Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms
Hiroshi Sasaki
Columbia University
sasaki@cs.columbia.edu
Miguel A. Arroyo
Columbia University
miguel@cs.columbia.edu
M. Tarek Ibn Ziad
Columbia University
mtarek@cs.columbia.edu
Koustubha Bhat†
Vrije Universiteit Amsterdam
k.bhat@vu.nl
Kanad Sinha
Columbia University
kanad@cs.columbia.edu
Simha Sethumadhavan
Columbia University
simha@cs.columbia.edu
ABSTRACT
Recent rapid strides in memory safety tools and hardware have improved software quality and security. While coarse-grained memory
safety has improved, achieving memory safety at the granularity
of individual objects remains a challenge due to high performance
overheads usually between ∼1.7x−2.2x. In this paper, we present a
novel idea called Califorms, and associated program observations, to
obtain a low overhead security solution for practical, byte-granular
memory safety.
The idea we build on is called memory blacklisting, which prohibits a program from accessing certain memory regions based on
program semantics. State of the art hardware-supported memory
blacklisting, while much faster than software blacklisting, creates
memory fragmentation (on the order of few bytes) for each use of
the blacklisted location. We observe that metadata used for blacklisting can be stored in dead spaces in a program’s data memory
and that this metadata can be integrated into the microarchitecture
by changing the cache line format. Using these observations, a Califorms based system proposed in this paper reduces the performance
overheads of memory safety to ∼1.02x−1.16x while providing bytegranular protection and maintaining very low hardware overheads.
Moreover, the fundamental idea of storing metadata in empty spaces
and changing cache line formats can be used for other security and
performance applications.
CCS CONCEPTS
• Security and privacy → Security in hardware; • Computer
systems organization → Architectures.
KEYWORDS
memory safety, memory blacklisting, caches
ACM Reference Format:
Hiroshi Sasaki, Miguel A. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, Koustubha Bhat†
,
Kanad Sinha, and Simha Sethumadhavan. 2019. Practical Byte-Granular
†Part of this work was carried out while the author was a visiting student at Columbia
University.
Permission to make digital or hard copies of all or part of this work for personal or
classroom use is granted without fee provided that copies are not made or distributed
for profit or commercial advantage and that copies bear this notice and the full citation
on the first page. Copyrights for components of this work owned by others than ACM
must be honored. Abstracting with credit is permitted. To copy otherwise, or republish,
to post on servers or to redistribute to lists, requires prior specific permission and/or a
fee. Request permissions from permissions@acm.org.
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
© 2019 Association for Computing Machinery.
ACM ISBN 978-1-4503-6938-1/19/10. . . $15.00
https://doi.org/10.1145/3352460.3358299
Memory Blacklisting using Califorms. In The 52nd Annual IEEE/ACM International Symposium on Microarchitecture (MICRO-52), October 12–16,
2019, Columbus, OH, USA. ACM, New York, NY, USA, 14 pages. https:
//doi.org/10.1145/3352460.3358299
1 INTRODUCTION
Historically, program memory safety violations have provided a
significant opportunity for exploitation by attackers: for instance,
Microsoft recently revealed that the root cause of more than half of
all exploits are software memory safety violations [30]. To address
this threat, software checking tools such as AddressSanitizer [25]
and commercial hardware support for memory safety such as Oracle’s ADI [21] and Intel’s MPX [20] have enabled programmers to
detect and fix memory safety violations before deploying software.
Current software and hardware-supported solutions excel at
providing coarse-grained, inter-object memory safety which involves detecting memory access beyond arrays and heap allocated
regions (malloc’d struct and class instances). However, they are not
suitable for fine-grained memory safety (i.e., intra-object memory
safety—detecting overflows within objects, such as fields within
a struct, or members within a class) due to the high performance
overheads and/or need for making intrusive changes to the source
code [29]. Some real-world scenarios where intra-object memory safety problems manifest are type confusion vulnerabilities
(e.g., CVE–2017–5115 [2]) and uninitialized data leaks through
padding bytes (e.g., CVE–2014–1444 [1]), both recognized as highimpact security classes [13, 16].
For instance, a recent work that aims to provide intra-object
overflow protection functionality incurs a 2.2x performance overhead [10]. These overheads are problematic because they not only
reduce the number of pre-deployment tests that can be performed,
but also impede post-deployment continuous monitoring, which
researchers have pointed out is necessary for detecting benign and
malicious memory safety violations [26]. Thus, a low overhead
memory safety solution that can enable continuous monitoring and
provide complete program safety has been elusive.
The source of overheads stem from how current designs store
and use metadata necessary for enforcing memory safety. In Intel
MPX [20], Hardbound [8], CHERI [31, 32], and PUMP [9], the metadata is stored for each pointer; each data or code memory access
through a pointer performs checks using the metadata. Since C/C++
memory accesses tend to be highly pointer based, the performance
and energy overheads of accessing metadata can be significant in
such systems. Furthermore, the management of metadata, especially if it is stored in a disjoint manner from the pointer, can also
create significant engineering complexity in terms of performance
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
0x0 0xD 0x1 0x5 0xE 0xA 0x5 0xE
0xF 0x0 0x0 0xD Header 0xF 0x0 0x0 0xD
0x0 0xD 0x1 0x5 0xE 0xA 0x5 0xE
Natural
Natural Natural
L2 Cache
L1D Cache
Califorms
Dead Byte
When dead bytes are present,
cache lines are califormed
When dead bytes are not present,
cache lines are preserved
Figure 1: Califorms offers memory safety by detecting accesses to dead bytes in memory. Dead bytes are not stored beyond the L1 data cache and identified using a special header
in the L2 cache (and beyond) resulting in very low overhead.
The conversion between these formats happens when lines
are filled or spilled between the L1 and L2 caches. The absence of dead bytes results in the cache lines stored in the
same natural format across the memory system.
and usability. This was evidenced by the fact that compilers like
LLVM and GCC dropped support for Intel MPX in their mainline
after an initial push to integrate it into the toolchain [20].
Our approach for reducing overheads is two-fold. First, instead
of checking access bounds for each pointer access, we blacklist
all memory locations that should never be accessed. This reduces
the additional work for memory safety such as comparing bounds.
Second, we propose a novel metadata storage scheme for storing
blacklisted information. We observe that by using dead memory
spaces in the program, we can store metadata needed for memory safety for free for nearly half of the program objects. These
dead spaces can occur for several reasons including language alignment requirements. When we cannot find naturally occurring dead
spaces, we manually insert them. The overhead due to this dead
space is smaller than traditional methods for storing metadata because of how we represent the metadata: our metadata is smaller
(one byte) as opposed to multiple bytes with traditional whitelisting
or blacklisting memory safety techniques.
A natural question is how the dead (more commonly referred
to as padding) bytes can be distinguished from normal bytes in
memory. A straightforward scheme results in one bit of additional
storage per byte to identify if a byte is a dead byte; this scheme
results in a space overhead of 12.5%. We reduce this overhead to
one bit per 64B cache line (0.2% overhead) without any loss of
precision by only reformatting how data is stored in cache lines.
Our technique, Califorms, uses one bit of additional storage to
identify if the cache line associated with the memory contains any
dead bytes. For califormed cache lines, i.e., lines which contain
dead bytes, the actual data is stored following the “header”, which
indicates the location of dead bytes, as shown in Figure 1.
With this support, it is easy to describe how a Califorms based
system for memory safety works. Dead bytes, either naturally harvested or manually inserted, are used to indicate memory regions
that should never be accessed by a program (i.e., blacklisting). If an
attacker accesses these regions, we detect this rogue access without
any additional metadata accesses as our metadata resides inline.
Pointer
✘ Buffer
✔
Begin
End
Begin
End
(a) Disjoint metadata
whitelisting.
Pointer
✘ Buffer_A
✔
Buffer_B
A
B
A
Color
Tags
(b) Cojoined metadata
whitelisting.
Pointer
Buffer
Tripwire
Tripwire
✘
✔
(c) Inlined metadata
blacklisting.
Figure 2: Three main classes of hardware solutions for memory safety.
In theory, perfect blacklisting is a strictly weaker form of security than perfect whitelisting, but blacklisting is a more practical
alternative because of its ease of deployment and low overheads.
Informally, whitelisting techniques are applied partially to reduce
overheads and maintain backward compatibility which reduces
their security, while blacklisting techniques can be applied more
broadly and thus offer more coverage due to their low overheads.
Additionally, blacklisting techniques complement defenses in existing systems better since they do not require intrusive changes.
Our experimental results on the SPEC CPU2006 benchmark suite
indicate that the overheads of Califorms are quite low: software
overheads range from 2 to 14% slowdown (or alternatively, 1.02x
to 1.16x performance overhead) depending on the amount and
location of padding bytes used. Varying the number of padding
bytes provides functionality for the user/customer to tune the security according to their performance requirements. Hardware
induced overheads are also negligible, on average less than 1%. All
of the software transformations are performed using the LLVM
compiler framework using a front-end source-to-source transformation. These overheads are substantially lower compared to the
state-of-the-art software or hardware supported schemes (viz., 2.2x
performance and 1.1x memory overheads for EffectiveSan [10], and
1.7x performance and 2.1x memory overheads for Intel MPX [20]).
2 BACKGROUND
Hardware support for memory safety can be broadly categorized
into the following three classes as presented in Figure 2.
Disjoint Metadata Whitelisting. This class of techniques, also
called base and bounds, attaches bounds metadata with every
pointer, bounding the region of memory they can legitimately
dereference (see Figure 2(a)). Hardbound [8], proposed in 2008,
provides spatial memory safety using this mechanism. Intel
MPX [20], productized in 2016, is similar and introduces an explicit
architectural interface (registers and instructions) for managing
bounds information. Temporal memory safety was introduced to
this scheme by storing an additional “version” information along
with the pointer metadata and verifying that no stale versions are
ever retrieved [18, 19]. BOGO [33] adds temporal memory safety to
MPX by invalidating all pointers to freed regions in MPX’s lookup
table. Introduced about 35 years ago in commercial chips like
Intel 432 and IBM System/38, CHERI [32] revived capability based
Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
architectures with similar bounds-checking guarantees, in addition
to having other metadata fields (e.g., permissions).1 PUMP [9],
on the other hand, is a general-purpose framework for metadata
propagation, and can be used for propagating pointer bounds.
One advantage of per pointer metadata stored separately from
the pointer in a shadow memory region is that it allows compatibility with codes that use legacy pointer layouts. Typically, metadata
storage overhead scales according to the number of pointers in
principle but implementations generally reserve a fixed chunk of
memory for easy lookup. Owing to this disjoint nature, metadata access requires additional memory operations, which some proposals
seek to minimize with caching and other optimizations. Regardless, disjoint metadata introduces atomicity concerns potentially
resulting in false positives and negatives or complicating coherence
designs at the least (e.g., MPX is not thread-safe). Explicit specification of bounds per pointer also allows bounds-narrowing in
principle, wherein pointer bounds can be tailored to protect individual elements in a composite memory object. However, commercial
compilers do not support this feature for MPX due to the complexity
of compiler analyses required. Furthermore, compatibility issues
with untreated modules (e.g., unprotected libraries) also introduces
real-world deployability concerns for these techniques. For instance
MPX drops its bounds when protected pointers are modified by
unprotected modules, while CHERI does not support it at all. MPX
additionally makes bounds checking explicit, thus introducing a
marginal computational overhead to bounds management as well.
Cojoined Metadata Whitelisting. Originally introduced in the
IBM System/370 mainframes, this mechanism assigns a “color” to
memory chunks when they are allocated, and the same color to the
pointer used to access that region. The runtime check for access
validity simply consists of comparing the colors of the pointer and
accessed memory (see Figure 2(b)).
This technique is currently commercially deployed by Oracle
as ADI [21],2 which uses higher order bits in pointers to store the
color. In ADI, color information associated with memory is stored
in dedicated per line metadata bits while in cache and in extra ECC
bits while in memory [26]. The use of ECC bits creates a restriction
on the number of colors, however, if the colors can fit into ECC,
metadata storage does not occupy any additional memory in the
program’s address space.3 Additionally, since metadata bits are
acquired along with concomitant data, extra memory operations
are obviated. For the same reason, it is also compatible with unprotected modules since the checks are implicit as well. Temporal
safety is achieved by assigning a different color when memory
regions are reused. However, intra-object protection or boundsnarrowing is not supported as there is no means for “overlapping”
colors. Furthermore, protection is also dependent on the number of
metadata bits employed, since it determines the number of colors
that can be assigned. So, while color reuse allows ADI to scale and
limit metadata storage overhead, it can also be exploited by this
1A recent version of CHERI [31], however, manages to compress metadata to 128 bits
and changes pointer layout to store it with the pointer value (i.e., implementing base
and bounds as cojoined metadata whitelisting), accordingly introducing instructions
to manipulate them specifically.
2ARM has a similar upcoming Memory Tagging feature [3], whose implementation
details are unclear, as of this work.
3However, when a memory is swapped color bits are copied into memory by the OS.
vector. Another disadvantage of this technique, specifically due to
inlining metadata in pointers, is that it only supports 64-bit architectures. Narrower pointers would not have enough spare bits to
accommodate color information.
Inlined Metadata Blacklisting. Another line of work, also referred to as tripwires, aims to detect overflows by simply blacklisting a patch of memory on either side of a buffer, and flagging
accesses to this patch (see Figure 2(c)). This is very similar to contemporary canary design [6], but there are a few critical differences.
First, canaries only detect overwrites, not overreads. Second, hardware tripwires trigger instantaneously, whereas canaries need to
be periodically checked for integrity, providing a period of attack
to time of use window. Finally, unlike hardware tripwires, canary
values can be leaked or tampered, and thus mimicked.
SafeMem [23] implements tripwires by repurposing ECC bits in
memory to mark memory regions invalid, thus trading off reliability
for security. On processors supporting speculative execution, however, it might be possible to speculatively fetch blacklisted lines into
the cache without triggering a faulty memory exception. Unless
these lines are flushed immediately after, SafeMem’s blacklisting
feature can be trivially bypassed. Alternatively, REST [28] achieves
the same by storing a predetermined large random number, in the
form of a 8–64B token, in the memory to be blacklisted. Violations
are detected by comparing cache lines with the token when they are
fetched. REST provides temporal memory safety by quarantining
freed memory, and not reusing them for subsequent allocations.
Compatibility with unprotected modules is easily achieved as well,
since tokens are part of the program’s address space and all access
are implicitly checked. However, intra-object safety is not supported
by REST owing to fragmentation overhead such heavy usage of
tokens would entail.
Since Califorms operates on the principle of detecting memory
accesses to dead bytes, which are in turn stored along with program
data, it belongs to the inlined metadata class of defenses. However,
it is different from other works in the class in one key aspect—
granularity. While both REST and SafeMem naturally blacklist at
the cache line granularity, Califorms can do so at the byte granularity. It is this property that enables us to provide intra-object safety
with negligible performance and memory overheads, unlike previous work in the area. For inter-object spatial safety and temporal
safety, we employ the same design principles as REST. Hence, our
safety guarantees are a strict superset of those provided by previous
schemes in this class (spatial memory safety by blacklisting and
temporal memory safety by quarantining).
3 MOTIVATION
One of the key ways in which we mitigate the overheads for finegrained memory safety is by opportunistically harvesting padding
bytes in programs to store metadata. So how often do these occur
in programs? Before we answer the question let us concretely understand padding bytes with an example. Consider the struct A
defined in Listing 1(a). Let us say the compiler inserts a three-byte
padding in between char c and int i as in Listing 1(b) because of
the C language requirement that integers should be padded to their
natural size (which we assume to be four bytes here). These types
of paddings are not limited to C/C++ but also required by many
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
struct A {
char c;
int i;
char buf[64];
void (*fp)();
}
(a) Original.
struct A_opportunistic {
char c;
/* compiler inserts padding
* bytes for alignment */
char padding_bytes[3];
int i;
char buf[64];
void (*fp)();
}
(b) Opportunistic.
struct A_full {
/* we protect every field with
* random security bytes */
char security_bytes[2];
char c;
char security_bytes[1];
int i;
char security_bytes[3];
char buf[64];
char security_bytes[2];
void (*fp)();
char security_bytes[1];
}
(c) Full.
struct A_intelligent {
char c;
int i;
/* we protect boundaries
* of arrays and pointers with
* random security bytes */
char security_bytes[3];
char buf[64];
char security_bytes[2];
void (*fp)();
char security_bytes[3];
}
(d) Intelligent.
Listing 1: (a) Original source code and examples of three security bytes harvesting strategies: (b) opportunistic uses the existing
padding bytes as security bytes, (c) full protect every field within the struct with security bytes, and (d) intelligent surrounds
arrays and pointers with security bytes.
0.0 0.1 0.2 0.3 0.4 0.5 0.6 0.7 0.8 0.9 1.0
Struct density
0.0
0.2
0.4
0.6
0.8
Fraction of structs
(a) SPEC CPU2006 C and C++
benchmarks.
0.0 0.1 0.2 0.3 0.4 0.5 0.6 0.7 0.8 0.9 1.0
Struct density
0.0
0.2
0.4
0.6
0.8
Fraction of structs
(b) V8 JavaScript engine.
Figure 3: Struct density histogram of SPEC CPU2006 benchmarks and the V8 JavaScript engine. More than 40% of the
structs have at least one padding byte.
other languages and their runtime implementations. To obtain a
quantitative estimate on the amount of paddings, we developed a
compiler pass to statically collect the padding size information. Figure 3 presents the histogram of struct densities for SPEC CPU2006
C and C++ benchmarks and the V8 JavaScript engine. Struct density
is defined as the sum of the size of each field divided by the total
size of the struct including the padding bytes (i.e., the smaller or
sparse the struct density the more padding bytes the struct has).
The results reveal that 45.7% and 41.0% of structs within SPEC and
V8, respectively, have at least one byte of padding. This is encouraging since even without introducing additional padding bytes (no
memory overhead), we can offer protection for certain compound
data types restricting the remaining attack surface.
Naturally, one might inquire about the safety for the rest of
the program. To offer protection for all defined compound data
types, we can insert random sized padding bytes, also referred to
as security bytes, between every field of a struct or member of a
class as in Listing 1(c) (full strategy). Random sized security bytes
are chosen to provide a probabilistic defense as fixed sized security
bytes can be jumped over by an attacker once she identifies the
actual size (and the exact memory layout). By carefully choosing the
minimum and maximum of random sizes, we can keep the average
size of security bytes small (few bytes). Intuitively, the higher the
unpredictability (or randomness) within the memory layout, the
higher the security level we can offer.
While the full strategy provides the widest coverage, not all of the
security bytes provide the same security utility. For example, basic
data types such as char and int cannot be easily overflowed past
their bounds. The idea behind the intelligent insertion strategy is to
Slowdown
0%
2%
4%
6%
8%
1B 2B 3B 4B 5B 6B 7B
Figure 4: Average performance overhead with additional
paddings (one byte to seven bytes) inserted for every field
within structs (and classes) of SPEC CPU2006 C and C++
benchmarks.
prioritize insertion of security bytes into security-critical locations
as shown in Listing 1(d). We choose data types which are most prone
to abuse by an attacker via overflow type accesses: (1) arrays and (2)
data and function pointers. In Listing 1(d), the array buf[64] and
the function pointer fp are protected with random sized security
bytes. While it is possible to utilize padding bytes present between
other data types without incurring memory overheads, doing so
would come at an additional performance overhead.
In comparison to opportunistic harvesting, the other more secure
strategies (full and intelligent) come at an additional performance
overhead. We analyze the performance trend in order to decide how
many security bytes can be reasonably inserted. For this purpose
we developed an LLVM pass which pads every field of a struct
and member of a class with fixed size paddings. We measure
the performance of SPEC CPU2006 benchmarks by varying the
padding size from one byte to seven bytes (since eight bytes is the
finest granularity that state-of-the-art technique can offer [28]). The
detailed evaluation environment and methodology are described
later in Section 10.
Figure 4 demonstrates the average slowdown when inserting
additional bytes for harvesting. As expected, we can see the performance overheads grow as we increase the padding size, mainly due
to ineffective cache usage. On average the slowdown is 3.0% for
one byte and 7.6% for seven bytes of padding. The figure presents
the ideal (lower bound) performance overhead when fully inserting
security bytes into compound data types; the hardware and software modifications we introduce add additional overheads on top
of these numbers. We strive to provide a mechanism that allows
the user to tune the security level at the cost of performance and
thus explore several security byte insertion strategies to reduce the
performance overhead in the paper.
Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
4 THREAT MODEL
We assume a threat model comparable to that used in contemporary related works [28, 31, 32]. We assume the victim program to
have one or more vulnerabilities that an attacker can exploit to
gain arbitrary read and write capabilities in the memory; our goal
is to prevent both spatial and temporal memory violations. Furthermore, we assume that the adversary has access to the source
code of the program, therefore she is able to glean all source-level
information. However, she does not have access to the host binary
(e.g., server-side applications). Finally, we assume that all hardware
is trusted—it does not contain and/or is not subject to bugs arising
from exploits such as physical or glitching attacks. Due to its recent
rise in relevance however, we maintain side-channel attacks in our
design of Califorms within the purview of our threats. Specifically,
we accommodate attack vectors seeking to leak the location and
value of security bytes.
5 FULL SYSTEM OVERVIEW
The Califorms framework consists of multiple components we discuss in the following sections:
Architecture Support. A new instruction called BLOC, mnemonic
for Blacklist LOCations, that blacklists memory locations at byte
granularity and raises a privileged exception upon misuse of blacklisted locations (Section 6).
Microarchitecture Design. New cache line formats, or Califorms,
that enable low cost access to the metadata—we propose different
Califorms for L1 cache vs. L2 cache and beyond (Section 7).
Software Design. Compiler, memory allocator and operating system extensions which insert the security bytes at compile time and
manages them via the BLOC instruction at runtime (Section 8).
At compile time, each compound data type (struct or class) is
examined and security bytes are added according to a user defined
insertion policy viz. opportunistic, full or intelligent, by a sourceto-source translation pass. At execution time when compound data
type instances are dynamically created in the heap, we use a new
version of malloc that issues BLOC instructions to arrange the security bytes after the space is allocated. When the BLOC instruction
is executed, the cache line format is transformed at the L1 cache
controller (assuming a cache miss) and is inserted into the L1 data
cache. Upon an L1 eviction, the L1 cache controller transforms the
cache line to meet the Califorms of the L2 cache.
While we add additional metadata storage to the caches, we
refrain from doing so for main memory and persistent storage to
keep the changes local within the CPU core. When a califormed
cache line is evicted from the last-level cache to main memory,
we keep the cache line califormed and store the additional one
metadata bit into spare ECC bits similar to Oracle’s ADI [21, 26].4
When a page is swapped out from main memory, the page fault
handler stores the metadata for all the cache lines within the page
into a reserved address space managed by the operating system;
the metadata is reclaimed upon swap in. Therefore, our design
keeps the cache line format califormed throughout the memory
hierarchy. A califormed cache line is un-califormed only when the
4ADI stores four bits of metadata per cache line for allocation granularity enforcement
while Califorms stores one bit for sub-allocation granularity enforcement.
Table 1: BLOC instruction K-map. X represents “Don’t Care”.
R2, R3
X, Allow Set, Allow Set, Allow
Initial
Regular Byte Regular Byte Exception Security Byte
Security Byte Security Byte Regular Byte Exception
corresponding bytes cross the boundary where the califormed data
cannot be understood by the other end, such as writing to I/O
(e.g., pipe, filesystem or network socket). Finally, when an object is
freed, the freed bytes are filled with security bytes and quarantined
for offering temporal memory safety. At runtime, when a rogue load
or store accesses a security byte the hardware returns a privileged,
precise security exception to the next privilege level which can take
any appropriate action including terminating the program.
6 ARCHITECTURE SUPPORT
6.1 BLOC Instruction
The format of the instruction is “BLOC R1, R2, R3”. The value in
register R1 points to the starting (64B cache line aligned) address
in the virtual address space, denoting the start of the 64B chunk
which fits in a single cache line. Table 1 represents a K-map for the
BLOC instruction. The value in register R2 indicates the attributes
of said region represented in a bit vector format (1 to set and 0
to unset the security byte). The value in register R3 is a mask to
the corresponding 64B region, where 1 allows and 0 disallows
changing the state of the corresponding byte. The mask is used
to perform partial updates of metadata within a cache line. We
throw a privileged exception when the BLOC instruction tries to set
a security byte to an existing security byte, or unset a security byte
from a normal byte.
The BLOC instruction is treated similarly to a store instruction
in the processor pipeline since it modifies the architectural state of
data bytes in a cache line. It first fetches the corresponding cache
line into the L1 data cache upon an L1 miss (assuming a write
allocate cache policy). Next, it manipulates the bits in the metadata
storage to appropriately set or unset the security bytes.
6.2 Privileged Exceptions
When the hardware detects an access violation (i.e., access to a
security byte), it throws a privileged exception once the instruction
becomes non-speculative. There are some library functions which
violate the aforementioned operations on security bytes such as
memcpy so we need a way to suppress the exceptions. In order
to whitelist such functions, we manipulate the exception mask
registers and let the exception handler decide whether to suppress
the exception or not. Although privileged exception handling is
more expensive than handling user-level exceptions (because it
requires a context switch to the kernel), we stick with the former to
limit the attack surface. We rely on the fact that the exception itself
is a rare event and would have negligible effect on performance.
7 MICROARCHITECTURE DESIGN
The microarchitectural support for our technique aims to keep
the common case fast: L1 cache uses the straightforward scheme
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
[0]
1bit
8B
Security byte?
Add’l storage
[0]
64B
Cache line (data)
1B
[1] [63]
1
[1] [63]
Figure 5: Califorms-bitvector: L1 Califorms implementation
using a bit vector that indicates whether each byte is a security byte. HW overhead of 8B per 64B cache line. Address Decoder Address Decoder
Data
Array
Tag
Array
Metadata
Array
O
ffset Index Tag etc.
Califorms
Checker Way Mux
Aligner
Address calc =
Exception? Hit/Miss
Data
Figure 6: Pipeline diagram for the L1 cache hit operation.
The shaded blocks correspond to Califorms components.
of having one bit of additional storage per byte. All califormed
cache lines are converted to the straightforward scheme at the
L1 data cache controller so that typical loads and stores which
hit in the L1 cache do not have to perform address calculations
to figure out the location of original data (which is required for
Califorms of L2 cache and beyond). This design decision guarantees
that the common case latencies will not be affected due to security
functionality. Beyond the L1, the data is stored in the optimized
califormed format, i.e., one bit of additional storage for the entire
cache line. The transformation happens when the data is filled in
or spilled from the L1 data cache (between the L1 and L2), and adds
minimal latency to the L1 miss latency.
7.1 L1 Cache: Bit Vector Approach
To satisfy the L1 design goal we consider a naive (but low latency)
approach which uses a bit vector to identify which bytes are security bytes in a cache line. Each bit of the bit vector corresponds to
each byte of the cache line and represents its state (normal byte
or security byte). Figure 5 presents a schematic view of this implementation califorms-bitvector. The bit vector requires a 64-bit (8B)
bit vector per 64B cache line which adds 12.5% storage overhead
for the L1 data cache (comparable to ECC overhead for reliability).
Figure 6 shows the L1 data cache hit path modifications for
Califorms. If a load accesses a security byte (which is determined
by reading the bit vector) an exception is recorded to be processed
when the load is ready to be committed. Meanwhile, the load returns
a pre-determined value for the security byte (in our design the
value zero which is the value that the memory region is initialized
to upon deallocation). Returning this fixed value is meant to be
[4] [63]
64B
Cache line (data)
4B
Line califormed?
1bit
Add’l
storage
1
[0] [3] [5] [62]
[0] [1] [2] [3]
# of security
bytes
00: 1
01: 2
10: 3
11: 4+
00 Addr0
01 Addr0 Addr1
10 Addr0 Addr1 Addr2
11 Addr0 Addr1 Addr2 Addr3 Sentinel
2bit
6bit
[1] [2]
[1] [2] [3]
[2] [3]
[3]
Figure 7: Califorms-sentinel that stores a bit vector in security byte locations. HW overhead of 1-bit per 64B cache line.
a countermeasure against speculative side-channel attacks that
seek to identify security byte locations (discussed in greater detail
in Section 9). On store accesses to security bytes, we report an
exception when the store commits.
7.2 L2 Cache and Beyond: Sentinel Approach
For L2 and beyond, we take a different approach that allows us
to recognize whether each byte is a security byte with fewer bits, as
using the L1 metadata format throughout the system will increase
the cache area overhead by 12.5%, which may not be acceptable.
We propose califorms-sentinel, which has a 1-bit or 0.2% metadata
overhead per 64B cache line. For main memory, we store the additional bit per cache line size in the DRAM ECC spare bits, thus
completely removing any cycle time impact on DRAM access or
modifications to the DIMM architecture.
The key insight that enables the savings is the following observation: the number of bits required to address all the bytes in a cache
line, which is six bits for a 64 byte cache line, is less than a single byte.
For example, let us assume that there is (at least) one security byte
in a 64B cache line. Considering a byte granular protection there are
at most 63 unique values (bytes) that non-security bytes can have.
Therefore, we are guaranteed to find a six bit pattern that is not
present in any of the normal bytes’, for instance least significant,
six bits. We use this pattern as a sentinel value to represent the
security bytes in the cache line. Now if we store this six bit (sentinel
value) as additional metadata, the storage overhead will be seven
bits (six bits plus one bit to specify if the cache line is califormed)
per cache line. In this paper we further propose a new cache line
format which stores the sentinel value within a security byte to
reduce the metadata overhead down to one bit per cache line.
As presented in Figure 7, califorms-sentinel stores the metadata
into the first four bytes (at most) of the 64B cache line. Two bits
of the first (0th) byte are used to specify the number of security
bytes within the cache line: 00, 01, 10 and 11 represent one, two,
three, and four or more security bytes, respectively. The sentinel
is used only when we have more than four security bytes. If there
is only one security byte in the cache line, we use the remaining
six bits of the 0th byte to specify the location of the security byte,
and the original value of the 0th byte is stored in the security byte.
Similarly when there is two or three security bytes in the cache line,
Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
[63]
[1]
[0]
L1 Califorms Metadata
L2 Califorms
Metadata
64
Mask Mask Mask
Find
index
of 1st
bit of
value 1
Find
index
of 1st
bit of
value 1
Find
index
of 1st
bit of
value 1
Find
index
of 1st
bit of
value 1
Cross Bar &
Combinational
Logic
L2 Cache Line Data
6 6 6 6
1st Sec. Byte 2nd Sec. Byte 3rd Sec. Byte 4th Sec. Byte
7 11
1 3 5
Decoder
6 x 64 [0]
[1]
[63]
[63]
[1]
[0]
6bit
2bit
6bit
6bit
Decoder
6 x 64
Decoder
6 x 64
Find
index
of 1st
bit of
value 0
64
1: used
0: unused
6
Sentinel Value
L1 Cache Line Data
Data of 1st 4 Bytes
12
9 13 14 15
[0]
[1]
[63]
8
Figure 8: Logic diagram for Califorms conversion from the L1 cache (califorms-bitvector) to L2 cache (califorms-sentinel).
The shaded blocks are constructed using 64 shift blocks followed by a single comparator. The circled numbers refer to the
corresponding steps in Algorithm 1.
1: Read the Califorms metadata for the evicted line and OR them
2: if result is 0 then
3: Evict the line as is and set Califorms bit to zero
4: else
5: Set Califorms bit to one
6: if num security bytes (N) < 4 then
7: Get locations of first N security bytes
8: Store data of first N bytes in locations obtained in 7
9: Fill the first N bytes based on Figure 7
10: else
11: Get locations of first four security bytes
12: Scan least 6-bit of every byte to determine sentinel
13: Store data of first four bytes in locations obtained in 11
14: Fill the first four bytes based on Figure 7
15: Use the sentinel to mark the remaining security bytes
16: end
17: end
Algorithm 1: Califorms conversion from the L1 cache
(califorms-bitvector) to L2 cache (califorms-sentinel).
we use the bits of the second and third bytes to locate them. The
key observation is that, we gain two bits per security byte since we
only need six bits to specify a location in the cache line. Therefore
when we have four security bytes, we can locate four addresses and
have six bits remaining in the first four bytes. This remaining six
bits can be used to store a sentinel value, which allows us to have
any number of additional security bytes.
Although the sentinel value depends on the actual values within
the 64B cache line, it works naturally with a write-allocate L1
cache (which is the most commonly used cache allocation policy
in modern microprocessors). The cache line format is transformed
upon L1 cache eviction and insertion (califorms-bitvector to/from
califorms-sentinel), while the sentinel value only needs to be found
upon L1 cache eviction (L1 miss). Also, it is important to note that
califorms-sentinel supports critical-word first delivery since the
security byte locations can be quickly retrieved by scanning only
the first 4B of the first 16B flit.
7.3 L1 to/from L2 Califorms Conversion
Figure 8 and Algorithm 1 show the logic diagram and the high-level
process of the spill (L1 to L2 conversion) module, respectively. The
circled numbers in the figure refer to the corresponding steps in
the algorithm. There are four components presented in the figure.
From the left, the first block details the process of determining the
sentinel value (line 12). We scan the least 6-bits of every byte, decode
them, and OR the output to construct a used-values vector. The usedvalues vector is then processed by a “find-index” block to get the
sentinel value. The find-index block takes a 64-bit input vector
[0]
2bit
F
[1]
[2]
[3]
Decoder
6 x 64
Decoder
6 x 64
Decoder
6 x 64
Decoder
6 x 64
6bit
Addr0
6bit
Addr1
6bit
Addr2
6bit
Addr3
En0
En1
En2
En3
[63]
[1]
[0]
6bit
Sentinel
G Sentinel?
L2 Cache Line Data
L1 Califorms
Metadata
L2 Califorms Metadata
Califormed?
[63]
6bit
[0]
[1]
[2]
[3]
[63]
L1 Cache Line Data
Zeros
L2[63]
L1Meta[63]
Zeros
L2[Addr3]
L1Meta[3]
Zeros
L2[Addr2]
L1Meta[2]
Zeros
L2[Addr1]
L1Meta[1]
Zeros
L2[Addr0]
L1Meta[0]
[2]
[3]
[4]
Blocks F (if 2-bit matches 00, 01, 10 or 11)
and G (if 6-bit matches the sentinel) are
constructed using logic comparators
5 6 7
8 9
En3
0
1
0
1
0
1
0
1
0
1
Figure 9: Logic diagram of Califorms conversion from the L2
cache (califorms-sentinel) to L1 cache (califorms-bitvector).
The shaded block F and G consist of four and 60 comparators,
respectively. The circled numbers refer to the corresponding
steps in Algorithm 2.
1: Read the Califorms bit for the inserted line
2: if result is 0 then
3: Set the Califorms metadata bit vector to [0]
4: else
5: Check the least significant 2-bit of byte 0
6: Set the metadata of byte[Addr[0-3]] to one based on 6
7: Set the metadata of byte[Addr[byte==sentinel]] to one
8: Set the data of byte[0-3] to byte[Addr[0-3]]
9: Set the new locations of byte[Addr[0-3]] to zero
10: end
Algorithm 2: Califorms conversion from the L2 cache
(califorms-sentinel) to L1 cache (califorms-bitvector).
and searches for the index of the first zero value. It is constructed
using 64 shift blocks followed by a single comparator. In the second
block, L1 cache (califorms-bitvector) metadata for the evicted line
is ORed to construct the L2 cache (califorms-sentinel) metadata. The
third block shows the logic for getting the locations of the first
four security bytes (lines 7 and 11). It consists of four successive
combinational find-index blocks (each detecting one security byte)
in our evaluated design. This logic can be easily pipelined into four
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
stages if needed, to completely hide the latency of the spill process
in the pipeline. Finally in the last block, we form the L2 cache line
based on Figure 7.
Figure 9 shows the logic diagram for the fill (L2 to L1 conversion)
module, as summarized in Algorithm 2. The shaded blocks F and
G are constructed using logic comparators. The one bit metadata of
L2 Califorms is used to control the value of the L1 cache (califormsbitvector) metadata. The first two bits of the L2 cache line are used
as inputs for the comparators (block F) to detect how many security
bytes the cache line contain. Block F outputs four signals (En0 to
En3) which enable the four decoders. Only if those two bits are 11,
the sentinel value is read from the fourth byte and fed, with the
least 6-bits of each byte, to 60 comparators simultaneously to set
the rest of the L1 metadata bits. Such parallelization reduces the
latency impact of the fill process.
7.4 Load/Store Queue Modifications
Since the BLOC instruction updates the architectural state, it is functionally a store instruction and handled as such in the pipeline.
However, there is a key difference: unlike a store instruction, the
BLOC instruction should not forward the value to a younger load instruction whose address matches within the load/store queue (LSQ)
but instead return the value zero. This functionality is required
to provide tamper-resistance against side-channel attacks. Additionally, upon an address match, both load and store instructions
subsequent to an in flight BLOC instruction are marked for Califorms
exception; exception is thrown when the instruction is committed
to avoid any false positives due to misspeculation.
In order to detect an address match in the LSQ with a BLOC
instruction, first a cache line address should be matched with all
the younger instructions. Subsequently upon a match, the value
stored in the LSQ for the BLOC instruction which contains the mask
value (to set/unset security bytes) is used to confirm the final match.
To facilitate a match with a BLOC instruction, each LSQ entry should
be associated with a bit to indicate whether the entry contains a
BLOC instruction. Detecting a complete match may take multiple
cycles, however, a legitimate load/store instruction should never
be forwarded a value from a BLOC instruction, and thus the storeto-load forwarding from a BLOC instruction is not on the critical
path of the program (i.e., its latency should not affect performance),
and we do not evaluate its effect in our evaluation. Alternately, if
LSQ modifications are to be avoided, the BLOC instructions can be
surrounded by memory serializing instructions (i.e., ensure that
BLOC instructions are the only in flight memory instructions).
8 SOFTWARE DESIGN
We describe the memory allocator, compiler and the operating
system changes to support Califorms in the following.
8.1 Dynamic Memory Management
We can consider two approaches to applying security bytes: (1)
Dirty-before-use. Unallocated memory has no security bytes. We
set security bytes upon allocation and unset them upon deallocation;
or (2) Clean-before-use. Unallocated memory remains filled with
security bytes all the time. We clear the security bytes (in legitimate
data locations) upon allocation and set them upon deallocation.
Ensuring temporal memory safety in the heap remains a nontrivial problem [30]. We therefore choose to follow a clean-beforeuse approach in the heap, so that deallocated memory regions remain protected by security bytes.5
In order to provide temporal
memory safety (to mitigate use-after-free exploits), we do not reallocate recently freed regions until the heap is sufficiently consumed
(quarantining). Additionally, both ends of the heap allocated regions
are protected by security bytes in order to provide inter-object memory safety. Compared to the heap, the security benefits are limited
for the stack since temporal attacks on the stack (e.g., use-afterreturn attacks) are much rarer. Hence, we apply the dirty-before-use
scheme on the stack.
8.2 Compiler Support
Our compiler-based instrumentation infers where to place security
bytes within target objects, based on their type layout information.
The compiler pass supports three insertion policies: the first opportunistic policy supports security bytes insertion into existing
padding bytes within the objects, and the other two support modifying object layouts to introduce randomly sized security byte spans
that follow the full or intelligent strategies described in Section 3.
The first policy aims at retaining interoperability with external code
modules (e.g., shared libraries) by avoiding type layout modification. Where this is not a concern, the latter two policies help offer
stronger security coverage—exhibiting a tradeoff between security
and performance.
8.3 Operating System Support
We need the following support in the operating system:
Privileged Exceptions. As the Califorms exception is privileged,
the operating system needs to properly handle it as with other
privileged exceptions (e.g., page faults). We also assume the faulting
address is passed in an existing register so that it can be used
for reporting/investigation purposes. Additionally, for the sake of
usability and backwards compatibility, we have to accommodate
copying operations similar in nature to memcpy. For example, a
simple struct to struct assignment could trigger this behavior,
thus leading to a potential breakdown of software with Califorms
support. Hence, in order to maintain usability, we allow whitelisting
functionality to suppress the exceptions. This can either be done
with a privileged store (requiring a syscall) or an unprivileged store.
Both options represent different design points in the performancesecurity tradeoff spectrum.
Page Swaps. As we have discussed in Section 5, data with security
bytes is stored in main memory in a califormed format. When a
page with califormed data is swapped out from main memory, the
page fault handler needs to store the metadata for the entire page
into a reserved address space managed by the operating system;
the metadata is reclaimed upon swap in. The kernel has enough
address space in practice (kernel’s virtual address space is 128TB
for a 64-bit Linux with 48-bit virtual address space) to store the
5
It is natural to use a variant of BLOC instruction which bypasses (does not store into)
the L1 data cache, just like the non-temporal (or streaming) load/store instructions
(e.g., MOVNTI, MOVNTQ, etc) when deallocating a memory region; deallocated region is
not meant to be used by the program and thus polluting the L1 data cache with those
memory is harmful and should be avoided. However, we do not evaluate the use of
such instructions in this paper.
Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
metadata for all the processes on the system since the size of the
metadata is minimal (8B for a 4KB page or 0.2%).
9 SECURITY DISCUSSION
9.1 Hardware Attacks and Mitigations
Metadata Tampering Attacks. A key feature of Califorms is the
absence of metadata that is accessible by the program via regular load-stores. This makes our technique immune to attacks that
explicitly aim to leak or tamper metadata to bypass the defense.
This, in turn, implies a smaller attack surface as far as software
maintenance/isolation of metadata is concerned.
Bit-Granular Attacks. Califorms’s capability of fine-grained
memory protection is the key enabler for intra-object overflow
detection. However, our byte granular mechanism is not enough
for protecting bit-fields without turning them into char bytes
functionally. This should not be a major detraction since security
bytes can still be added around composites of bit-fields.
Side-Channel Attacks. Our design takes multiple steps to be resilient to side-channel attacks. Firstly, we purposefully avoid having
our hardware modifications introduce timing variances to avoid
timing based side-channel attacks. Additionally, to avoid speculative execution side channels ala Spectre [15], our design returns
zero on a load to camouflage security byte with normal data, thus
preventing speculative disclosure of metadata. We augment this further by requiring that deallocated objects (heap or stack) be zeroed
out in software [17]. This is to reduce the chances of the following
attack scenario: consider a case if the attacker somehow knows that
the padding locations should contain a non-zero value (for instance,
because she knows the object allocated at the same location prior
to the current object had non-zero values). However, while speculatively disclosing memory contents of the object, she discovers that
the padding location contains a zero instead. As such, she can infer
that the padding there contains a security byte. If deallocations
were accompanied with zeroing, however, this assumption can be
made with a lower likelihood. Hence, making Califorms return a
fixed value (zero), complemented by software actively zeroing out
unused locations, reduces the attacker’s probability of speculatively
predicting security byte locations, as well as leaking its exact value.
9.2 Software Attacks and Mitigations
Coverage-Based Attacks. For emitting BLOC instructions to work
on the padding bytes (in an object), we need to know the precise
type information of the allocated object. This is not always possible
in C-style programs where void* allocations may be used. In these
cases, the compiler may not be able to infer the correct type, in
which case intra-object support may be skipped for such allocations.
Similarly, our metadata insertion policies (viz., intelligent and full)
require changes to the type layouts. This means that interactions
with external modules that have not been compiled with Califorms
support may need (de)serialization to remain compatible. For an
attacker, such points in execution may appear lucrative because of
inserted security bytes getting stripped away in those short periods.
We note however that the opportunistic policy can still remain
in place to offer some protection. On the other hand, for those
interactions that remain oblivious to type layout modifications
(e.g., passing a pointer to an object that shall remain opaque within
the external module), our hardware-based implicit checks have
the benefit of persistent tampering protection, even across binary
module boundaries.
Whitelisting Attacks. Our concession of allowing whitelisting of
certain functions was necessary to make Califorms more usable in
common environments without requiring significant source modifications. However, this also creates a vulnerability window wherein
an adversary can piggy back on these functions in the source to
bypass our protection. To confine this vector, we keep the number
of whitelisted functions as minimal as possible.
Derandomization Attacks. Since Califorms can be bypassed if
an attacker can guess the security bytes location, it is crucial that it
be placed unpredictably. For the attacker to carry out a guessing
attack, the virtual address of the target object has to be leaked, in
order to overwrite a certain number of bytes within that object.
To know the address of the object of interest, she typically has to
scan the process’s memory: the probability of scanning without
touching any of the security bytes is (1−P/N)
O whereO is number
of allocated objects, N is the size of each object, and P is number of
security bytes within that object. With 10% padding (P/N = 0.1),
whenO reaches 250, the attack success goes to 10−20. If the attacker
can somehow reduce O to 1, which represents the ideal case for
the attacker, the probability of guessing the element of interest is
1/7
n
(since we insert 1–7 wide security bytes), compounding as the
number of padding spans to be guessed (= n) increases.
The randomness is, however, introduced statically akin to
randstruct plugin introduced in recent Linux kernels which
randomizes structure layout of those which are specified (it does
not offer detection of rogue accesses unlike Califorms do) [5, 12].
The static nature of the technique may make it prone to brute
force attacks like BROP [4] which repeatedly crashes the program
until the correct configuration is guessed. This could be prevented
by having multiple binaries of the same program with different
padding sizes or simply by better logging, when possible. Another
mitigating factor is that BROP attacks require specific type of
program semantics, namely, automatic restart-after-crash with the
same memory layout. Applications with these semantics can be
modified to spawn with a different padding layout in our case and
yet satisfy application level requirements.
10 PERFORMANCE EVALUATION
10.1 Hardware Overheads
Cache Access Latency Impact of Califorms. Califorms adds
additional state and operations to the L1 data cache and the interface
between the L1 and L2 caches. The goal of this section is to evaluate
the access latency impact of the additional state and operations
described in Section 7. Qualitatively, the metadata area overhead
of L1 Califorms is 12.5%, and the access latency should not be
impacted as the metadata lookup can happen in parallel with the
L1 data and tag accesses; the L1 to/from L2 Califorms conversion
should also be simple enough so that its latency can be completely
hidden. However, the metadata area overhead can increase the L1
access latency and the conversions might add little latency. Without
loss of generality, we measure the access latency impact of adding
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
Table 2: Area, delay and power overheads of Califorms
(GE represents gate equivalent). L1 Califorms (califormsbitvector) adds negligible delay and power overheads to the
L1 cache access.
L1 Califorms Area (GE) Delay (ns) Power (mW )
L1 Overheads [+18.69%] 412,263.87 [+1.85%] 1.65 [+2.12%] 16.17
Fill Module 8,957.16 1.43 0.18
Spill Module 34,561.80 5.50 0.52
califorms-bitvector on a 32KB direct mapped L1 cache in the context
of a typical energy optimized tag and data, formatting L1 pipeline
with multicycle fill/spill handling. For the implementation we use
the 65nm TSMC core library, and generate the SRAM arrays with
the ARM Artisan memory compiler.
Table 2 summarizes the results for the L1 Califorms (califormsbitvector). As expected, the overheads associated with the califormsbitvector are minor in terms of delay (1.85%) and power consumption (2.12%). We found the SRAM area to be the dominant component in the total cache area (around 98%) where the overhead is
18.69% (higher than 12.5%).
The results of fill/spill modules are reported separately in the
bottom half of Table 2. The latency impact of the fill operation is
within the access period of the L1 design. Thus, the transformation
can be folded completely within the pipeline stages that are responsible for bringing cache lines from L2 to L1. The timing delay of
the less performance sensitive spill operation is larger than that
of the fill operation (5.5ns vs. 1.4ns) as we use pure combinational
logic to construct the califorms-sentinel format in one cycle, as
shown in Figure 8. This cycle period can be reduced by dividing
the operations of Algorithm 1 into two or more pipeline stages.
For instance, getting the locations of the first four security bytes
(lines 7 and 11) consists of four successive combinational blocks
(each detecting one security byte) in our evaluated design. This
logic can be easily pipelined into four stages. Therefore we believe
that the latency of both the fill and spill operations can be minimal
(or completely hidden) in the pipeline.
Performance with Additional Cache Access Latency. Our
VLSI implementation results imply that there will be no additional
L2/L3 latency imposed by implementing Califorms. However, this
might not be the case depending on several implementation details
(e.g., target clock frequency) so we pessimistically assume that the
L2/L3 access latency incurs additional one cycle latency overhead.
In order to evaluate the performance of the additional latency posed
by Califorms, we perform detailed microarchitectural simulations.
We run SPEC CPU2006 benchmarks with ZSim [24] processor
simulator for evaluation. All the benchmarks are compiled with
Clang version 6.0.0 with “-O3 -fno-strict-aliasing” flags. We
use the ref input sets and representative simulation regions are
selected with PinPoints [22]. We do not warmup the simulator
upon executing each SimPoint region, but instead use a relatively
large interval length of 500M instructions to avoid any warmup
issues. MaxK used in SimPoint region selection is set to 30.6 Table 3
6
For some benchmark-input pairs we saw discrepancies in the number of instructions
measured by PinPoints vs. ZSim and thus the appropriate SimPoint regions might not
be simulated. Those inputs are: foreman_ref_encoder_main for h264ref and pds-50
for soplex. Also, due to time constraints, we could not complete executing SimPoint
for h264ref with sss_encoder_main input and excluded it from the evaluation.
Table 3: Hardware configuration of the simulated system.
Core x86-64 Intel Westmere-like OoO core at 2.27GHz
L1 inst. cache 32KB, 4-way, 3-cycle latency
L1 data cache 32KB, 8-way, 4-cycle latency
L2 cache 256KB, 8-way, 7-cycle latency
L3 cache 2MB, 16-way, 27-cycle latency
DRAM 8GB, DDR3-1333
Slowdown
0%
0.5%
1%
1.5%
astar
bzip2
dealII
gcc
gobmk
h264ref
hmmer
lbm
libquantum
mcf
milc
namd
omnetpp
perlbench
povray
sjeng
soplex
sphinx3
xalancbmk
AMean
Figure 10: Slowdown with additional one-cycle access latency for both L2 and L3 caches.
shows the parameters of the processor, an Intel Westmere-like outof-order core which has been validated against a real system whose
performance and microarchitectural events to be commonly within
10% [24]. We evaluate the performance when both L2 and L3 caches
incur additional latency of one cycle.
As shown in Figure 10 slowdowns range from 0.24% (hmmer) to
1.37% (xalancbmk). The average performance slowdown is 0.83%
which is well in the range of error when executed on real systems.
10.2 Software Performance Overheads
Our evaluations so far revealed that the hardware modifications
required to implement Califorms add little or no performance overhead. Here, we evaluate the overheads incurred by the software
based changes required to enable inter-/intra-object and temporal
memory safety with Califorms: the effect of underutilized memory
structures (e.g., caches) due to additional security bytes, the additional work necessary to issue BLOC instructions (and the overhead
of executing the instructions themselves), and the quarantining to
support temporal memory safety.
Evaluation Setup. We run the experiments on an Intel Skylakebased Xeon Gold 6126 processor running at 2.6GHz with RHEL
Linux 7.5 (kernel 3.10). We omit dealII and omnetpp due to library
compatibility issues in our evaluation environment, and gcc since
it fails when executed with the memory allocator with inter-object
spatial and temporal memory safety support. The remaining 16
SPEC CPU2006 C/C++ benchmarks are compiled with our modified
Clang version 6.0.0 with “-O3 -fno-strict-aliasing” flags. We
use the ref inputs and run to completion. We run each benchmarkinput pair five times and use the shortest execution time as its
performance. For benchmarks with multiple ref inputs, the sum of
the execution time of all the inputs are used as their execution times.
We use the arithmetic mean to represent the average slowdown.7
We estimate the performance impact of executing a BLOC instruction by emulating it with a dummy store instruction that writes
some value to the corresponding cache line’s padding byte. Since
7The use of arithmetic mean of the speedup (execution time of the original system
divided by that of the system with additional latency) means that we are interested in
a condition where the workloads are not fixed and all types of workloads are equally
probable on the target system [11, 14].
Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
Slowdown
-10%
0%
10%
20%
30%
40%
50%
astar bzip2 gobmk h264ref hmmer lbm libquantum mcf milc namd perlbench povray sjeng soplex sphinx3 xalancbmk AMean
1-3B 1-5B 1-7B Opportunistic BLOC 1-3B BLOC 1-5B BLOC 1-7B BLOC
80.3%
85.2%
85.2%
85.2%
Figure 11: Slowdown of the opportunistic policy, and full insertion policy with random sized security bytes (with and without
BLOC instructions). The average slowdowns of opportunistic and full insertion policies are 6.2% and 14.2%, respectively.
Slowdown
-5%
0%
5%
10%
15%
20%
astar bzip2 gobmk h264ref hmmer lbm libquantum mcf milc namd perlbench povray sjeng soplex sphinx3 xalancbmk AMean
1-3B 1-5B 1-7B 1-3B BLOC 1-5B BLOC 1-7B BLOC
Figure 12: Slowdown of the intelligent insert policy with random sized security bytes (with and without BLOC instructions).
The average slowdown is 2.0%.
a single BLOC instruction is able to caliform the entire cache line,
issuing one dummy store instruction per to-be-califormed cache
line suffices. In order to issue the dummy stores, we implement a
LLVM pass to instrument the code to hook into memory allocations
and deallocations. We then retrieve the type information to locate
the padding bytes, calculate the number of dummy stores and the
address they access, and finally emit them. Therefore, all the software overheads we need to pay to enable Califorms are accounted
for in our evaluation.
For the random sized security bytes, we evaluate three variants:
we fix the minimum size to one byte while varying the maximum
size to three, five and seven bytes (i.e., on average the amount of
security bytes inserted are two, three and four bytes, respectively).
In addition, in order to account for the randomness introduced by
the compiler, we generate three different versions of binaries for
the same setup (e.g., three versions of astar with random sized
paddings of minimum one byte and maximum three bytes). The
error bars in the figure represent the minimum and the maximum
execution times among 15 executions (three binaries × five runs)
and the average of the execution times is represented as the bar.
Performance of the Opportunistic and Full Insertion Policies with BLOC Instructions. Figure 11 presents the slowdown incurred by three set of strategies: full insertion policy (with random
sized security bytes) without BLOC instructions, the opportunistic
policy with BLOC instructions, and the full insertion policy with
BLOC instructions. Since the first strategy does not execute BLOC
instructions it does not offer any security coverage, but is shown
as a reference to showcase the performance breakdown of the third
strategy (cache underutilization vs. executing BLOC instructions).
First, we focus on the three variants of the first strategy, which
are shown in the three left most bars. We can see that different sizes
of (random sized) security bytes does not make a large difference in
terms of performance. The average slowdown of the three variants
are 5.5%, 5.6% and 6.5%, respectively. This can be backed up by
our results shown in Figure 4, where the average slowdowns of
additional padding of two, three and four bytes ranges from 5.4%
to 6.2%. Therefore in order to achieve higher security coverage
without losing performance, using a random sized bytes of, minimum of one byte and maximum of seven bytes, is promising. When
we focus on individual benchmarks, we can see that a few benchmarks including h264ref, mcf, milc and omnetpp incur noticeable
slowdowns (ranging from 15.4% to 24.3%).
Next, we examine the opportunistic policy with BLOC instructions, which is shown in the middle (fourth) bar. Since this strategy does not add any additional security bytes, the overheads are
purely due to the work required to setup and execute BLOC instructions. The average slowdown of this policy is 7.9%. There
are benchmarks which encounter a slowdown of more than 10%,
namely gobmk, h264ref and perlbench. The overheads are due
to frequent allocations and deallocations made during program
execution, where we have to calculate and execute BLOC instructions upon every event (since every compound data type requires
security bytes management). For instance perlbench is notorious
for being malloc-intensive, and reported as such elsewhere [25].
Lastly the third policy, the full insertion policy with BLOC instructions, offers the highest security coverage in Califorms based
system with the highest average slowdown of 14.0% (with the random sized security bytes of maximum seven bytes). Nearly half
(seven out of 16) the benchmarks encounter a slowdown of more
than 10%, which might not be suitable for performance-critical
environments, and thus the user might want to consider the use of
the following intelligent insertion policy.
Performance of the Intelligent Insertion Policy with BLOC
Instructions. Figure 12 shows the slowdowns of the intelligent
insertion policy with random sized security bytes (with and without
BLOC instructions, in the same spirit as Figure 11). First we focus
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
Table 4: Security comparison against prior hardware techniques. ∗Achieved with bounds narrowing. †Although the
hardware supports bounds narrowing, CHERI foregoes it
since doing so compromises capability logic [7].
‡Execution
compatible, but protection dropped when external modules
modify pointer. §Limited to 13 tags. ¶Allocator should randomize allocation predictability.
Proposal Protection Intra- Binary Temporal
Granularity Object Composability Safety
Hardbound [8] Byte ✓
∗ ✗ ✗
Watchdog [18] Byte ✓
∗ ✗ ✓
WatchdogLite [19] Byte ✓
∗ ✗ ✓
Intel MPX [20] Byte ✓
∗ ✗
‡ ✗
BOGO [33] Byte ✓
∗ ✗
‡ ✓
PUMP [9] Word ✗ ✓ ✓
CHERI [32] Byte ✗
† ✗ ✗
CHERI concentrate [31] Byte ✗
† ✗ ✗
SPARC ADI [21] Cache line ✗ ✓ ✓§
SafeMem [23] Cache line ✗ ✓ ✗
REST [28] 8–64B ✗ ✓ ✓¶
Califorms Byte ✓ ✓ ✓¶
on the strategy without executing BLOC instructions (the three
bars on the left). The performance trend is similar such that the
three variants with different random sizes have little performance
difference, where the average slowdown is 0.2% with the random
sized security bytes of maximum seven bytes. We can see that none
of the programs incurs a slowdown of greater than 5%. Finally with
BLOC instructions (three bars on the right), gobmk and perlbench
have slowdowns of greater than 5% (16.1% for gobmk and 7.2% for
perlbench). The average slowdown is 1.5%, where considering its
security coverage and performance overheads the intelligent policy
might be the most practical option for many environments.
11 COMPARISON WITH PRIOR WORK
Tables 4, 5, and 6 summarize the security, performance, and implementation characteristics of the hardware based memory safety
techniques discussed in Section 2, respectively. Califorms has the
advantage of requiring simpler hardware modifications and being
faster than disjoint metadata based whitelisting systems. The hardware savings mainly stem from the fact that our metadata resides
with program data; it does not require explicit propagation while
additionally obviating all lookup logic. This significantly reduces
our design’s implementation costs. Califorms also has lower performance and energy overheads since it neither requires multiple
memory accesses, nor does it incur any significant checking costs.
However, Califorms can be bypassed if accesses to security bytes
can be avoided. This safety-vs.-complexity tradeoff is critical to
deployability and we argue that our design point is more practical. This is because designers have to contend with integrating
these features to already complicated processor designs, without
introducing additional bugs while also keeping the functionality of
legacy software intact. This is a hard balance to strike [20].
On the other hand, ideal cojoined metadata mechanisms would
have comparable slowdowns and similar compiler requirements.
However, practical implementations like ADI exhibits some crucial
differences from the ideal.
• It is limited to 64-bit architectures, which excludes a large portion of embedded and IoT processors that operate on 32-bit or
narrower platforms.
• It has finite number of colors since available tag bits are limited—
ADI supports 13 colors with 4 tag bits. This is important because
reusing colors proportionally reduces the safety guarantees of
these systems in the event of a collision.
• It operates at the coarse granularity of cache line width, and
hence, is not practically applicable for intra-object safety.
On the contrary, Califorms is agnostic of architecture width and
is better suited for deployment over a more diverse device environment. In terms of safety, collision is not an issue for our design.
Hence, unlike cojoined metadata systems, our security does not
scale inversely with the number of allocations in the program. Finally, our fine-grained protection makes us suitable for intra-object
memory safety which is a non-trivial threat in modern security [16].
12 CONCLUSION
Califorms is a hardware primitive which allows blacklisting a memory location at byte granularity with low area and performance
overhead. A key observation behind Califorms is that a blacklisted
region need not store its metadata separately but can rather store
them within itself; we utilize byte-granular existing or added space
between object elements to blacklist a region. This in-place compact data structure avoids additional operations for fetching the
metadata making it very performant in comparison. Further, by
changing how data is stored within a cache line we reduce the hardware area overheads substantially. Subsequently, if the processor
accesses a blacklisted byte or a security byte, due to programming
errors or malicious attempts, it reports a privileged exception.
To provide memory safety, we use Califorms to insert security
bytes between and within data structures (e.g., between fields of a
struct) upon memory allocation and clear them on deallocation.
Notably, by doing so, Califorms can even detect intra-object overflows in a practical manner, thus addressing one of the prominent
open problems in area of memory safety and security.
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS
This work was partially supported by ONR N00014–16–1–2263,
ONR N00014–17–1–2788, ONR N00014–15–1–2173, and DARPA
HR0011–18–C–0017, and a gift from Bloomberg. The authors thank
Prof. Mingoo Seok for access to SRAM timing measurement tools.
Opinions, findings, conclusions and recommendations expressed in
this material are those of the authors and do not necessarily reflect
the views of the US government or commercial entities. Simha
Sethumadhavan has a significant financial interest in Chip Scan
Inc.
Practical Byte-Granular Memory Blacklisting using Califorms MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA
Table 5: Performance comparison against previous hardware techniques.
Proposal Metadata Memory Performance Main
Overhead Overhead Overhead Operations
Hardbound [8] 0–2 words per ptr, ∝
∼
# of ptrs and prog memory footprint ∝
∼
# of ptr derefs 1–2 mem ref for bounds (may be cached),
4b per word check µops.
Watchdog [18] 4 words per ptr ∝
∼
# of ptrs and allocations ∝
∼
# of ptr derefs 1–3 mem ref for bounds (may be cached),
check µops.
WatchdogLite [19] 4 words per ptr ∝
∼
# of ptrs and allocations ∝
∼
# of ptr ops 1–3 mem ref for bounds (may be cached),
check & propagate insns.
Intel MPX [20] 2 words per ptr ∝
∼
# of ptrs ∝
∼
# of ptr derefs 2+ mem ref for bounds (may be cached),
check & propagate insns.
BOGO [33] 2 words per ptr ∝
∼
# of ptrs ∝
∼
# of ptr derefs MPX ops + ptr miss exception handling,
page permission mods.
PUMP [9] 64b per cache line ∝
∼
Prog memory footprint ∝
∼
# of ptr ops 1 mem ref for tags, may be cached,
fetch and chk rules; propagate tags.
CHERI [32] 256b per ptr ∝
∼
# of ptrs and physical mem ∝
∼
# of ptr ops 1+ mem ref for capability (may be cached),
capability management insns.
CHERI concentrate [31] Ptr size is 2x ∝
∼
# of ptrs ∝
∼
# of ptr ops Wide ptr load (may be cached),
capability management insns.
SPARC ADI [21] 4b per cache line ∝
∼
Prog memory footprint ∝
∼
# of tag (un)set ops (Un)set tag.
SafeMem [23] 2x blacklisted memory ∝
∼
Blacklisted memory ∝
∼
# of ECC (un)set ops Syscall to scramble ECC, copy data content.
REST [28] 8–64B token ∝
∼
Blacklisted memory ∝
∼
# of arm/disarm insns Execute arm/disarm insns.
Califorms Byte granular security byte ∝
∼
Blacklisted memory ∝
∼
# of BLOC insns. Execute BLOC insns.
Table 6: Implementation complexity comparison against previous hardware techniques.
Proposal Core Caches/TLB Memory Software
Hardbound [8]
µop injection & logic for ptr meta,
extend reg file and data path to Tag cache and its TLB N/A Compiler & allocator annotates ptr meta
propagate ptr meta
Watchdog [18]
µop injection & logic for ptr meta,
extend reg file and data path to Ptr lock cache N/A Compiler & allocator annotates ptr meta
propagate ptr meta
WatchdogLite [19] N/A N/A N/A Compiler & allocator annotates ptrs,
compiler inserts meta propagation and check insns
Intel MPX [20] Unknown (closed platform [27], design likely similar to Hardbound) Compiler & allocator annotates ptrs,
compiler inserts meta propagation and check insns
BOGO [33] Unknown (closed platform [27], design likely similar to Hardbound) MPX mods + kernel mods for bounds page
right management
PUMP [9]
Extend all data units by tag width,
modify pipeline stages for tag checks, Rule cache N/A Compiler & allocator (un)sets memory, tag ptrs
new miss handler
CHERI [32] Capability reg file, coprocessor Capability caches N/A Compiler & allocator annotates ptrs,
integrated with pipeline compiler inserts meta propagation and check insns
CHERI concentrate [31] Modify pipeline to integrate ptr checks N/A N/A Compiler & allocator annotates ptrs,
compiler inserts meta propagation and check insns
SPARC ADI [21] Unknown (closed platform) Compiler & allocator (un)sets memory, tag ptrs
SafeMem [23] N/A N/A Repurposes ECC bits Original data copied to distinguish from hardware faults
REST [28] N/A 1–8b per L1D line, N/A Compiler & allocator (un)sets tags,
1 comparator allocator randomizes allocation order/placement
Califorms N/A 8b per L1D line, Use unused/spare ECC bit Compiler & allocator mods to (un)set tags,
1b per L2/L3 line compiler inserts intra-object spacing
MICRO-52, October 12–16, 2019, Columbus, OH, USA H. Sasaki, M. Arroyo, M. Tarek Ibn Ziad, K. Bhat, K. Sinha, and S. Sethumadhavan
REFERENCES
[1] 2014. CVE–2014–1444. https://cve.mitre.org/cgi-bin/cvename.cgi?name=CVE2014-1444. [Online; accessed 30-Aug-2019].
[2] 2017. CVE–2017–5115. https://cve.mitre.org/cgi-bin/cvename.cgi?name=CVE2017-5115. [Online; accessed 30-Aug-2019].
[3] ARM. 2018. ARM A64 instruction set architecture for ARMv8-A architecture
profile. https://static.docs.arm.com/ddi0596/a/DDI_0596_ARM_a64_instruction_
set_architecture.pdf.
[4] Andrea Bittau, Adam Belay, Ali Mashtizadeh, David Mazi e res, and Dan Boneh.
2014. Hacking blind. In IEEE S&P ’14: Proceedings of the 35th IEEE Symposium on
Security and Privacy. 227–242.
[5] Kees Cook. 2017. Introduce struct layout randomization plugin. https://lkml.org
/lkml/2017/5/26/558.
[6] Crispin Cowan, Calton Pu, Dave Maier, Heather Hintony, Jonathan Walpole,
Peat Bakke, Steve Beattie, Aaron Grier, Perry Wagle, and Qian Zhang. 1998.
StackGuard: automatic adaptive detection and prevention of buffer-overflow
attacks. In USENIX Security ’98: Proceedings of the 7th USENIX Security Symposium.
63–78.
[7] Brooks Davis, Khilan Gudka, Alexandre Joannou, Ben Laurie, A Theodore Markettos, J Edward Maste, Alfredo Mazzinghi, Edward Tomasz Napierala, Robert M
Norton, Michael Roe, Peter Sewell, Robert N M Watson, Stacey Son, Jonathan
Woodruff, Alexander Richardson, Peter G Neumann, Simon W Moore, John Baldwin, David Chisnall, James Clarke, and Nathaniel Wesley Filardo. 2019. CheriABI:
enforcing valid pointer provenance and minimizing pointer privilege in the POSIX
C run-time environment. In ASPLOS ’19: Proceedings of the 24th International
Conference on Architectural Support for Programming Languages and Operating
Systems. 379–393.
[8] Joe Devietti, Colin Blundell, Milo M K Martin, and Steve Zdancewic. 2008. HardBound: architectural support for spatial safety of the C programming language.
In ASPLOS XIII: Proceedings of the 13th International Conference on Architectural
Support for Programming Languages and Operating Systems. 103–114.
[9] Udit Dhawan, Catalin Hritcu, Raphael Rubin, Nikos Vasilakis, Silviu Chiricescu,
Jonathan M Smith, Thomas F Knight, Jr, Benjamin C Pierce, and Andre DeHon.
2015. Architectural support for software-defined metadata processing. In ASPLOS ’15: Proceedings of the 20th International Conference on Architectural Support
for Programming Languages and Operating Systems. 487–502.
[10] Gregory J Duck and Roland H C Yap. 2018. EffectiveSan: type and memory error
detection using dynamically typed C/C++. In PLDI ’18: Proceedings of the 39th
ACM SIGPLAN Conference on Programming Language Design and Implementation.
181–195.
[11] Lieven Eeckhout. 2010. Computer architecture performance evaluation methods
(1st ed.). Morgan & Claypool Publishers.
[12] Nur Hussein. 2017. Randomizing structure layout. https://lwn.net/Articles
/722293/.
[13] Yuseok Jeon, Priyam Biswas, Scott Carr, Byoungyoung Lee, and Mathias Payer.
2017. HexType: efficient detection of type confusion errors for C++. In CCS ’17:
Proceedings of the 24th ACM SIGSAC Conference on Computer and Communications
Security. 2373–2387.
[14] Lizy Kurian John. 2004. More on finding a single number to indicate overall
performance of a benchmark suite. ACM SIGARCH Computer Architecture News
32, 1 (March 2004), 3–8.
[15] Paul Kocher, Daniel Genkin, Daniel Gruss, Werner Haas, Mike Hamburg, Moritz
Lipp, Stefan Mangard, Thomas Prescher, Michael Schwarz, and Yuval Yarom. 2019.
Spectre attacks: exploiting speculative execution. In IEEE S&P ’19: Proceedings of
the 40th IEEE Symposium on Security and Privacy. 19–37.
[16] Kangjie Lu, Chengyu Song, Taesoo Kim, and Wenke Lee. 2016. UniSan: proactive
kernel memory initialization to eliminate data leakages. In CCS ’16: Proceedings
of the 23rd ACM SIGSAC Conference on Computer and Communications Security.
920–932.
[17] Alyssa Milburn, Herbert Bos, and Cristiano Giuffrida. 2017. SafeInit: comprehensive and practical mitigation of uninitialized read vulnerabilities. In NDSS ’17:
Proceedings of the 2017 Network and Distributed System Security Symposium. 1–15.
[18] Santosh Nagarakatte, Milo M K Martin, and Steve Zdancewic. 2012. Watchdog:
hardware for safe and secure manual memory management and full memory
safety. In ISCA ’12: Proceedings of the 39th International Symposium on Computer
Architecture. 189–200.
[19] Santosh Nagarakatte, Milo M K Martin, and Steve Zdancewic. 2014. WatchdogLite:
hardware-accelerated compiler-based pointer checking. In CGO ’14: Proceedings of
the 12th IEEE/ACM International Symposium on Code Generation and Optimization.
175–184.
[20] Oleksii Oleksenko, Dmitrii Kuvaiskii, Pramod Bhatotia, Pascal Felber, and Christof
Fetzer. 2018. Intel MPX explained: a cross-layer analysis of the Intel MPX system
stack. Proceedings of the ACM on Measurement and Analysis of Computing Systems
2, 2 (June 2018), 28:1–28:30.
[21] Oracle. 2015. Hardware-assisted checking using Silicon Secured Memory (SSM).
https://docs.oracle.com/cd/E37069_01/html/E37085/gphwb.html.
[22] Harish Patil, Robert Cohn, Mark Charney, Rajiv Kapoor, Andrew Sun, and Anand
Karunanidhi. 2004. Pinpointing representative portions of large Intel® Itanium®
programs with dynamic instrumentation. MICRO-37: Proceedings of the 37th
IEEE/ACM International Symposium on Microarchitecture, 81–92.
[23] Feng Qin, Shan Lu, and Yuanyuan Zhou. 2005. SafeMem: exploiting ECC-memory
for detecting memory leaks and memory corruption during production runs. In
HPCA ’05: Proceedings of the IEEE 11th International Symposium on High Performance Computer Architecture. 291–302.
[24] Daniel Sanchez and Christos Kozyrakis. 2013. ZSim: fast and accurate microarchitectural simulation of thousand-core systems. In ISCA ’13: Proceedings of the
40th International Symposium on Computer Architecture. 475–486.
[25] Konstantin Serebryany, Derek Bruening, Alexander Potapenko, and Dmitry
Vyukov. 2012. AddressSanitizer: a fast address sanity checker. In USENIX ATC ’12:
Proceedings of the 2012 USENIX Annual Technical Conference. 309–318.
[26] Kostya Serebryany, Evgenii Stepanov, Aleksey Shlyapnikov, Vlad Tsyrklevich,
and Dmitry Vyukov. 2018. Memory tagging and how it improves C/C++ memory
safety. arXiv.org (Feb. 2018). arXiv:cs.CR/1802.09517v1
[27] Junjing Shi, Qin Long, Liming Gao, Michael A. Rothman, and Vincent J. Zimmer.
2018. Methods and apparatus to protect memory from buffer overflow and/or
underflow. International patent WO/2018/176339.
[28] Kanad Sinha and Simha Sethumadhavan. 2018. Practical memory safety with
REST. In ISCA ’18: Proceedings of the 45th International Symposium on Computer
Architecture. 600–611.
[29] Dokyung Song, Julian Lettner, Prabhu Rajasekaran, Yeoul Na, Stijn Volckaert,
Per Larsen, and Michael Franz. 2019. SoK: sanitizing for security. In IEEE S&P ’19:
Proceedings of the 40th IEEE Symposium on Security and Privacy. 187–207.
[30] David Weston and Matt Miller. 2016. Windows 10 mitigation improvements.
Black Hat USA.
[31] Jonathan Woodruff, Alexandre Joannou, Hongyan Xia, Anthony Fox, Robert
Norton, David Chisnall, Brooks Davis, Khilan Gudka, Nathaniel W Filardo, ,
A Theodore Markettos, Michael Roe, Peter G Neumann, Robert Nicholas Maxwell
Watson, and Simon Moore. 2019. CHERI concentrate: practical compressed
capabilities. IEEE Trans. Comput. (April 2019).
[32] Jonathan Woodruff, Robert N M Watson, David Chisnall, Simon W Moore,
Jonathan Anderson, Brooks Davis, Ben Laurie, Peter G Neumann, Robert Norton,
and Michael Roe. 2014. The CHERI capability model: revisiting RISC in an age of
risk. In ISCA ’14: Proceedings of the 41st International Symposium on Computer
Architecture. 457–468.
[33] Tong Zhang, Dongyoon Lee, and Changhee Jung. 2019. BOGO: buy spatial memory safety, get temporal memory safety (almost) free. In ASPLOS ’19: Proceedings
of the 24th International Conference on Architectural Support for Programming
Languages and Operating Systems. 631–644.

© 20XX IEEE. Personal use of this material is permitted. Permission from IEEE must be obtained for all other uses, in any
current or future media, including reprinting/republishing this material for advertising or promotional purposes, creating new
collective works, for resale or redistribution to servers or lists, or reuse of any copyrighted component of this work in other
works.
ABCAS: Adaptive Bound Control of spectral norm
as Automatic Stabilizer
Shota HIROSE, Shiori MAKI,
Naoki WADA, Jiro KATTO
School of Fundamental Science and Engineering
Faculty of Science and Engineering, Waseda University
Tokyo, Japan
syouta.hrs@akane.waseda.jp
Heming SUN
Waseda Research Institute for Science and Engineering
Waseda University, Tokyo, Japan
and JST, PRESTO, Saitama, Japan
hemingsun@aoni.waseda.jp
Abstract— Spectral Normalization is one of the best
methods for stabilizing the training of Generative Adversarial
Network. Spectral Normalization limits the gradient of
discriminator between the distribution between real data and
fake data. However, even with this normalization, GAN’s
training sometimes fails. In this paper, we reveal that more
severe restriction is sometimes needed depending on the training
dataset, then we propose a novel stabilizer which offers an
adaptive normalization method, called ABCAS. Our method
decides discriminator’s Lipschitz constant adaptively, by
checking the distance of distributions of real and fake data. Our
method improves the stability of the training of Generative
Adversarial Network and achieved better Fréchet Inception
Distance score of generated images. We also investigated
suitable spectral norm for three datasets. We show the result as
an ablation study.
Keywords—Generative Adversarial Network, Spectral
Normalization, Lipschitz constant, Adaptive Scheduling
I. INTRODUCTION
Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) [1], is one of the
successful neural networks. GAN learns the distributions of
data by training a discriminator and a generator at the same
time, and then generates fake data by the generator. It can
synthesize images with high quality.
However, training of GAN is often unstable. To solve this
problem, various approaches have been proposed. For
example, WGAN [2] limits the Lipschitz constant of the
discriminator by applying Weight Clipping. It stabilizes
GAN’s training because this regularization limits the upper
bound of the norm of the gradient which the generator receives.
However, Weight Clipping is not a safe way, and the
performance depends on clipping values. If the clipping value
is too small, it will be difficult to train the discriminator, and
if clipping value is too large, mode collapse will occur. As
alternative way to restrict the Lipschitz constant, Spectral
Normalization [3] is proposed. It normalizes spectral norm,
which is the upper bound of Lipschitz constant. This method
drastically stabilizes the training of GAN with justifiable
computational cost. However, even with this normalization,
the training of GAN sometimes fails.
In this paper, we therefore propose a new method, called
ABCAS. It controls the distance of real and fake distributions
by limiting the spectral norm of the discriminator adaptively.
We show the suitable norms are different depending on
datasets. We then confirm that our method works well even in
such situations.
II. RELATED WORK
In Generative Adversarial Network, a generator tries to
deceive a discriminator by generating images which look real,
while the discriminator tries to classify input images to real or
fake. GAN’s training is often unstable and mode collapse
often occurs. To mitigate such problems, various approaches
have been proposed. For example, definition of loss functions
has been modified [2, 4, 5].
Instability in GAN’s training often appears with limited
data. Many researchers have been looking for good methods
for mitigating this problem. To our knowledge, it is because
the discriminator overfits the training dataset due to data
insufficiency, and there are two ways to avoid the instability.
First is Data Augmentation, that can virtually mitigate the
insufficiency and solve the overfitting. For example, Adaptive
Discriminator Augmentation [6] applies the adaptive strategy
for data augmentation by detecting the overfitting of the
discriminator and controls the strength of Data Augmentation.
Adaptive Pseudo Augmentation [7] is another method, which
adds “real” label to generated data when overfitting occurs.
The method improves the stability of GAN’s training.
Second is model regularization. Overfitting is also caused
by overparameterization. Therefore, model regularization can
mitigate the overfitting. For example, Weight Clipping [2],
Gradient Penalty [8], Spectral Normalization [3], and Label
Noise [9] have been proposed.
Wasserstein GAN (WGAN) [2] minimizes Wasserstein
distance between real data and fake data. To let the
discriminator return approximation of Wasserstein distance,
weights of the discriminator are clipped and Lipschitz
constant is regularized.
Gradient Penalty [8] regularizes the Lipschitz constant by
regularizing the gradient between real data and fake data. This
method was proposed to improve WGAN.
Spectral Normalization [3] also limits the Lipschitz
constant by limiting the spectral norm of the discriminator
because the Lipschitz constant is bounded by the product of
the spectral norms of weight matrices corresponding to
convolutional filtering of each layer. In the algorithm of
Spectral Normalization, the spectral norm of weight matrix is
calculated by using power iteration method [10], that
contributes to faster computation than singular value
decomposition.
SAGAN[11] and BigGAN [12] also uses Spectral
Normalization. In addition, these GANs use Self-Attention
[13]. It improves the quality of generated images. However, it
needs huge computation and memory cost.
Spectral Normalization performs well to stabilize GAN’s
training and has been utilized by many subsequent GANs.
However, Spectral Normalization still suffers from
instability depending on utilized datasets.
In this paper, we therefore show an adaptive normalization
method by extending Spectral Normalization. Our method can
stabilize GAN’s training better than the original Spectral
Normalization and other existing methods.
III. PROPOSED APPROACH
To limit the Lipschitz constant more strictly than the
Spectral Normalization, we propose a new method, Adaptive
Bound Control of Spectral Normalization as Automatic
Stabilizer (ABCAS). For this purpose, we introduce two
parameters, r and beta. r is a variable to control magnitude of
the normalized spectral norm of the discriminator by
multiplying 𝑚 = 0.9
𝑟
. beta is a constant to limit the
parameter r.
Our method aims to limit the distance between the
distribution of real data and fake data less than constant value,
beta, in ABCAS. Spectral Normalization limits the spectral
norm of the discriminator, however, the output value is not
limited to specific range because the maximum norm of the
critic depends on the norm of input images.
We show the algorithm of ABCAS in Figure 1. The
essential point is adaptive control of the spectral norm by
checking the distance between real data and fake data and
updating 𝑟 adaptively. If the distance between real data and
fake data is large, 𝑟 becomes large and the spectral norm of the
discriminator does smaller. This leads smaller distance
between real data and fake data. In ABCAS, beta is a hyperparameter. If beta is small, ABCAS limits the spectral norm
more severely. The result of our experiment shows that
suitable beta is 4.
m,r,dm,counter ←0 #initialization
alpha←0.9999 #for running average
while training:
counter←counter+1
sample 𝑧 from N(0,1)
xreal←loadimage(dataset)
xfake←𝐺(𝑧)
for each matrix 𝑊 of discriminator:
compute the spectral norm 𝜎(W)
m = 0.9
𝑟
𝑊′ = m* 𝑊/ 𝜎(𝑊) #ABCAS
𝐶𝑟𝑒𝑎𝑙 ←𝐷(𝑥𝑟𝑒𝑎𝑙) using 𝑊′
𝐶𝑓𝑎𝑘𝑒 ←𝐷(𝑥𝑓𝑎𝑘𝑒) using 𝑊′
if value of counter is odd:
dist← max(𝐶𝑟𝑒𝑎𝑙) - min(𝐶𝑓𝑎𝑘𝑒)
dm ← alpha * dm + (1-alpha) * dist
clbr_dm← dm/beta
r ← max(0, clbr_dm/(1-clbr_dm))
𝐷𝑙𝑜𝑠𝑠←loss_function(xreal, xfake)
𝐺𝑙𝑜𝑠𝑠←loss_function(xfake)
If value of counter is odd:
update Discriminator
else: #value of counter is even:
update Generator
Fig. 1. Pseudocode of ABCAS
IV. EXPERIMENTS
A. Network architecture
We use a network based on SNGAN[3]. We scale up the
discriminator and the generator to generate images with
256x256 pixels. We apply ABCAS for all convolution layers
of the discriminator and we don’t use Batch
Normalization[14]. For the generator, we remove Batch
Normalization and add Layer Normalization[15] after the
second last convolution layer. In the paper[16], they show
Layer Normalization can stabilize the training well, so we use
Layer Normalization. In addition, we add Pixel
Normalization[17] in the first layer of the generator to
normalize the latent input vector. For the training, we use nonsaturating GAN loss [1]. We use RAdam[18] optimizer with
β1 = 0, β2 = 0.999. The batch size is 16. We use TTUR[19]
technique to accelerate the training of GAN. The learning rate
of the discriminator is 0.0005 and the learning rate of the
generator is 0.0001. To make sure that our method works well
for various datasets, we use FFHQ[20] dataset, AFHQCat[21], and FFHQ-10k(a subset of FFHQ, it consists of
10,000 images) as training dataset. AFHQ-Cat dataset consists
of about 5,165 images of faces of cats. FFHQ dataset consists
of about 70,000 images of faces of people. We created FFHQ10k dataset by choosing first 10,000 images of FFHQ dataset.
For all datasets, we resized them to 256x256 resolution, using
MATLAB.
The network details which we used are shown in Table I
and Table II.
TABLE I. NETWORK OF GENERATOR WE USE
z∈R^140 ~N(0,1)
Pixel Normalization(z) #normalize z channel-wise
4x4 stride=1, convtranspose, 384x4x4, LReLU(0.2)
4x4 stride=2, convtranspose, 192x8x8, LReLU(0.2)
4x4 stride=2, convtranspose, 96x16x16, LReLU(0.2)
4x4 stride=2, convtranspose, 96x32x32, LReLU(0.2)
4x4 stride=2, convtranspose, 48x64x64, LReLU(0.2)
4x4 stride=2, convtranspose, 24x128x128,
Layer Normalization, ReLU
4x4 stride=2, convtranspose, 3x256x256, Tanh
TABLE II. NETWORK OF DISCRIMINATOR WE USE
RGB image x∈R^(3x256x256)
4x4, stride=2, ABCASConv 24x128x128, ReLU
4x4, stride=2, ABCASConv 48x64x64, ReLU
4x4, stride=2, ABCASConv 96x32x32, ReLU
4x4, stride=2, ABCASConv 96x16x16, ReLU
4x4, stride=2, ABCASConv 192x8x8, ReLU
4x4, stride=2, ABCASConv 384x4x4, ReLU
4x4, stride=1, ABCASConv 384x1x1
B. Comparisons of Fréchet Inception Distance scores
To verify that our adaptive method works better than
original Spectral Normalization, we compare with Spectral
Normalization with fixed m values. With ABCAS algorithm,
we can adjust the spectral norm of each layer by changing 𝑚
in the algorithm, that is represented by 𝑚 = ABCAS(beta).
Since the original Spectral Normalization is corresponding to
the case 𝑚 = 1 , we try cases 𝑚 = 0.5, 0.6, 0.7, 0.8 and 0.9,
that bring smaller spectral norms than the original Spectral
Normalization. We show experimental results with parameter
settings in Table III. In Table III, “Spectral Norm” represents
fixed 𝑚 in the Spectral Normalization and adaptive m in the
ABCAS algorithm.
TABLE III. COMPARISON OF GANS AND THE BEST FID
Dataset Spectral Norm Best FID
AFHQ
(Cat)
0.5 47.68
0.6 35.30
0.7 31.23
0.8 28.50
0.9 26.90
1.0 33.25
ABCAS(beta=1) 33.99
ABCAS(beta=4) 24.99
FFHQ
0.5 53.54
0.6 50.96
0.7 40.96
0.8 34.88
0.9 35.27
1 34.33
ABCAS(beta=1) 35.30
ABCAS(beta=4) 34.20
FFHQ-10k
0.5 83.67
0.6 90.81
0.7 70.30
0.8 65.27
0.9 59.80
1 68.59
ABCAS(beta=1) 56.12
ABCAS(beta=4) 55.48
For FFHQ dataset, we test each setting for 200 epochs, and
measure Fréchet inception distance [19] (FID) every epoch.
For AFHQ-Cat and FFHQ-10k dataset, we test each setting for
1000 epochs, and measure FID every 5 epochs. We use
GeForce RTX 3070 as GPU. We show relationship between
elapsed epoch and FID in the training in Fig 2, where (a) is for
AFHQ-Cat dataset, (b) is for FFHQ dataset, and (c) is for
FFHQ-10k dataset, respectively. Horizontal axis denotes
elapsed epochs on a linear scale, and vertical axis denotes
FIDs on a logarithmic scale. Legends of each figure
correspond to the settings in Table IV.
(a) AFHQ-Cat
(b) FFHQ
(c) FFHQ-10k
Fig. 2. Comparisons of elapsed epoch vs FIDs
From these results, we can recognize that the original
Spectral Normalization (m=1) is not the best, and optimal m
changes according to datasets. We notice that
ABCAS(beta=1) performs better than the original Spectral
Normalization for FFHQ-10k dataset, and ABCAS(beta=4)
performs the best for all three datasets.
Next, we show how the parameter 𝑟 in ABCAS(beta=4)
changes in training phase. Fig.3 shows that 𝑟 rises rapidly and
fall slightly in early training. After that, 𝑟 rises gradually, and
m (= 0.9
𝑟
) becomes smaller. It is also confirmed that final 𝑟
is different, depending on utilized datasets. We think 𝑟 can be
higher when dataset is small, considering that the result of
final 𝑟 is the largest in AFHQ-Cat (5k images), followed in
order by FFHQ-10k (10k images) and FFHQ (70k images).
(a) AFHQ-Cat
(b) FFHQ
(c) FFHQ-10k
Fig 3. Comparisons of FIDs and parameter r per
epoch
C. Subjective comparisons of generated images
To compare perceptual differences of the results, we show
generated images with AFHQ-Cat dataset. In Fig.4, we show
generated images of the cases that 𝑚 = 0.5 , 𝑚 = 1 and
ABCAS(𝑏𝑒𝑡𝑎 = 4).
In Fig.4(a), when m is too small, FID is worse than the
original Spectral Normalization (𝑚 = 1). From the subjective
viewpoint, generated images are visually worse than other two
cases. Generated images are blurrier, and the cat in upper right
has unnatural eyes and strange face contour. Therefore, we can
conclude that 𝑚 = 0.5 is not a good choice.
(a) Constant SN, 𝑚 = 0.5 (195 epochs, FID=47.68)
(b) Constant SN, 𝑚 = 1.0 (145 epochs, FID=33.25)
(c) ABCAS(𝑏𝑒𝑡𝑎 = 4) (230 epochs, FID=24.99)
Fig. 4: Subjective comparisons of generated images.
The original Spectral Normalization in Fig.4(b) and
ABCAS (𝑏𝑒𝑡𝑎 = 4) in Fig. 4(c) clearly provide better
generated images then Fig. 4(a) even if we used very simple
GAN. However, the cats in upper left and upper right of
Fig.4(b) have unnatural noses, and the cats in lower left and
lower right have strange contour. On the other hand, all cats
in Fig.4(c) have natural eyes and noses. Therefore, we can
conclude that the overall subjective quality of
ABCAS (𝑏𝑒𝑡𝑎 = 4) is higher than Spectral Normalization
with fixed m.
V. CONCLUSIONS
We proposed ABCAS, which controls spectral norms in
an adaptive manner to image datasets. Although our proposed
algorithm is very simple, experimental results verified that
GAN’s training becomes more stable. In addition, our
experiment results show that preferable spectral norms are
different, depending on datasets which are used in training
phase. We continue to look for better metrics for measuring
the distance of real data and fake data for improving our
method.
REFERENCES
[1] Ian J. Goodfellow, Jean Pouget-Abadie, Mehdi Mirza, Bing Xu,
David Warde-Farley, Sherjil Ozair, Aaron Courville, Yoshua
Bengio: “Generative Adversarial Networks”, NIPS 2014,
Dec.2014
[2] Martin Arjovsky, Soumith Chintala, Léon Bottou: “Wasserstein
Generative Adversarial Networks”, PMLR, 2017
[3] Takeru Miyato, Toshiki Kataoka, Masanori Koyama, Yuichi
Yoshida: “Spectral Normalization for Generative Adversarial
Networks”, ICLR 2018, Apr.2018
[4] Xudong Mao, Qing Li, Haoran Xie, Raymond Y.K. Lau, Zhen
Wang, Stephen Paul Smolley: “Least Squares Generative
Adversarial Networks”, ICCV 2017, Oct.2017
[5] Junbo Zhao, Michael Mathieu, Yann LeCun: ”Energy-based
Generative Adversarial Network”, ICLR 2017, Apr.2017
[6] Tero Karras, Miika Aittala, Janne Hellsten, Samuli Laine, Jaakko
Lehtinen, Timo Aila: “Training Generative Adversarial Networks
with Limited Data”, NIPS 2020, Dec.2020
[7] Liming Jiang, Bo Dai, Wayne Wu, Chen Change Loy:” Deceive
D: Adaptive Pseudo Augmentation for GAN Training with
Limited Data”, NeurIPS 2021, Dec.2021
[8] Ishaan Gulrajani, Faruk Ahmed, Martin Arjovsky, Vincent
Dumoulin, Aaron Courville:”Improved Training of Wasserstein
GANs”, NIPS 2017, Dec.2017
[9] Soumith Chintala. “How to train a GAN”, NeurIPS workshop on
adversarial training.
https://sites.google.com/site/nips2016adversarial/, 2016.
Accessed: 2022-05-16.
[10] Yuichi Yoshida, Takeru Miyato:”Spectral norm regularization for
improving the generalizability of deep learning.”,arXiv preprint,
arXiv:1705.10941, 2017.
[11] Han Zhang, Ian Goodfellow, Dimitris Metaxas, and Augustus
Odena:” Self-attention generative adversarial networks”,arXiv
preprint, arXiv:1805.08318, 2018.
[12] Andrew Brock, Jeff Donahue, Karen Simonyan:” Large Scale
GAN Training for High Fidelity Natural Image Synthesis”, ICLR
2019, May.2019
[13] Ashish Vaswani, Noam Shazeer, Niki Parmar, Jakob Uszkoreit,
Llion Jones, Aidan N. Gomez, Łukasz Kaiser, Illia Polosukhin:
“Attention is All you Need”, NIPS 2017, Dec.2017
[14] Sergey Ioffe, Christian Szegedy: “Batch Normalization:
Accelerating Deep Network Training by Reducing Internal
Covariate Shift”, PMLR, 2015
[15] Jimmy Lei Ba, Jamie Ryan Kiros, Geoffrey E. Hinton: “Layer
Normlization”, NIPS 2016 Deep Learning Symposium, Dec.2016
[16] Ekdeep Singh Lubana, Robert Dick, Hidenori Tanaka: “Beyond
BatchNorm: Towards a Unified Understanding of Normalization
in Deep Learning”, NeurIPS 2021, Dec.2021
[17] Tero Karras, Timo Aila, Samuli Laine, Jaakko Lehtinen:”
Progressive Growing of GANs for Improved Quality, Stability, and
Variation”, ICLR 2018, Apr.2018
[18] Liyuan Liu, Haoming Jiang, Pengcheng He, Weizhu Chen,
Xiaodong Liu, Jianfeng Gao, Jiawei Han: “On the Variance of the
Adaptive Learning Rate and Beyond”, ICLR 2020, Apr.2020
[19] Martin Heusel, Hubert Ramsauer, Thomas Unterthiner, Bernhard
Nessler, Sepp Hochreiter: “GANs Trained by a Two Time-Scale
Update Rule Converge to a Local Nash Equilibrium”, NIPS 2017,
Dec.2017
[20] Tero Karras, Samuli Laine, Timo Aila, “A style-based
generator architecture for generative adversarial networks,” CVPR
2019, Jun.2019
[21] Yunjey Choi, Youngjung Uh, Jaejun Yoo, Jung-Woo Ha:
“StarGAN v2: Diverse Image Synthesis for Multiple Domains”,
CVPR 2020, Jun.2020

 STREAMING-CAPABLE HIGH-PERFORMANCE ARCHITECTURE OF
LEARNED IMAGE COMPRESSION CODECS
Fangzheng Lin1
lin_toto@toki.waseda.jp
Heming Sun2,3
hemingsun@aoni.waseda.jp
Jiro Katto1,2
katto@waseda.jp
1 School of Fundamental Science and Engineering, Waseda University, Tokyo, Japan 2 Waseda Research Institute for Science and Engineering, Waseda University, Tokyo, Japan 3 JST, PRESTO, 4-1-8 Honcho, Kawaguchi, Saitama, Japan
ABSTRACT
Learned image compression allows achieving state-of-theart accuracy and compression ratios, but their relatively slow
runtime performance limits their usage. While previous
attempts on optimizing learned image codecs focused more on
the neural model and entropy coding, we present an
alternative method to improving the runtime performance of
various learned image compression models. We introduce
multi-threaded pipelining and an optimized memory model to
enable GPU and CPU workloads’ asynchronous execution,
fully taking advantage of computational resources. Our
architecture alone already produces excellent performance
without any change to the neural model itself. We also
demonstrate that combining our architecture with previous
tweaks to the neural models can further improve runtime
performance. We show that our implementations excel in
throughput and latency compared to the baseline and
demonstrate the performance of our implementations by
creating a real-time video streaming encoder-decoder sample
application, with the encoder running on an embedded device.
Keywords—learned image compression, real-time
streaming, high-performance, pipelining
I. INTRODUCTION
Learned image compression methods have been gaining
interest nowadays for the superior image quality to its
compression ratio. In recent years, multiple state-of-the-art
learned image compression codecs were introduced, for
example, [1], [2], [3], [4], [5], [15] and [20]. While these
models offer exceptional accuracy compared to traditional
methods, the tremendous amount of hardware resource that
learned image compression require, which limits their
throughput and latency, makes their usage not often seen,
especially for streaming purposes and on embedded devices.
We present an approach for implementing learned
codecs, demonstrating with a factorized-prior [1] and a
scale-hyperprior [2] codec. We show that: (1) by employing
practical implementation techniques, namely multithreaded
pipelining, zero-copy memory, and memory pooling, we
can speed up the codecs without modifying either the
learned models or the entropy coders; (2) by combining our
architecture with other works on optimizations of the
learned models (e.g., [6]), the codecs can reach excellent
performance; (3) a demonstration of a learned image
compression based video monitoring system, with the
embedded platform Jetson Xavier NX [10] as an encoder,
serving a real-time stream of 1280x720 at 30 FPS video feed
to a server, to show the performance of our implementation.
II. RELATED WORK
Previous attempts to improve the runtime performance
of learned image codecs focused on either the neural model
architecture or the entropy coding process. For example, [7]
featured a codec architecture designed with real-time
operation in consideration. [14] designed a block-based
encoder architecture that splits the input image into blocks
for more flexibility in parallel context prediction. [6]
demonstrated using fast activation layers and model pruning
to reduce computational complexity on existing models.
On the other hand, works like [16] and [19] showed
different approaches in implementing high-performance
entropy coders. [17] and [18] demonstrated different
methods enabling parallel entropy parameter calculations in
context models, significantly boosting the serial masked
CNN performance bottleneck. These works showed
performance increases of the entropy coding process of
different image codecs.
However, there have been no real-time implementations
of learned image compression demonstrated in video rate
(i.e., 30-60 fps), partly because the often ignored third
bottleneck of learned image compression systems: the
integration and coordination between the neural model and
entropy coding as a system. The neural model and entropy
coding require very different computing resources (often
GPU and CPU, respectively). In a direct implementation
such as [8], GPU and CPU workload are serially executed.
This is not ideal as when GPU performs computation, the
CPU waits doing nothing, and vice versa. It results in very
poor resource usage and makes the optimization on either
half soon reach diminishing returns.
Our architecture resolves this bottleneck by enhancing
coordination between GPU and CPU. Unlike previous
works, our method works on most existing learned image
codecs without either new neural model or entropy coder
architectures. Our approach also comes with the capability
to be further optimized when combined with the above
model optimizations such as [7], [14], and [6], or highperformance entropy coders such as [16] and [19].
Heming Sun is the corresponding author.
978-1-6654-9620-9/22/$31.00 ©2022 IEEE 286 ICIP 2022
2022 IEEE International Conference on Image Processing (ICIP) | 978-1-6654-9620-9/22/$31.00 ©2022 IEEE | DOI: 10.1109/ICIP46576.2022.9897695
Authorized licensed use limited to: WASEDA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY. Downloaded on November 22,2022 at 06:45:39 UTC from IEEE Xplore. Restrictions apply.
We demonstrate our architecture with the factorizedprior [1] and scale-hyperprior [2] codec for simplicity. We
run these neural models on GPUs as they are nowadays
readily available even on some embedded devices and the
corresponding entropy coders on CPU. As mentioned, our
method could also be extended to support other codecs or
other types of neural workloads that run on FPGA/ASIC.
III. ARCHITECTURE
We performed mainly the following optimizations in
our architecture.
A. Asynchronous workloads for factorized-prior
As Figure 1 shows, the factorized-prior [1] model
encodes an image in three steps: (1) non-linear
transformation of the image � into a transform domain,
outputting � ; (2) quantization of � with a channel-wise
mean, producing �# ; and (3) entropy coding of �# . The
transformation is a computationally heavy but highly
scalable process and performs best if executed on the GPU.
The quantization process has only a negligible performance
impact. The entropy coding process is highly CPU-intensive.
We introduce a multi-threaded pipeline framework into
the architecture. As previously explained, the factorizedprior learned image codec can be split into a GPU-intensive
and a CPU-intensive workload. Each frame of the input
image (or strings for decoder) is represented by a statemachine pattern task, which must be processed by the above
workloads sequentially. For each workload, a FIFO task
queue implementing a multi-threaded producer-consumer
pattern manages the execution of the tasks. A raw frame
enters the pipeline from the rear of the first workload’s task
queue. One or more threads would fetch tasks from the
queue and execute the workload: for a GPU-intensive
workload, a dedicated control thread fetches the tasks and
communicate with the GPU; for a CPU-intensive workload,
multiple worker threads perform the computations. When a
task finishes computation, its result is put directly into the
queue of the next task. Therefore, by coordinating the
execution of a learned image codec, where each frame
travels through the pipeline, it is processed by the workloads
sequentially; in contrast, the processing of different frames
happens parallelly, increasing overall throughput and
resource usage.
For factorized-prior encoder and decoder [1], the GPUintensive workload is the transformation �! / inverse
transformation �" model, and the CPU workload performs
(de-)quantization and entropy (de-)coding. We implement
this encoder and decoder with a 2-stage pipeline. Figure 2
shows the timing diagram of this encoder.
B. Asynchronous workloads for scale-hyperprior
As Figure 1 shows, the scale-hyperprior model extends
the factorized-prior model with a new random variable �
carrying spatial dependency information inferred from y,
through a model ℎ! . The extra data z also needs to be
quantized and entropy coded while the entropy coder of �#
requires scales information deduced from � with another
model ℎ" [2].
The scale-hyperprior encoder, while structurally more
complicated, is also implemented in a 2-stage pipeline,
shown in Figure 2: we combine the models �! , ℎ! , the
quantization of � and model ℎ" into a single runtime, the
GPU-intensive workload; and we launch quantization of �
and entropy coding of outputs � and � on CPU.
As Figure 1 shows, the scale-hyperprior decoder is more
complicated. First, the entropy decoding of � strings is
executed on the CPU. The result � is then passed to the
neural model ℎ" to generate the scales on GPU. The scales
are needed for the entropy decoding and dequantization of
� strings, executed on the CPU. Finally, the decoding result
� is used by the model �" to infer the result image � on
GPU. Therefore, instead of a 2-stage pipeline, we
implement this decoder with a 4-stage pipeline: CPU1-
GPU1-CPU2-GPU2.
C. Use of TensorRT as inference runtime
Converting the learned model into NVIDIA TensorRT
[11] format and using it as inference runtime has various
benefits. For example, it compiles the model into native
CUDA kernels and eliminates the overhead brought by
machine learning frameworks. We found that the use of
TensorRT gives an improved performance on the neural
models over the sample implemented with PyTorch [8].
D. Zero-copy memory and memory pooling
TensorRT also enables access to low-level CUDAspecific features, the most important being CUDA zerocopy memory. As most embedded devices use a unified
memory for CPU and GPU, the zero-copy memory model
eliminates most data copy overhead. This is, however, nonideal on desktop architectures since GPU and CPU have
� �! � �
� �&
� strings
� � �"
�& �′ � strings �
ℎ!
�
� � �!
�"
scales
� strings
ℎ" � � �’ �̂
�
�̂
� strings
scales
Encoder
Decoder
Fig. 1. Operation diagram of the encoder and decoder of the two codecs.
Dotted square areas represent scale-hyperprior’s extension to factorizedprior. Green squares represent GPU workloads; Blue squares represent
CPU workloads. Q represents (de-)quantization; E represents entropy
(de-)coding.
0t 1t 2t 3t 4t 5t
Pending Tasks
1. GPU Task
2. CPU Task
Finished Tasks
Pipeline
Clock
Fig. 2. Timing diagram of a 2-stage encoder pipeline
287
Authorized licensed use limited to: WASEDA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY. Downloaded on November 22,2022 at 06:45:39 UTC from IEEE Xplore. Restrictions apply.
their dedicated memory. Thus, we offer a command-line
option in our implementation to quickly toggle this option
on or off.
We also find in our profiling that CUDA memory
allocation and deallocation can sometimes become a
significant overhead. Specifically, we noticed that the
`cudaFree` call, which releases memory used by the GPU,
blocks until all current CUDA kernels finish executing,
causing degradation in throughput and latency. This has an
especially devastating effect on the scale-hyperprior 4-stage
decoder pipeline; if the GPU1 workload (relatively fast)
finishes processing and wants to release some memory, it
must wait until the completion of the currently executing
GPU2 workloads (relatively slow), causing latency not only
to climb but also jitter randomly. Therefore, we carefully
control dynamic memory allocation/deallocation and pool
the allocated memory for later re-use whenever possible.
IV. IMPLEMENTATIONS
The factorized-prior and scale-hyperprior models from
CompressAI [8] have 8 different quality levels, each
corresponding to a λ parameter which controls the loss
function into favoring various bits per pixel settings, and
optimizing for either PSNR or MS-SSIM. We found that if
the model structure (i.e., the channel numbers for
convolution and entropy bottleneck) is the same, the quality
levels, optimization targets and/or different input images
have no impact on throughput and only a minor impact on
entropy coder latency. Our performance evaluation focuses
on the model with quality parameter 2 optimized for PSNR,
with 128 channels for convolution and 192 channels for
entropy bottleneck.
Then, we evaluate the following three implementations:
A. Baseline
We first evaluate the factorized-prior and scalehyperprior codecs using the models trained by CompressAI
and their sample implementation [8]. To ensure a fair
comparison, we modify it to infer in FP16.
B. Pipelined, GDN
We then evaluate the above codecs, using the same
neural models converted into TensorRT FP16 format, and
with the codec re-implemented using our architecture. We
do not change the neural model or perform any other
optimizations other than the above specified. For entropy
coder, we do not perform optimizations as well and simply
integrate the CompressAI entropy coder [8] into our system.
C. Pipelined, 1DN
We base this implementation on B (Pipelined, GDN) but
introduce an optimized model. We discovered a large
portion of the performance overhead lies within the GDN
activation function [9]. Using the 1DN activation layer [6]
provides a considerable speed-up without accuracy loss.
We trained in total 32 variations of tweaked models for
both factorized-prior and scale-hyperprior. The � values are
shown in Table 1 (We abbreviate factorized-prior as “Factor”
and scale-hyperprior as “Hyper”). For quality 1 to 5, we use
128 channels for convolution and 192 for entropy
bottleneck; for 6 to 8 we use 192 and 320 channels
respectively; these channel numbers are the same as the
CompressAI models [8]. We trained the factorized-prior
models on a subset of the Open Image Dataset [12] of about
100,000 randomly selected images, and the scale-hyperprior
models on a subset of 300,000 images as we found the
models overfit on the smaller subset. We evaluate the
accuracy of our models against the baseline on the Kodak
Image Dataset [13].
As Figure 3 shows, replacing the GDN activation layer
with 1DN does not incur any performance loss for both
PSNR and MS-SSIM optimized models. Although only by
a small margin, our models optimized for PSNR outperform
the baseline; however, this is likely due to the change in the
dataset used.
V. EXPERIMENTS
A. Performance evaluation on embedded platform
We evaluate the runtime performance of the
implementations on Jetson Xavier NX [10], an embedded
Fig. 3. Left: Rate-distortion curves of the PSNR optimized models. Right: Rate-distortion curves of the MS-SSIM optimized models.
26
28
30
32
34
36
38
40
42
0 0.5 1 1.5 2
PSNR
bits per pixel (bpp)
Scale-hyperprior GDN
Scale-hyperprior 1DN
Factorized-prior GDN
Factorized-prior 1DN 0.92
0.93
0.94
0.95
0.96
0.97
0.98
0.99
1
0 0.2 0.4 0.6 0.8 1 1.2
MS-SSIM
bits per pixel (bpp)
Scale-hyperprior GDN
Scale-hyperprior 1DN
Factorized-prior GDN
Factorized-prior 1DN
TABLE 1. � VALUES OF 1DN MODELS
Quality Architecture
Factor PSNR Factor SSIM Hyper PSNR Hyper SSIM
1 0.0016 2.30 0.0017 2.40
2 0.003 4.35 0.0032 4.58
3 0.0055 8.29 0.006 8.30
4 0.01 14.98 0.0115 15.80
5 0.019 28.58 0.023 30.14
6 0.04 54.00 0.0445 57.47
7 0.075 101.52 0.086 109.60
8 0.14 190.00 0.165 210.00
TABLE 2. THROUGHPUT AND LATENCY COMPARISON OF THREE
IMPLEMENTATIONS, ON 768X512 IMAGES AND JETSON XAVIER NX
Factor Enc Factor Dec Hyper Enc Hyper Dec
FPS
A 20 17 13 14
B 75 35 68 34
C 88 35 83 34
Latency
/ ms
A 51 56 74 67
B 22 37 33 44
C 20 36 31 44
288
Authorized licensed use limited to: WASEDA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY. Downloaded on November 22,2022 at 06:45:39 UTC from IEEE Xplore. Restrictions apply.
platform provided by NVIDIA. We give a 768x512 and a
1280x720 sample image as input in an infinite loop and then
measure the throughput and latency at the output side. We
launch 3 threads for the entropy coder workload.
As Table 2 shows (We abbreviate factorized-prior as
“Factor” and scale-hyperprior as “Hyper”, encoder as “Enc”
and decoder as “Dec”), for 768x512 images, the pipelining
method alone brings 3.75x and 5.2x throughput boost to
factorized-prior and scale-hyperprior encoders, respectively.
The additional 1DN activation layer optimization brings
another 17% and 23% throughput boost to the two encoders.
The pipelining also brings an almost 2x boost to factorizedprior decoder throughput and 2.4x to the scale-hyperprior
decoder. The optimizations also reduce the latency from the
baseline to about 0.45x for both encoders and 0.65x for both
decoders; however, the 1DN activation provides only a
marginal benefit for encoder latency and almost no benefit
to the decoders.
The same improvement pattern can also be seen on
1280x720 images shown in Table 3. It is clearly
demonstrated that with our architecture and the 1DN
optimization, a Jetson Xavier NX is more than capable of
encoding a live 1280x720 at 30 FPS video feed.
B. Performance evaluation on desktop platform
We evaluate the runtime performance of the
implementations on a Dell T630 server, with dual Xeon E5-
2680 v4 CPU and a NVIDIA GeForce RTX 2080 Ti GPU.
We experiment with 1280x720 images as input for the
desktop platform. We launch 10 threads for the entropy
coder workload.
As Table 4 shows, our architecture alone boosts encoder
throughput by 21x and 25x, and decoder throughput by 8.7x
and 9.8x, for factorized-prior and scale-hyperprior,
respectively. This further demonstrates the importance of
good coordination between different hardware. However,
the 1DN optimization does not show a significant boost in
this experiment. Since the RTX 2080 Ti is a very highperformance GPU, the coordination strategies between the
workloads themselves, such as mutexes and queue
operations, unfortunately also become part of the overhead
in such high throughput situations. The effect of our
architecture on encoder/decoder latency is similar to the
previous experiment.
VI. STREAMING DEMONSTRATION
Based on the high-performance architecture of the
learned image compression models, we create a sample
video streaming application to demonstrate the performance
further.
We simulate a video monitoring system setup composed
of capturing devices consisting of a camera and an
embedded processing board (we use only one capturing
device in this experiment.) The devices transfer streams of
video encoded by learned image compression to a central
server over TCP/IP networking.
The capturing side is a Jetson Xavier NX board with a
CSI camera attached, encoding a 1280x720 stream at 30
FPS. The stream is encoded by the factorized-prior model
with 1DN activation. Due to the nature of the model, we
encode every frame as keyframes. The receiving side is the
above Dell T630 server, with RTX 2080 Ti. Due to the
decoder of this learned image codec requires more
computational power than the encoder, we run it on more
powerful hardware; this however exactly represents the use
case of a video monitoring system.
Our implementation successfully transmits the camera
video stream with no frame drops or noticeable jittering1
.
VII. CONCLUSIONS
Our proposed implementations of learned image
compression successfully accelerate the factorized-prior
and scale-hyperprior image codecs, pushing their runtime
performance to streaming-capable levels even on embedded
devices. This is a giant leap on the path to enabling the use
of learned image compression in more performance-critical
situations.
Even with our architecture, learned image encoding and
decoding is still a highly GPU-bound algorithm on most
platforms. Therefore, as future work, by combining our
method with other research to optimize the neural model,
even higher performance could be achieved; on the other
hand, the introduction of higher performance entropy coders
such as [16] and [19] could potentially further reduce
latency on desktop platforms. Especially for context-based
models, combining our architecture with works such as [17]
and [18] enables more parallel execution and higher
throughput to be achieved.
ACKNOWLEDGMENT
This work was supported in part by NICT, Grant
Number 03801, Japan; in part by JST, PRESTO Grant
Number JPMJPR19M5, Japan; in part by Japan Society for
the Promotion of Science (JSPS), under Grant 21K17770;
and in part by Kenjiro Takayanagi Foundation.
TABLE 4. THROUGHPUT AND LATENCY COMPARISON OF THREE
IMPLEMENTATIONS, ON 1280X720 IMAGES AND DELL T630
Factor Enc Factor Dec Hyper Enc Hyper Dec
FPS
A 15 19 11 16
B 316 166 279 157
C 328 166 281 161
Latency
/ ms
A 67 52 86 61
B 25 22 36 33
C 26 22 36 37
Encoder
Jetson Xavier NX
Decoder
RTX 2080 Ti
TCP/IP
Fig. 4. Architecture of the streaming system
1 Demo video available at: https://youtu.be/1HJpYPb8fOo.
TABLE 3. THROUGHPUT AND LATENCY COMPARISON OF THREE
IMPLEMENTATIONS, ON 1280X720 IMAGES AND JETSON XAVIER NX
Factor Enc Factor Dec Hyper Enc Hyper Dec
FPS
A 9 10 7 8
B 30 16 28 15
C 37 16 33 15
Latency
/ ms
A 110 101 140 127
B 53 84 85 104
C 49 83 79 106
289
Authorized licensed use limited to: WASEDA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY. Downloaded on November 22,2022 at 06:45:39 UTC from IEEE Xplore. Restrictions apply.
REFERENCES
[1] J. Ballé, V. Laperra and E. P. Simoncelli, "End-to-end Optimized
Image Compression," in 5th Int. Conf. on Learning
Representations, 2017.
[2] J. Ballé, D. Minnen, S. Singh, S. J. Hwang and N. Johnston,
"Variational image compression with a scale hyperprior," in 6th Int.
Conf. on Learning Representations, 2018.
[3] Z. Cheng, H. Sun, M. Takeuchi and J. Katto, "Learned Image
Compression with Discretized Gaussian Mixture Likelihoods and
Attention Modules," in Conference on Computer Vision and
Pattern Recognition, 2020.
[4] Z. Cheng, H. Sun, M. Takeuchi and J. Katto, "Deep convolutional
autoencoder-based lossy image compression," in Picture Coding
Symposium, 2018.
[5] D. Minnen, J. Ballé and G. Toderici, "Joint Autoregressive and
Hierarchical Priors for Learned Image Compression," in Adv. in
Neural Information Processing Systems 31, 2018.
[6] N. Johnston, E. Eban, A. Gordon and J. Ballé, "Computationally
Efficient Neural Image Compression," arXiv:1912.08771, 2019.
[7] O. Rippel and L. Bourdev, "Real-Time Adaptive Image
Compression," in International Conference on Machine Learning,
2017.
[8] J. Bégaint, F. Racapé, S. Feltman and A. Pushparaja, "CompressAI:
a PyTorch Library and Evaluation Platform for End-to-end
Compression Research," arXiv:2011.03029, 2020.
[9] J. Ballé, V. Laparra and E. P. Simoncelli, "Density Modeling of
Images using a Generalized Normalization Transformation," in 4th
Int. Conf. on Learning Representations, 2016.
[10] NVIDIA, "World’s Smallest AI Supercomputer: Jetson Xavier
NX," [Online]. Available: https://www.nvidia.com/enus/autonomous-machines/embedded-systems/jetson-xavier-nx/.
[Accessed 1 2022].
[11] NVIDIA, "NVIDIA TensorRT," NVIDIA, [Online]. Available:
https://developer.nvidia.com/tensorrt. [Accessed 1 2022].
[12] A. Kuznetsova, H. Rom, N. Alldrin, J. Uijlings, I. Krasin, J. PontTuset, S. Kamali, S. Popov, M. Malloci, A. Kolesnikov, T. Duerig
and V. Ferrari, "The Open Images Dataset V4: Unified image
classification, object detection, and visual relationship detection at
scale," International Journal of Computer Vision, 2020.
[13] Kodak, "Kodak Lossless True Color Image Suite," [Online].
Available: http://r0k.us/graphics/kodak/.
[14] Y. Wu, X. Li, Z. Zhang, X. Jin and Z. Chen, "Learned Block-based
Hybrid Image Compression," IEEE Trans. on Circuits and Systems
for Video Technology, 2021.
[15] T. Chen, H. Liu, Z. Ma, Q. Shen, X. Cao and Y. Wang, "End-toEnd Learnt Image Compression via Non-Local Attention
Optimization and Improved Context Modeling," IEEE Trans. on
Image Processing, 2021.
[16] M. Boliek, J. D. Allen, E. L. Schwartz, and M. J. Gormish, "Very
high speed entropy coding," in IEEE International Conference on
Image Processing, 1994.
[17] D. He, Y. Zheng, B. Sun, Y. Wang and H. Qin, "Checkerboard
Context Model for Efficient Learned Image Compression," in
Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition, 2021.
[18] D. Minnen and S. Singh, "Channel-wise Autoregressive Entropy
Models for Learned Image Compression," in IEEE International
Conference on Image Processing, 2020.
[19] M. M. Torres, M. Hernández-Cabronero, I. Blanes and J. SerraSagristà, "High-Throughput Variable-to-Fixed Entropy Codec
Using Selective, Stochastic Code Forests," in IEEE Access, vol. 8,
pp. 81283-81297, 2020, doi: 10.1109/ACCESS.2020.2991314.
[20] Z. Guo, Z. Zhang, R. Feng and Z. Chen, "Causal Contextual
Prediction for Learned Image Compression," IEEE Trans. on
Circuits and Systems for Video Technology, 2021, doi:
10.1109/TCSVT.2021.3089491.
290
Authorized licensed use limited to: WASEDA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY. Downloaded on November 22,2022 at 06:45:39 UTC from IEEE Xplore. Restrictions apply.
[Home][Feed][Lectures][Exercises][Projects][Login]
Parallel Programming Abstractions

Previous | Next --- Slide 52 of 60
Back to Lecture Thumbnails

koala

The Gather operation can be particularly expensive if the mem_base is large and the index vector is very scattered. Such operation lacks spatial locality.


kayvonf

Question: Who can tell use about the AVX gather or AVX-512 gather/scatter instructions?

See the very handy Intel Intrinsics Guide!


poptarts

@kayvonf

I'll try to give an overview of the AVX2 intrinsic, _mm256_i32gather_epi32, which returns a __mm256i type. If you navigate to the intrinsics page, there seems to be an overwhelming amount of instructions--but most are just variations of several types. The entire function spec is as follows:

__m256i _mm256_i32gather_epi32 (int const* base_addr, __m256i vindex, const int scale)
All of Intel's instructions have pretty much the same naming scheme. The _mm256 indicates that the instruction operates on 256 bit registers. The return type of __mm256i indicates that the result of the operation is a 256 bit pack of int's (a d suffix stands for double).

i32gather is the operation. In this case, it is 'gathering' 32 bit integers. Finally, the epi32 suffix means that the instruction operates on extended packed 32 bit integers. More specifically, the input data to this instruction, vindex, is to be interpreted as a pack of 32 bit integers.

So, what does it do? _mm256_i32gather_epi32 returns a vector of eight 32 bit integers using eight 32 bit indecies. The location of the ith gathered element is calculated as MEM[base_addr + vindex[i] * scale], where scale can be 1, 2, 4, or 8.

The guide mentions that the instruction has a latency of 6, but does not state units. It seems reasonable to guess that they mean 6 clock cycles, but that seems a bit too fast if the indices hit different cache lines.

AVX-512 implements all AVX2 instructions using larger 512 bit registers, along with a few new operations such as _mm512_mask_prefetch_i32extgather_ps which prefetches 16 single precision (32 bit) elements into cache (you can even specify whether you want it in L1 or L2!).

Example
Say we have an integer array A (e.g. base_addr = A) and we want to gather elements at indices 2, 3, 5, 7, 11, 13, 17, and 19. First store the indices in a standard array, then pack them into a single __m256i.

int idxs [8] = { 2, 3, 5, 7, 11, 13, 17, 19 }; __m256i vindex = _mm256_maskload_epi32 (idxs, maskAll);

Then we can invoke our gather, using a scale of 4 (32 bits => 4-wide elements).

__m256i result = _mm256_i32gather_epi32 (A, vindex, 4);

Copyright 2017 Carnegie Mellon UniversityCheckerboard Context Model for Efficient Learned Image Compression
                                         Dailan He Yaoyan Zheng Baocheng Sun Yan Wang* Hongwei Qin
                                         SenseTime Research
                                         {hedailan, zhengyaoyan, sunbaocheng, wangyan1, qinhongwei}@sensetime.com
                                         Abstract
                                         For learned image compression, the autoregressive context model is proved effective in improving the ratedistortion (RD) performance. Because it helps remove spatial redundancies among latent representations. However,
                                         the decoding process must be done in a strict scan order,
                                         which breaks the parallelization. We propose a parallelizable checkerboard context model (CCM) to solve the problem. Our two-pass checkerboard context calculation eliminates such limitations on spatial locations by re-organizing
                                         the decoding order. Speeding up the decoding process more
                                         than 40 times in our experiments, it achieves significantly
                                         improved computational efficiency with almost the same
                                         rate-distortion performance. To the best of our knowledge,
                                         this is the first exploration on parallelization-friendly spatial context model for learned image compression.
                                         1. Introduction
                                         Image compression is a vital and long-standing research
                                         topic in multimedia signal processing. Various algorithms
                                         are designed to reduce spatial, visual, and statistical redundancies to produce more compact image representations.
                                         Common image compression algorithms like JPEG [15],
                                         JPEG2000 [30] and BPG [8] all follow a general pipeline,
                                         where lossless entropy coders [23] are used after image
                                         transformations and quantization. In those non-learned image compression methods, content loss only occurs in the
                                         quantization process. The transformations involved mainly
                                         include Discrete Cosine Transformation and Wavelet Transformation, which are lossless.
                                         In recent years, many state-of-the-art (SOTA) deep learning and computer vision techniques have been introduced to
                                         build powerful learned image compression methods. Many
                                         studies aim to establish novel image compression pipelines
                                         based on recurrent neural networks [35], convolutional autoencoders [5, 34, 31, 3, 6], or generative adversarial networks [1]. Some of them [26, 18, 11] have attained a better
                                         *Corresponding author. This work is done when Dailan He, Yaoyan
                                         Zheng and Baocheng Sun are interns at SenseTime Research.
                                         (a) serial 3 × 3 (b) serial 5 × 5
                                         × ×
                                         (c) ours 3 × 3
                                         × ×
                                         (d) ours 5 × 5
                                         Figure 1. Masked convolutions modeling spatial causal context.
                                         The red blocks denote elements to en/de-code. Latents in yellow
                                         and blue locations are currently visible (all of them are visible during encoding, and those who have been decoded are visible during
                                         decoding). A context modeling can be conducted using a masked
                                         convolution which is centered at the red location and only convolves with the yellow latents. (a)(b) 3 × 3 and 5 × 5 instances of
                                         the widely used serial context model. This context model requires
                                         strict Z-ordered serial decoding, which limits the computational
                                         efficiency. (c)(d) Our proposed checkerboard context model with
                                         a kernel size of 3×3 and 5×5. After decoding all anchors, which
                                         are latents in blue and yellow locations, the context calculating for
                                         all non-anchors can be run in parallel.
                                         performance than those currently SOTA conventional compression techniques such as JPEG2000 [30] and BPG [8] on
                                         both the peak signal-to-noise ratio (PSNR) and multi-scale
                                         structural similarity (MS-SSIM) [36] distortion metrics. Of
                                         particular note is, even the intra coding of Versatile Video
                                         Coding (VVC) [9], an upcoming video coding standard, has
                                         been approached by a recent learning-based method [10].
                                         The common key of those currently most successful approaches is the entropy modeling and optimizing method,
                                         with autoencoder based structure to perform a nonlinear
                                         transform coding [14, 5]. By estimating the probability distribution of latent representations, such models can minimize the entropy of these representations to be compressed,
                                         which directly correlates to the final code length using
                                         arithmetic encoding [32] or range encoding [24], and enable a differentiable form of rate-distortion (RD) optimization. Another important aspect is the introduction of hyperprior [6]. Hyper latent is the further extracted representation, which provides side-information implicitly describing
                                         the spatial correlations in latent. Adopting hyperprior modeling allows entropy models to approximate latent distributions more precisely and benefits the overall coding perfor14771
                                         mance. This method [6] is referred to as a scale hyperprior
                                         framework in their later work [26], where hyper latent is
                                         used to predict the entropy model’s scale parameter.
                                         The context model [26, 18], inspired by the concept of
                                         context from traditional codecs, is used to predict the probability of unknown codes based on latents that have already
                                         been decoded (as shown in Figure 1(a-b)). This method is
                                         referred to as a mean-scale hyperprior framework [26, 16],
                                         where hyper latent and context are used jointly to predict
                                         both the location (i.e. mean value) and scale parameter of
                                         the entropy model. Evaluated by previous works [26, 18],
                                         combining all the above-mentioned components (differentiable entropy modeling, hyper latent, and context model)
                                         can beat BPG in terms of PSNR and MS-SSIM. These
                                         context models are extended to more powerful and, of
                                         course, more computation-consuming ones by a series of
                                         later works [38, 19, 11, 10].
                                         Though it seems promising, there are still many problems to solve before those models can be used in practice.
                                         The above-mentioned context model, which plays a crucial
                                         role in achieving SOTA performance and is adopted by most
                                         recent works, has a horribly low computational efficiency
                                         because of the lack of parallelization [26, 16]. Recent works
                                         focusing on the real-world deployment of practical neural
                                         image compression choose to omit the context model due
                                         to its inefficiency. They choose to use only the scale hyperprior framework [4] or the mean-scale hyperprior framework but without the context model [16]. Li et al. introduce
                                         CCN [21] for a faster context calculation with moderate parallelizability but its efficiency is still limited by image size.
                                         In order to develop a practical and more effective learningbased image codec, it is essential to investigate more efficient context models.
                                         In this paper, we propose a novel parallelizable checkerboard context model along with a two-pass decoding
                                         method to achieve a better balance between RD performance and running efficiency.
                                         2. Related Work
                                         The most related works, including [5, 6, 26], which establish a powerful convolutional autoencoder framework for
                                         learned image compression, have been introduced in the introduction part.
                                         A very recent work [27] proposes a channel-wise autoregressive entropy model that aims to minimize the elementlevel serial processing in the context model of [26] and
                                         achieves SOTA RD performance when combined with latent residual prediction and round-based training. Our
                                         checkerboard context is built in the spatial dimension,
                                         which provides a new solution to the serial processing problem.
                                         There are also related works aiming to improve different aspects of the convolutional autoencoder framework, in-
                                         (a) autoencoder with hyperprior (b) extend (a) with a context model
                                         Figure 2. Operational diagrams: (a) Autoencoder with hyperprior.
                                         Arrows show the data flow direction. Boxes are transforms implemented by neural networks. Boxes labeled U|Q is the quantization
                                         module, which performs uniform perturbation in the training stage
                                         and quantization in the inference stage. (b) Autoencoder with both
                                         hyperprior and context model.
                                         cluding using more complex entropy models [25, 28, 20,
                                         10], enhancing reconstruction quality with post-processing
                                         networks [39], enabling variable rate compression using
                                         a single model [11, 13], using content aware compression [22], and incorporating multi-scale or attention-based
                                         neural architectures and fancier quantization methods [25,
                                         40, 37].
                                         3. Preliminary
                                         3.1. Variational Image Compression with Hyperprior
                                         The diagram for the scale hyperprior framework [6] is
                                         given in Figure 2(a). ga, gs, ha, hs are nonlinear transforms
                                         implemented by neural networks. x is the original image,
                                         y = ga(x) and yˆ = Q(y) are latent representations before
                                         and after quantization, xˆ = gs(yˆ) is the reconstructed image. z = ha(y) and zˆ = Q(z) are the hyper latent before
                                         and after quantization. zˆ is used as side information to estimate the scale parameter σ for the entropy model of latent
                                         yˆ. During training, the quantization operation is approximated by adding uniform noise, producing differentiable
                                         variables y˜, z˜ and x˜. Hereinafter we always use xˆ, yˆ and
                                         zˆ to represent x˜|xˆ, y˜|yˆ and z˜|zˆ for simplicity. The tradeoff between rate and distortion or the loss function can be
                                         written as:
                                         R + λ · D = Ex∼px
                                         [− log2 pyˆ|zˆ(yˆ|zˆ) − log2 pzˆ(zˆ)]
                                         + λ · Ex∼px
                                         [d(x, xˆ)] (1)
                                         where bit rate of latent yˆ and hyper latent zˆ is approximated
                                         by estimated entropy, λ controls the bit rate(i.e. larger λ for
                                         larger rate and better reconstruction quality), d(x, xˆ) is the
                                         distortion term, usually using MSE or MS-SSIM.
                                         With scale hyperprior [6], the probability of latents yˆ can
                                         be modeled by a conditional Gaussian scale mixture (GSM)
                                         model:
                                         pyˆ|zˆ(ˆyi
                                         |zˆ) = 
                                         N (µi
                                         , σ2
                                         i
                                         ) ∗ U(−
                                         1
                                         2
                                         ,
                                         1
                                         2
                                         )
                                         
                                         (ˆyi) (2)
                                         14772
                                         pyˆ|zˆ(yˆ|zˆ) = Y
                                         i
                                         pyˆ|zˆ(ˆyi
                                         |zˆ)
                                         (3)
                                         where the location parameter µi
                                         is assumed to be zero and
                                         the scale parameter σi
                                         is the i-th element of σ = hs(zˆ) for
                                         each code in yˆ given the hyperprior. The probability of the
                                         hyper latent zˆ can be modeled using a non-parametric fully
                                         factorized density model [6].
                                         3.2. Autoregressive Context
                                         In the mean-scale hyperprior framework [26], an additional module called context model is added to boost the RD
                                         performance. Figure 2(b) shows the entire structure consisting of autoencoder (ga, gs), hyper autoencoder (ha, hs),
                                         context model (gcm), and a parameter inference network
                                         (gep) which estimates the location and scale parameters
                                         Φ = (µ,σ) of the entropy model for latent yˆ. Let hs(zˆ)
                                         denote the hyperprior feature and gcm(yˆ<i) denote the context feature, the parameter prediction for i-th representation
                                         yˆi
                                         is
                                         Φi = (µi
                                         , σi) = gep
                                         hs(zˆ), gcm(yˆ<i)
                                         
                                         (4)
                                         where yˆ<i means the causal context (i.e. some nearby visible latents of latent yˆi). This type of context model can be
                                         implemented using masked convolutions. Given the k × k
                                         binary mask M and convolutional weights W, the masked
                                         convolution with kernel size of k × k on input x can be
                                         performed in a reparameterization form:
                                         gcm(x) = (M ⊙ W)x + b (5)
                                         where ⊙ is the Hadamard operator and b is a bias term.
                                         Since M describes the context modeling pattern, by manually set different mask M various context referring schemes
                                         are obtained. In previous works, usually the mask shown in
                                         Figure 1(a) is adopted as M to implement a left-top reference which requires strict Z-ordered serial decoding because only already decoded latents are visible.
                                         In [10], the entropy model is improved by using a discretized K-component Gaussian mixture model (GMM):
                                         pyˆ|zˆ(ˆyi
                                         |zˆ) = X
                                         0<k<K
                                         π
                                         (k)
                                         i
                                         
                                         N (µ
                                         (k)
                                         i
                                         , σ
                                         2(k)
                                         i
                                         ) ∗ U(−
                                         1
                                         2
                                         ,
                                         1
                                         2
                                         )
                                         
                                         (ˆyi)
                                         (6)
                                         where K groups of entropy parameters (π
                                         (k)
                                         , µ
                                         (k)
                                         ,σ
                                         (k)
                                         )
                                         are calculated by gep. Combined with the autogressive context model, [10] is the first to achieve comparable PSNR
                                         with VVC.
                                         Following previous works [26, 10], we do not apply context model to the hyper latent zˆ.
                                         4. Parallel Context Modeling
                                         Though the previous context model, called serial context model by us and shown in Figure 1(a), has a limitaContext
                                         Model
                                         𝒚
                                         ෝ
                                         𝒈𝒄𝒎(𝒚; 𝑴, 𝑾) ෝ
                                         ? ···
                                         𝑴
                                         sampling space
                                         masks to evaluate
                                         Figure 3. Context model in proposed random-mask model. Mask
                                         M is randomly generated during training (orange dashed box) and
                                         replaced by a fixed mask (blue dashed line) during evaluation.
                                         tion on computational efficiency, most of the SOTA methods still rely on it [26, 10, 20]. Therefore, improvement is
                                         highly required. We firstly analyze the context model using a random-mask model, then we propose a novel parallel
                                         context model with checkerboard shaped masked convolution as a replacement to the existing serial context model.
                                         4.1. Random-Mask Model: Test Arbitrary Masks
                                         The context model can be seen as a convolution with
                                         weight W conditioned on the binary mask M, as described
                                         in eq. 5 where the mask describes the pattern of context
                                         modeling. To understand the mechanism of context models
                                         and explore better modeling patterns, we propose a randommask toy model to which arbitrary mask can be fed as the
                                         context modeling pattern.
                                         The random-mask model is adapted from the abovementioned autoregressive model [26] with the same en/decoders and gep. The serial context model with a manually
                                         designed mask is replaced by a convolution conditioned on
                                         randomly generated masks during training. As shown in
                                         Figure 3, we generate random sampled 5 × 5 masks M and
                                         compute Hadamard product of M and non-masked convolution weights W to obtain the masked convolution weights
                                         M ⊙ W in every iteration of the training stage. After each
                                         time of backward propagation, the weights W will be updated guided by a random mask M, which implicitly establishes a supernet consisting of all context models conditioned on 5×5 masks. Therefore, weights are shared among
                                         context models using different masks so that the trained
                                         random-mask model can be used to evaluate arbitrary masks
                                         during inference. After training, to test the performance of
                                         a particular mask pattern, we simply feed that mask to the
                                         context model as M, and then the random-mask model has
                                         a context model with a fixed mask.
                                         This random-mask model is suitable to measure the ability to save bit rate brought by various context modeling patterns. The same latent yˆ and reconstructed image xˆ are
                                         shared (because of the weight sharing) so that the same distortion is shared among context modeling patterns, enabling
                                         the direct comparison of bit rates. Let R0 denote the nonreference bits per pixel (BPP) when context modeling is
                                         disabled by inputting a full-zero mask to the random-mask
                                         1477
                                         model (corresponds to the context-free mean-scale hyperprior baseline [26]). We further quantitate the ability of rate
                                         saving as a rate saving ratio:
                                         η(M) = R0 − RM
                                         R0
                                         × 100% (7)
                                         where RM denotes the BPP feeding mask M to the
                                         random-mask model. In the following section, we use the
                                         trained random-mask model to analyze context modeling
                                         patterns represented by masks M by calculating their rate
                                         saving ratio η(M).
                                         4.2. How Distance Influences Rate Saving
                                         The serial context model saves rate by referring to already decoded neighboring latents to estimate the entropy
                                         of current decoding latent more precisely. For such a model
                                         with a 5 × 5 mask (Figure 1(b)), latents on 12 locations
                                         at the left-top of the central location are referred to in the
                                         estimation. We find that latents on nearer locations contribute to rate saving much more significantly by calculating
                                         the η of 24 different single-reference masks (each mask has
                                         only one location set to 1 and others set to 0, as shown in
                                         Figure 4(b)) based on the above-mentioned random-mask
                                         model. The result is shown in Figure 4(a). It is obvious
                                         that closer neighboring latents reduce much more bit rate,
                                         and neighbors with a distance of more than 2 elements influence the bit saving negligibly.
                                         To dig deeper, we analyze how the context models help
                                         save rate. With context modeling, the entropy model estimates decoding latents yˆi conditioned on those visible already decoded latents yˆj<i. Viewing those latents on different locations as samples from correlated virtual coding
                                         sources Yˆ
                                         i and Yˆ
                                         j<i, the mutual information I(Yˆ
                                         i
                                         ; Yˆ
                                         j<i) between them is recognized by context model and partially
                                         removed from bits used to encode yˆi
                                         . According to the
                                         Slepian-Wolf coding theory [33], the optimal bit rate:
                                         Rˆ = H(Yˆ
                                         i
                                         , Yˆ
                                         j<i) = H(Yˆ
                                         i) + H(Yˆ
                                         j<i) − I(Yˆ
                                         i
                                         ; Yˆ
                                         j<i)
                                         is theoretically reachable. Therefore, provided that the
                                         training is sufficient, a context modeling pattern referring to
                                         latents with more mutual information I(Yˆ
                                         i
                                         ; Yˆ
                                         j<i), or simply
                                         saying, more causal relationship, saves more bit rate.
                                         On the other hand, spatial redundancy is an important basis of image and video compression. Strong self-correlation
                                         exists in digital images, and adjacent pixels are likely to
                                         have a stronger causal relationship. Empirically, convolution outputs partially keep such redundancy because of locality [6], even when using scale hyperprior [26, 10]. So the
                                         latents still retain a similar redundancy.
                                         That tells how the distance between referred latents and
                                         decoding latents influences the bit saving of context modeling in learned image compression. Nearer latents have
                                         0 1 2 3 4
                                         0
                                         1
                                         2
                                         3
                                         4
                                         0.72% 1.71% 3.18% 1.75% 0.74%
                                         1.97% 4.15% 6.93% 4.11% 2.00%
                                         4.22% 8.14% 8.16% 4.29%
                                         2.04% 4.05% 6.93% 4.18% 1.95%
                                         0.71% 1.66% 3.14% 1.69% 0.65%
                                         0.01
                                         0.02
                                         0.03
                                         0.04
                                         0.05
                                         0.06
                                         0.07
                                         0.08
                                         (a) (b)
                                         Figure 4. (a) Rate saving ratios of single-reference masks tested on
                                         Kodak images [17]. (b) For each single-reference mask, only one
                                         location is set to 1 (black) and others are set to 0 (white).
                                         a stronger causal relationship, and more mutual information can be re-calculated during decoding instead of being
                                         stored and occupying the bit rate. Also, it helps explain
                                         why modeling the context using masked convolution with
                                         larger kernels or a stack of 5 × 5 convolutions (with a much
                                         larger receptive field) unexpectedly does damage to the RDperformance, as reported in previous work [26]. Referring
                                         to further neighbors that carry nearly no mutual information
                                         helps little but increases the risk of overfitting.
                                         This implies that a context modeling pattern referring to
                                         more close neighbors is more likely to save more bit rate
                                         than presently adopted serial context models. We then establish our parallel context model based on this motivation.
                                         4.3. Parallel Decoding with Checkerboard Context
                                         Figure 1(c) shows a checkerboard shaped context model.
                                         Referring to four nearest neighbours, it outperforms both
                                         3 × 3 and 5 × 5 serial context model in our further experiments on random-mask model (we will discuss this experiment in section 5.1 and Table 1, here we bring forward its
                                         conclusion to motivate the proposal of checkerboard shaped
                                         context models). Then we further extend it to a general form
                                         with arbitrary kernel size (for an instance of 5 × 5 kernel,
                                         see Figure 1(d)). Though it is impossible to apply it on the
                                         whole latent feature map (or the adjacent latents will depend
                                         on each other during decoding), it is helpful to building a
                                         computationally efficient parallel context model without introducing apparent RD performance loss compared with the
                                         present serial context model.
                                         To develop our parallel decoding approach, we only encode/decode half of the latents (white and red ones in Figure 1(c) and Figure 1(d)) using checkerboard shaped context and hyperprior. The coding of the other half of latents,
                                         which we call anchors, only depends on the hyperprior. To
                                         implement these two sets of rules, we set the context feature of all anchors zero and adapt the calculation of entropy
                                         14774
                                         𝒈𝒄𝒎
                                         𝒈𝒆𝒑
                                         𝒈𝒆𝒑
                                         AD AD
                                         : entropy parameter
                                         : zero
                                         : hyperprior feature
                                         : context feature
                                         : useless value / placeholder
                                         PASS 1 (anchor decoding) PASS 2 (non-anchor decoding)
                                         : latent
                                         Figure 5. Illustration of the proposed two-pass decoding. gcm is the context model with a checkerboard mask and gep is the parameter
                                         network. Entropy parameters Φanchor and Φnon−anchor are estimated in turn. To decode the latents (orange blocks) from bitstream (not
                                         given in the diagram), useless values (gray blocks) in estimated entropy parameters are removed and the remained ones (blue blocks) are
                                         flattened and input into arithmetic decoder (AD). For further implementation details, please refer to the supplementary material.
                                         parameters Φ in eq. 4 to a spatial location conditioned form:
                                         Φi =
                                         (
                                         gep (hs(zˆ), 0)
                                         i
                                         , yˆi ∈ yˆanchor
                                         gep (hs(zˆ), gcm(yˆanchor;M ⊙ W))i
                                         , otherwise
                                         (8)
                                         where gcm is the masked convolution as described in eq. 5
                                         conditioned on a checkerboard-shaped mask M. Its input yˆanchor is the set of anchors and i is the index for the
                                         i-th element yˆi
                                         in latent yˆ. For approaches using meanscale Gaussian entropy models, the entropy parameter Φ =
                                         (µ,σ), and for methods adopting GMM Φ consists of K
                                         groups of π
                                         (k)
                                         , µ
                                         (k)
                                         and σ
                                         (k)
                                         .
                                         When anchors are visible, the context features of all nonanchors can be calculated in parallel by a masked convolution. Anchors’ decoding is also run in parallel, so the
                                         entropy parameter calculation in eq. 4 for decoding can be
                                         performed in two passes, which is much more efficient than
                                         the serial context model.
                                         4.3.1 Encoding Latents in One Pass
                                         Here we reformulate eq. 8 to illustrate that the encoding
                                         process can be done within one pass. By one pass we mean
                                         entropy parameters Φ of all the latents are obtained in parallel without element-wise sequential calculation. Let yˆhalf
                                         denotes the latents with all non-anchors set to zero:
                                         (yˆhalf)i =
                                         (
                                         yˆi
                                         , yˆi ∈ yˆanchor
                                         0, otherwise
                                         (9)
                                         Since now the binary mask M is checkerboard-shaped, if
                                         input yˆhalf into gcm, according to eq. 5 we have:
                                         gcm(yˆhalf)i =
                                         (
                                         byˆi
                                         , yˆi ∈ yˆanchor
                                         gcm(yˆanchor)i
                                         , otherwise
                                         (10)
                                         where byˆi ∈ b is the corresponding bias term added to
                                         yˆi
                                         . Similar to yˆhalf, let bhalf denote a feature map with
                                         all elements on anchor locations set to b and the others set
                                         to zeros. Because gep is usually implemented as a pointwise transform consisting of a stack of 1 × 1 convolutions [26, 10], we can re-write eq. 8 to:
                                         Φ = gep (hs(zˆ), gcm(yˆhalf) − bhalf) (11)
                                         During encoding (and training) all latents in yˆ are visible,
                                         so we can simply generate yˆhalf from yˆ by setting its nonanchors to zero and then calculate all entropy parameters
                                         Φ in parallel with only one pass of context model and parameter network. Finally, we flatten and rearrange yˆ and
                                         Φ and then encode anchors and non-anchors into the bitstream in turn. We will discuss cheap and parallel ways to
                                         get yˆhalf and bhalf in the supplementary material. Hence,
                                         only an element-wise subtraction in eq. 11 is newly introduced to the encoding process for using the checkerboard
                                         context model, which won’t slow down the encoding.
                                         4.3.2 Decoding Latents in Two Passes
                                         At the beginning of decoding, the hyper latent zˆ can be decompressed directly by an arithmetic decoder (AD) from
                                         the bitstream using code probability pzˆ. Then the hyperprior feature hs(zˆ) is calculated. After that, there are two
                                         decoding passes to obtain whole latent yˆ, as shown in Figure 5.
                                         In the first decoding pass, entropy parameters of anchors
                                         Φanchor are calculated with the context feature set to zero
                                         according to eq. 8. Then the conditional probability pyˆ|zˆ
                                         of anchors is determined by these entropy parameters. Now
                                         the anchors, half of all the latent elements in yˆ, can be decoded by AD. Then decoded anchors become visible for
                                         decoding non-anchors in the next pass.
                                         14775
                                         In the second decoding pass, the context feature for
                                         non-anchors can be calculated using proposed checkerboard
                                         model and entropy parameters of them are calculated from
                                         concatenated hyperprior feature and context feature. Then
                                         AD can decompress the remained half of yˆ (those nonanchors) from the bitstream and we obtain whole latent yˆ.
                                         Finally, we get reconstructed image xˆ = gs(yˆ).
                                         4.3.3 Structure and Analysis
                                         As an example, Figure 6 shows how we adapt the structure
                                         of the autoregressive model [26] by replacing its serial context model with proposed checkerboard context model. We
                                         don’t modify other components of the autoregressive model
                                         for fair comparison.
                                         For convolution kernel size of k,
                                         k
                                         2
                                         2
                                         neighbors evenly
                                         distribute around the center (as is shown in Figure 1(c)) and
                                         contribute to the context for each non-anchor spatial location. Though only half of the latents refers to their neighbours now, a checkerboard context model can extract more
                                         causal information from decoded neighbours to save more
                                         bit rate. This compensates the potential BPP increase when
                                         compressing anchors without using any context in our proposed method.
                                         Compared with the serial context model [26] which requires H×W sequential steps to decode a H×W×M latent
                                         feature map, our proposed parallel model allows a constant
                                         step of 2 to decode such latents, where H × W ×
                                         M
                                         2
                                         latent representations are processed in parallel. Considering
                                         that large-size images with more than one million pixels
                                         are produced and shared frequently nowadays, this parallelizable checkerboard context model brings significant improvement on practicality.
                                         5. Experiments
                                         We implement representative previous works and our
                                         proposed methods in PyTorch [29]. We choose the largest
                                         8000 images from the ImageNet [12] validation set as our
                                         training data, where each image has more than one million
                                         pixels. Following previous works [5, 6], we add random
                                         uniform noise to each of them and then downsample all the
                                         images. We use Kodak dataset [17] and Tecnick dataset [2]
                                         as our test set.
                                         During training, before fed into models all input images
                                         are randomly cropped to 256 × 256 patches. All models
                                         are trained for 2000 epochs (i.e. 2M steps) with a batchsize of 8 and learning rate of 10−4
                                         if not specified. Sadam
                                         optimization [7] is adopted on each convolution layer for
                                         training stability.
                                         5.1. Toy Experiments on Random-Mask Model
                                         We adapt the architecture of Minnen2018 [26] by replacing its context model by a 5 × 5 random-mask convolution
                                         description Kref RM η(M)
                                         non-reference (R0) 0 0.4332 0.0%
                                         serial 3 × 3 (Fig. 1(a)) 4 0.3928 9.3%
                                         serial 5 × 5 (Fig. 1(b)) 12 0.3817 11.9%
                                         checkerboard 3 × 3 (Fig. 1(c)) 4 0.3651 15.7%
                                         checkerboard 5 × 5 (Fig. 1(d)) 12 0.3648 15.8%
                                         all neighbours in 3 × 3 8 0.3649 15.8%
                                         Table 1. Various masks tested with the random-mask model. Kref
                                         denotes the number of referred neighbours (i.e. number of ones in
                                         the mask). RM and η(M) denote the BPP and rate saving ratio
                                         when feeding mask M to the random-mask model. The row all
                                         neighbours in 3 × 3 refers to the mask where all 8 neighbours
                                         surrounding the center are set to 1. Note that the random-mask
                                         model is not designed as an actual codec, during decoding we can
                                         use entropy model parameters obtained in the encoding process,
                                         which is not allowed in actual decoder.
                                         to obtain the random-mask model mentioned in section 4.1.
                                         Here we further discuss its details. To generate a binary
                                         mask, each location of the mask is sampled from {0, 1} in
                                         equiprobability. During training, new random masks are
                                         generated in every iteration. To train such a model with
                                         random-mask context, we set λ = 0.01 and N = M = 256
                                         for MSE optimization. On the trained model we perform
                                         two toy experiments:
                                         • Single Reference Mask for Causal Estimation. As
                                         above mentioned, we estimate the causal relationship
                                         between latent pairs by using 5 × 5 masks with only
                                         one location set to 1 and calculating their η on Kodak.
                                         Figure 4(a) shows the result which implies that the mutual information between latents decays quickly as the
                                         spatial distance between them increases.
                                         • Performance of Various Masks. We test several
                                         masks using the random-mask model and post a brief
                                         report in Table 1. It indicates that simply increasing the number of referred neighbours (i.e. Kref in
                                         the table) doesn’t always help save bit rate, because
                                         the pattern referring to 4 adjacent neighbours (the row
                                         checkerboard 3×3) performs much better than the pattern referring to 12 left-top neighbours (the row serial
                                         5×5). Also, even referring to all 8 surrounding neighbours cannot outperform checkerboard 3×3. However,
                                         masks referring to more adjacent neighbours (the last
                                         three rows) always perform better. This further proves
                                         that closer neighbours play much more important roles
                                         in context modeling. Motivated by this experiment, we
                                         establish our parallel context model based on checkerboard 5 × 5.
                                         14776
                                         Conv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         Conv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         GDN
                                         Conv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         GDN
                                         GDN
                                         Conv 5x5, M, stride 2
                                         AE
                                         AD
                                         𝒚
                                         ෝ
                                         Deconv 5x5, 3, stride 2
                                         Deconv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         Deconv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         Deconv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         IGDN
                                         IGDN
                                         IGDN
                                         𝒚
                                         ෝ
                                         𝒙
                                         𝒙
                                         ෝ
                                         Conv 3x3, N, stride 1
                                         Leaky ReLU
                                         Conv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         Leaky ReLU
                                         Conv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         Quantization
                                         𝒚
                                         AE
                                         AD
                                         𝒛
                                         ො
                                         𝒛
                                         Deconv 5x5, N, stride 2
                                         Deconv 3x3, 2M, stride 1
                                         Deconv 5x5, 1.5N, stride 2
                                         Leaky ReLU
                                         Leaky ReLU
                                         Quantization Concat
                                         Conv 1x1, 640, stride 1
                                         Conv 1x1, 512, stride 1
                                         Leaky ReLU
                                         Leaky ReLU
                                         𝓝(𝝁, 𝝈) Conv 1x1, 2N, stride 1
                                         Factorized
                                         𝒛
                                         ො
                                         𝒈𝒂
                                         𝒈s
                                         𝒉𝒂
                                         𝒉𝒔
                                         MConv 5x5
                                         2M, stride 1
                                         𝒈𝒄𝒎
                                         𝒈𝒆𝒑
                                         (𝝁, 𝝈)
                                         𝒚
                                         ෝ
                                         half
                                         𝒛
                                         ො
                                         𝒚
                                         ෝ
                                         anchor
                                         𝟎
                                         bitstream bitstream
                                         Figure 6. Previously proposed framework of learned compression model using context based autoregressive entropy model [26]. We
                                         replace the serial context model with the proposed checkerboard convolution. Blue and red lines denote encoding and decoding data flow
                                         respectively. Processes shared by both encoding and decoding are represented by yellow lines.
                                         architecture (N=192) Balle2018 ´
                                         Minnen2018 Cheng2020
                                         w/o context serial parallel(ours) serial parallel(ours)
                                         Kodak (768 × 512) 26.34 26.41 1323.66 29.66 1395.35 75.23
                                         Tecnick (1200 × 1200) 83.28 86.31 4977.98 95.46 5296.16 259.37
                                         Table 2. Total decoding time averaged on Kodak and Tecnick (ms). Feature map size of each Kodak image is 48×32×M and feature map
                                         size of each Tecnick image is 75 × 75 × M. Balle2018 is the earlier context-free hyperprior model [ ´ 6] while Minnen2018 and Cheng2020
                                         represent the serial autoregressive structure [26] and its Gaussian Mixture Model (GMM) and attention involved adaption [10] respectively.
                                         For models marked as serial the serial context models are adopted and for parallel ones the proposed checkerboard context is used.
                                         0.0 0.1 0.2 0.3 0.4 0.5 0.6 0.7 0.8 0.9
                                         Bits Per Pixel
                                         28
                                         30
                                         32
                                         34
                                         36
                                         PSNR
                                         Cheng2020 with checkerboard, 6M steps (ours)
                                         Minnen2020, cc10 [26]
                                         Cheng2020 [10]
                                         Cheng2020 with checkerboard, 1M steps (ours)
                                         Minnen2018 [25]
                                         Minnen2018 with checkerboard (ours)
                                         Minnen2018 w/o context [25]
                                         BPG (4:4:4) [8]
                                         Ballé2018 [6]
                                         JPEG [15]
                                         Figure 7. RD curves of various learned or manually designed
                                         image codecs. The results are averaged on Kodak. Except for
                                         two models with our proposed context model, all data are reported
                                         by prior works. All learned models are optimized for MSE. For
                                         MS-SSIM optimization results please refer to the supplementary
                                         material.
                                         5.2. Checkerboard Context Model V.S. Serial Context Model
                                         We evaluate our checkerboard context model and the parallel decoding method based on two previous architectures
                                         using serial context: Minnen2018 [26] and Cheng2020 [10].
                                         As is explained in section 4.3.3 and shown in Figure 6 using
                                         0.0 0.1 0.2 0.3 0.4 0.5 0.6 0.7 0.8 0.9
                                         Bits Per Pixel
                                         28
                                         30
                                         32
                                         34
                                         36
                                         PSNR
                                         Cheng2020 [10]
                                         Cheng2020, 1M steps (reproduction)
                                         Cheng2020 with checkerboard, 1M steps (ours)
                                         Minnen2018 [25]
                                         Minnen2018 (reproduction)
                                         Minnen2018 with checkerboard (ours)
                                         Ballé2018 [6]
                                         Figure 8. Comparison of parallel and serial context models on
                                         Minnen2018 and Cheng2020. Curves marked as ours and reproduction are trained on our dataset using above specified settings,
                                         while the rest are reported results.
                                         Minnen2018 as an example, we do not change any other architectures except replacing the serial context model by the
                                         proposed one to ensure fair comparisons.
                                         To compare the performance of different context models, we implement these two baseline models, and for each
                                         baseline we train its adaption with parallel context model
                                         under the same settings. The detailed experimental settings
                                         are:
                                         14777
                                         Minnen2018 (N=192) serial parallel(ours)
                                         hyper synthesis 1.26 1.42
                                         parameter calculation 1302.42 4.75
                                         latent synthesis 20.98 23.49
                                         total 1323.66 29.66
                                         Table 3. Running speed of Minnen2018’s each decoding process
                                         (ms). In hyper synthesis and latent synthesis, the decoders hs and
                                         gs are invoked respectively. In parameter calculation, context features and entropy parameters are calculated by gcm and gep.
                                         • Cheng2020. We train Cheng2020 following their reported settings, i.e. K = 3, λ = {0.0016, 0.0032,
                                         0.0075, 0.015, 0.03, 0.045}, N = M = 128 for the three
                                         lower λ and N = M = 192 for the rest1
                                         . For reproduction we train 1M steps, and we find that training up to
                                         6M steps can lead to an even better RD performance
                                         especially at high bit rates. During training, after 3M
                                         steps we decay the learning rate from 10−4
                                         to 5×10−5
                                         .
                                         • Minnen2018. As the exact setting was not reported,
                                         we choose to use the same λ setting as Cheng2020. We
                                         follow the suggestion on reproduction from authors2
                                         to
                                         use N = 128 and M = 192 for small λ and N = 192 and
                                         M = 320 for big λ and consider λ ≥ 0.015 (corresponding BPP > 0.6) as big ones. For all models we
                                         train 6M steps and the learning rate decays to 5×10−5
                                         after 3M steps.
                                         5.2.1 Decoding Speed
                                         We evaluate inference latency of both serial and parallel
                                         models on Nvidia TITAN XP: Table 2 and Table 3. Notice
                                         that for proposed parallel models, the context model and
                                         the parameter network are invoked twice in the parameter
                                         calculation process. For serial models, context model and
                                         parameter network are called H × W times for decoding a
                                         H ×W ×M feature map. For each time we crop the visible
                                         neighbours to 5 × 5 patches then feed them into the serial
                                         context model for a fast implementation [38] to pursue a
                                         fair comparison. It is obvious that a serial context model
                                         becomes a bottleneck even when decoding relatively small
                                         images. Meanwhile, the proposed two-pass decoding model
                                         has a much faster running speed on parallel devices, making spatial context based image compression models more
                                         practical.
                                         5.2.2 Rate-Distortion Performance
                                         We train and compare proposed checkerboard context
                                         model and the serial model based on Minnen2018 and
                                         1The hyper-parameter M is not introduced in the original paper. Here
                                         we let M denote number of output channel of the encoder ga’s last layer.
                                         2https://groups.google.com/g/tensorflowcompression/c/LQtTAo6l26U/m/cD4ZzmJUAgAJ
                                         Cheng2020 with settings as mentioned above. Figure 8
                                         shows their RD-curves evaluated on Kodak (the ones
                                         marked as with checkerboard). Compared with original
                                         models, using such a parallel context model only slightly
                                         reduces RD performance on Kodak. However, it still outperforms the context-free hyperprior baseline (Balle2018 in ´
                                         the figure) significantly (compared with Balle2018, BDBR ´
                                         −17.0%/−27.4% for Minnen2018/Cheng2020 using our
                                         checkerboard context model). Since it removes the limitation of computational efficiency, we think the quality loss
                                         is acceptable.
                                         For completeness, we also compared our proposed
                                         models with several previous learned or conventional
                                         codecs including a recently proposed channel conditioned
                                         model [27], a SOTA architecture without using spatial context. See Figure 7, the channel conditioned model performs better than Cheng2020 with a parallel context model
                                         at lower bit rate but slightly worse at higher bit rate. As
                                         discussed by the author, a potential combination of spatial context and channel-wise adaption is promising to further improve RD performance of present approaches, since
                                         only the spatial-wise adaption can help remove spatial redundancy from source images. However, investigating the
                                         proper way of combining the two different type of adaptive modeling is beyond the scope of this paper as our topic
                                         is to speed up the spatial context model. To our understanding, the proposed parallel and efficient spatial context
                                         model is an important basis for future researches on the
                                         multi-dimension context modeling techniques, or the running speed will be inevitably limited by the low-efficiency
                                         serial context model.
                                         We have also tested all above-mentioned models on Tecnick dataset and come to the same conclusion that the proposed checkerboard context model can be used as an efficient replacement to the serial context. For more RD curves
                                         and results please refer to the supplementary material.
                                         6. Discussion
                                         Serial context models for learned image compression are
                                         computationally inefficient. We propose a parallel context
                                         model based on the checkerboard-shaped convolution and
                                         develop a two-pass parallel decoding scheme. Compared
                                         with the serial context model, it allows decoding to be implemented in a highly parallel manner. After applying it
                                         to two representative context model involved baselines, we
                                         prove that it greatly speeds up the decoding process on parallel devices while keeps a competitive compression performance. Also, our proposed approach does not require any
                                         changes in model structure or model capacity, so it is almost
                                         a drop-in replacement for the original widely used serial
                                         context model. Therefore, the proposed approach significantly improves the potential performance of SOTA learned
                                         image compression techniques with spatial context models.
                                         14778
                                         References
                                         [1] Eirikur Agustsson, Michael Tschannen, Fabian Mentzer,
                                         Radu Timofte, and Luc Van Gool. Generative adversarial
                                         networks for extreme learned image compression. In Proceedings of the IEEE International Conference on Computer
                                         Vision, pages 221–231, 2019.
                                         [2] N. Asuni and A. Giachetti. Testimages: a large-scale archive
                                         for testing visual devices and basic image processing algorithms. In STAG: Smart Tools & Apps for Graphics (2014),
                                         2014.
                                         [3] Mohammad Haris Baig, Vladlen Koltun, and Lorenzo Torresani. Learning to inpaint for image compression. In
                                         Advances in Neural Information Processing Systems, pages
                                         1246–1255, 2017.
                                         [4] Johannes Balle, Nick Johnston, and David Minnen. Integer ´
                                         networks for data compression with latent-variable models.
                                         In Int. Conf. on Learning Representations, 2019.
                                         [5] Johannes Balle, Valero Laparra, and Eero P Simoncelli. End- ´
                                         to-end optimized image compression. In Int. Conf. on Learning Representations, 2017.
                                         [6] Johannes Balle, David Minnen, Saurabh Singh, Sung Jin ´
                                         Hwang, and Nick Johnston. Variational image compression
                                         with a scale hyperprior. In Int. Conf. on Learning Representations, 2018.
                                         [7] J. Balle. Efficient nonlinear transforms for lossy image com- ´
                                         pression. In 2018 Picture Coding Symposium (PCS), pages
                                         248–252, June 2018.
                                         [8] Fabrice Bellard. Bpg image format. URL https://bellard.
                                         org/bpg, 2015.
                                         [9] B Bross, J Chen, and S Liu. Versatile video coding (draft 5).
                                         JVET, 2019.
                                         [10] Zhengxue Cheng, Heming Sun, Masaru Takeuchi, and Jiro
                                         Katto. Learned image compression with discretized gaussian
                                         mixture likelihoods and attention modules. In Proceedings of
                                         the IEEE/CVF Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern
                                         Recognition (CVPR), June 2020.
                                         [11] Yoojin Choi, Mostafa El-Khamy, and Jungwon Lee. Variable rate deep image compression with a conditional autoencoder. In Proceedings of the IEEE International Conference
                                         on Computer Vision, pages 3146–3154, 2019.
                                         [12] Jia Deng, Wei Dong, Richard Socher, Li-Jia Li, Kai Li,
                                         and Li Fei-Fei. Imagenet: A large-scale hierarchical image
                                         database. In 2009 IEEE conference on computer vision and
                                         pattern recognition, pages 248–255. Ieee, 2009.
                                         [13] Alexey Dosovitskiy and Djolonga Josip. You only train once:
                                         Loss-conditional training of deep networks. In Int. Conf. on
                                         Learning Representations, 2020.
                                         [14] V. K. Goyal. Theoretical foundations of transform coding.
                                         IEEE Signal Processing Magazine, 18(5):9–21, Sep. 2001.
                                         [15] ITU. Information technology - digital compression and coding of continuous - tone still images - requirements and
                                         guidelines. CCITT, Recommendation, 1992.
                                         [16] Nick Johnston, Elad Eban, Ariel Gordon, and Johannes
                                         Balle. Computationally efficient neural image compression. ´
                                         arXiv preprint arXiv:1912.08771, 2019.
                                         [17] Eastman Kodak. Kodak lossless true color image suite (photocd pcd0992), 1993.
                                         [18] Jooyoung Lee, Seunghyun Cho, and Seung-Kwon Beack.
                                         Context-adaptive entropy model for end-to-end optimized
                                         image compression. In Int. Conf. on Learning Representations, 2019.
                                         [19] Jooyoung Lee, Seunghyun Cho, Se-Yoon Jeong, Hyoungjin
                                         Kwon, Hyunsuk Ko, Hui Yong Kim, and Jin Soo Choi.
                                         Extended end-to-end optimized image compression method
                                         based on a context-adaptive entropy model. In Proceedings
                                         of the IEEE Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern
                                         Recognition Workshops, pages 0–0, 2019.
                                         [20] Jooyoung Lee, Seunghyun Cho, and Munchurl Kim. An endto-end joint learning scheme of image compression and quality enhancement with improved entropy minimization. arXiv
                                         preprint arXiv:1912.12817, 2019.
                                         [21] Mu Li, Kede Ma, Jane You, David Zhang, and Wangmeng
                                         Zuo. Efficient and effective context-based convolutional entropy modeling for image compression. IEEE Transactions
                                         on Image Processing, 29:5900–5911, 2020.
                                         [22] Mu Li, Wangmeng Zuo, Shuhang Gu, Debin Zhao, and
                                         David Zhang. Learning convolutional networks for contentweighted image compression. In Proceedings of the IEEE
                                         Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition,
                                         pages 3214–3223, 2018.
                                         [23] Detlev Marpe, Heiko Schwarz, and Thomas Wiegand.
                                         Context-based adaptive binary arithmetic coding in the h.
                                         264/avc video compression standard. IEEE Transactions on
                                         circuits and systems for video technology, 13(7):620–636,
                                         2003.
                                         [24] G Martin. Range encoding: an algorithm for removing redundancy from a digitised message. In Video and Data
                                         Recording Conference, Southampton, 1979, pages 24–27,
                                         1979.
                                         [25] Fabian Mentzer, Eirikur Agustsson, Michael Tschannen,
                                         Radu Timofte, and Luc Van Gool. Conditional probability
                                         models for deep image compression. In Proceedings of the
                                         IEEE Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition, pages 4394–4402, 2018.
                                         [26] David Minnen, Johannes Balle, and George D Toderici. ´
                                         Joint autoregressive and hierarchical priors for learned image
                                         compression. In Advances in Neural Information Processing
                                         Systems, pages 10771–10780, 2018.
                                         [27] David Minnen and Saurabh Singh. Channel-wise autoregressive entropy models for learned image compression. 2020.
                                         [28] David Minnen, George Toderici, Saurabh Singh, Sung Jin
                                         Hwang, and Michele Covell. Image-dependent local entropy
                                         models for learned image compression. In 2018 25th IEEE
                                         International Conference on Image Processing (ICIP), pages
                                         430–434. IEEE, 2018.
                                         [29] Adam Paszke, Sam Gross, Francisco Massa, Adam Lerer,
                                         James Bradbury, Gregory Chanan, Trevor Killeen, Zeming
                                         Lin, Natalia Gimelshein, Luca Antiga, et al. Pytorch: An
                                         imperative style, high-performance deep learning library. In
                                         Advances in Neural Information Processing Systems, pages
                                         8024–8035, 2019.
                                         [30] Majid Rabbani. Jpeg2000: Image compression fundamentals, standards and practice. Journal of Electronic Imaging,
                                         11(2):286, 2002.
                                         14779
                                         [31] Oren Rippel and Lubomir Bourdev. Real-time adaptive image compression. In Proceedings of the 34th International
                                         Conference on Machine Learning-Volume 70, pages 2922–
                                         2930. JMLR. org, 2017.
                                         [32] Jorma Rissanen and Glen Langdon. Universal modeling
                                         and coding. IEEE Transactions on Information Theory,
                                         27(1):12–23, 1981.
                                         [33] David Slepian and Jack Wolf. Noiseless coding of correlated
                                         information sources. IEEE Transactions on information Theory, 19(4):471–480, 1973.
                                         [34] Lucas Theis, Wenzhe Shi, Andrew Cunningham, and Ferenc
                                         Huszar. Lossy image compression with compressive autoen- ´
                                         coders. In Int. Conf. on Learning Representations, 2017.
                                         [35] George Toderici, Damien Vincent, Nick Johnston, Sung
                                         Jin Hwang, David Minnen, Joel Shor, and Michele Covell.
                                         Full resolution image compression with recurrent neural networks. In Proceedings of the IEEE Conference on Computer
                                         Vision and Pattern Recognition, pages 5306–5314, 2017.
                                         [36] Zhou Wang, Eero P Simoncelli, and Alan C Bovik. Multiscale structural similarity for image quality assessment. In
                                         The Thrity-Seventh Asilomar Conference on Signals, Systems & Computers, 2003, volume 2, pages 1398–1402. Ieee,
                                         2003.
                                         [37] Sihan Wen, Jing Zhou, Akira Nakagawa, Kimihiko Kazui,
                                         and Zhiming Tan. Variational autoencoder based image compression with pyramidal features and context entropy model.
                                         In Proceedings of the IEEE Conference on Computer Vision
                                         and Pattern Recognition Workshops, 2019.
                                         [38] Jing Zhou, Sihan Wen, Akira Nakagawa, Kimihiko Kazui,
                                         and Zhiming Tan. Multi-scale and context-adaptive entropy
                                         model for image compression. In Proceedings of the IEEE
                                         Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition
                                         Workshops, 2019.
                                         [39] Lei Zhou, Chunlei Cai, Yue Gao, Sanbao Su, and Junmin
                                         Wu. Variational autoencoder for low bit-rate image compression. In CVPR Workshops, pages 2617–2620, 2018.
                                         [40] Lei Zhou, Zhenhong Sun, Xiangji Wu, and Junmin Wu. Endto-end optimized image compression with attention mechanism. In Proceedings of the IEEE Conference on Computer
                                         Vision and Pattern Recognition Workshops, pages 0–0, 2019.
                                         14780
The Project Gutenberg eBook of The life of Cardinal Mezzofanti, by
Charles William Russell

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States, you
will have to check the laws of the country where you are located before
using this eBook.

Title: The life of Cardinal Mezzofanti
       With an introductory memoir of eminent linguists, ancient and
       modern

Author: Charles William Russell

Release Date: December 4, 2022 [eBook #69473]

Language: English

Produced by: Tim Lindell and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
             https://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from images
             generously made available by The Internet Archive/Canadian
             Libraries)

*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE LIFE OF CARDINAL
MEZZOFANTI ***






THE LIFE OF CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI.




[Illustration: J. Card. Mezzofanti

  Perugini, del.      H. Adlard, sc.]




                                 THE LIFE
                                    OF
                           CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI;
                                   WITH
                          AN INTRODUCTORY MEMOIR
                                    OF
                  EMINENT LINGUISTS, ANCIENT AND MODERN.

                                    BY
                           C. W. RUSSELL, D.D.
              PRESIDENT OF ST. PATRICK’S COLLEGE, MAYNOOTH.

                                 LONDON:
                         LONGMAN, BROWN, AND CO.
                             PATERNOSTER-ROW.
                                  1858.

                [_The Right of Translation is reserved._]




PREFACE.


The following Memoir had its origin in an article on Cardinal Mezzofanti,
contributed to the Edinburgh Review in the year 1855. The subject
appeared at that time to excite considerable interest. The article was
translated into French, and, in an abridged form, into Italian; and I
received through the editor, from persons entirely unknown to me, more
than one suggestion that I should complete the biography, accompanied by
offers of additional information for the purpose.

Nevertheless, the notices of the Cardinal on which that article was
founded, and which at that time comprised all the existing materials
for a biography, appeared to me, with all their interest, to want the
precision and the completeness which are essential to a just estimate of
his attainments. I felt that to judge satisfactorily his acquaintance
with a range of languages so vast as that which fame ascribed to
him, neither sweeping statements founded on popular reports, however
confident, nor general assertions from individuals, however distinguished
and trustworthy, could safely be regarded as sufficient. The proof of his
familiarity with any particular language, in order to be satisfactory,
ought to be specific, and ought to rest on the testimony either of
a native, or at least of one whose skill in the language was beyond
suspicion.

At the same time the interest with which the subject seemed to be
generally regarded, led me to hope that, by collecting, while they
were yet recent, the reminiscences of persons of various countries and
tongues, who had known and spoken with the Cardinal, it might be possible
to lay the foundation of a much more exact judgment regarding him than
had hitherto been attainable.

A short inquiry satisfied me that, although scattered over every part
of the globe, there were still to be found living representatives of
most of the languages ascribed to the Cardinal, who would be able, from
their own personal knowledge, to declare whether, and in what degree, he
was acquainted with each; and I resolved to try whether it might not be
possible to collect their opinions.

The experiment has involved an extensive and tedious correspondence;
many of the persons whom I have had to consult being ex-pupils of the
Propaganda, residing in very distant countries; more than one beyond the
range of regular postal communication, and only accessible by a chance
message transmitted through a consul, or through the friendly offices of
a brother missionary.

For the spirit in which my inquiries have been met, I am deeply grateful.
I have recorded in the course of the narrative the names of many to
whom I am indebted for valuable assistance and information. Other
valued friends whom I have not named, will kindly accept this general
acknowledgment.

There is one, however, to whom I owe a most special and grateful
expression of thanks—his Eminence the Cardinal Archbishop of Westminster.
From him, at the very outset of my task, I received a mass of anecdotes,
recollections, and suggestions, which, besides their great intrinsic
interest, most materially assisted me in my further inquiries; and
the grace of the contribution was enhanced by the fact, that it was
generously withdrawn from that delightful store of Personal Recollections
which his Eminence has since given to the public; and in which his
brilliant pen would have made it one of the most attractive episodes.

Several of the autographs, also, which appear in the sheet of
fac-similes, I owe to his Eminence. Others I have received from friends
who are named in the Memoir.




CONTENTS.


    PREFACE,                                                     pp. v-vii.

                          INTRODUCTORY MEMOIR.

          ANCIENT PERIOD:—

      History of Linguists little known—Legendary Linguists—The
    Jews—The Asiatics—The Greeks—Mithridates—Cleopatra—The
    Romans—Prevalence of Greek under the Empire—The Early
    Christians—Decline of the Study—Separation of the two
    Empires—The Crusaders—Frederic II—The Moorish Schools
    in Spain—Council of Vienne—Roderigo Ximenes—Venetian
    travellers—Fall of Constantinople—Greeks in
    Italy—Complutensian Polyglot,                                 pp. 5-18.

          MODERN PERIOD:—

      I. _Linguists of the East._ Dragomans—Genus Bey—Jonadab
    Alhanar—Interpreters in the Levant—Ciceroni at Mecca—Syrian
    Linguists—The Assemani—Greeks—Armenians—The Mechitarists,    pp. 18-24.

      II. _Italian Linguists._ Pico della Mirandola—Teseo
    Ambrosio—Pigafetta—Linguistic Missionary
    Colleges—The Propaganda—Schools of the Religious Orders—
    Giggei—Galani—Ubicini—Maracci—Podestà—Piromalli—Giorgi—De
    Magistris—Finetti—Valperga de Galuso—The De Rossis,          pp. 25-34.

      III. _Spanish and Portuguese Linguists._ Fernando di
    Cordova—Covilham—Libertas Cominetus—Arias Montanus—Del
    Rio—Lope de Vega—Missionaries—Antonio Fernandez—Carabantes—
    Pedro Paez—Hervas-y-Pandura,                                 pp. 34-41.

      IV. _French Linguists._
    Postel—Polyglot-Pater-Nosters—Scaliger—Le
    Cluse—Peiresc—Chasteuil—Duret—Bochart—Picquet—Le Jay—De la
    Croze—Renaudot—Fourmont—Deshauterayes—De Guignes—Diplomatic
    affairs in the Levant—De Paradis, Langlés—Abel Remusat—Modern
    School, Julien, Bournouf, Renan, Fresnel, the d’Abbadies,    pp. 41-58.

      V. _German, Dutch, Flemish, and Hungarian Linguists._
    Müller—(Regiomontanus)—Bibliander—Gesner—Christmann—Drusius—
    Schultens—Maes—Haecx—Gramaye—Erpen—The
    Goliuses—Hottinger—Kircher—Ludolf—Rothenacker—Andrew
    Müller—Witzen—Wilkins—Leibnitz—Gerard
    Müller—Schlötzer—Buttner—Michaelis—Catholic
    Missionaries—Richter, Fritz, Widmann, Grebmer, Dobritzhofer,
    Werdin—Berchtold, Adelung, Vater, Pallas, Klaproth, Niebuhr,
    Humboldt and his School—Castrén, Rask, Bunsen, Biblical
    Linguists—Hungarian Linguists—Csoma de Körös,                pp. 59-81.

      VI. _British and Irish Linguists._ Crichton—Andrews—Gregory—
    Castell, Walton, Pocock, Ockley, Sale, Clarke, Wilkins,
    Toland, “Orator” Henley, Carteret, Jones, Marsden, Colebrooke,
    Craufurd, Lumsden, Leyden, Vans Kennedy, Adam Clarke, Roberts
    Jones, Young, Pritchard, Cardinal Wiseman, Browning, Lee,
    Burritt,                                                     pp. 81-99.

      VII. _Slavonian Linguists._ _Russians_—Scantiness of
    Materials—Early Period—Jaroslav, Boris—The Romanoffs—Beründa
    Pameva, Peter the Great, Catherine I., Mentschikoff,
    Timkoffsky, Bitchourin, Igumnoff, Giganoff, Tchubinoff,
    Goulianoff, Senkowsky, Gretsch, Kazem-Beg—_Poles_—Meninski,
    Groddek, Bobrowski, Albertrandy, Rzewuski,
    Italinski—_Bohemians_—Komnensky, Dobrowsky, Hanka,          pp. 99-110.

      Miraculous gift of tongues—Royal Linguists—
    Lady-Linguists—Infant Phenomena—Uneducated Linguists,      pp. 110-121.

                      LIFE OF CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI.

                          CHAPTER I. (1774-98.)

      Birth and family history—Legendary tales—Early
    education—First masters—School friends—Ecclesiastical
    studies—Illness and interruption of studies—Study of
    languages—Anecdote—Ordination—Appointment as Professor of
    Arabic—Deprivation of professorship,                       pp. 125-147.

                        CHAPTER II. (1798-1802.)

      Straitened circumstances—Private tuition—The Marescalchi
    family—The military hospitals—Manner of study—The Magyar,
    Czechish, Polish, Russian, and Flemish languages—Foreigners—The
    Confessional—Intense application—Examples of literary
    labour,                                                    pp. 148-161.

                        CHAPTER III. (1803-1806.)

      Appointed as Assistant Librarian of the _Istituto di
    Bologna_—_Catalogue Raisonné_—Professorship of Oriental
    Languages—Paper on Egyptian obelisks—De Rossi—Correspondence
    with him—Polyglot translations—Caronni’s account of him—Visit
    to Parma, Pezzana, Bodoni—Persian—Illness—Invitation to settle
    at Paris—Domestic relations—Correspondence—Translations,   pp. 162-190.

                         CHAPTER IV. (1807-14.)

      Labour of compiling Catalogue—His skill as linguist tested by
    the Russian Embassy—Deprivation of Professorship—Death of his
    mother—Visit to Modena and Parma—Literary friends—Giordani’s
    account—Greek scholarship—Bucheron’s trial of his
    Latinity—Deputy Librarianship of University—Visitors—Lord
    Guildford—Learned societies—Academy of Institute—Paper on
    Mexican symbolic Paintings,                                pp. 191-204.

                          CHAPTER V. (1814-17.)

      Restoration of the Papal Government—Pius VII. at
    Bologna—Invites Mezzofanti to Rome—Re-appointment as
    Professor of Oriental languages—Death of his father—Notices
    of Mezzofanti by Tourists—Kephalides—Appointed head
    librarian—Pupils—Angelelli—Papers read at Academy,          pp. 205-18.

                         CHAPTER VI. (1817-20.)

      Tourists’ Notices of Mezzofanti—Society in Bologna—Mr.
    Harford—Stewart Rose—Byron—The Opuscoli Letterarj di
    Bologna—Panegyric of F. Aponte—Emperor Francis I. at
    Bologna—Clotilda Tambroni—Lady Morgan’s account of
    Mezzofanti—Inaccuracies—The Bologna dialect—M. Molbech,     pp. 219-40.

                         CHAPTER VII. (1820-28.)

      Illness—Visit to Mantua, Modena, Pisa, and Leghorn—Solar
    Eclipse—Baron Von Zach—Bohemian—Admiral Smyth—The Gipsy
    language—Blume—Armenian—Georgian—Flemish—Pupils—Cavedoni,
    Veggetti, Rosellini—Foreigners—Daily duties—Correspondence—
    Death of Pius VII.—Appointment as member of Collegio dei
    Consultori—Jacobs’ account of him—Personal appearance—Cardinal
    Cappellari—Translation of Oriental Liturgy—Mezzofanti’s
    disinterestedness—Birmese,                                  pp. 241-70.

                        CHAPTER VIII. (1828-30.)

      Visit of Crown Prince of Prussia—Trial of skill in
    languages—Crown Prince of Sweden—M. Braunerhjelm—Countess of
    Blessington—Irish Students—Lady Bellew—Dr. Tholuck—Persian
    couplet—Swedish—Cornish Dialect—Frisian—Abate
    Fabiani—Letters—Academy of the Filopieri,                   pp. 271-86.

                           CHAPTER IX. (1831.)

      Political parties at Bologna—M. Libri’s account of
    Mezzofanti—Hindoo Algebra—Indian literature and history—Indian
    languages—Manner of study—Revolution of Bologna—Delegates to
    Rome—Mezzofanti at Rome—Reception by Gregory XVI.—Visit to the
    Propaganda—Dr. Cullen—Polyglot conversation—Renewed Invitation
    to settle at Rome—Consents—Calumnies of revolutionary party—Dr.
    Wordsworth—Mr. Milnes—Removal to Rome,                     pp. 287-300.

                          CHAPTER X. (1831-33.)

      Rome a centre of many languages—Mezzofanti’s pretensions
    fully tested—Appointments at Rome—Visit to the Chinese
    College at Naples—History of the College—Study of
    Chinese—Its difficulties—Illness—Return to Rome—Polyglot
    society of Rome—The Propaganda—Amusing trials of
    skill—Gregory XVI.—Library of Propaganda rich in rare
    books on languages—Appointed First Keeper of the Vatican
    Library—Letters,                                            pp. 301-17.

                           CHAPTER XI. (1834.)

      The Welsh language—Dr. Forster—Dr. Baines—Dr. Edwards—Mr.
    Rhys Powell—Flemish—Mgr. Malou—Mgr. Wilde—Canon Aerts—Pere
    van Calven—Pere Legrelle—Dutch—M. Leon—Dr. Wap—Mezzofanti’s
    extempore Dutch verses—Bohemian—The poet Frankl—Conversations
    on German and Magyar Poetry—Maltese—Padre Schembri—Canonico
    Falzou—Portuguese—Count de Lavradio,                        pp. 318-37.

                         CHAPTER XII. (1834-36.)

      The Vatican Library—Mezzofanti’s colleagues—College of St.
    Peter’s—Mezzofanti made Rector—His literary friends in
    Rome—Angelo Mai—Accademia della Cattolica Religione—He reads
    papers in this Academy—Gregory XVI.’s kindness—Cardinal
    Giustiniani—Albani—Pacca—Zurla—Polyglot party at Cardinal
    Zurla’s in his honour—Opinions regarding him—Number of
    his languages—Mr. Mazzinghi—Dr. Cox—Dr. Wiseman—Herr
    Fleck—Greek Epigram—Herr Fleck’s criticisms—Mezzofanti’s
    Latinity—His English—Dr. Baines—Cardinal Wiseman—Mr. Monckton
    Milnes—Mezzofanti’s style formed on books—Lady Morgan’s opinion
    of his English—Swedish Literature—Professor Carlson—Count
    Oxenstjerna—Armenian Literature—Mgr. Hurmuz—Padre Angiarakian
    Arabic of Syria—Greek Literature—Mgr. Missir—Romaic—Abate
    Matranga—Polish Literature—Sicilian—The poet Meli,          pp. 338-54.

                        CHAPTER XIII. (1836-38.)

      Californian students in Propaganda—Californian
    language—Mezzofanti’s success in it—Nigger Dutch of
    Curaçoa—American Indians in Propaganda—Augustine
    Hamelin—“The Blackbird”—Mezzofanti’s knowledge of Indian
    languages—Dr. Kip—Algonquin—Chippewa Delaware—Father
    Thavenet—His studies in the Propaganda—Arabic—Albanese—Mr.
    Fernando’s notice of him—Cingalese—East Indian
    languages—Hindostani—Mahratta—Guzarattee—Dr. M’Auliffe—Count
    Lackersteen—M. Eyoob—Chinese, difficulty of—Chinese
    students—Testimony of Abate Umpierres—Cardinal Wiseman—West
    African languages—Father Brunner—Angolese—Oriental
    languages—Paul Alkushi—“Shalom”—Letter,                     pp. 355-72.

                         CHAPTER XIV. (1838-41.)

      Created Cardinal—The Cardinalate—Its history, duties,
    emoluments, congregations, offices—Mezzofanti’s
    poverty—Kindness of Gregory XVI.—Congratulations
    of his Bolognese friends—The Filopieri—Polyglot
    congratulations of the Propaganda—Friends among the
    Cardinals—His life as Cardinal—Still continues to acquire
    new languages—Abyssinian—M. d’Abbadie—His visit to
    Mezzofanti—Basque—Amarinna—Arabic—Ilmorma—Mezzofanti’s
    failure—Studies Amarinna—Abyssinian Embassy to Rome—Their
    account of the Cardinal—The Basque language—M. d’Abbadie—Prince
    L.L. Bonaparte—M. Dassance—Strictures on Mezzofanti—Mrs.
    Paget—Baron Glucky de Stenitzer—Guido Görres—Modesty of
    Mezzofanti—Mr. Kip—Görres—Cardinal Wiseman—Mezzofanti among
    the pupils of the Propaganda,                               pp. 373-97.

                         CHAPTER XV. (1841-43.)

      Author’s recollections of Mezzofanti in 1841—His personal
    appearance and manner; his attractive simplicity—Languages
    in which the author heard him speak—His English
    conversation—Various opinions regarding it—Impressions of
    the author—Anecdotes—Cardinal Wiseman—Rev. John Smyth—Father
    Kelleher—His knowledge of English literature—Mr. Harford—Dr.
    Cox—Cardinal Wiseman—Mr. Grattan—Mr. Badeley—Hudibras—Author’s
    own conversation with the Cardinal—The Tractarian movement—Mr.
    Grattan—Baron Bunsen—Author’s second visit to Rome—The
    Polyglot Academy of the Propaganda—Playful trial of
    Mezzofanti’s powers by the students—His wonderful versatility
    of language—Analogous examples of this faculty—Description
    of it by visitors—His own illustration—The Irish
    language—Mezzofanti’s admission regarding it—The Etruria
    Celtica—The Eugubian Tables—Amusing experiment suggested
    by Mezzofanti—Dr. Murphy—The Gælic language—Mezzofanti’s
    extempore Metrical compositions—Specimens—Rapidity with which
    he wrote them—Power of accommodating his pronunciation of
    Latin to that of the various countries—National interjectional
    sounds—Playfulness—Puns,                                   pp. 398-431.

                         CHAPTER XVI. (1843-49.)

      Death of his nephew Mgr. Minarelli—His sister
    Teresa—Letter—Visitors—Rev. Ingraham Kip—English
    conversation—English literature—American literature—The
    American Indian languages—Scottish dialect—Burns and Walter
    Scott—Rev. John Gray—Mezzofanti as a philologer—Baron
    Bunsen—The Abbé Gaume—French patois—Spanish—Father
    Burrueco—Mexican—Peruvian—New Zealand language—Armenian
    and Turkish—Father Trenz—Russian—M. Mouravieff—The
    Emperor Nicholas—Polish—Klementyna z Tanskich
    Hoffmanowa—Makrena, Abbess of Minsk—Her history—Her account
    of Mezzofanti—His occupations—House of Catechumens—First
    communion—_Fervorini_—The confessional—Death of Gregory
    XVI.—Election of Pius IX.—Mezzofanti’s epigrams on the
    occasion—His relations with the new Pope—Father Bresciani’s
    account of him—The revolution of 1848—Its effect on Cardinal
    Mezzofanti—His illness—Death and funeral,                   pp. 432-56.

                     CHAPTER XVII. (RECAPITULATION.)

      Plan pursued in preparing this Biography—Points of
    inquiry—Number of languages known to Mezzofanti—What is meant
    by knowledge of a language—Popular notion of it—Mezzofanti’s
    number of languages progressive—Dr. Minarelli’s list of
    languages known by him—Classification of languages according
    to the degrees of his knowledge—Languages spoken by him with
    great perfection—Languages spoken less perfectly—Languages in
    which he could initiate a conversation—Languages known from
    books—Dialects—Southern and central American languages—Total
    number known to him in various degrees—His speaking of
    languages not literally faultless, but perfect to a degree
    rare in foreigners—Comparison with other linguists—His plan
    of studying languages—Various systems of study—Mezzofanti’s
    method involved much labour—Habit of thinking in foreign
    languages—His success a special gift of nature—In what this
    consisted—Quickness of perception—Analysis—Memory—Peculiarity
    of his memory—His enthusiasm and simplicity—Mezzofanti as a
    philologer, as a critic, a historian, a man of science—Piety
    and charity, liberal and tolerant spirit—Social virtues,   pp. 457-493.

    APPENDIX,                                                  pp. 495-502.




CORRIGENDA.


    Page  35, Line 5, for “yards” read “feet.”
          52,      last, after “(1704),” supply “who.”
          57,      21, for “Bourmouf,” read “Bournouf.”
          59,      8, for “John and,” read “and John.”
          76,      2nd last, for “Boehthingk,” read “Boehtlingk.”
         117,      4th last, (and three other places,) for “marvelous,”
                     read “marvellous.”
         119,      2nd last, for “months,” read “years.”
         121,      2nd last, for “Hall,” read “Hill.”
         281,      22, for “Grüner,” read “Grüder.”
         283,      17, for “Rabinical,” read “Rabbinical.”
         312,      10, for “unable,” read “able.”
         426,      4th last, for “seneeta,” read “senecta;” also
                     interchange ; and !

Transcriber’s Note: The corrections have been made.




[Illustration: _Fac-similes in Sixteen Languages._]




MEMOIRS OF EMINENT LINGUISTS.


In the Life of Cardinal Mezzofanti I have attempted to ascertain, by
direct evidence, the exact number of languages with which that great
linguist was acquainted, and the degree of his familiarity with each.

Eminence in any pursuit, however, is necessarily relative. We are
easily deceived about a man’s stature until we have seen him by the
side of other men; nor shall we be able to form a just notion of the
linguistic accomplishments of Cardinal Mezzofanti, or at least to bring
them before our minds as a practical reality, until we shall have first
considered what had been effected before him by other men who attained to
distinction in the same department.

I have thought it desirable, therefore, to prefix to his Life a summary
history of the most eminent linguists of ancient and modern times. There
is no branch of scholarship which has left fewer traces in literature,
or has received a more scanty measure of justice from history. Viewed in
the light of a curious but unpractical pursuit, skill in languages is
admired for a time, perhaps indeed enjoys an exaggerated popularity; but
it passes away like a nine days’ wonder, and seldom finds an exact or
permanent record. Hence, while the literature of every country abounds
with memoirs of distinguished poets, philosophers, and historians, few,
even among professed antiquarians, have directed their attention to the
history of eminent linguists, whether in ancient or in modern times. In
all the ordinary repositories of curious learning—Pliny, Aulus Gellius,
and Athenæus, among the ancients; Bayle, Gibbon, Feyjoo, Disraeli,
and Vulpius, among the moderns—this interesting chapter is entirely
overlooked; nor does it appear to have engaged the attention even of
linguists or philologers themselves.

The following Memoir, therefore, must claim the indulgence due to a first
essay in a new and difficult subject. No one can be more sensible than
the writer of its many imperfections;—of the probable omission of names
which should have been recorded;—of the undue prominence of others with
inferior pretensions; and perhaps of still more serious inaccuracies of
a different kind. It is only offered in the absence of something better
and more complete; and with the hope of directing to what is certainly a
curious and interesting subject, the attention of others who enjoy more
leisure and opportunity for its investigation.

       *       *       *       *       *

The diversity of languages which prevails among the various branches
of the human family, has proved, almost equally with their local
dispersion, a barrier to that free intercommunion which is one of
the main instruments of civilization. “The confusion of tongues, the
first great judgment of God upon the ambition of man,” says Bacon, in
the Introductory Book of his “Advancement of Learning,” “hath chiefly
imbarred the open trade and intercourse of learning and knowledge.”[1]
Perhaps it would be more correct to say that these two great impediments
to intercourse have mutually assisted each other. The divergency of
languages seems to keep pace with the dispersion of the population.
Adelung lays it down as the result of the most careful philological
investigations, that where the difficulties of intercourse are such as
existed among the ancients and as still prevail among the less civilized
populations, no language can maintain itself unchanged over a space of
more than one hundred and fifty thousand square miles.[2]

It might naturally be expected, therefore, that one of the earliest
efforts of the human intellect would have been directed towards the
removal of this barrier, and that one of the first sciences to invite
the attention of men would have been the knowledge of languages. Few
sciences, nevertheless, were more neglected by the ancients.

It is true that the early literatures of many of the ancient nations
contain legends on this head which might almost throw into the shade the
greatest marvels related of Mezzofanti. In one of the Chinese stories
regarding the youth of Buddha, translated by Klaproth, it is related
that, when he was ten years old, he asked his preceptor, Babourenou, to
teach him all the languages of the earth, seeing that he was to be an
apostle to all men; and that when Babourenou confessed his ignorance
of all except the Indian dialects, the child himself taught his master
“fifty foreign tongues with their respective characters.”[3] A still
more marvellous tale is told by one of the Rabbinical historians, Rabbi
Eliezer, who relates that Mordechai, (one of the great heroes of Talmudic
legend), was acquainted with seventy languages; and that it was by means
of this gift he understood the conversation of the two eunuchs who were
plotting in a foreign tongue the death of the king.[4] Nor is the Koran
without its corresponding prodigy. When the Prophet was carried up to
Heaven, before the throne of the Most High, “God promised that he should
have the knowledge of all languages.”[5]

But when we turn to the genuine records of antiquity, we find no ground
for the belief that such legends as these have even that ordinary
substructure of truth which commonly underlies the fables of mythology.
Neither the Sacred Narratives, nor those of the early profane authors,
contain a single example of remarkable proficiency in languages.

It is true that in the later days of the Jewish people, interpreters
were appointed in the synagogues to explain the lessons read from the
Hebrew Scriptures for the benefit of their foreign brethren; that in
all the courts of the Eastern monarchs interpreters were found, through
whom they communicated with foreign envoys, or with the motley tribes of
their own empire; and that professional interpreters were at the service
of foreigners in the great centres of commerce or travel,[6] who, it
may be presumed, were masters of several languages. The philosophers,
too, who traversed remote countries in pursuit of wisdom, can hardly be
supposed to have returned without some acquaintance with the languages
of the nations among whom they had voyaged. Solon and Pythagoras are
known to have visited Egypt and the East; the latter also sojourned for
a considerable time in Italy and the islands; the wanderings of Plato
are said to have been even more extensive. Nay, in some instances these
pilgrims of knowledge extended their researches beyond the limits of
their own ethnographical region. Thus, on the one hand, the Scythian
sages, Anacharsis and Zamolxis, themselves most probably of the Mongol
or Tartar tongue, sojourned for a long time in countries where the
Indo-European family of languages alone prevailed; on the other, the
merchants of Tyre were in familiar and habitual intercourse with the
Italo-Pelasgic race; and the Phœnician explorers, in their well-known
circumnavigation of Africa described by Herodotus, must have come
in contact with still more numerous varieties both of race and of
tongue. Nevertheless it may fairly be doubted whether these or similar
opportunities among the ancients, resulted in any very remarkable
attainments in the department of languages. The absence of all record
furnishes a strong presumption to the contrary; and there is one example,
that of Herodotus, which would almost be in itself conclusive. This acute
and industrious explorer devoted many years to foreign travel. He visited
every city of note in Greece and Asia Minor, and every site of the
great battles between the Greeks and Barbarians. He explored the whole
line of the route of Xerxes in his disastrous expedition. He visited in
succession all the chief islands of the Egean, as well as those of the
western coast of Greece. His landward wanderings extended far into the
interior. He reached Babylon, Ecbatana, and Susa, and spent some time
among the Scythian tribes on the shores of the Black Sea. He resided
long in Egypt, from which he passed southwards as far as Elephantine,
eastwards into Arabia, and westwards through Lybia, at least as far as
Cyrene. And yet Dahlmann is of opinion that, with all his industry, and
all the spirit of inquiry which was his great characteristic, Herodotus
never became acquainted even with the language of Egypt, but contented
himself with the service of an interpreter.[7]

In like manner, it would be difficult to shew, either from the Cyropædia,
or the Expedition of Cyrus, that Xenophon, during his foreign travel,
became master of Persian or any kindred Eastern tongue. Nor am I aware
that there has ever been discovered in the writings of Plato any evidence
of familiarity with the language of those Eastern philosophers from whose
science he is believed to have drawn so largely.

It is strange that the two notable exceptions to this barrenness of
eminent linguists which characterizes the classic times, Mithridates
and Cleopatra, should both have been of royal rank. The former, the
celebrated king of Pontus, long one of the most formidable enemies of
the Roman name, is alleged to have spoken fluently the languages of all
the subjects of his empire; an empire so vast, and comprising so many
different nationalities as to throw an air of improbability over the
story. According to Aulus Gellius,[8] he “was thoroughly conversant”
(_percalluit_) with the languages of all the nations (_twenty-five in
number_) over which his rule extended.[9] The other writers who relate
the circumstance—Valerius Maximus,[10] Pliny,[11] and Solinus—make the
number only twenty-two. Some commentators have regarded the story as a
gross exaggeration; and others have sought to diminish its marvellousness
by explaining it of different dialects, rather than of distinct
languages. But there does not appear in the narrative of the original
writers any reason whether for the doubt or for the restriction. Pliny
declares that “it is quite certain;” and the matter-of-fact tone in which
they all relate it, makes it clear that they wished to be understood
literally. It was the king’s invariable practice, they tell us, to
communicate with all the subjects of his polyglot empire directly and in
person, and “never through an interpreter;” and Gellius roundly affirms
that he was able to converse in each and every one of these tongues
“with as much correctness as if it were his native dialect.”

The attainments of Cleopatra, although far short of what is reported
of Mithridates, are nevertheless described by Plutarch[12] as very
extraordinary. He says that she “spoke most languages, and that there
were but few of the foreign ambassadors to whom she gave audience through
an interpreter.” The languages which he specifies are those of the
Ethiopians, of the Troglodytes (probably a dialect of Coptic), of the
Hebrews, of the Arabs, the Syrians, the Medes, and the Persians; but
he adds that this list does not comprise all the languages which this
extraordinary woman understood.

Now the very prominence assigned to these examples, and the absence of
all allusion to any other which might be supposed to approximate to them,
may afford a presumption that they are almost solitary. Valerius Maximus,
in his well-known chapter _De Studio et Industria_, cites the case of
Mithridates as a very remarkable example “of study and industry.” It is
highly probable therefore, that, if he knew any other eminent linguists,
he would have added their names. Yet the only cases which he instances
are those of Cato learning Greek in his old age, of Themistocles
acquiring Persian during his exile, and of Publius mastering all the five
dialects of Greece during the time of his Prætorship. In like manner,
Aulus Gellius has no more notable linguist to produce, in contrast with
Mithridates, than the old poet Ennius, who used to boast that he had
three hearts,[13] because he could speak Greek, Latin, and his rude
native dialect, Oscan. And Pliny, with all his love of parallels, is even
more meagre:—he does not recite a single name in comparison with that of
Mithridates.

       *       *       *       *       *

The Romans, especially under the early Republic, appear to have been
singularly indifferent or unsuccessful in cultivating languages; and
the bad Greek of the Roman ambassadors to Tarentum, for their ridicule
of which the Tarentines paid so dearly, is almost an average specimen
of the accomplishments of the earlier Romans as linguists. Nor can
this circumstance fail to appear strange, when it is remembered over
how many different races and tongues the wide domain of Rome extended.
The very multiplicity of languages submitted to her government would
seem to have imposed upon her public men the necessity of familiarizing
themselves, even for the discharge of their public office, with at least
the principal ones among them. But, on the contrary, for a long time they
steadily pursued the policy of imposing, as far as practicable, upon
the conquered nationalities the Latin language, at least in public and
official transactions.[14]

And, so far as regards the Eastern and Northern languages, this exclusion
was successfully and permanently enforced at Rome. The slave population
of the city comprised almost every variety of race within the limits of
the Empire. The very names of the slaves who are introduced in the plays
of Plautus and Terence—Syra, Phœnicium, Afer, Geta, Dorias, &c. (which
are but their respective gentile appellatives)—embrace a very large
circle of the languages of Asia, Africa, and Northern Europe. And yet,
with the exception of a single scene in the Pænulus of Plautus, in which
the well-known Punic speech of Hanno the Carthaginian is introduced,[15]
there is nothing in either of these dramatists from which we could
infer that any of the manifold languages of the slave population of
Rome effected an entrance among their haughty masters. They were all as
completely ignored by the Romans, as is the vernacular Celtic of the
Irish agricultural servant in the midland counties of England.

But it was not so for Greek. From the Augustan age onwards, this polished
language began to dispute the mastery with Latin, even in Rome itself.

    “Græcia capta ferum cepit captorem, et artes
    Intulit agresti Latio—”

applies to the language, even more than to the arts. In the days of the
Rhetorician, Molon, (Cicero’s master in eloquence,) Greek had obtained
the entrée of the Senate. In the time of Tiberius, its use was permitted
even in forensic pleadings. With the emperors who succeeded,[16] the
triumph of Greek was still more complete. From Pliny downwards, there is
hardly an author of eminence in the Roman Empire who did not write in
that language;—Pausanias, Dion, Galen, even the Emperor Marcus Aurelius
himself, with all the traditionary Roman associations of his name.

It was so also with the Christian population and the Christian literature
of Rome. Almost all the Christian writings of the first two centuries
are in Greek. The early Roman liturgy was Greek. The population of Rome
was in great part a Greek-speaking race. A large proportion of the
inscriptions in the Roman Catacombs are Greek, and some even of the Latin
ones are engraved in Greek characters. Nay, the early Christian churches
in Gaul, Vienne, Lyons, and Marseilles, and the few remains of their
literature which have reached us, are equally Greek.[17]

In a word, during the first two centuries of the Christian era, making
due allowance for the difference of the periods, Greek and Latin held
towards each other in Rome the same relation which we find between
Norman-French and Saxon in England after the Conquest; and we may safely
say that, during those centuries, a knowledge of both languages was the
ordinary accomplishment of all educated men, and was shared by many of
the lowest of the population.

Beyond this limit, however, we read of no remarkable linguists even among
the accomplished scholars of the Augustan age. No one will doubt that the
two Varros may fairly be taken as, in this respect, the most favourable
specimens of the class. Now neither of them seems to have gone further
than a knowledge of Greek. Out of the four hundred and ninety books which
Marcus Terentius Varro wrote, there is not one named which would indicate
familiarity with any other foreign language.

The Neo-Platonists of the second and third centuries, whose researches
in Oriental Philosophy must have brought them into contact with some of
the Eastern languages, may possibly form an exception to this general
statement; but, on the whole, in the absence of positive and exact
information on the subject, it may not unreasonably be conjectured that,
among the Christian scholars of the second, third, and fourth centuries,
we might find a wider range of linguistic attainments than among their
gentile contemporaries. The critical study of the Bible itself involved
the necessity of familiarity, not only with Greek and Hebrew, but with
more than one cognate oriental dialect besides. St. Jerome, besides
the classic languages and his native Illyrian, is known to have been
familiar with several of the Eastern tongues; and it is not improbable
that some of the earlier commentators and expositors of the Bible may be
taken as equally favourable specimens of the Christian linguists.[18]
Origen’s Hexapla is a monument of his scholarship in Hebrew, and probably
in Syriac and Samaritan. St. Clement of Alexandria was perhaps even a
more accomplished linguist; for he tells that of the masters under whom
he studied, one was from Greece, one from Magna Græcia, a third from
Cœle-Syria, a fourth from Egypt, a fifth an Assyrian, and a sixth a
Hebrew.[19] And St. Gregory Nazianzen expressly relates of his friend St.
Basil, that, even before he came to Athens to commence his rhetorical
studies, he was already well-versed in many languages.[20]

From the death of Constantine, however, the study began rapidly to
decline, even among ecclesiastics. The disruption of the Empire naturally
tended to diminish the intercourse between East and West, and by
consequence the interchange of their languages. It would appear, too, as
if the barbarian conquerors adopted, in favour of their own languages,
the same policy which the Romans had pursued for Latin. Attila is said
to have passed a law prohibiting the use of the Latin language in his
newly conquered kingdom,[21] and to have taken pains, by importing native
teachers, to procure the substitution of Gothic in its stead. At all
events, in whatever way the change was brought about, a knowledge of
both Greek and Latin, which in the classic times of the Empire had been
the ordinary accomplishment of every educated man, became uncommon and
almost exceptional. Pope Gregory the Great, who, bitterly as he has been
assailed as an enemy of letters, must be confessed to have been the
most eminent Western scholar of his day, spoke Greek very imperfectly;
he complains that it was difficult, even at Constantinople, to find any
one who could translate Greek satisfactorily into Latin;[22] and a still
earlier instance is recorded, in which a pope, in other respects a man
of undoubted ability, was unable to translate the letter of the Greek
patriarch, much less to communicate with the Greek ambassadors, except
through an interpreter.[23]

More than one, indeed, of the early theological controversies was
embittered through the misunderstandings caused between the East and
West by mutual ignorance of each other’s language. Pelagius succeeded
in obtaining a favourable decision from the Council of Jerusalem in
415, chiefly because, while his Western adversary, Orosius, was unable
to speak Greek, the fathers of the Council were ignorant of Latin. The
protracted controversy on the Three Chapters owed much of its inveteracy
to the ignorance of the Westerns[24] of the original language of the
works whose orthodoxy was impugned; and it is well known that the
condemnation of the decree of the sixth council on the use of sacred
images issued by the fathers of Francfort, was based exclusively on a
strangely erroneous Latin translation of the acts of the council, through
which translation alone they were known in Germany and Gaul.[25]

The foundation of the Empire of Charlemagne consummated the separation
between the Greek and Latin races and their languages. The venerated
names of Bede and of Alcuin in the Western Church, and the more
questionable celebrity of the Patriarch Photius in the Eastern,
constitute a passing exception. But it need hardly be added that they
stand almost entirely alone; and it will readily be believed that,
amid the Barbarian irruptions from without, and the fierce intestine
revolutions, of which Europe was the theatre during the rest of the
earlier mediæval period, even that familiarity with the Greek and
oriental languages which we have described, entirely disappeared in the
West.

The wars of the Crusades, and the reviving intellectual activity
in which this and other great events of the second mediæval period
originated, gave a new impulse to the study of languages. Frederic II.,
a remarkable example of the union of great intellectual gifts with deep
moral perversity, spoke fluently six languages, Latin, Greek, Italian,
German, Hebrew, and even Arabic.[26] The Moorish schools in Spain began
to be visited by Christian students. In this manner Arabic found its
way into the West; and the intermixture of learned Jews in the European
kingdoms afforded similar opportunities for the cultivation of Hebrew,
which were turned to account by many, especially among biblical scholars.
On the other hand, notwithstanding the contempt for profane learning
which breathes through the Koran, the Saracen scholars began to direct
their attention to the learning of other creeds, and the languages of
other races. Ibn Wasil, who came into Italy in 1250 as ambassador to
Manfred, the son of Frederic II., was reported to be familiar with the
Western tongues. The Spanish Moors, too, began sedulously to cultivate
Greek. The works of Aristotle, of Galen, of Dioscorides, and many other
Greek writers, chiefly philosophical, were translated into Arabic by
Averroes, Ibn Djoldjol and Avicenna. And the Jewish scholars of that age
were equally assiduous in the cultivation of Greek. The learned Rabbi
Maimonides, born in Cordova in the early part of the 12th century, was
not only master of many Eastern tongues, but was also thoroughly familiar
with the Greek language.

It would be a mistake, however, to imagine that it was among the Moors or
the Hebrews that the revival of the study of languages first commenced.
Alcuin, in addition to the modern languages with which his sojourn in
various kingdoms must have made him acquainted, was also familiar with
Latin, Greek, and Hebrew. Hermann, the Dalmatian, the first translator
of the Koran, was well acquainted with Latin, Greek, Hebrew, and Arabic.
The celebrated Raymond Lully, who was a native of Majorca, was able to
lecture in Latin Greek, Arabic, and perhaps Hebrew;—an accomplishment
especially wonderful in one who was among the most laborious and
prolific writers of his age, and who left after him, according to some
authorities, (though this, no doubt, is a great exaggeration), not less
than a thousand[27] works on the most diversified subjects. At the
instance of this eminent orientalist, the council of Vienne directed that
professorships should be founded in all the great Universities, for the
Hebrew, Chaldee, and Arabic languages.[28]

An example of, for the period, very remarkable proficiency in modern
languages is recorded in the history of the Fourth Lateran Council, 1215.
Roderigo Ximenes,[29] Archbishop of Toledo in the early part of the
thirteenth century, a native of Navarre, but a scholar of the University
of Paris, was one of the representatives of the Spanish Church at that
Council. A controversy regarding the Primacy of Spain had arisen between
the Sees of Toledo and Compostella, which was referred for adjudication
to the bishops there assembled. Ximenes addressed to the council a long
Latin oration in defence of the claim of Toledo; and, as many of his
auditory, which consisted both of the clergy and the laity, were ignorant
of that language, he repeated the same argument in a series of discourses
addressed to the natives of each country in succession; to the Romans,
Germans, French, English, Navarrese, and Spaniards,[30] each in their
respective tongues. Thus the number of languages in which he spoke was
at least seven, and it is highly probable that he had others at his
disposal, if his auditory had been of such a nature as to render them
necessary.

The taste for the languages and literature of the East received a
further stimulus from the foundation of the Christian principalities
at Antioch and Jerusalem, from the establishment of the Latin Empire
at Constantinople, and in general from the long wars in the East, to
which the enthusiasm of the age attracted the most enterprising spirits
of European chivalry. The pious pilgrimages, too, contributed to the
same result. Many of the knights or palmers, on their return from the
East, brought with them the knowledge, not only of Greek, but of more
than one of the oriental languages besides. The long imprisonments to
which, during the holy wars, and the Latin campaigns against the Turks,
they were often subjected, supplied another occasion of familiarity with
Arabic, Syriac, Turkish, or Persian.

The commercial enterprise of the Western Nations, and especially of
the Venetians and Genoese, was a still more powerful instrument of the
interchange of languages. Few modern voyagers have possessed more of
that spirit of travel which is the best aid towards the acquisition of
foreign tongues, than the celebrated Marco Polo. It is hard to suppose
that he can have returned from his extensive wanderings in Persia, in
Tartary, in the Indian Archipelago, and in China and Tibet, without some
tincture of their languages. Still less can this be supposed of his
countryman, Josaphat Barbaro, who sojourned for sixteen years among the
Tartar tribes.[31] It was in the commercial settlements of the Venetians
in the Levant that the profession of interpreters, of which I shall have
to speak hereafter, and which has since become hereditary in certain
families, was originated or brought to perfection.[32]

       *       *       *       *       *

It is only, however, from the revival of letters, properly so called,
that the history of linguistic studies can be truly said to commence.

The attention of Scholars, in the first instance, was chiefly directed
towards the classical languages and the languages of the Bible. The
Greek scholars who were driven to the West by the Moslem occupation of
Constantinople brought their language, in its best and most attractive
form, to the Universities of Italy. In the Council of Florence, in 1438,
more than one Italian divine, especially Ambrogio Traversari, was found
capable of holding discussions with the Greek representatives in their
native tongue. In like manner, the Jews and Moors, who were exiled from
Spain by the harsh and impolitic measures of Ferdinand and Isabella,
deposited through all the schools of Europe the seeds of a solid and
critical knowledge of Hebrew and Arabic and their cognate languages. The
fruits of their teaching may be discerned at a comparatively early period
in the biblical studies of the time. Antonio de Lebrixa published, in
1481, a grammar of the Latin, Castilian and Hebrew languages: and I need
only allude to the mature and various oriental learning which Cardinal
Ximenes found ready to his hand, in the very first years of the sixteenth
century, for the compilation of the Complutensian Polyglot. Although
some of the scholars whom he engaged, as for instance, Demetrius Ducas,
were Greeks; and others, as Alfonzo Zamora or Pablo Coronell,[33] were
converted Jews; yet, the names of Lopez de Zuniga, Nunez de Guzman, and
Vergara[34] are a sufficient evidence of the success with which the
co-operation of native scholars was enlisted in the undertaking.[35]

       *       *       *       *       *

From this period the number of scholars eminent in the department
of languages becomes so great, and the history of many among them
presents so frequent points of resemblance, that it may conduce to the
greater distinctness of the narrative to classify separately the most
distinguished linguists of each among the principal nations.


§ I. LINGUISTS OF THE EAST.

Although the inquiry must of course commence with the East, the cradle
of human language, unfortunately the materials for this portion of the
subject are more meagre and imperfectly preserved than any other.

In the East indeed, the faculty of language appears, for the most part,
in a form quite different from what we shall find among the scholars of
the West. The Eastern linguists, with a few exceptions, have been eminent
as mere _speakers_ of languages, rather than scholars even in the loosest
sense of the word.

As it is in the East that the office of _Dragoman_ or “interpreter” first
rose to the dignity of a profession, so all the most notable Oriental
linguists have belonged to that profession.

A very remarkable specimen of this class occurs in the reign of Soliman
the Magnificent, and flourished in the early part of the sixteenth
century. A most interesting account is given of him, under his Turkish
name of Genus Bey, by Thevet, in that curious repertory—his _Cosmographie
Universelle_.[36] He was the son of a poor fisherman, of the Island of
Corfu; and while yet a boy, was carried away by pirates and sold as a
slave at Constantinople. Thence he was carried into Egypt, Syria, and
other Eastern countries; and he would also seem to have visited most of
the European kingdoms, or at least to have enjoyed the opportunity of
intercourse with natives of them all. His proficiency in the languages
both of the East and West, drew upon him the notice of the Sultan, who
appointed him his First Dragoman, with the rank of Pasha. Thevet (who
would seem to have known him personally during his wanderings,) describes
him in his quaint old French, as “the first man of his day for speaking
divers sorts of languages, and of the happiest memory under the Heavens.”
He adds, that this extraordinary man “knew perfectly no fewer than
sixteen languages, viz: Greek, both ancient and modern, Hebrew, Arabic,
Persian, Turkish, Moorish, Tartar, Armenian, Russian, Hungarian, Polish,
Italian, Spanish, German, and French.” Genus Bey, was, of course, a
renegade; but, from a circumstance related by Thevet, he appears to have
retained a reverence for his old faith, though not sufficiently strong to
be proof against temptation. He was solicited by some bigoted Moslems to
remove a bell, which the Christians had been permitted to erect in their
little church. For a time he refused to permit its removal; but at last
he was induced by a large bribe, to accede to the demand. Thevet relates
that, in punishment of his sacrilegious weakness, he was struck with that
loathsome disease which smote King Herod, and perished miserably in nine
days from the date of this inauspicious act.

In Naima’s “Annals of the Turkish Empire,” another renegade, a Hungarian
by birth, is mentioned, who spoke fourteen languages, and who, in
consequence of this accomplishment, was employed during a siege to carry
a message through the lines of the blockading army.[37]

A still more marvellous example of the gift of languages is mentioned by
Duret, in his _Trésor des Langues_ (p. 964)—that of Jonadab, a Jew of
Morocco, who lived about the same period. He was sold as a slave by the
Moors, and lived for twenty-six years in captivity in different parts
of the world. With more constancy to his creed, however, than the Corfu
Christian, he withstood every attempt to undermine his faith or to compel
its abjuration; and, from the obduracy of his resistance, received from
his masters the opprobrious name _Alhanar_, “the serpent” or “viper.”
Duret says that Jonadab spoke and wrote twenty-eight different languages.
He does not specify their names, however, nor have I been able to find
any other allusion to the man.

It would be interesting, if materials could be found for the inquiry,
to pursue this extremely curious subject through the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries, and especially in the military and commercial
establishments of the Venetians in the Morea and the islands. The race
of Dragomans has never ceased to flourish in the Levant. M. Antoine
d’Abbadie informed me that there are many families in which this office,
and sometimes the consular appointment for which it is an indispensable
qualification, have been hereditary for the last two or three centuries;
and that it is very common to find among them men and women who,
sufficiently for all the ordinary purposes of conversation, speak Arabic,
Turkish, Greek, Italian, Spanish, English, German, and French, with
little or no accent. This accomplishment is not confined to one single
nation. Mr. Burton, in his “Pilgrimage to Medinah and Meccah,” mentions
an Afghan who “spoke five or six languages.”[38] He speaks of another,
a Koord settled at Medinah, who “spoke five languages in perfection.”
The traveller, he assures us, “may hear the Cairene donkey-boys shouting
three or four European dialects with an accent as good as his own;” and
he “has frequently known Armenians (to whom, among all the Easterns, he
assigns the first place as linguists) speak, besides their mother tongue,
Turkish, Arabic, Persian, and Hindostanee, and at the same time display
an equal aptitude for the Occidental languages.”[39]

But of all the Eastern linguists of the present day the most notable
seem to be the ciceroni who take charge of the pilgrims at Mecca, many
of whom speak fluently every one of the numerous languages which prevail
over the vast region of the Moslem. Mr. Burton fell in at Mecca with
a one-eyed Hadji, who spoke fluently and with good accent Turkish,
Persian, Hindostani, Pushtu, Armenian, English, French, and Italian.[40]
In the “Turkish Annals” of Naima, already cited, the learned Vankuli
Mohammed Effendi, a contemporary of Sultan Murad Khan, is described as
“a perfect linguist.”[41] Many similar instances might, without much
difficulty, be collected; nor can it be doubted that, among the numerous
generations which have thus flourished and passed away in the East, there
may have been rivals for Genus Bey, or even for “the Serpent” himself.
But unhappily their fame has been local and transitory. They were admired
during their brief day of success, but are long since forgotten; nor is
it possible any longer to recover a trace of their history. They are
unknown,

    Carent quia vate sacro.[42]

It would be a great injustice, however, to represent this as the
universal character of the Eastern linguists. On the contrary, it has
only needed intercourse with the scholars of the West in order to draw
out what appears to be the very remarkable aptitude of the native
Orientals for the scientific study of languages. Thus the learned
Portuguese Jew, Rabbi Menasseh Ben Israel (1604-1657), was not only a
thorough master of the Oriental languages, but was able to write with
ease and exactness several of the languages of the West, and published
almost indifferently in Hebrew, Latin, Spanish, and English.[43] I allude
more particularly, however, to those bodies of Eastern Christians, which,
from their community of creed with the Roman Church, have, for several
centuries, possessed ecclesiastical establishments in Rome and other
cities of Europe.

The Syrians had been remarkable, even from the classic times,[44] for
the patient industry with which they devoted themselves to the labour of
translation from foreign languages into their own. Many of the modern
Syrians, however, have deserved the still higher fame of original
scholarship.

The Maronite community of Syrian Christians has produced several scholars
of unquestioned eminence. Abraham Echellensis was one of the chief
assistants of Le Jay, at Paris, in the preparation of his Polyglot. His
services in a somewhat similar capacity at Rome are familiar to all
Oriental scholars. But it is to the name of Assemani that the Maronite
body owes most of its reputation. For a time, indeed, literature would
seem to have been almost an inheritance in the family of Assemani. It has
contributed to the catalogue of Oriental scholars no less than five of
its members—Joseph Simon, who died in 1768; his nephews, Stephen Evodius
and Joseph Lewis; Joseph Aloysius, who died at Rome in 1782; and Simon,
who died at Padua in 1821. The first of them is the well-known editor of
the works of St. Ephrem, and author of the great repertory of Oriental
ecclesiastical erudition, the _Bibliotheca Orientalis_.

The Greeks, with greater resources, and under circumstances more
favourable, are less distinguished as linguists. John Matthew
Caryophilos, a native of Corfu, who was archbishop of Iconium and
resided at Rome in the early part of the seventeenth century, was a
learned Orientalist, and, besides several literary works of higher
pretension, published some elementary books on the Chaldee, Syriac, and
Coptic languages. But he has few imitators among his countrymen. Leo
Allatius (Allazzi), although a profound scholar, and familiar with every
department of the literature of the West, whether sacred or profane,[45]
can hardly be considered a linguist in the ordinary sense of the word.
The same may be said of the many Greek students, as, for instance,
Metaxa, Meletius Syrius, and others, who, during the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries, repaired to the universities of Italy, France,
and even England.[46] It can hardly be doubted, of course, that many of
them acquired a certain familiarity with the languages of the countries
in which they sojourned, but no traces of this knowledge appear to be
now discoverable. By far the most notable of them, Cyrillus Lucaris,
the well-known Calvinistic Patriarch of Constantinople, spoke and
wrote fluently Arabic, Greek, Latin, and Italian; but, if his latinity
be a fair sample of his skill in the other languages, his place as a
linguist must be held low indeed.[47] It should be added, however,
that as polyglot speakers, the Greeks have long enjoyed a considerable
reputation. The celebrated Panagiotes Nicusius[48] (better known by his
Italianized name Panagiotti) obtained, despite all the prejudices of
race, the post of First Dragoman of the Porte, about the middle of the
seventeenth century; and, from his time forward, the office was commonly
held by a Greek, until the separation of Greece from the Ottoman Empire.

Mr. Burton’s observation that no natives of the East seem to possess the
faculty of language in a higher degree than the Armenians, is confirmed
by the experience of all other travellers; and the commercial activity
which has long distinguished them, and has led to their establishing
themselves in almost all the great European centres of commerce, has
tended very much to develope this national characteristic. A far higher
spirit of enterprise has led to the foundation of many religious
establishments of the Armenians in different parts of Europe, which have
rendered invaluable services, not only to their own native language
and literature, but to Oriental studies generally. Among these the
fathers of the celebrated Mechitarist order have earned for themselves,
by their manifold contributions to sacred literature, the title of
the Benedictines of the East. The publications of this learned order
(especially at their principal press in the convent of San Lazzaro,
Venice,) are too well known to require any particular notice. Most of
their publications regard historical or theological subjects; but many
also are on the subject of language,[49] as grammars, dictionaries,
and philological treatises. A little series of versions, the Prayers
of St. Nerses in twenty-four languages, printed at their press, is
one of the most beautiful specimens of polyglot typography with which
I am acquainted. Among the scholars of the order the names of Somal,
Rhedeston, Ingigean, Avedichian, Minaos, and, above all, of the two
Auchers, are the most prominent. One of the latter is best known to
English readers as the friend of Byron, his instructor in Armenian, and
his partner in the compilation of an Anglo-Armenian grammar. The fathers
of this order generally, however, both in Vienna and in Italy, have long
enjoyed the reputation of being excellent linguists. Visitors of the
Armenian convent of St. Lazzaro at Venice cannot fail to be struck by
this accomplishment among its inmates. Besides the ordinary Oriental
languages, most of them speak Italian, French, and often German. I have
heard from M. Antoine d’Abbadie that, in 1837, Dr. Pascal Aucher spoke no
less than twelve languages.


§ II. LINGUISTS OF ITALY.

The most prominent among the nations of the West at the period
immediately succeeding the Revival of Letters, is of course Italy.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first in order, dating from this period, among the linguists of
Italy, is also in many respects the most remarkable of them all;—at least
as illustrating the possibility of uniting in a single individual the
most diversified intellectual attainments, each in the highest degree
of perfection;—the celebrated Giovanni Pico della Mirandola, son of the
Duke John Francis of that name.[50] He was born in 1463, and from his
childhood was regarded as one of the wonders of his age. Before he had
completed his tenth year, he delivered lectures in civil and canon law,
not less remarkable for eloquence than for learning. While yet a boy he
was familiar with all the principal Greek and Latin classics. He next
applied himself to Hebrew; and, while he was engaged in that study,
a large collection of cabalistic manuscripts, which were represented
to him as genuine works of Esdras, turned his attention to the other
Eastern languages, and especially the Chaldee, the Rabbinical dialect
of Hebrew, and the Arabic. Unfortunately, the strange and fantastic
learning with which he was thus thrown into contact gave a tinge to his
mind, which appears to have affected all his later studies. His progress
in languages, however, cannot but be regarded as prodigious, when we
consider the poverty of the linguistic resources of his age. At the age
of eighteen he had the reputation of knowing no fewer than twenty-two
languages, a considerable number of which he spoke with fluency. And
while he thus successfully cultivated the department of languages, he
was, at the same time, an extraordinary proficient in all the other
knowledge of his day. His memory was so wonderful as to be reckoned
among the marvellous examples of that gift which are enumerated by the
writers upon this faculty of the human mind. Cancellieri states that he
was able, after a single reading, not only to recite the contents of
any book which was offered to him, but to repeat the very words of the
author, and even in an inverted order.[51] In 1486 he maintained a thesis
in Rome, _De omni Re Scibili_. Much of the learning which it displayed
was certainly of a very idle and puerile character; much of it, too, was
the merest pedantry; but nevertheless it is undeniable that the nine
hundred propositions of which it consisted, comprised every department of
knowledge cultivated at that period. And it is impossible to doubt that,
if Pico’s career had been prolonged to the usual term of human life, his
reputation would have equalled that of the greatest scholars, whether of
the ancient or the contemporary world. He was cut off, however, at the
early age of thirty-one.

It is not unnatural to suppose that this circumstance, as well as the
rank of Pico, and the singular precocity of his talents, may have led to
a false or exaggerated estimate of his acquirements. But, even allowing
every reasonable deduction on this score, his claim must be freely
admitted to the character of one of the greatest wonders of his own or
any other age, whether he be considered as a linguist or as a general
scholar.

Marvellous, however, as is the reputation of Pico della Mirandola,
perhaps the science of language owes more to a less brilliant but more
practical scholar of the same period, Teseo Ambrosio, of the family of
the Albonesi. He was born at Pavia, in 1469. His admirers have not failed
to chronicle such precocious indications of genius as his composing
Italian, Latin, and even Greek poetry, before he was fifteen; but he
himself confesses that his proficiency in these studies dates from a
considerably later time. He entered the order of Canons Regular of St.
Augustine, and fixed his residence at Rome, where he devoted himself with
great assiduity to Oriental studies, and acquired such a reputation,
that when, in the Lateran Council of 1512, the united Ethiopic and
Maronite Christians solicited the privilege of using their own peculiar
liturgies while they maintained the communion of the Roman church, it was
to him the task of examining those liturgies, and of ascertaining how
far their teaching was in accordance with the doctrines of the Church,
was entrusted by the Holy See. Teseo assures us that, at the time when
he received this commission, he knew little more than the elements
of Hebrew, Chaldee, and Arabic. He set to work with the assistance of
a native Syrian (who, however, was entirely ignorant of Latin); and,
carrying on their communication by mutual instruction, he was soon able
not only to master the difficulties of these languages, but to set on
foot what may be regarded as (at least conjointly with the Complutensian
Polyglot) one of the earliest systematic schemes for the promotion of
Oriental studies. He had types cast expressly for his projects; and he
himself prepared the Chaldee Psalter for the press, and repaired to his
native city of Pavia for the purpose of having it printed. He died (1539)
before it was completed;[52] but his types were turned to account by
other scholars. It was with Teseo’s types that William Postel printed two
out of the five Pater Nosters contained in his collection—the Chaldee
and the Armenian.[53] And to him we owe a still greater boon—the first
regular attempt at a Polyglot Grammar; which, however imperfectly,
comprises the elements of Chaldee, Syriac, Armenian, and ten other
languages.

The scholarship of Ambrogio was derived almost entirely from books.
His countryman, Antonio Pigafetta, enjoyed among his contemporaries a
different reputation, that of considerable skill as a speaker of foreign
languages, acquired during his extensive and protracted wanderings.
Pigafetta was born at Vicenza, towards the end of the fifteenth century.
In the expedition undertaken, under the patronage of Charles V., for the
conquest of the Moluccas, by the celebrated Fernando Magellan, the first
circumnavigator of the globe, one of the literary staff was Pigafetta,
who acted as historiographer of the expedition, and to whose narrative we
are indebted for all the particulars of it, which have been preserved.

Marzari describes Pigafetta as a prodigy of learning; and, although this
has been questioned by later inquirers,[54] there is no reason to doubt
his acquirements in modern languages at least, and particularly his
skill and success in obtaining information as to the languages of the
countries which he visited. It is to him[55] we are indebted for the
first vocabularies of the language of the Philippine and Molucca islands,
the merit of which is recognized even by recent philologers.[56]

It may be permitted to class with the linguists of Italy, a Corsican
scholar of the same period, Augustine, bishop of Nebia. It is difficult
to pronounce definitively as to the extent of his attainments; but his
skill in the ancient languages, at least, is sufficiently attested
by the polyglot Bible which he published, (containing the Hebrew,
Greek, Chaldee, and Arabic texts,) of which Sixtus of Sienna speaks
in the highest terms; and if we could receive without qualification
the statement of the same writer, we should conclude that Augustine’s
familiarity with modern languages was even more extensive. Sixtus of
Sienna describes him as “deeply versed in the languages of all the
nations which are scattered over the face of the earth.”

Towards the close of the sixteenth century the study of languages
in Italy assumed that practical character in relation to the actual
exigencies of missionary life by which it has ever since been mainly
characterized in that country. The Oriental press established at Florence
by the Cardinal Ferdinand de Medici, under the superintendence of the
great orientalist Giambattista Raimondi;[57] the opening at Rome of
the College _De Propaganda Fide_; the foundation of the College of San
Pancrazio, for the Carmelite Oriental Missions in 1662; the opening of
similar Oriental schools in the Dominican, the Franciscan, Augustinian,
and other orders, for the training of candidates for their respective
missions in the East; and above all, the constant intercourse with
the Eastern missions which began to be maintained, gave an impulse to
Oriental studies, the more powerful and the more permanent, because it
was founded on motives of religion; and although we do not meet among
the missionary linguists that marvellous variety of languages which
excites our wonder, yet we find in them abundant evidences of a solid and
practical scholarship, whose fruits, if less attractive, are more useful
and more enduring. Nearly all the linguists of Italy from the close of
the sixteenth century, appear to have been either actually missionaries,
or connected with the colleges of the foreign mission.

Thus, Antonio Giggei, one of the “Oblates of Mary,” taught Persian in
a missionary college, at Milan, and, at a later period, taught Arabic
in Florence. Giggei’s _Thesaurus Linguæ Arabicæ_,[58] is still much
esteemed. He wrote besides, a Grammar of Chaldee and of Rabbinical
Hebrew, which is still preserved in manuscript in the Ambrosian Library
at Milan; and his translation of a Rabbinical commentary on the
Proverbs of Solomon, published at Milan in 1620, is an evidence of his
familiarity, not only with Biblical Hebrew, but with the language of the
Talmud in all its successive phases.

In like manner, Clemente Galani, the eminent Armenian scholar, spent
no less than twelve years as a missionary in Armenia. On his return to
Rome, in 1650, he was such a proficient in the language that he was able,
not only to write both in Armenian and Latin his well-known work on the
conformity of the creeds of the Armenian and Roman Churches,[59] but also
to deliver theological lectures to the Armenian students in Rome in their
native tongue.[60]

Tommaso Ubicini was a Franciscan missionary in the Levant.[61] He was
born at Novara, and entered young into the order of Friar-minors. He
was named guardian of the Franciscan convent in Jerusalem; and, during
a residence of many years, made himself master, in addition to Hebrew
and Chaldee, of the Syriac, Arabic, and Coptic languages. The latter
years of his life were spent in the convent of San Pietro in Montorio
at Rome; where, besides publishing several works upon these languages,
be taught them to the students of his order. His great work, _Thesaurus
Arabico-Syro-Latinus_ was not published till 1636, several years after
his death.[62]

Ludovico Maracci, best known to English readers by the copious use to
which Gibbon has turned his translation and annotations of the Koran, was
one of the missionary “Clerks of the Mother of God.” He was born at Lucca
in 1612, and first obtained notice by the share which he had in the Roman
edition of the Arabic Bible, published in 1671. He taught Arabic for many
years with great distinction in the University of the Sapienza at Rome.
But his best celebrity is due to his critical edition of the Koran, and
the admirable translation which accompanies it.[63] From this repertory
of Arabic learning, Sale has borrowed, almost without acknowledgment, or
rather with occasional depreciatory allusions, all that is most valuable
in his translation and notes.

One of Maracci’s pupils, John Baptist Podestà, (born at Fazana early
in the 17th century), is another exception to the general rule. Having
perfected his Oriental studies in Constantinople, he was appointed
Oriental Secretary of the Emperor Leopold at Vienna, and attained
considerable reputation as Professor of Arabic in that university. He
published a Grammar of Arabic, Persian, and Turkish; which, however, was
severely, and, indeed, ferociously, criticised by his contemporary and
rival, Meninski.

But Podestà’s contemporary, Paolo Piromalli, was trained in the school
of the Mission. He was a native of Calabria, and became a member of the
Dominican order. Piromalli was for many years attached to the Mission
of his order in Armenia, and was eminently successful in reconciling
the separated Armenians to the Roman Church, having even the happiness
to number among his converts the schismatical patriarch himself. From
Armenia, Piromalli passed into the Missions of Georgia and Persia. He
afterwards went, in the capacity of Apostolic Nuncio, to Poland, with
a commission of much importance to the Emperor from the Pope, Urban
VIII. In the course of one of his voyages he was made prisoner by the
Algerine corsairs, and carried as a slave to Tunis; but he was soon after
redeemed and called to Rome, whence, after he had been entrusted with the
revision of an Armenian Bible, he was sent back to the East, as Bishop
of Nachkivan in 1655. He remained in this charge for nine years, and was
called home as Bishop of Bisignano, where he died in 1667. Piromalli
published two dictionaries, Persian and Armenian, and several other works
upon these languages.[64]

The Augustinian order in Italy, also, produced a linguist, not inferior
in solidity, and certainly superior in range of attainments, to any of
those hitherto enumerated—Antonio Agostino Giorgi.[65] He was born at
San Mauro, near Rimini, in 1711, and entered the Augustinian order at
Bologna; but Benedict XIV., who, during his occupancy of the see of
Bologna, had become acquainted with his merit, invited him to Rome after
his elevation to the Papacy, and appointed him to a professorship in
the Sapienza. Father Giorgi occupied this post with much distinction
for twenty-two years, till his death, in 1797. His acquirements as a
linguist were more various than those of any of the scholars hitherto
named. Besides modern languages, he knew not only Greek, Hebrew, Chaldee,
Samaritan, and Syriac, but also Coptic and (what was at that period a
much more rare accomplishment) Tibetan. On the last named language he
compiled an elementary work for the use of missionaries, which, although
it is not free from inaccuracies, deserves, nevertheless, the highest
praise as a first essay in that till then untried language.

Simon De Magistris, one of the priests of the Oratory, (born at Ferrara
in 1728) was for many years at the head of the Congregation of the
Oriental Liturgies in Rome. He was not only deeply versed in the written
languages of the East, but spoke the greater number of them with the same
ease and fluency as his native Italian.[66]

Of the learned Dominican, Finetti, I am unable to offer any particulars.
His treatise “On the Hebrew and its cognate Languages” is a sufficient
evidence of his ability as an Orientalist; but it contains no indication
of anything beyond the learning which is acquired from books.

The same may be said of the Oratorian, Valperga de Galuso. He was born at
Turin in 1737, but lived chiefly in the convents of his order at Naples,
Malta, and Rome. In addition, however, to his accomplishments as an
Orientalist, Padre de Galuso had the reputation of being one of the most
skilful mathematicians of his day. He died in 1815.

Our information regarding the two De Rossi’s, Ignazio, author of the
_Etymologicum Copticum_, and Giambernardo, of Parma, is more detailed and
more satisfactory.

Ignazio de Rossi was born at Viterbo in 1740, and entered the Jesuit
society at a very early age. In the schools of Macerata, Spoleto, and
Florence, he was employed in teaching the Humanities and Rhetoric until
the suppression of the order in 1773; after which event he repaired
to Rome, and received an appointment as professor of Hebrew in the
University, which he held for thirty years, rejoining his brethren,
however, at the first moment of their restoration under Pius VII.

As a general scholar, Father De Rossi was one of the first men of his
day. His memory may be ranked among the most prodigious of which any
record has been preserved. On one occasion, during the _villeggiatura_
at Frascati, it was tried by a test in some respects the most wonderful
which has ever been applied in such cases. A line being selected at
pleasure from any part of any one of the four great Italian classics,
Dante, Petrarca, Tasso, and Ariosto, De Rossi immediately repeated
the hundred lines _which followed next in order_ after that which had
been chosen; and, on his companions expressing their surprise at this
extraordinary feat (which he repeated several times), he placed the
climax to their amazement by reciting _in the reverse order_ the hundred
lines immediately _preceding_ any line taken at random from any one of
the above-named poets.[67] His reputation as an Orientalist was founded
chiefly upon his familiarity with Hebrew and the cognate languages. But
he was also a profound Coptic scholar; and it is a subject of regret to
many students of that language that his numerous MSS. connected therewith
have been suffered to remain so long unpublished. He died in 1824.

Giovanni Bernardo de Rossi was a linguist of wider range. He was born
at Castel Nuovo, in Piedmont, in 1742, and in his youth was destined
for the ecclesiastical state. He began his collegiate studies at Turin,
and manifested very early that taste for Oriental literature which
distinguished his after life. Within six months after he commenced his
Hebrew studies, he produced a long Hebrew poem. In addition to the
Biblical Hebrew, he was soon master of the Rabbinical language, of
Chaldee, Syriac, and Arabic. He learned besides, by private study, most
of the languages of modern Europe;—his plan being to draw up in each a
compendious grammar for his own use. In this way he prepared grammars
of the German, English, and Russian languages. In 1769, he obtained an
appointment in the Royal Museum at Turin; but, being invited at the same
time to undertake the much more congenial office of Professor of Oriental
Languages in the new University of Parma, he gladly transferred himself
to that city, where he continued to reside, as Professor of Oriental
Literature, for more than forty years. During the latter half of this
period, De Rossi maintained a frequent correspondence with Mezzofanti,
upon the subject of their common studies.[68] From the terms in which
such a scholar as Mezzofanti speaks of De Rossi, and the deference with
which he appeals to his judgment, we may infer what his acquirements
must have been. On occasion of the marriage of the Infante of Parma,
Charles Emanuel, he published a polyglot epithalamium,[69]—a Collection
of Hymeneal Odes in various languages—which even still is regarded as
the most extraordinary of that class of compositions[70] ever produced
by a single individual. It does not belong to my present plan to allude
to the works of De Rossi, or to offer any estimate of his learning; but
without entering into any such particulars, or attempting to specify
the languages with which he was acquainted, it may safely be said that
no Italian linguist from the days of Pico della Mirandola can be
compared with him, either in the solidity or the extent of his linguistic
attainments. De Rossi died in 1831.[71]

The fame of the linguists of Italy during the nineteenth century has been
so completely eclipsed by that of Mezzofanti, that I shall not venture
upon any enumeration of them, though the list would embrace such names as
Rossellini, Luzatto, Molza, Laureani, &c. There are few of whom it can be
said with so much truth as of Mezzofanti:—

                Prœgravat artes
    Infra se positas.


§ III. SPANISH AND PORTUGUESE LINGUISTS.

The catalogue of Spanish linguists opens with a name hardly less
marvellous than that which I have placed at the head of the linguists
of modern Italy—that of Fernando di Cordova;—one of those universal
geniuses, whom Nature, in the prodigal exercise of her creative powers,
occasionally produces, as if to display their extent and versatility. He
was born early in the fifteenth century, and was hardly less precocious
than his Italian rival, Pico della Mirandola. At ten years of age he
had completed his courses of grammar and rhetoric. He could recite
three or four pages of the Orations of Cicero after a single reading.
Before he attained his twenty-fifth year, he was installed Doctor in all
the faculties; and he is said by Feyjoo to have been thorough master
(supo con toda la perfeccion) of Latin, Greek, Hebrew, Chaldee, and
Arabic. Feyjoo adds, that he knew, besides, all the principal European
languages.[72] He could repeat the entire Bible from memory. He was
profoundly versed in theology, in civil and canon law, in mathematics,
and in medicine. He had at his perfect command all the works of St.
Thomas, of Scotus, of Alexander of Hales, of Galen, Avicenna, and the
other lights of the age in every department of science.[73] Like the
Admirable Crichton, too, he was one of the most accomplished gentlemen
and most distinguished cavaliers of his time. He could play on every
known variety of instrument; he sang exquisitely; he was a most graceful
dancer; an expert swordsman; and a bold and skilful rider; and he was
master of one particular art of fence by which he was able to defeat all
his adversaries, by springing upon them at a single bound of twenty-three
or twenty-four feet! In a word, to adopt the enthusiastic panegyric of
the old chronicler on whose simple narrative these statements rest, “if
you could live a hundred years without eating or drinking, and were to
give the whole time to study, you could not learn all that this young
man knew.”[74] The occasion to which this writer, quoting Monstrelet’s
Chronicle,[75] refers was the Royal Fête at Paris in 1445; so that
Fernando must have been born about 1425. Of his later history but little
is known. He was sent as ambassador to Rome in 1469, and died in 1480.

A Portuguese of the same period, Pedro de Covilham, is mentioned by
Damian a Goes in his curious book, _De Ethiopum Moribus_ in terms which,
if we could take them literally, should entitle him to a place among the
linguists. During the reign of John II. of Portugal (1481-95) Covilham,
who had already distinguished himself as an explorer under Alfonzo V.,
was sent, in company with Alfonzo de Payva, in search of the kingdom
of Prester John, which the traditional notions of the time placed in
Abyssinia. Payva died upon the expedition. Covilham, after visiting
India, the Persian Gulf, and exploring both the coasts of the Red Sea,
at length reached Abyssinia, where he was received with much distinction
by the King. He married in the country, and obtained large possessions;
but, in accordance with a law of Abyssinia[76] similar to that which
still exists in Japan, prohibiting any one who may have once settled in
the country ever again to leave it, he was compelled to adopt Abyssinia
as a second home. When, therefore, he was recalled by John II., the King
of Abyssinia refused to relinquish him, pleading “_that he was skilled
in almost all the languages of men_,”[77] and that he had made to him,
as his own adopted subject, large grants of land and other possessions.
Covilham, after a residence of thirty-three years, was still alive in
1525, when the embassy under Alvarez de Lima reached Abyssinia.

Very early in the sixteenth century, I find a notice of a Spanish convert
from Judaism, called in Latin “Libertas Cominetus” (_Libertas_ being,
in all probability, but the translation of his Hebrew patronymic,)
whose acquirements are more precisely defined. He was born at Cominedo,
towards the close of the fifteenth century, and renounced his creed
about 1525. His fellow-convert Galatinus, an Italian Jew, and himself
no mean linguist, describes Libertas in his work “_De Arcanis Catholicæ
Veritatis_,” as not only deeply versed in Holy Writ, but master of
fourteen languages.[78] The Biographical Dictionaries and other books of
reference are quite silent regarding him.

The name of Benedict Arias Montanus, editor of the so-called “King of
Spain’s Polyglot Bible,” is better known to Biblical students. He was
born at Frexenal[79] in Estremadura in 1527 and studied in the university
of Alcala, then in the first freshness of the reputation which it owed
to the magnificence of the great Cardinal Ximenes. Montanus entered the
order of St. James, and after accompanying the Bishop of Segovia to the
Council of Trent, where he appeared with great distinction, returned
to the Hermitage of Nuestra Señora de los Angelos near Aracena, with
the intention of devoting himself entirely to study and prayer. From
this retreat, however, he was drawn by Philip II., who employed him
to edit a new Polyglot Bible on a more comprehensive plan than the
Complutensian Polyglot. On the completion of this task, Philip sought to
reward the learned editor by naming him to a bishopric; but Montanus
had humility and self-denial enough to decline the honour, and died an
humble chaplain, in 1598. The estimate formed by his contemporaries of
Montanus’s attainments in languages falls little short of the marvellous.
Le Mire describes him as _omnium fere gentium linguis et literis raro
exemplo excultus_; but we may more safely take his own modest statement
in the preface of his Polyglot, that he knew ten languages.[80]

The celebrated Father Martin Del Rio, best known perhaps to English
readers, since Sir Walter Scott’s pleasant sketch, by his vast work on
Demonology, was also a very distinguished linguist. Del Rio, although of
Spanish parentage, was born at Antwerp in May 1551. His first university
studies were made at Paris; but he received the Doctor’s degree at
Salamanca, and has merited a place in Baillet’s _Enfans Celebres_, by
publishing an edition of Solinus, with a learned commentary, before he
was twenty years old.[81] Del Rio’s talents and reputation opened for him
a splendid career; but he abandoned all his offices and all his prospects
of preferment, in order to enter the Society of the Jesuits at Valladolid
in 1580. According to Feyjoo,[82] Del Rio knew ten languages; and Baillet
would appear to imply even more, when he says that he was master of _at
least_ that number. Del Rio died at Louvain in 1608.

One of Del Rio’s most distinguished contemporaries, the celebrated
dramatic poet, Lope de Vega, although his celebrity rests upon a very
different foundation, was also a very respectable linguist, so far, at
least, as regards the modern languages. The extraordinary fecundity of
this author, especially when we consider his extremely chequered and
busy career as a secretary, a soldier, and eventually a priest, would
seem to preclude the possibility of his having applied himself to any
other pursuit than that of dramatic literature. The mere physical labour
of committing to paper (putting composition out of view altogether)
his _fifteen hundred_ versified plays,[83] three hundred interludes
and sacred dramas[84], ten epic poems, and eight prose novels, besides
an infinity of essays, prefaces, dedications, and other miscellaneous
pieces, would appear more than enough to occupy the very busiest human
life. Yet notwithstanding all this prodigious labour, Lope de Vega
contrived to find time for the acquisition of Greek, Latin, Italian,
Portuguese, French, and probably English! Well might Cervantes call him
“a Prodigy of Nature!”

Although the missionaries of Spain and Portugal are, as a body, less
distinguished in the department of languages than those of Italy, yet
there are some among them not inferior to the most eminent of their
Italian brethren. The great Coptic and Abyssinian scholar, Antonio
Fernandez, was a Portuguese Jesuit. He was born at Lisbon in 1566, and
entered the Jesuit society as a member of the Portuguese province of
the order. After a long preparatory training, he was sent, in 1602,
to Goa, the great centre of the missionary activity of Portugal. His
ultimate destination, however, was Abyssinia, which country he reached
in 1604, in the disguise of an Armenian. He resided in Abyssinia for
nearly thirty years, and was charged with a mission to the Pope Paul
III. and Philip IV. of Spain, from the king, who, under the influence of
the missionaries, had embraced the Catholic religion. Fernandez set out
with some native companions in 1615; but they were all made prisoners
at Alaba, and narrowly escaped being put to death; nor was he released
in the end, except on condition of relinquishing this intended mission,
and returning to Abyssinia. On the death of the king, who had so long
protected them, the whole body of Catholic missionaries were expelled
from Abyssinia by the new monarch in 1632; and Fernandez returned,
after a most chequered and eventful career, to Goa, where he died, ten
years later, in 1642. Of his acquirements in the Western languages, I
am unable to discover any particulars, but he was thoroughly versed in
Armenian, Coptic, and Amharic or Abyssinian, in both of which last named
languages he has left several ritual and ascetic works for the use of the
missionaries and native children.

The Spanish and Portuguese missionaries in America, too, (especially
those of the Jesuit order) rendered good service to the study of the
numerous native languages of both continents.[85] Most of the modern
learning on the subject is derived from their treatises, chiefly
manuscript, preserved by the Society.

Nor were the other orders less efficient. Padre Josef Carabantes, a
Capuchin of the province of Aragon, (born in 1648) wrote a most valuable
practical treatise for the use of missionaries, which was long a text
book in their hands.

One of the Portuguese missionaries in Abyssinia, Father Pedro Paez, who
succeeded Fernandez, and whose memory still lingers among the native
traditions of the people,[86] not only became thorough master of the
popular dialects of the various races of the Valley of the Nile, but
attained a proficiency in Gheez, the learned language of Abyssinia, not
equalled even by the natives themselves.[87] A Franciscan missionary
at Constantinople about the same time, mentioned by Cyril Lucaris, is
described by him as “acquainted with many languages;”[88] but I have not
been able to discover his name.

By far the most eminent linguist of the Peninsula, however, is the
learned Jesuit, Father Lorenzo Hervas-y-Pandura. He was born in 1735,
of a noble family, at Horcajo, in la Mancha. Having entered the Jesuit
society, he taught philosophy for some years in Madrid, and afterwards in
a convent in Murcia; but at length, happily for the interests of science
as well as of religion, he embraced a missionary career, and remained
attached to the Jesuit mission of America, until 1767. On the suppression
of the order, Father Hervas settled at Cesena, and devoted himself to
his early philosophical studies, which, however, he ultimately, in a
great measure, relinquished in order to apply himself to literature and
especially to philology. When the members of the society were permitted
to re-establish themselves in Spain, Hervas went to Catalonia; but he was
obliged to return to Italy, and settled at Rome, where he was named by
Pius VII. keeper of the Vatican Library. In this honourable charge he
remained till his death in 1809.

Father Hervas may with truth be pronounced one of the most meritorious
scholars of modern times. His works are exceedingly numerous; and, beside
his favourite pursuit, philology, embrace almost every other conceivable
subject, theology, mathematics, history, general and local, palæography;
not to speak of an extensive collection of works connected with the
order, which he edited, and a translation of Bercastel’s History of the
Church, (with a continuation), executed, if not by himself, at least
under his superintendence. Besides all the stupendous labour implied
in these diversified undertakings, Father Hervas has the still further
merit of having devoted himself to the subject of the instruction of the
deaf-mute, for whose use he devised a little series of publications, and
published a very valuable essay on the principles to be followed in their
instruction.[89]

Our only present concern, however, is with his philological and
linguistic publications, especially in so far as they evince a knowledge
of languages. They form part of a great work in twenty-one 4to. volumes,
entitled _Idea dell’ Universo_; and were printed at intervals, at Cesena,
in Italian, from which language they were translated into Spanish by
his friends and associates, and republished in Spain. It will only be
necessary to particularize one or two of them—the _Saggio Prattico delle
Lingue_, which consists of a collection of the Lord’s Prayer in three
hundred and seven languages, together with other specimens of twenty-two
additional languages, in which the author was unable to obtain a version
of the Lord’s Prayer, all illustrated by grammatical analyses and
annotations; and the _Catalogo delle Lingue conosciute, e Notizia delle
loro Affinità e Diversità_.[90] In the compilation of these, and his
other collections, it is true, Hervas had the advantage, not alone of
his own extensive travel, and of his own laborious research, but also of
the aid of his brethren; and this in an Order which numbered among its
members, men to whose adventurous spirit every corner of the world had
been familiar:—

    “In Greenland’s icy mountains,
    On India’s coral strand,
    Where Afric’s sunny fountains
    Roll down their golden sand.”

But he, himself, compiled grammars of no less than eighteen of the
languages of America; which, with the liberality of true science, he
freely communicated to William von Humboldt for publication in the
_Mithridates_ of Adelung. He was a most refined classical scholar and a
profound Orientalist. He was perfectly familiar, besides, with almost
all the European languages; and, wide as is the range of tongues which
his published works embrace, his critical and grammatical notes and
observations, even upon the most obscure and least known of the languages
which they contain, although in many cases they have of course all the
imperfections of a first essay, exhibit, even in their occasional errors,
a vigorous and original mind.

The name of Father Hervas-y-Pandura is a fitting close to the
distinguished line of linguistic “Glorias de España.”


§ IV. FRENCH LINGUISTS.

The University of Paris did not enter into the study of languages so
early, or with so much zeal as the rival schools of Spain and Italy.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first[91] great name in this department which we meet in the history
of French letters, is that of the celebrated Rabbinical scholar, William
Postel. This extraordinary man was born at Dolerie in 1510. Having lost
both his parents at a very early age, he was left entirely dependent
upon his own exertions for support; and, with that indomitable energy
which often accompanies the love of knowledge, he began, from his very
boyhood, a systematic course of self-denial, by which he hoped to realize
the means of prosecuting the studies for which he had conceived an early
predilection. Having scraped together, in the laborious and irksome
occupation of a school-master, what he regarded as a sufficient sum for
his modest wants, he repaired to Paris; but he had scarcely reached
that city, when he was robbed by some designing sharpers, of the fruits
of all his years of self-denial; and a long illness into which he was
thrown by the chagrin and privation which ensued, reduced him to the
last extremity. Even still, however, his spirit was unbroken. He went to
Beauce, where, by working as a daily labourer, he earned the means of
returning to Paris as a poor scholar. Presenting himself at the College
of Saint Barbara, he obtained a place as a servant, with permission to
attend the lectures; and having in some way got possession of a Hebrew
grammar, he contrived, in his stolen half hours of leisure, to master
the language so thoroughly, that in a short time his preceptors found
themselves outstripped by their singular dependent.

His reputation as an Oriental scholar spread rapidly. When La Fôret’s
memorable embassy to the Sultan was being organized by Francis I., the
king was recommended to entrust to Postel a literary mission, somewhat
similar to that undertaken during the reign of Louis Philippe, at the
instance of M. de Villemain, one of the objects of which was to collect
Greek and Oriental MSS. It was on his return from this expedition, (in
which he visited Constantinople, Greece, Asia Minor, and part of Syria,)
that Postel met Teseo Ambrosio at Venice, and published what may be
said to have been the first systematic attempt as yet made to bring
together materials for the philosophical investigation of the science of
language—being a collection of the alphabets of twelve languages, with a
slight account of each among the number.[92] He was soon after appointed
Professor of Mathematics, and also of Oriental Languages, in the College
de France; but the wild and visionary character of his mind appears to
have been quite unsuited to any settled pursuit. He had conceived the
idea that he was divinely called to the mission of uniting all Christians
into one community, the head of which he recognized in Francis I. of
France, whom he maintained to be the lineal descendant of Sem, the eldest
of the sons of Noah. Under the notion that this was his pre-ordained
vocation, he refused to accompany La Fôret on a second mission to the
East, although he was pressed to do so by the king himself, and a sum
of four thousand crowns was placed at his disposal for the purchase of
manuscripts. He offered himself, in preference, to the newly founded
society of the Jesuits; but his unsuitableness for that state soon became
so apparent, that St. Ignatius of Loyola, then superior of the society,
refused to receive him. After many wanderings in France, Italy, and
Germany, and an imprisonment in Venice, (where his fanaticism reached its
greatest height,) he undertook a second expedition to the East, in 1549,
whence he returned in 1551, with a large number of valuable MSS. obtained
through the French ambassador, D’Aramont, but wilder and more visionary
than ever. He resumed his lectures in the College des Lombards, now the
property of the Irish College in Paris. The crowds who flocked to hear
him were so great, that they were obliged to assemble in the court, where
he addressed them from one of the windows. His subsequent career was a
strange alternation of successes and embroilments. The Emperor Ferdinand
invited him to Vienna, as Professor of Mathematics. While there, he
assisted Widmandstadt in the preparation of his Syriac New Testament.
He left Vienna, however, after a short residence, and betook himself to
Italy, in 1554 or 1555. He was put into prison in Rome, but liberated in
1557. In 1562 he returned to Paris. The extravagancies of his conduct
and his teaching led to his being placed under a kind of honourable
surveillance, in 1564, in the monastery of St. Martin des Champs, near
Paris. Yet so interesting was his conversation that crowds of the most
distinguished of all orders continued to visit him in this retreat till
his death in 1581. Postel’s attainments in languages living or dead, were
undoubtedly most extensive. Not reckoning the modern languages, which
he may be presumed to have known, his Introduction exhibits a certain
familiarity with not less than twelve languages, chiefly eastern; and he
is said to have been able to converse in most of the living languages
known in his time. Duret states, as a matter notorious to all the
learned, that he “knew, understood, and spoke fifteen languages;”[93] and
it was his own favourite boast, that he could traverse the entire world
without once calling in the aid of an interpreter. In addition to his
labours as a linguist, Postel was a most prolific writer. Fifty-seven of
his works are enumerated by his biographer.

It is to this learned but eccentric scholar that we owe the idea
of the well-known polyglot collections of the Lord’s Prayer. These
compilations as carried out by later collectors, have rendered such
service to philology, that, although many of their authors were little
more than mere compilers, and have but slender claims to be considered
as linguists, in the higher sense of the word, it would be unpardonable
to pass them over without notice in a Memoir like the present. Towards
the close of the fourteenth century, a Hungarian soldier named John
Schildberger, while serving in a campaign against the Turks in Hungary,
was made prisoner by the enemy; and on his return home, after a captivity
of thirty-two years, published (in 1428) an account of his adventures. He
appended to his travels, as a specimen of the languages of the countries
in which he had sojourned, the Lord’s Prayer in Armenian, and also in
the Tartar tongue. This, however, was a mere traveller’s curiosity:
but Postel’s publication (Paris, 1558) is more scientific. It contains
specimens of the characters of twelve different languages, in five of
which—Chaldee, Hebrew, Arabic, Greek, and Armenian, the Pater Noster is
printed both in Roman characters and in those of the several languages.
This infant essay of Postel was followed, ten years after, by the
collection of Theodore Bibliander, (the classicized form of the German
name _Buchmann_,) which contains fourteen different Pater Nosters. Conrad
Gesner, in 1555, increased the number to twenty-two, to which Angelo
Rocea, an Augustinian Bishop, added three more (one of them Chinese) in
1591. Jerome Megiser, in 1592, extended the catalogue to forty. John
Baptist Gramaye, a professor in Louvain, made a still more considerable
stride in advance. He was taken prisoner by the Algerine corsairs, in the
beginning of the next century, and after his return to Europe, collected
no fewer than a hundred different versions of the Pater Noster, which he
published in 1622. But his work seems to have attracted little notice;
for more than forty years later, (1668) a collection made by Bishop
Wilkins, the learned linguist, to whom I shall hereafter return, contains
no more than fifty.

In all these, however, the only object appears to have been to collect
as large a number of languages as possible, without any attention to
critical arrangement. But, in the latter part of the same century,
the collection of Andrew Müller (which comprises eighty-three Pater
Nosters) exhibits a considerable advance in this particular. Men began,
too, to arrange and classify the various families. Francis Junius
(Van der Yonghe) published the Lord’s Prayer in nineteen different
languages of the German family; and Nicholas Witsen devoted himself to
the languages of Northern Asia—the great Siberian family,—in eleven
of which he published the Lord’s Prayer in 1692. This improvement in
scientific arrangement, however, was not universal; for although the
great collection of John Chamberlayne and David Wilkins, printed at
Amsterdam in 1715, contains the Lord’s Prayer in a hundred and fifty-two
languages, and that of Christian Frederic Gesner—the well-known
_Orientalischer und Occidentalischer Sprachmeister_ (Leipzic 1748)—in
two hundred, they are both equally compiled upon the old plan, and have
little value except as mere specimens of the various languages which they
contain.[94]

It is not so with a collection already described, which was published
near the close of the same century, by a learned Spanish Jesuit,
Don Lorenzo Hervas y Pandura. It is but one of that vast variety of
philological works from the same prolific pen which, as I have stated,
appeared, year after year, in Cesena, originally in Italian, though they
were all afterwards published in a Spanish translation, in the author’s
native country. Father Hervas’s collection, it will be remembered,
contains the Lord’s Prayer in no less than _three hundred and seven_
languages, besides hymns and other prayers in twenty-two additional
dialects, in which the author was not able to find the Pater Noster.

Almost at the very same time with this important publication of Hervas,
a more extensive philological work made its appearance in the extreme
north, under the patronage and indeed the direct inspiration, of the
Empress Catherine II. of Russia. The plan of this compilation was more
comprehensive than that of the collections of the Lord’s Prayer. It
consisted of a Vocabulary of two hundred and seventy-three familiar and
ordinary words, in part selected by the Empress herself, and drawn up
in her own hand. This Vocabulary, which is very judiciously chosen, is
translated into two hundred and one languages. The compilation of this
vast comparative catalogue of words was entrusted to the celebrated
philologer, Pallas, assisted by all the eminent scholars of the northern
capital; among whom the most efficient seems to have been Bakmeister, the
Librarian of the Imperial Academy of St. Petersburg. The opportunities
afforded by the patronage of a sovereign who held at her disposition the
services of the functionaries of a vast, and, in the literal sense of
the word, a polyglot empire like Russia, were turned to the best account.
Languages entirely beyond the reach of private research, were unlocked
at her command; and the rude and hitherto almost unnamed dialects of
Siberia, of Northern Asia, of the Halieutian islanders, and the nomadic
tribes of the Arctic shores, find a place in this monster vocabulary,
beside the more polished tongues of Europe and the East. Nevertheless,
the Vocabulary of Pallas (probably from the circumstance of its being
printed altogether in the Russian character)[95] is but little familiar
to our philologers, and is chiefly known from the valuable materials
which it supplied to Adelung and his colleagues in the compilation of the
well-known _Mithridates_.

The _Mithridates_ of Adelung closes this long series of philological
collections; but although in its general plan, it is only an expansion
of the original idea of the first simple traveller who presented to his
countrymen, as specimens of the languages of the countries which he had
visited, versions in each language of the Prayer which is most familiar
to every Christian, yet it is not only far more extensive in its range
than any of its predecessors, but also infinitely more philosophical
in its method. There can be no doubt that the selection of a prayer so
idiomatical, and so constrained in its form as the Lord’s Prayer, was far
from judicious. As a specimen of the structure of the various languages,
the choice of it was singularly infelicitous; and the utter disregard of
the principles of criticism (and in truth of everything beyond the mere
multiplication of specimens), which marks all the early collections, is
an additional aggravation of its original defect. But it is not so in the
_Mithridates_ of Adelung. It retains the Lord’s Prayer, it is true, like
the rest, as the specimen (although not the only one) of each language;
but it abandons the unscientific arrangement of the older collections,
the languages being distributed into groups according to their
ethnographical affinities. The versions, too, are much more carefully
made; they are accompanied by notes and critical illustrations; and in
general, each language or dialect, with the literature bearing upon it,
is minutely and elaborately described. In a word, the _Mithridates_,
although, as might be expected, still falling far short of perfection, is
a strictly philosophical contribution to the study of ethnography; and
has formed the basis, as well as the text, of the researches of all the
masters in the modern schools of comparative philology.[96]

To return, however, to the personal history of linguists, from which we
have been called aside by the mention of the work of Postel.

A celebrity as a linguist equally distinguished, and even more unamiable,
than Postel’s, is that of his countryman and contemporary, the younger of
the two Scaligers.

Joseph Justus Scaliger was born at Agen in 1544, and made his school
studies at Bordeaux, where he was only remarkable for his exceeding
dulness, having spent three years in a fruitless, though painfully
laborious, attempt to master the first rudiments of the Latin language.
These clouds of the morning, however, were but the prelude of a brilliant
day. His after successes were proportionately rapid and complete. The
stories which are told of him seem almost legendary. He is said to have
read the entire Iliad and Odyssey in twenty-one days, and to have run
through the Greek dramatists and lyric poets in four months. He was but
seventeen years old when he produced his Œdipus. At the same age he was
able to speak Hebrew with all the fluency of a Rabbi. His application
to study was unremitting, and his powers of endurance are described as
beyond all example. He himself tells, that even in the darkness of the
night, when he awoke from his brief slumbers, he was able to read without
lighting his lamp![97] So powerful, according to his own account, was
his eye-sight, that like the knight of Deloraine:—

    “Alike to him was tide and time,
    Moonless midnight, and matin prime!”

After a brilliant career at Paris, he was invited to occupy the chair
of Belles Lettres at Leyden, where the best part of his life was spent.
Like most eminent linguists, Scaliger possessed the faculty of memory in
an extraordinary degree. He could repeat eighty couplets of poetry after
a single reading: he knew by heart every line of his own compositions,
and it was said of him that he never forgot anything which he had learnt
once. But with all his gifts and all his accomplishments, he contrived
to render himself an object of general dislike, or at least of general
dis-esteem. His vanity was insufferable; and it was of that peculiarly
offensive kind which is only gratified at the expense of the depreciation
of others. His life was a series of literary quarrels; and in the whole
annals of literary polemics, there are none with which, for acrimony,
virulence, and ferocity of vituperation, these quarrels may not compete.
And hence, although there is hardly a subject, literary, antiquarian,
philological, or critical, on which he has not written, and (for his
age) written well, there are few, nevertheless, who have exercised less
influence upon contemporary opinion. Scaliger spoke thirteen languages,
in the study of which Baillet[98] says he never used either a dictionary
or a grammar. He himself declares the same. The languages ascribed to him
are strangely jumbled together in the following lines of Du Bartas:—

    —————“Scaliger, merveille de notre age,
    Soleil des savants, qui parle elegamment
    Hebreu, Greçois, Romain, Espagnol, Allemand,
    François, Italien, Nubien, Arabique,
    Syriaque, Persian, Anglois, Chaldaique.”[99]

In his case it is difficult, as in most others, to ascertain the degree
of his familiarity with each of these. To Du Bartas’s poetical epithet,
_elegamment_, of course, no importance is to be attached; and it would
perhaps be equally unsafe to rely on the depreciatory representations
of his literary antagonists. One thing, at least, is certain, that he
himself made the most of his accomplishment. He was not the man to hide
his light from any overweening delicacy. He was one of the greatest
boasters of his own or any other time. In one place he boasts that there
is no language in which he could write with such elegance as Arabic.[100]
In another he professes to write Syriac as well as the Syrians
themselves.[101] And it is curiously significant of the reputation which
he commonly enjoyed, that the wits of his own day used to say that there
was one particular department of each language in which there could be no
doubt of his powers—its Billingsgate vocabulary! There was not one, they
confessed, of the thirteen languages to which he laid claim, in which he
was not fully qualified to scold![102]

The eminent botanist, Charles Le Cluse, (Clusius), a contemporary of
Scaliger, can hardly be called a great linguist, as his studies were
chiefly confined to the modern European languages, with several of which
he was thoroughly conversant; but he is remarkable as having contributed,
by a familiarity with modern languages very rare among the naturalists of
his day, to settle the comparative popular nomenclature of his science.
He is even still a high authority on this curious branch of botanical
study.

The reader who remembers the extraordinary reputation enjoyed among his
contemporaries by the learned Nicholas Peiresc, may be disappointed at
finding him overlooked in this enumeration: but, as of his extraordinary
erudition he has left no permanent fruit in literature, so of his
acquirements as a linguist no authentic record has been preserved. The
same is true of his friend, Galaup de Chasteuil, a less showy, perhaps,
but better read orientalist. Through devotion to these studies, quite
as much as under the influence of religious feeling, Chasteuil made a
pilgrimage to the Holy Land, and, in 1631, permanently fixed his abode
in Palestine; and so thoroughly conversant did he become, not only with
the language and literature, but also with the manners, usages and
feelings of the Maronites of the Lebanon, that, on the death of their
patriarch, despite the national predilections by which all Easterns are
characterized, they desired to elect him, a Western as he was, head of
their national church.[103] Lewis de Dieu, the two Morins—Stephen, the
Calvinist minister, and John, the learned Oratorian convert—the two
Cappels, Lewis and James, and even the celebrated D’Herbelot, author of
the _Bibliothèque Orientale_, all belong rather to the class of oriental
scholars than of linguists in the popular acceptation of the word. The
two Cappels, as well as their adversaries, the Buxtorfs, are best known
in connexion with the controversy about the Masoretic Points.

One of the writers named in a previous page, Claude Duret, although
Adelung[104] could not discover any particulars regarding him, beyond
those which are detailed in the title of his book, (where he is merely
described as “Bourbonnais, President a Moulins,”) nevertheless deserves
very special mention on account of the extensive and curious learning,
not alone in languages, but also in general literature, history and
science, which characterize his rare work, _Thresor de l’Histoire des
Langues de cet Univers_.[105] This work is undoubtedly far from being
exempt from grave inaccuracies; but it is nevertheless, for its age,
a marvel, as well of curious learning and extensive research, as of
acquaintance with a great many (according to one account, seventeen,)
languages, both of the East and of the West.[106] How much of this,
however, is mere book-scholarship, and how much is real familiarity, it
is impossible, in the absence of all details of the writer’s personal
history, to decide.

Although far from being so universal a linguist as Duret, the great
biblical scholar, Samuel Bochart (born at Rouen in 1599) was much
superior to him in his knowledge of Hebrew and the cognate languages,
Chaldee, Syriac, Arabic, and even Coptic. His _Hierozoicon_ and
_Geographia Sacra_, as monuments of philological as well as antiquarian
knowledge, have maintained a high reputation even to the present time,
notwithstanding the advantages enjoyed by modern students of biblical
antiquities and history.[107]

Bochart’s pupil and his friend in early life, (although they were
bitterly alienated from each other at a later period, and although
Bochart’s death is painfully associated with their literary quarrel[108])
the celebrated Peter Daniel Huet, can hardly deserve a place in the
catalogue of French linguists; but he was at least a liberal and
enlightened patron of the study.

Many of the French missionaries of the seventeenth century would deserve
a place in this series, and among them especially Francis Picquet, who,
after serving for several years as French consul at Aleppo, embraced a
missionary life, and at last was consecrated Archbishop of Bagdad in
1674. Le Jay, the projector and editor of the well-known polyglot Bible
which appeared in France a few years before the rival publication of
Brian Walton, though he is often spoken of as the mere patron of the
undertaking, was in reality a very profound and accomplished Orientalist.
The same may be said of Rapheleng, the son-in-law of Plantin, and often
described as his mere assistant in the publication of the King of
Spain’s Polyglot Bible. Matthew Veysiere de la Croze, too, the apostate
Benedictine, although a superficial scholar and a hasty and inaccurate
historian, was a very able linguist.

But, as we descend lower in the history of this generation of French
linguists, we find comparatively few names which, for variety of
attainments, can be compared with those of Italy or Germany. Beyond the
cultivation of the Biblical languages, little was done in France for this
department of study during the rest of the seventeenth century. There
seems but too much reason to believe that the reputation of the learned
but pedantic Menage as a linguist, is extravagantly exaggerated. He was
an accomplished classicist, and his acquaintance with modern languages
was tolerably extensive. He was a good etymologist, too, according
to the servile and unscientific system of the age. But his claims to
Oriental scholarship appear very questionable. And in truth during this
entire period, if it were not for the interest of the controversy above
referred to, on the antiquity and authority of the Masoretic Points,
it might almost be said that Oriental studies had fallen entirely into
disuse in France. Even of those who took a part in that discussion, the
name of Masclef (who knew Greek, Hebrew, Syriac, Chaldee, and Arabic,
with perhaps some of the modern languages) is the only one which can
approach the rank of the higher masters of the study. The three Buxtorfs
(father, son, and grandson), Guarin, and even Girandeau, were mere
Hebraists; patient and accurate scholars, it is true, but with few of the
characteristics of an eminent linguist. La Bletterie can hardly claim
even this qualified reputation.

There is one brilliant exception—the eminent historian and
controversialist, Eusebius Renaudot. He was born at Paris in 1646. Having
made his classical studies under the Jesuits, and those of Philosophy in
the College d’Harcourt, he entered the congregation of the Oratory. But
he very soon quitted that society; and, although he continued to wear the
ecclesiastical dress, he never took holy orders. His life, however, was
a model of piety and of every Christian virtue; and it was his peculiar
merit that, while many of his closest friends and most intimate literary
allies were members of the Jansenist party, Renaudot was inflexible
in his devotion to the judgment of the Holy See. His first linguistic
studies lay among the Oriental languages, the rich fruit of which we
still possess in his invaluable Collection of Oriental Liturgies, and in
the last two volumes of the _Perpetuitè de la Foi sur l’Eucharistie_,
which are also from his prolific pen. But he soon extended his researches
into other fields; and he is said to have been master of seventeen
languages,[109] the major part of which he spoke with ease and fluency.

But Renaudot stands almost alone.[110] The only names which may claim to
be placed in comparison with his, are those of the two Petis, François
Petis, and François Petis de la Croix. The latter especially, who
succeeded his father as royal Oriental interpreter, under Lewis XIV., and
made several expeditions to the East in this capacity, was well versed,
not only in Arabic, Persian, Turkish, and Tartar, but also in Coptic and
Armenian. His translation of the Arabian Nights Entertainments is the
work by which he is best known; but his dissertations and collections on
Oriental history are full of valuable learning. The eighteenth century
in France was a period of greater activity. Etienne Fourmont, although
born in 1683, belongs properly to the eighteenth century. He is often
cited as an example of extraordinary powers of memory, having, when a
mere boy, learnt by rote the whole list of Greek Roots in the Port Royal
Treatise, so as to repeat them in every conceivable order. He soon after
published in French verse all the roots of the Latin language. But it is
as an Orientalist that he is chiefly remarkable. He was appointed to the
chair of Arabic in the College Royal, and also to the office of Oriental
interpreter in the Bibliothèque du Roi; and soon established such a
reputation as an Orientalist, that he was consulted on philological
questions by the learned of every country in Europe. He was thoroughly
master of Greek, Hebrew, Arabic, Syriac, and Persian, and was one of the
first French scholars who, without having visited China,[111] attained to
any notable proficiency in Chinese.

His nephew, Michael Angelo Deshauterayes, born at Conflans Ste. Honorine,
near Pontoise, 1724, was even more precocious. At the age of ten, he
commenced his studies under Fourmont’s superintendence. He thus became
familiar at an early age with Hebrew, Arabic, Syriac, and Chinese; so
that in his twenty-second year he was appointed to succeed his uncle as
Oriental Interpreter to the Royal Library, to which post, a few years
later, was added the Arabic professorship in the College de France. In
these employments he devoted himself to Oriental studies for above thirty
years.

Another pupil of Fourmont, Joseph de Guignes, born at Pontoise in 1721,
attained equal eminence as an Orientalist. At Fourmont’s death, he
was associated with the last named linguist on the staff of the Royal
Library. But De Guignes’ merit in the department of Oriental history and
antiquities, has almost overshadowed his reputation as a mere linguist,
although he was a proficient in all the principal Eastern languages, and
in many of those of Europe. His History of the Huns, Turks, Moguls, and
other Tartar nations, notwithstanding that many of its views are now
discarded, is still regarded as a repertory of Oriental learning; and,
while both in this and also in some others of his works, De Guignes is
often visionary and even paradoxical,[112] he is acknowledged to have
done more for Chinese literature in France, than any linguist before Abel
Remusat; nor is there one of the scholars of the eighteenth century, who
in the spirit, if not in the letter, of the views which he put forward,
comes so near to the more enlarged and more judicious theories of the
scholars of our own day, on the general questions of philology.

From the days of De Guignes the higher departments of linguistic science
fell for a time into disrepute in France; but a powerful impulse
was given to the practical cultivation of Oriental languages by the
diplomatic relations of that kingdom with Constantinople and the Levant.
The official appointments connected with that service served to supply
at once a stimulus to the study and an opportunity for its practice.
Cardonne, Ruffin,[113] Legrand, Kieffer, Venture de Paradis, and Langlés,
were all either trained in that school, or devoted themselves to the
study as a preparation for it.

Of these, perhaps John Michael Venture De Paradis is the most remarkable.
His father had been French Consul in the Crimea, and in various cities
of the Levant, and appears to have educated the boy with a special
view to the Oriental diplomatic service. From the College de Louis le
Grand, he was transferred, at the age of fifteen, to Constantinople,
and, before he had completed his twenty-second year, he was appointed
interpreter of the French embassy in Syria. Thence he passed into
Egypt in the same capacity, and, in 1777, accompanied Baron de Tott in
his tour of inspection of the French establishments in the Levant. He
was sent afterwards to Tunis, to Constantinople, and to Algiers; and
eventually was attached to the ministry of Foreign Affairs in Paris, with
the Professorship of Oriental Languages. His last service was in the
memorable Egyptian expedition under Bonaparte, in which he fell a victim
to fatigue, and the evil effects of the climate, in 1799.[114]

Lewis Matthew Langlés[115] was a Picard, born at Peronne, in 1763. From
his boyhood he too was destined for the diplomatic service; and studied
first at Montdidier, and afterwards in Paris, where he obtained an
employment which afforded him considerable leisure for the pursuit of
his favourite studies. He learned Arabic under Caussin de Perceval, and
Persian under Ruffin. Soon afterwards, however, he engaged in the study
of Mantchu, and in some time became such a proficient in that language,
that he was entrusted with the task of editing the Mantchu Dictionary
of Pere Amiot. From that time his reputation was established, at least
with the general public. His subsequent publications in every department
of languages are numerous beyond all precedent. He had the reputation
of knowing, besides the learned languages, Chinese, Tartar, Japanese,
Sanscrit, Malay, Armenian, Arabic, Turkish, and Persian. But it must be
added that the solidity of these attainments has been gravely impeached,
and that by many he is regarded more as a charlatan than as a scholar.

No such cloud hangs over the fame of, after De Guignes, the true reviver
of Chinese literature, Abel Remusat.[116] He was born at Paris in 1788,
and brought up to the medical profession; and it may almost be said that
the only time devoted by him to his early linguistic studies was stolen
from the laborious preparation for the less congenial career to which
he was destined by his father. By a very unusual preference, he applied
himself, almost from the first, to the Chinese and Tartar languages. Too
poor to afford the expensive luxury of a Chinese dictionary, he compiled,
with incredible labour, a vocabulary for his own use; and the interest
created at once by the success of his studies, and by the unexampled
devotedness with which they were pursued, were so great as to procure
for him, at the unanimous instance of the Academy of Inscriptions, the
favour, at that period rare and difficult, of exemption from the chances
of military conscription. From that time forward he applied himself
unremittingly to philological pursuits; and, although he was admitted
doctor of the faculty of medicine, at Paris in 1813, he never appears to
have practised actively in the profession. On the creation of the two
new chairs of Chinese and Sanscrit, in the College de France, after the
Restoration, Remusat was appointed to the former, in November, 1814;
from which period he gave himself up entirely to literature. He was
speedily admitted into all the learned societies both of Paris and of
other countries; and in 1818 he became one of the editors of the _Journal
des Savans_. On the establishment (in which he had a chief part,) of the
Société Asiatique, in 1822, he was named its perpetual secretary; and,
on the death of Langlés, in 1824, he succeeded to the charge of keeper
of Oriental MSS. in the Bibliothèque du Roi. This office he continued to
hold till his early and universally lamented death in 1832. Remusat’s
eminence lay more in the depth and accuracy of his scholarship in
the one great branch of Oriental languages, which he selected as his
own—those of Eastern Asia—and in the profoundly philosophical spirit
which he brought to the investigation of the relations of these languages
to each other, and to the other great families of the earth, than in the
numerical extent of his acquaintance with particular languages. But this,
too, was such as to place him in the very first rank of linguists.

A few words must suffice for the French school since Remusat, although it
has held a very distinguished place in philological science. The Société
Asiatique, founded at Remusat’s instance, and for many years directed
by him as secretary, has not only produced many eminent individual
philologers, as De Sacy, Quatremere, Champollion, Renan, Fresnel, and
De Merian; but, what is far more important, it has successfully carried
out a systematic scheme of investigation, by which alone it is possible,
in so vast a subject, to arrive at satisfactory results. M. Stanislas
Julien’s researches in Chinese; M. Dulaurier’s in the Malay languages;
Father Marcoux’s in the American Indian; Eugene Bournouf’s in those of
Persia; the brothers Antoine and Arnauld d’Abbadie in the languages of
East Africa, and especially in the hitherto almost unknown Abyssinian
and Ethiopian families; Eugene Borè in Armenian;[117] M. Fresnel’s
explorations among the tribes of the western shores of the Red Sea; and
many similar successful investigations of particular departments, are
contributing to lay up such a body of facts, as cannot fail to afford
sure and reliable data for the scientific solution by the philologers
of the coming generation, of those great problems in the science of
language, on which their fathers could only speculate as a theory, and
at the best could but address themselves in conjecture. Although I have
no intention of entering into the subject of living French linguists,
yet there is one of the gentlemen whom I have mentioned, M. Fulgence
Fresnel, whom I cannot refrain from alluding to before I pass from
the subject of French philology. His name is probably familiar to the
public at large, in connexion with the explorations of the French at
Nineveh; but he is long known to the readers of the Journal Asiatique
as a linguist not unworthy of the very highest rank in that branch of
scholarship. M. d’Abbadie,[118] himself a most accomplished linguist,
informed me that M. Fresnel, although exceedingly modest on the subject
of his attainments, has the reputation of knowing twenty languages. The
facility with which he has acquired some of these languages almost rivals
the fame of Mezzofanti. M. Arago having suggested on one occasion the
desirableness of a French translation of Berzelius’s Swedish Treatise
“On the Blow-pipe,” Fresnel at once set about learning Swedish, and in
three months had completed the desired translation! He reads fluently
Hebrew, Greek, Romaic, Latin, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, and
what little is known of the Hieroglyphical language. He is second only
to Lane as an Arabic scholar. Among the less known languages of which M.
Fresnel is master, M. d’Abbadie heard him speak a few sentences of one,
of which he may be said to have himself been the discoverer, and which
is, in some respects, completely anomalous. M. Fresnel describes this
curious language in the Journal Asiatique, July, 1838. It is spoken by
the savages of Mahrak; and as it is not reducible to any of the three
families, the Aramaic, the Canaanitic, or the Arabic, of which, according
to Gesenius, the Ethiopic is an elder branch, M. Fresnel believes it to
be the very language spoken by the Queen of Saba! Its present seat is in
the mountainous district of Hhacik, Mirbât, and Zhafâr. Its most singular
characteristic consists in its articulations, which are exceedingly
difficult and most peculiar. Besides all the nasal sounds of the French
and Portuguese, and that described as the “sputtered sound” of the
Amharic, this strange tongue has three articulations, which can only be
enunciated with _the right side of the mouth_; and the act of uttering
them produces a contortion which destroys the symmetry of the features!
M. Fresnel describes it as “horrible, both to hear and to see spoken.”
Endeavouring to represent the force of one of these sounds by the letters
_hh_, he calls the language _Ehhkili_.[119]


§ V. LINGUISTS OF THE TEUTONIC RACE.[120]

If we abstract from the Sacred Languages, the German scholars were slow
in turning themselves to Oriental studies.

John Müller, of Königsberg, commonly known as Regiomontanus, although he
had the highest repute for learning of all the German scholars of the
fifteenth century, does not appear to have gone beyond the classical
languages. Martin Luther, Reuchlin,[121] Ulrich Van Hutten, Hoogenstraet,
were Hebraists and no more; and John Widmanstadt, when he wished to study
Arabic, was forced to make a voyage to Spain expressly for the purpose.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first student of German race at all distinguished by scholarship in
languages, was Theodore Bibliander,[122] who, besides Greek and Hebrew,
was also well versed in Arabic, and probably in many other Oriental
tongues.[123] The celebrated naturalist, Conrad Gesner, though perhaps
not so solidly versed as Bibliander, in any one language, appears to have
possessed a certain acquaintance with a greater number. His _Mithridates;
de Differentiis Linguarum_,[124] resembles in plan as well as in name,
the great work of Adelung. The number and variety of the languages which
it comprises is extraordinary for the period. It contains the Pater
Noster in twenty-two of these; and, although the observations on many of
the specimens are exceedingly brief and unsatisfactory, yet they often
exhibit much curious learning, and no mean familiarity with the language
to which they belong.[125] Gesner’s success as a linguist is the more
remarkable, inasmuch as that study by no means formed his principal
pursuit. Botany and Natural History might much better be called the real
business of his literary life. Accordingly, Beza says of him, that he
united in his person the very opposite genius of Varro and Pliny; and,
although he died at the comparatively early age of forty-nine, his works
on Natural History fill nearly a dozen folio volumes. Both Gesner and
Bibliander fell victims, one in 1564, the other in 1565, to the great
plague of the sixteenth century.

Jerome Megiser, who, towards the close of the same century compiled the
more extensive polyglot collection of Pater Nosters already referred to,
need scarcely be noticed. He is described by Adelung,[126] as a man of
various, but trivial and superficial learning.

Not so another German scholar of the same age, Jacob Christmann, of
Maintz. Christmann was no less distinguished as a philosopher than as a
linguist. He held for many years at Heidelberg the seemingly incompatible
professorships of Hebrew, Arabic, and Logic, and is described as
deeply versed in all the ancient and modern languages, as well as in
mathematical and astronomical science.[127]

It would be unjust to overlook the scholars of the Low Countries during
the same period. Some of these, as for example, Drusius, and the three
Schultens, father, son, and grandson, were chiefly remarkable as
Hebraists. But there are many others, both of the Belgian and the Dutch
schools, whose scholarship was of a very high order. Among the former,
Andrew Maes (Masius,) deserves a very special notice. He was born in
1536, at Linnich in the diocese of Courtrai. In 1553 he was sent to
Rome as chargé d’affaires. During his residence there, in addition to
Greek, Latin, Spanish, and other European languages, with which he was
already familiar, he made himself master, not only of Italian, but also
of Hebrew, Chaldee, and Syriac. He is said[128] to have assisted Arias
Montanus in the compilation of his Polyglot Bible; but of this no mention
is made by Montanus in the preface. No doubt, however, can be entertained
of his great capacity as an Orientalist; and Sebastian Munster used to
say of him that he seemed to have been brought up among the Hebrews, and
to have lived in the classic days of the Roman Empire. About the same
period, or a few years later, David Haecx published his dictionary of the
Malay languages, one of the earliest contributions to the study of that
curious family. Haecx, though he spent his life in Rome, was a native of
Antwerp.

John Baptist Gramaye, already named as a collector of Pater Nosters,
acquired some reputation as one of the first contributors to the history
of the languages of Africa, although his work is described by Adelung as
very inaccurate. Gramaye was a native of Antwerp, and became provost of
Arnheim and historiographer of the Low Countries. On a voyage from Italy
to Spain, he fell into the hands of Algerine corsairs, who carried him to
Algiers. There he was sold as a slave, and was detained a considerable
time in Barbary. Having at length obtained his liberty, he published,
after his return, a diary of his captivity, a descriptive history of
Africa, and a polyglot collection of Pater Nosters, among which are
several African languages not previously known in Europe.[129] Very
little, however, is known of his own personal acquirements, which are
noticeable, perhaps, rather on account of their unusual character, than
of their great extent or variety.

Some of the linguists of Holland may claim a higher rank. The well-known
Arabic scholar, Erpenius, (Thomas Van Erpen,) was also acquainted with
several other Oriental languages, Hebrew, Chaldee, Persian, Turkish, and
Ethiopic. His countryman and successor in the chair of Oriental languages
at Leyden, James Golius, was hardly less distinguished. Peter Golius,
brother of James, who entered the Carmelite Order and spent many years
as a missionary in Syria and other parts of the East, became equally
celebrated in Rome for his Oriental scholarship. In all these three cases
the knowledge of the languages was not a mere knowledge of books, but had
been acquired by actual travel and research in the various countries of
the East.

John Henry Hottinger, too, a pupil of James Golius at Leyden, and the
learned Jesuit, Father Athanasius Kircher, belong also to this period.
The latter, who is well known for his varied and extensive attainments
in every department of science, was moreover a linguist of no ordinary
merit.[130] He was born at Geyzen, near Fulda, in 1602, and entered the
Jesuit society in 1618, when only sixteen years old. No detailed account
is given by his biographers (with whom languages were of minor interest,)
of the exact extent of his attainments in the department of languages;
but they were both diversified and respectable, and in some things he was
far beyond the men of his own time. His _Lingua Egyptiaca Restituta_ may
still be consulted with advantage by the student of Coptic.

Most of these men, however, confined themselves chiefly to one particular
department. The first really universal linguist of Germany is the great
Ethiopic scholar, Job Ludolf, who was born at Erfurt, in 1624. Early in
life he devoted himself to the study of languages; and his extensive
travels—first as preceptor to the sons of the Duke of Saxe-Gotha,
and afterwards as tutor to the children of the Swedish ambassador in
Paris—coupled with his unexampled industry,[131] enabled him, not only to
hold a high rank in history and general literature, but also to attain to
a success as a linguist which had rarely been equalled before his time.
He is said to have been master of twenty-five languages,[132] but as I
have never seen any exact enumeration of them, I am inclined to allow for
considerable exaggeration.

There is even more reason to suspect of exaggeration the popular accounts
which have come down to us of a self-educated linguist of the same
period—a Saxon peasant called Nicholas Schmid, more commonly known as
Cüntzel of Rothenacker, from the name of the village where he was born,
in 1606. This extraordinary man was the son of a peasant. His youth
was entirely neglected. He worked as a common labourer on his father’s
farm, and, until his sixteenth year, never had learned even the letters
of the alphabet. At this age one of the farm-servants taught him to
read, greatly to the dissatisfaction of his father, who feared that such
studies would withdraw him from his work. Soon afterwards, a relative who
was a notary, gave him a few lessons in Latin; and, under the direction
of the same relative, he learned the rudiments of Greek, Hebrew, and
other languages. During all this time, he continued his daily occupation
as a farm-labourer, and had no time for his studies but what he was able
to steal from the hours allotted for sleep and for meals; the latter of
which he snatched in the most hurried manner, and always with an open
book by his side. In this strange way, amid the toils of the field and
of the farm-yard, Schmid is said to have acquired a store of knowledge
the details of which border upon the marvelous, one of his recorded
performances being a translation of the Lord’s Prayer into fifty-one
languages![133]

One of the scholars engaged in the compilation of Walton’s Polyglot,
Andrew Müller, has left a reputation less marvellous, but more solid.
He was born about 1630, at Greiffenhagen in Pomerania. Müller, like
Crichton, was a precocious genius. At eighteen he wrote verses freely in
Latin, Greek, and Hebrew. On the completion of his studies, he became
pastor of Königsberg on the Warta; but the duties of that charge soon
became distasteful to him, and, after a short trial, he resolved, at
the invitation of Castell, to settle in England, and devote himself to
literature. He arrived just as Brian Walton was making arrangements for
the publication of his celebrated Polyglot Bible, and at once entered
earnestly into the scheme. He took up his residence in the house of
John Castell in the Strand, where, for ten years, he applied himself
unremittingly to study. It is told of him that, in the ardour of study
or the indifference of scholastic seclusion, he would not raise his
head from his books to look out of the window, on occasion of Charles
II.’s triumphal progress at the Restoration! Having received from Bishop
Wilkins some information on the subject of Chinese, he conceived a
most enthusiastic passion for that language. He obtained some types at
Antwerp, and, through the instructions of the celebrated Jesuit, Father
Kircher, and other members of the society, he was perhaps the first
European scholar who, without actually visiting China, acquired a mastery
of its language; as he is certainly one of the first who deserted the
track of the old philologers, and attempted the comparative study of
languages on principles approaching to those which modern science has
made familiar. Soon after the completion of Walton’s Polyglot Müller
returned to Germany. He was named successively Pastor of Bernau and
Provost of Berlin in 1667, but resigned both livings in 1685, and lived
thenceforth in retirement at Stettin. He died in 1694. Although a most
laborious man and a voluminous writer, Müller’s views were visionary
and unpractical. He professed to have devised a plan of teaching, so
complete, that, by adopting it, a perfect knowledge of Chinese could be
acquired in half a year, and so simple, that it could be applied to the
instruction of persons of the most ordinary capacity. Haller states that
he spoke no less than twenty languages.

A Burgomaster-linguist is a more singular literary phenomenon. We are
so little accustomed to connect that title with any thing above the
plodding details of the commerce with which it is inseparably associated,
that the name of Nicholas Witzen, Burgomaster of Amsterdam, deserves to
be specially commemorated, as an exception to an unliterary class. It
was in the pursuit of his vocation as a merchant that Witzen acquired
the chief part of the languages with which he was acquainted. He made
repeated expeditions to Russia between the years 1666 and 1677, in
several of which he penetrated far into the interior of the country,
and had opportunities of associating with many of the motley races of
that vast empire; Slavonians, Tartars, Cossacks, Samoiedes, and the
various Siberian tribes; as well as with natives of Eastern kingdoms not
subject to Russia.[134] Besides inquiries into the geography and natural
history of those countries which lie upon the north-eastern frontier of
Europe and the contiguous provinces of Asia, Witzen used every effort
to glean information regarding their languages. He obtained, in most
of these languages, not only versions of the Lord’s Prayer, but also
vocabularies comprising a considerable number of words; both of which
he supplied to his friend and correspondent, Leibnitz, for publication
in his _Collectanea Etymologica_.[135] How far Witzen himself was
acquainted with these languages it is difficult to determine; but he is
at least entitled to notice as the first collector of materials for this
particular branch of the study.

David Wilkins, Chamberlayne’s fellow-labourer in the compilation of
the Collection of Pater Nosters referred to in a former page, may also
deserve a passing notice. The place of his birth, which occurred about
1685, is a matter of some uncertainty. Adelung[136] thinks he was a
native of Dantzig; by others he is believed to have been a native of
Holland. The best part of his life, however, was spent in England; where,
at Cambridge, he took the degree of Doctor of Divinity, in 1717. He was
afterwards appointed Librarian of Lambeth and Archdeacon of Suffolk.
His qualifications as Polyglot editor, at the time when he undertook
to assist Chamberlayne, appear to have consisted rather in patient
industry and general scholarship, than in any extraordinary familiarity
with languages; though he afterwards obtained considerable reputation,
especially by an edition of the New Testament in Coptic, in 1716.

With the illustrious name of Leibnitz we commence a new era in the
science of languages. This extraordinary man, who united in himself all
the most varied, and it might seem incompatible, excellencies of other
men—a jurist and a divine, a mathematician and a poet, a historian and
a philosopher—added to all his other prodigious attainments a most
extensive and profound knowledge of languages. It is not, however, on the
actual extent of his acquaintance with particular languages (although
this too was most remarkable), that his fame as a scientific linguist
rests. He was the first to recognize the true nature and objects of
linguistic science, and to direct its studies to an object at once
eminently practical and profoundly philosophical. It is not alone that,
deserting the trivialities of the old etymologists, he laid down the
true principles of the great science of comparative philology, and
detected its full importance; Leibnitz may claim the further merit of
having himself almost created that science, and given it forth, a new
Minerva, in its full and perfect development. There is hardly a principle
of modern philology the germ of which may not be discovered in his
singularly pregnant and suggestive essays and letters; and, what is far
more remarkable, he has often, with the instinctive sagacity of original
genius, anticipated sometimes by conjecture, sometimes by positive
prediction, analogies and results which the investigations of actual
explorers have since realized.[137]

One of the most important practical services rendered by Leibnitz to
science, was the organization of academies and other scientific bodies,
by which the efforts of individuals might be systematically guided to one
common end, and the results of their researches, whether in collecting
facts or in developing theories, might, through the collision of many
minds, be submitted to the ordeal of careful examination and judicious
discussion. It is chiefly to him that science is indebted for the Royal
Society of Berlin and the Academy of St. Petersburg. Both of these
bodies, although embracing the whole circle of science, have proved most
eminent schools of languages; and it is a curious illustration of that
profound policy, in pursuance of which we see Russia still availing
herself of the service of genius wherever it is to be found, that many
of the ablest German linguists of the eighteenth century were, either
directly or indirectly, connected with the latter institution.

Gerard Frederic Müller is an early example. He was born, at Herforden
in Westphalia, in 1705, and was a pupil of the celebrated Otto Mencken.
Mencken, having been invited to become a member of the new academy of St.
Petersburg, declined the honour for himself, but recommended his scholar
Müller in his stead.[138] Müller accordingly accompanied the scientific
expedition which was sent to Siberia under the elder Gmelin, (also a
German,) from 1733 to 1741. On his return, he was appointed keeper of
the Imperial Archives, and Historiographer of Russia. Müller does not
appear to have given much attention to Oriental languages; but he was
more generally familiar with modern languages than most of the scholars
of that period.[139]

Augustus Lewis Schlötzer, another German literary adventurer in the
Russian service, and for a time secretary of Müller, was a more generally
accomplished linguist. Unlike Müller, he was a skilful Orientalist;
and he was versed, moreover, in several of the Slavonic languages with
which Müller had neglected to make himself acquainted, before engaging
in the compilation of his great collection of Russian Historians. For
this he availed himself of the assistance of his secretary Schlötzer.
Gottlieb Bayer of Königsberg, one of the earliest among the scholars of
Germany, author of the _Museum Sinicum_, also occupied for some years
a chair at St. Petersburg; but he is better known by his ferocious
controversial writings, than by his philological works. A much more
distinguished scholar of modern Germany, almost entirely unknown in
England, is Christian William Buttner. He was born at Wolfenbüttel in
1716, and was destined by his father (an apothecary) for the medical
profession; but, although he gave his attention in the first instance to
the sciences preparatory to that profession, the real pursuit of his life
became philology, and especially in its relation to the great science
of ethnography. It was a saying of Cuvier’s, that Linnæus and Buttner
realised by their united studies the title of Grotius’s celebrated work,
“De Jure _Naturæ_ et _Gentium_;”—Linnæus by his pursuit of _Natural_
History assuming the first, and Buttner, by his _ethnological_ studies,
appropriating the second—as the respective spheres of their operations.
In every country which Buttner visited, he acquired not only the
general language, but the most minute peculiarities of its provincial
dialects. Few literary lives are recorded in history which present such
a picture of self-denial and privation voluntarily endured in the cause
of learning, as that of Buttner. His library and museum, accumulated
from the hoardings of his paltry income, were exceedingly extensive and
most valuable. In order to scrape together the means for their gradual
purchase, he contented himself during the greater part of his later
life with a single meal per day, the cost of which never exceeded a
silber-groschen, or somewhat less than three half-pence![140] It may be
inferred, however, from what has been said, that Buttner’s attainments
were mainly those of a book-man. In the scanty notices of him which we
have gleaned, we do not find that his power of speaking foreign languages
was at all what might have been expected from the extent and variety
of his book-knowledge. But his services as a scientific philologer
were infinitely more important, as well as more permanent, than any
such ephemeral faculty. He was the first to observe and to cultivate
the true relations of the monosyllabic languages of southern Asia, and
to place them at the head of his scheme of the Asiatic and European
languages. He was the first to conceive, or at least to carry out, the
theory of the geographical distribution of languages; and he may be
looked on as the true founder of the science of glossography. He was
the first to systematise and to trace the origin and affiliations of
the various alphabetical characters; and his researches in the history
of the palæography of the Semitic family may be said to have exhausted
the subject. Nevertheless, he has himself written very little; but he
communicated freely to others the fruits of his researches; and there
are few of the philologers of his time who have not confessed their
obligations to him. Michaelis, Schlötzer, Gatterer, and almost every
other contemporary German scholar of note, have freely acknowledged both
the value of his communications and the generous and liberal spirit in
which they were imparted.[141]

John David Michaelis[142] (1717-91) is so well known in these countries
by his contributions to Biblical literature[143] that little can be
necessary beyond the mention of his name. His grammar of the Hebrew,
Chaldee, Syriac, and Arabic languages, sufficiently attest his abilities
as an Orientalist; and, as regards that particular family of languages,
his philological views are generally solid and judicious. But I am
unable to discover what were his attainments in modern languages; and to
the general science of comparative philology he cannot be said to have
rendered any important original contribution.

The Catholic Missionaries of Germany, although of course less numerous
than their brethren of Italy and the Spanish Peninsula, have contributed
their share to the common stock of linguistic science. Many of the Jesuit
Missionaries of Central and Southern America;—for example, Fathers
Richter, Fritz, Grebmer, and Widmann—whose papers are the foundation of
Humboldt’s Essay in the _Mithridates_, were of German origin. Father
Dobritzhofer, whose interesting account of the Abipones has been
translated into English[144], under Southey’s advice and superintendence,
was a native of Austria; and the learned Sanscrit scholar, Father
Paulinus de Sancto Bartholomeo, (although less known under his German
name, John Philip Werdin) was an Austrian Carmelite, and served for above
fourteen years in the Indian missions of his order.

A German philanthropist of a different class, Count Leopold von Berchtold
(1738-1809) the Howard of Germany, deserves to be named, not merely for
his devoted services to the cause of humanity throughout the world, but
for his remarkable acquirements as a linguist. He spoke fluently eight
European languages;[145] and, what is more rare, wrote and published in
the greater number of them, tracts upon the great subject to which he
dedicated his life. He died, at a very advanced age, of the plague, and
has long been honoured as a martyr in the cause of philanthropy; but he
has left no notable work behind him.

Very different the career of the great author of the _Mithridates_, John
Christopher Adelung, who lived almost exclusively for learning. He was
born in 1734, at Spantekow in Pomerania. In 1759, he was appointed to
a professorship at Erfurt; but he exchanged it, after a few years, for
a place at Leipsic, where he continued to reside for a long series of
years. Although habitually of a gay and cheerful disposition, and a most
agreeable member of society, he was one of the most assiduous students
upon record, devoting as a rule no less than fourteen hours a day to his
literary occupations.[146] His services to his native language are still
gratefully acknowledged by every German etymologist, and his Dictionary,
(although since much improved by Voss and Campe,) has been declared as
great a boon to Germany, as the united labours of the Academy had been
able to offer to France. Adelung’s personal reputation as a linguist was
exceedingly high, but his fame with posterity must rest on his great
work, the _Mithridates_, which I have already briefly described. The very
origination of such a work, or at least the undertaking it upon the scale
on which he has carried it out, would have made the reputation of an
ordinary man. In the touching preface of the first volume, (the only one
which Adelung lived to see published,) he describes it as “the youngest
and probably the last child of his muse;” and confesses that “he has
nurtured, dressed, and cherished it, with all the tenderness which it
is commonly the lot of the youngest child to enjoy.”[147] It is indeed
a work of extraordinary labour, and, although from the manner in which
its materials were supplied, necessarily incomplete and even inaccurate
in its details, a work of extraordinary ability. The first volume alone
(containing the languages of Asia, and published in 1806,) is exclusively
Adelung’s. Of the second, only a hundred and fifty pages had been printed
when the venerable author died in his seventy-third year. These printed
sheets, and the papers which he had collected for the subsequent
volumes, he bequeathed to Dr. Severinus Vater, professor of theology at
Königsberg, under whose editorship, with assistance from several friends,
(and especially from the lamented William von Humboldt and Frederic
Adelung,) the second volume, which comprises the languages of Europe with
all their ramifications, appeared in 1809. The third, on the languages
of Africa, and of America, (for which last the work is indebted to
Humboldt,) appeared, in parts, between 1812 and 1816; and a supplementary
volume, containing additions to the earlier portions of the work, by
Humboldt, Frederic Adelung, and Vater himself, was published in 1817.
It is impossible to overstate the importance and value of this great
linguistic repertory. The arrangement of the work is strictly scientific,
according to the views then current. The geographical distribution, the
origin and history, and the general structural peculiarities of each,
not only of the great families, but of the individual languages, and in
many cases even of the local dialects, are carefully, though briefly
described. The specimen Pater Noster in each language and dialect, is
critically examined, and its vocabulary explained. To each language,
too, is prefixed a catalogue of the chief philological or etymological
works which treat of its peculiarities; and thus abundant suggestions
are supplied for the prosecution of more minute researches into its
nature and history. And for the most part, all this is executed with so
much simplicity and clearness, with so true a perception of the real
points of difficulty in each language, and with so almost instinctive
a power of discriminating between those peculiarities in each which
require special explanation, and those less abnormal qualities which a
philosophical linguist will easily infer from the principles of general
grammar, or from a consideration of the common characteristics of the
family to which it belongs, that one may learn as much of the real
character of a language, in a few hours, from the few suggestive pages
the _Mithridates_, as from the tedious and complicated details of its
professional grammarians.

Adelung’s associate in the _Mithridates_ and its continuator, Dr.
Severinus Vater, was born at Altenburg, in 1771; he studied at Jena and
Halle, in both of which universities he afterwards held appointments
as professor; at Jena, as extraordinary Professor of Theology in 1796,
and at Halle, as Professor of Oriental Languages in 1800. Thence he
was transferred, in 1809, to Königsberg in the capacity of Professor
of Theology and Librarian; but he returned, in 1820, to Halle, where
he continued to reside till his death, in 1826. Although Vater was
by no means a very scientific linguist,[148] the importance of his
contributions to the study of languages cannot be too highly estimated.
Besides the large share which he had in the preparation of the
_Mithridates_ (the last three volumes of which were edited by him,) he
also wrote well on the grammar of the Hebrew, Polish, Russian, and German
languages. Nevertheless, his reputation is rather that of a scholar than
of a linguist.

A few years after the author of the _Mithridates_ appears the celebrated
Peter Simon Pallas, to whom we are indebted for the great “Comparative
Vocabulary” already described. He was born at Berlin in 1741, and his
early studies were mainly directed to natural philosophy, which he seems
to have cultivated in all its branches. His reputation as a naturalist
procured for him, in 1767, an invitation from Catherine II. of Russia,
to exchange a distinguished position which he had obtained at the Hague
for a professorship in the Academy of St. Petersburg. His arrival in that
capital occurred just at the time of the departure of the celebrated
scientific expedition to Siberia for the purpose of observing the transit
of Venus; and, as their mission also embraced the geography and natural
history of Siberia, Pallas gladly accepted an invitation to accompany
them. They set out in June, 1768, and after exploring the vast plains of
European Russia, the borders of Calmuck Tartary, and the shores of the
Caspian, they crossed the Ural Mountains, examined the celebrated mines
of Catherinenberg, proceeded to Tobolsk, the capital of Siberia, and
penetrated across the mountains to the Chinese frontier, whence Pallas
returned by the route of Astrakan and the Caucasus to St. Petersburg. He
reached that city in July, 1774, with broken health, and hair prematurely
whitened by sickness and fatigue. He resumed his place in the Academy;
and was rewarded by the Empress with many distinctions and lucrative
employments, one of which was the charge of instructing the young
grand-dukes, Alexander and Constantine. It was during these years that
he devoted himself to the compilation of the _Vocabularia Comparativa_,
which comprises two hundred and one languages; but, in 1795, he returned
to the Crimea, (where he had obtained an extensive gift of territory
from the Empress) for the purpose of recruiting his health and pursuing
his researches. After a residence there of fifteen years, he returned
to Berlin in 1810, where he died in the following year. It will be
seen, therefore, that, prodigious as were his acquirements in that
department, the study of languages was but a subordinate pursuit of this
extraordinary man. His fame is mainly due to his researches in science.
It is to him that we owe the reduction of the astronomical observations
of the expedition of 1768; and Cuvier gives him the credit of completely
renewing the science of geology, and of almost entirely re-constructing
that of natural history. It is difficult, nevertheless,[149] to arrive
at an exact conclusion as to the share which he personally took in the
compilation of the Vocabulary; and still more so, as to his powers as a
speaker of foreign languages; although it is clear that his habits of
life as a traveller and scientific explorer, not only facilitated, but
even directly necessitated for him, the exercise of that faculty, to a
far greater degree than can be supposed in the case of most of the older
philologers.

The career of Pallas bears a very remarkable resemblance to that of a
more modern scholar, also a native of Berlin, Julius Henry Klaproth.
He was the son of the celebrated chemist of that name, and was born in
1783. Although destined by his father to follow his own profession, a
chance sight of the collection of Chinese books in the Royal Library at
Berlin, irrevocably decided the direction of his studies. With the aid
of the imperfect dictionary of Mentzel and Pere Diaz, he succeeded in
learning without a master that most difficult language; and, though he
complied with his father’s desire, so far as to pursue with success the
preparatory studies of the medical profession, he never formally embraced
it. After a time he gave his undivided attention to Oriental studies;
and, in 1802, established, at Dresden, the _Asiatisches Magazin_. Like so
many of his countrymen, he accepted service in Russia, at the invitation
of Count Potocki, who knew him at Berlin; and he was a member of the
half-scientific, half-political, mission to Pekin, in 1805, under that
eminent scholar and diplomatist. He withdrew, however, from the main
body of this expedition, in order to be able to pursue his scientific
researches more unrestrainedly; and, after traversing eighteen hundred
leagues in the space of twenty months, in the course of which he passed
in review all the motley races of that inhospitable region, Samoiedes,
Finns, Tartars, Monguls, Paskirs, Dzoungars, Tungooses, &c., he returned
to St. Petersburg, in 1806, with a vast collection of notes on the
Chinese, Mantchu, Mongul, and Japanese[150] languages. With a similar
object, he was soon afterwards sent by the Academy, in September, 1807,
to collect information on the languages of the Caucasus, a journey of
exceeding difficulty and privation, in which he spent nearly three years.
On his return to St. Petersburg, he obtained permission to go to Berlin
for the purpose of completing the necessary engravings for his work;
and he availed himself of this opportunity to withdraw altogether from
the Russian service, although with the forfeiture of all his titles
and honours. After a brief sojourn in Italy, he fixed his residence in
Paris. To him the _Société Asiatique_ may be said to owe its origin; and
he acted, almost up to his death in 1835, as the chief editor of its
journal—the well-known _Journal Asiatique_. In Paris, also, he published
his _Asia Polyglotta_, and “New Mithridates.” Klaproth, perhaps, does not
deserve, in any one of the languages which he cultivated, the character
of a very deep scholar; but he was acquainted with a large number: with
Chinese, Mongol, Mantchu, and Japanese, also with Sanscrit, Armenian,
Persian, and Georgian;[151] he was of course perfectly familiar with
German, Russian, French, and probably with others of the European
languages.

The eminent historical successes of Berthold George Niebuhr, (born at
Copenhagen in 1776), have so completely eclipsed the memory of all his
other great qualities, that perhaps the reader will not be prepared
to find that in the department of languages his attainments were of
the highest rank. His father, Carsten Niebuhr, the learned Eastern
traveller, had destined him to pursue his own career; but the delicacy
of the youth’s constitution, and other circumstances, forced his father
to abandon the idea, and saved young Niebuhr for the far more important
studies to which his own tastes attracted him. His history, both literary
and political, is too recent and too well known to require any formal
notice. It will be enough for our purpose to transcribe from his life
an extremely interesting letter from his father, which bears upon the
particular subject of the present inquiry. It is dated December, 1807,
when Niebuhr was little more than thirty years of age. “My son has
gone to Memel,” writes the elder Niebuhr, “with the commissariat of the
army. When he found he should probably have to go to Riga, he began
forthwith to learn Russian. Let us just reckon how many languages he
knows already. He was only two years old when we came to Meldorf, so
that we must consider, 1st, German, as his mother tongue. He learned at
school, 2nd, Latin; 3rd, Greek; 4th, Hebrew; and, besides in Meldorf he
learned, 5th, Danish; 6th, English; 7th, French; 8th, Italian; but only
so far as to be able to read a book in these languages; some books from a
vessel wrecked on the coast induced him to learn, 9th, Portuguese; 10th,
Spanish; of Arabic he did not know much at home, because I had lost my
lexicon and could not quickly replace it; in Kiel and Copenhagen he had
opportunities of practice in speaking and writing French, English, and
Danish; in Copenhagen he learned, 11th, Persian, of Count Ludolph, the
Austrian minister, who was born at Constantinople, and whose father was
an acquaintance of mine; and 12th, Arabic, he taught himself; in Holland
he learned, 13th, Dutch; and again, in Copenhagen, 14th, Swedish, and a
little Icelandic; at Memel, 15th, Russian; 16th, Slavonic; 17th, Polish;
18th, Bohemian; and, 19th, Illyrian. With the addition of Low German,
this makes in all twenty languages.”[152]

As this letter does not enter into the history of Niebuhr’s later
studies, I inquired of his friend, the Chevalier Bunsen, whether he had
continued to cultivate the faculty thus early developed. I received from
him the following interesting statement:—“Niebuhr,” he says, “ought not
to be ranked among _Linguists_, in contradistinction with _Philologers_.
Language had no special interest for him, beyond what it affords in
connection with history and literature. His proficiency in languages
was, however, very great, in consequence of his early and constant
application to history, and his _matchless memory_. I have spoken of
both in my _Memoir on Niebuhr_, in the German and English edition of
Niebuhr’s Letters and Life; it is appended to the 2nd volume of both
editions. I think it is somewhere stated how many languages he knew
at an early age. What I know is, that besides _Greek_ and _Latin_, he
learned early to read and write _Arabic_; _Hebrew_ he had also learned,
but neglected afterwards; _Russian_ and _Slavonic_ he learned (to read
only,) in the years 1808, 1810. He wrote well _English_, _French_, and
_Italian_; and read _Spanish_, and _Portuguese_. _Danish_ he wrote as
well as his mother tongue, _German_, and he understood _Swedish_. In
short, he would learn with the greatest ease _any language_ which led him
to the knowledge of historical truth, when occupied with the subject; but
language, as such, had no charm for him.”

Among the scholars who assisted Adelung and Vater in the compilation of
the _Mithridates_, by far the most distinguished was the illustrious
Charles William von Humboldt. He was born at Potsdam, in 1767, and
received his preliminary education at Berlin. His university studies
were made partly at Göttingen, partly at Jena, where he formed the
acquaintance and friendship of Goethe, Schiller, Wieland, and, above
all, of Herder, from whose well-known tastes it is highly probable that
Humboldt’s mind received the strong philological bias which it exhibited
during his life. Unlike most of the scholars who preceded him in this
career, however, Humboldt’s life was spent amid the bustle and intrigue
of diplomatical pursuits. He was sent to Rome as Prussian Minister in
1802, and, from that period until 1819, he was almost uniformly employed
in this and similar public services. From his return to Berlin, in 1819,
he lived almost entirely for science, till his death, which occurred
at Tegel, near Berlin, in 1835. Humboldt is, in truth, the author of
that portion of the third volume of the _Mithridates_ which treats of
the languages of the two continents of America; and, although a great
part of its materials were derived from the labours of others—from the
memoirs, published and unpublished, of the missionaries, from the works
and MSS. of Padre Hervaz, and other similar sources—yet no one can read
any single article in the volume without perceiving that Humboldt had
made himself thoroughly master of the subject; and that, especially in
its bearings upon the general science of philology, or the great question
of the unity of languages and its kindred ethnological problems, he
had not only exhausted all the learning of his predecessors, but had
successfully applied to it all the powers of his own comprehensive and
original genius. To the consideration, too, of this numerous family of
languages he brought a mind stored with the knowledge of all the other
great families both of the East and of the West; and although it is not
easy to say what his success in speaking languages may have been, it is
impossible to doubt either the variety or the solidity of his attainments
both as a scientific and as a practical linguist. But Humboldt’s place
with posterity must be that of a philologer rather than of a linguist.
His Essay on the “Diversity of the Formation of Human Language, and
its Influence on the Intellectual Development of Mankind,” published
posthumously in 1836, as an Introduction to his Analysis of the Kawi
Language, is a work of extraordinary learning and research, as well as of
profound and original thought; analysing all the successive varieties of
grammatical structure which characterize the several classes of language
in their various stages of structural development, from the naked
simplicity of Chinese up to the minute and elaborate inflexional variety
of the Sanscritic family. M. Bunsen describes this wonderful work as “the
_Calculus Sublimis_ of linguistic theory,” and declares that “it places
William von Humboldt’s name by the side of that of Leibnitz in universal
comparative ethnological philology.”[153]

The school of Humboldt in Germany has supplied a long series of
distinguished names to philological literature, beginning with Frederic
von Schlegel, (whose Essay “On the Language and Literature of the
Hindoos, 1808,” opened an entirely new view of the science of comparative
philology), and continued, through Schlegel’s brother Augustus, Rask,
Bopp, Grimm, Lepsius, Pott, Pfizmaier, Hammer-Purgstall (the so-called
“Lily of Ten Tongues”), Sauerwein, Diez, Boehtlingk, and the lamented
Castrén, down to Bunsen, and his learned fellow-labourers, Max Müller,
Paul Boetticher, Aufrecht, and others.[154] For most of those, as for
Schlegel, the Sanscrit family of languages has been the great centre
of exploration, or at least the chief standard of comparison; and
Bopp, in his wonderful work, the “Comparative Grammar of the Sanscrit,
Zend, Greek, Latin, Lithuanian, old Slavonic, Gothic, and German
Languages,”[155] has almost exhausted this part of the inquiry. Others
(still, however, with the same general view) have devoted themselves
to other families, as Lepsius to the Egyptian, Rask to the Scythian,
Boehtlingk to the Tartar,[156] Grimm to the Teutonic, Diez to the
Romanic, and Castrén to the Finnic. Others, in fine, as Bunsen in
his most comprehensive work, “Outlines of the Philosophy of Universal
History applied to Language,” (the third volume of his “Christianity and
Mankind”) have digested the entire subject, and applied the researches
of all to the solution of the great problem of the science. Some of
those whom I have named rather resembled the ancient heroes of romance
and adventure, than the common race of quiet everyday scholars. The
journeys of Rask, Klaproth, and Lepsius, were not only full of danger,
but often attended with exceeding privation; and Alexander Castrén of
Helsingfors was literally a martyr of the science. This enthusiastic
student,[157] although a man of extremely delicate constitution, “left
his study, travelled for years alone in his sledge through the snowy
deserts of Siberia; coasted along the borders of the Polar Sea; lived for
whole winters in caves of ice, or in the smoky huts of greasy Samoiedes;
then braved the sand-clouds of Mongolia; passed the Baikal; and returned
from the frontiers of China to his duties as Professor at Helsingfors,
to die after he had given to the world but a few specimens of his
treasures.”[158]

Rask and M. Bunsen, even as linguists, deserve to be more specially
commemorated.

The former, who was born in 1787 at Brennekilde, in the island of Funen,
traversed, in the course of the adventurous journey already alluded
to, the Eastern provinces of Russia, Persia, India, Malacca, and the
island of Ceylon, and penetrated into the interior of Africa. In all
the countries which he visited he made himself acquainted with the
various languages which prevailed; so that besides the many languages
of his native Teutonic family, those of the Scandinavian, Finnic, and
Sclavonic stock, the principal cultivated European languages, and the
learned languages (including those of the Bible), he was also familiar
with Sanscrit in all its branches; and is justly described as the first
who opened the way to “a real grammatical knowledge of Zend.”[159] M.
Bunsen’s great work exhibits a knowledge of the structural analysis of
a prodigious number of languages, from almost every family. As a master
of the learned languages, Hebrew, Greek, Syriac, and (though he has
cultivated these less), Arabic and Persian, he has few superiors. He
speaks and writes with equal facility Latin, German, English, French,
and Italian, all with singular elegance and purify; he speaks besides
Dutch and Danish; he reads Swedish, Icelandic, and the other old German
languages, Spanish, Portuguese, and Romaic; and he has also studied many
of the less known languages, as Chinese, Basque, Finnic, and Welsh,
together with several of the African and North American languages, but
chiefly with a view to their grammatical structure, and without any idea
of learning to read them.

Nevertheless, with all the linguistic learning which they undoubtedly
possess, neither Humboldt nor the other members of his distinguished
school fall properly within the scope of this Memoir. With all of them,
even those who were themselves accomplished linguists, the knowledge
of languages, (and especially of their vocabularies), is a subordinate
object. They have never proposed the study to themselves, for its own
sake, but only as an instrument of philosophical inquiry. It might almost
be said, indeed, that by the reaction which this school has created
against the old system of etymological, and in favour of the structural,
comparison of languages, a positive discouragement has been given to the
exact or extensive study of their vocabularies. Philologers, as a class,
have a decided disposition to look down upon, and even to depreciate, the
pursuit of linguists. With the former, the knowledge of the words of a
language is a very minor consideration in comparison with its inflexions,
and still more its laws of transposition (Lautverschiebung); Professor
Schott of Berlin plainly avows that “a limited knowledge of languages
is sufficient for settling the general questions as to their common
origin;”[160] and beyond a catalogue of a certain number of words for the
purpose of a comparative vocabulary, there is a manifest tendency on the
part of many, to regard all further concern about the words of a language
as old-fashioned and puerile. It it some consolation to the admirers of
the old school to know, that, from time to time, learned philologers
have been roughly taken to task for the presumption with which they have
theorized about languages of whose vocabulary they are ignorant; and it
is difficult not to regard the unsparing and often very amusing exposures
of Professor Schott’s blunders which occur in the long controversy that
he has had with Boehtlingk, Mr. Caldwell’s recent strictures[161] upon
the Indian learning of Professor Max Müller, or Stanislaus Julien’s
still fiercer onslaught on M. Panthier, in the _Journal Asiatique_,[162]
as a sort of retributive offering to the offended Genius of neglected
Etymology.

       *       *       *       *       *

I shall not delay upon the Biblical linguists of Germany as Hug, Jahn,
Schott, Windischmann, Vullers, &c., among Catholics, or the rival
schools of Rosenmüller, Tholuck, Ewald, Gesenius, Fürst, Beer, De
Lagarde, &c. Extensive[163] as is the range of the attainments of these
distinguished men in the languages of the Bible, and their literature,
this accomplishment has now become so universal among German Biblical
scholars, that it has almost ceased to be regarded as a title to
distinction. Its very masters are lost in the crowd of eminent men who
have grown up on all sides around him.

       *       *       *       *       *

Among the scholars of modern Hungary there are a few names which deserve
to be mentioned. Sajnovitz’s work on the common origin of the Magyar
and Lapp languages, though written in 1770, long before the science
of Comparative Philology had been reduced to its present form, has
obtained the praise of much learning and ingenuity. Gyarmathi, who wrote
somewhat later on the affinity of the Magyar and Finnic languages (1799)
is admitted by M. Bunsen[164] to “deserve a very high rank among the
founders of that science.” But neither of these authors can be considered
as a linguist. Father Dubrowsky, of whom I shall speak elsewhere,
although born in Hungary, cannot properly be considered as a Hungarian.
Kazinczy, Kisfaludy, and their followers, have confined themselves almost
entirely to the cultivation of their own native language, or at least to
the ethnological affinities which it involves.

I have only discovered one linguist of modern Hungary whom I can consider
entitled to a special notice, but the singular and almost mysterious
interest which attaches to his name may in some measure compensate for
the comparative solitude in which it is found.

I allude to the celebrated Magyar pilgrim and philologer, Csoma de Körös.
His name is written in his own language, Körösi Csoma Sandor; but in the
works which he has published (all of which are in English), it is given
in the above form. He was born of a poor, but noble family, about 1790,
at Körös, in Transylvania; and, received a gratuitous education at the
College of Nagy-Enyed. The leading idea which engrossed this enthusiastic
scholar during life, was the discovery of the original of the Magyar
race; in search of which (after preparing himself for about five years,
at Göttingen, by the study of medicine and of the Oriental languages,)
he set out in 1820, on a pilgrimage to the East, “lightly clad, with a
little stick in his hand, as if meditating a country walk, and with but
a hundred florins, (about £10), in his pocket.” The only report of his
progress which was received for years afterwards, informed his friends
that he had crossed the Balkan, visited Constantinople, Alexandria, and
the Arabic libraries at Cairo; and, after traversing Egypt and Syria,
had arrived at Teheran. Here, on hearing a few words of the Tibetan
language, he was struck by their resemblance to Magyar; and, in the hope
of thus resolving his cherished problem, he crossed Little Bucharia
to the desert of Gobi; traversed many of the valleys of the Himalaya;
and finally buried himself for four years (1827-1830), in the Buddhist
Monastery of Kanam, deeply engaged in the study of Tibetan; four months
of which time he spent in a room nine feet square, (without once quitting
it), and in a temperature below zero! He quickly discovered his mistake
as to the affinity of Tibetan with Magyar; but he pursued his Tibetan
studies in the hope of obtaining in the sacred books of Tibet some light
upon the origin of his nation; and before his arrival at Calcutta, in
1830, he had written down no less than 40,000 words in that language. He
had hardly reached Calcutta when he was struck down by the mortifying
discovery that the Tibetan books to which he had devoted so many precious
years were but translations from the Sanscrit! From 1830 he resided for
several years chiefly at Calcutta, engaged in the study of Sanscrit
and other languages, and employed in various literary services by the
Asiatic Society of Bengal. He published in 1834 a Tibetan and English
Dictionary, and contributed many interesting papers to the Asiatic
Journal, and the Journal of the Bengal Asiatic Society. In 1842, he set
out afresh upon the great pilgrimage which he had made the object of his
life; and, having reached Dharjeeling on his way to Sikam in Tibet, he
was seized by a sudden illness, which, as he refused to take medicine,
rapidly carried him off. This strange, though highly gifted man, had
studied in the course of his adventurous life, seventeen or eighteen
languages, in several of which he was a proficient.[165]

The career of this enthusiastic Magyar resembles in many respects that
of Castrén, the Danish philologer; and in nothing more than in the
devotedness with which each of them applied himself to the investigation
of the origin of his native language and to the discovery of the
ethnological affinities of his race.


§ VI. LINGUISTS OF GREAT BRITAIN AND IRELAND.

The names with which the catalogue of Italian and that of Spanish
linguists open, find a worthy companion in the first name among the
linguists of Britain.

       *       *       *       *       *

With others the study of languages, or of kindred sciences, formed almost
the business of life. But it was not so with the wonder of his own and of
all succeeding generations—the “Admirable Crichton”; who, notwithstanding
the universality of his reputation, became almost equally eminent in each
particular study, as any of those who devoted all their powers to that
single pursuit.

James Crichton was born in 1561, in Scotland. The precise place of his
birth is uncertain, but he was the son of Robert Crichton of Eliock,
Lord Advocate of James VI. He was educated at St. Andrew’s. The chief
theatres of his attainments, however, were France and Italy. There
is not an accomplishment which he did not possess in its greatest
perfection—from the most abstruse departments of scholarship, philosophy,
and divinity, down to the mere physical gifts and graces of the musician,
the athlete, the swordsman, and the cavalier. His memory was a prodigy
both of quickness and of tenacity. He could repeat verbatim, after a
single hearing, the longest and most involved discourse.[166] Many
of the details which are told of him are doubtless exaggerated and
perhaps legendary; but Mr. Patrick Frazer Tytler[167] has shown that the
substance of his history, prodigious as it seems, is perfectly reliable.
As regards the particular subject of our present inquiry, one account
states that, when he was but sixteen years old, he spoke ten languages.
Another informs us that, at the age of twenty, the number of languages
of which he was master exactly equalled the number of his years. But the
most tangible data which we possess are drawn from his celebrated thesis
in the University of Paris, in which he undertook to dispute in any of
twelve languages—Hebrew, Syriac, Arabic, Greek, Latin, Spanish, Italian,
French, English, German, Flemish, and Slavonic. I am inclined to believe
that Crichton’s acquirements extended at least so far as this. It might
seem that a vague challenge to dispute in any one of a number of foreign
tongues was an empty and unsubstantial boast, and a mere exhibition of
vanity, perfectly safe from the danger of exposure. But it is clear
that Crichton’s challenge was not so unpractical as this. He not only
specified the languages of his challenge, but there is hardly one of
those that he selected which was not represented in the University of
Paris at the time, not only sufficiently to test the proficiency of the
daring disputant, but to secure his ignominious exposure, if there were
grounds to suspect him of charlatanism or imposture. Unhappily, however,
the promise of a youth so brilliant was cut short by an early death, in
1583, at the age of twenty-two years. Nor did Crichton leave behind him
any work by which posterity might test the reality of his acquirements,
except a few Latin verses printed by his friend, Aldus Manutius, on whose
generous patronage, with all his accomplishments, he had been dependent
for the means of subsistence during one of the most brilliant periods of
his career.

A few years Crichton’s senior in point of time, although, from the
precociousness of Crichton’s genius, his junior in reputation, was
Lancelot Andrews, Bishop of Winchester. He was born in London in 1555,
and, after a distinguished career in the university, rose, through a long
course of ecclesiastical preferments, to the see of Winchester. Beyond
the general praises of his scholarship in which all his biographers
indulge, few particulars are preserved respecting his attainments. Among
his contemporaries he was regarded as a prodigy. Wanley says[168] that
“some thought he might almost have served as interpreter-general at the
confusion of tongues;” and even the more prosaic Chalmers attributes to
him a profound knowledge of the “chief Oriental tongues, Greek, Latin,
and many modern languages.”[169]

John Gregory, who was born at Agmondesham in Buckinghamshire, in the year
1607, would probably have far surpassed Andrews as a linguist, had he
not been cut off prematurely before he had completed his thirtieth year.
He was a youth of unexampled industry and perseverance, devoting sixteen
hours of the twenty-four to his favourite studies. Even at the early age
at which he died he had mastered not only the Oriental and classical
languages, but also French, Italian, and Spanish, and, what was far more
remarkable in his day, his ancestral Anglo-Saxon. But he died in the very
blossom of his promise, in 1646.

These, however, must be regarded as exceptional cases. The study of
languages, it must be confessed, occupied at this period but little
of public attention in England. It holds a very subordinate place in
the great scheme of Bacon’s “Advancement of Learning.” In the model
Republic of his “New Atlantis” only four languages appear, “ancient
Hebrew, ancient Greek, good Latin of the School, and Spanish.”[170]
Gregory’s contemporaries, the brothers John and Thomas Greaves, though
both distinguished Persian and Arabic scholars, never made a name in
other languages. Notwithstanding the praise which Clarendon bestows on
Selden’s “stupendous learning in all kinds and _in all languages_,”[171]
it is certain that the range of his languages was very limited. So,
also, what Hallam says of Hugh Broughton as a man “deep in Jewish
erudition,”[172] must be understood rather of the literature than of the
languages of the East; and although Hugh Broughton’s namesake, Richard,
(one of the missionary priests in England in the beginning of the
seventeenth century, and an antiquarian of considerable merit, mentioned
by Dodd[173]) was a learned Hebraist, there is no evidence of his having
gone farther in these studies.

Indeed, strange as it may at first sight appear, the first epoch in
English history really prolific in eminent scholars is the stormy period
of the great Civil War. It is not a little remarkable that the most
creditable fruit of English scholarship, Walton’s Polyglot Bible, was
matured, if not brought to light, under the Republic.

The men who were engaged in this work, however, were, for the most part,
merely book-scholars. Edmund Castell, born at Halley, in Cambridgeshire,
in 1606, author of the Heptaglot Lexicon, which formed the companion or
supplement of Walton’s Bible, is admitted to have been one of the most
profound Orientalists of his day. This Lexicon comprises seven Oriental
languages, Hebrew, Chaldee, Samaritan, Syriac, Ethiopic, Arabic, and
Persian; and, if we add to these the classical languages, we shall
find Castell’s attainments to have been little inferior to those of
any linguist before his time; even without reckoning whatever modern
languages he may be supposed to have known. Castell, nevertheless, is one
of the most painful examples of neglected scholarship in all literary
history. Disraeli truly says that he more than devoted his life to his
Lexicon Heptaglotton.[174] His own Appeal to Charles the Second, if less
noble and dignified than Johnson’s celebrated preface to the Dictionary,
is yet one of the most touching documents on record. He laments the
“seventeen years during which he devoted sixteen or eighteen hours a day
to his labour. He declares that he had expended his whole inheritance
(above twelve thousand pounds), upon the work; and that he spent his
health and eyesight as well as his fortune, upon a thankless task.” The
copies of his Lexicon remained unsold upon his hands; and, out of the
whole five hundred copies which he left at his death, hardly one complete
copy escaped destruction by damp and vermin. “The whole load of learned
rags sold for seven pounds!”[175]

I cannot find that either Castell or his friend (though by no means his
equal as a linguist), Brian Walton possessed any remarkable faculty in
speaking even the languages with which they were most familiar.

Another of Walton’s associates in the compilation of the Polyglot, as
well as in other learned undertakings, Edward Pocock (born at Oxford in
1604,) appears to have given more attention to the accomplishment of
speaking foreign languages. In addition to Latin, Greek, French, and
probably Italian, he was well versed in Hebrew, Syriac, Ethiopic, and
Arabic. During a residence of six years at Aleppo, as British chaplain,
(1600-6), he had the advantage of receiving instructions from a native
doctor, in the language and literature of Arabia; and he engaged an Arab
servant for the sole purpose of enjoying the opportunity of speaking the
language.[176] In a second journey to the East, undertaken a few years
later, under the patronage of Laud, he extended his acquaintance with
these languages. Two of Pocock’s sons, Edward and Thomas, attained a
certain eminence in the same pursuit; but neither of them can be said to
have approached the fame of their father.

The mention of Arabian literature suggests the distinguished names of
Simon Ockley, the earliest English historian of Mahometanism, and of
George Sale, the first English translator of its sacred book. Both were
in their time Orientalists of high character; but both of them appear
to have applied chiefly to Arabic, Persian, and Turkish, rather than
to the Biblical languages. Both, too, may be cited among the examples
of unsuccessful scholarship. It was in a debtor’s prison at Cambridge
that Ockley found leisure for the completion of his great History of the
Saracens; and it is told of the learned translator of the Koran, that
too often, when he quitted his studies, he wanted a change of linen, and
frequently wandered in the streets in search of some compassionate friend
who might supply him with the meal of the day![177]

Another scholar of high repute at the same period, is Samuel Clarke. He
was born at Brackley, in Northamptonshire, in 1623, and was a student at
Merton College, Oxford, when the parliamentary commission undertook the
reform of the University. The general report of the period represents
him as a very profound and accomplished linguist; but the only direct
evidence which remains of the extent of his powers, is the fact that
he assisted Walton in the preparation of his Polyglot Bible, and also
Castell in the composition of his Heptaglot Lexicon. He died in 1669.

Early in the same century was born John Wilkins, another linguist of some
pretensions. Perhaps, however, he is better known by the efforts which
he made to recommend that ideal project for a Universal Language which
has occupied the thoughts of so many learned enthusiasts since his time,
than by his own positive and practical attainments; although he published
a Collection of Pater Nosters which possesses no inconsiderable
philological merit. He was born in 1614, at Fawsley, in Northamptonshire;
and at the early age of thirteen, he was admitted a scholar of Magdalen
College, Oxford, where he took his degree in 1634. In the contest
between the Crown and the Parliament, Wilkins became a warm partisan
of the latter. He was named Warden of Wadham College, Oxford, by the
parliamentary commission in 1648. Some years later, in 1656, he married
Robina, sister of the Protector, and widow of Peter French; the Protector
having granted him a dispensation from the statute which requires
celibacy, as one of the conditions of the tenure of his Wardenship. In
1659, Richard Cromwell promoted him to the Mastership of Trinity College,
Cambridge; from which, however, he was dispossessed at the Restoration.
But his reputation for scholarship, seemingly through the influence of
Buckingham,[178] outweighed his political demerits; and he was named
successively Dean of Ripon and Bishop of Chester, in which latter dignity
he died in 1670.

The unhappy deistical writer, John Toland, born in the County Donegal,
in Ireland, in 1669, was one of the most skilful linguists of his day.
His birth was probably illegitimate, and he was baptized by the strange
name of James Junius,[179] which the ridicule of his schoolfellows caused
him to change for that by which he is now known. During his early youth,
he was a member of the Catholic religion; but his daring and sceptical
mind early threw off the salutary restraints which that creed imposes,
although, like Gibbon, only to abandon Christianity itself in abandoning
Catholicity. His eventful and erratic career does not fall within the
scope of this notice, and I will only mention that in the singular
epitaph, which he composed for his own tomb, he speaks of himself as
“_linguarum plus decem sciens_.” In several of these ten languages, as
he states in his memorial to the Earl of Oxford,[180] he spoke and wrote
with as much fluency as in English. Toland died at Putney, in 1722.

From this period the same great blank occurs in the history of English
scholarship, which we have observed in almost all the contemporary
literatures of Europe. Still a few names may be gleaned from the general
obscurity.[181] It is true that what many persons may deem the most
notable publication of the time, Chamberlayne’s Collection of Pater
Nosters, (1715), was rather a literary curiosity than a work of genuine
scholarship. But there are other higher, though less known, names.

The once notorious “Orator Henley,” whom the Dunciad has immortalized as
the

    “Preacher at once, and Zany of his age,”

was unquestionably a linguist of great acquirements. His “Complete
Linguist,” consisting of grammars of ten languages, was published when
he was but twenty-five years old; and throughout his entire career,
eccentric as it was, he appears to have persevered in the same studies.
John Henley was born at Melton Mowbray, in 1692, and graduated in the
University of Cambridge. He took orders, and obtained some notoriety as a
preacher; but his great theatre of display was his so-called “Oratory,”
where he delivered orations or lectures on a variety of topics,
religious, political, humorous, and even profane. It was on one of these
occasions that he drew together a large congregation of shoemakers, by
the promise of showing them “the best, newest, and most expeditious way
of making shoes,” which he proceeded to illustrate by holding out a boot
and _cutting off the leg part_! Henley died in 1756.[182]

What Henley was in the learned languages, the distinguished statesman
Lord Carteret, afterwards Earl of Granville, was in the modern. With all
his brilliant qualities as a debater, and all his great capacity for
public affairs, Carteret combined the learning and the accomplishments of
a finished scholar. Swift said of him that “he carried away from Oxford
more Greek, Latin, and philosophy, than became a person of his rank.” He
spoke and wrote French, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese, German, and even
Swedish; and one of the first causes of the jealousy with which Walpole
regarded him, was the volubility with which he was able to hold converse
in German with their common master, George the First.

But Henley and Carteret stand almost alone among the English scholars of
the early half of the seventeenth century; and the first steady impulse
which the study of languages received in England, may be chiefly traced
to the attractions of the honourable and emolumentary service of the
East India Company. What the diplomatic ambition of France in the Levant
effected among the scholars of that country, the commercial enterprise
of the merchant princess of England achieved in her Indian territory;
and the splendid rewards held out to practical Oriental scholarship,
gave an impulse to the study of Eastern languages on a more liberal
and comprehensive scale.[183] It is in great part to this, that we are
indebted for the splendid successes of Sir William Jones, of Marsden, of
Colebrooke, of Craufurd, of Lumsden, of Leyden, and still more recently,
of Colonel Vans Kennedy.

The first of these, William Jones, was the son of a school-master,
and was born in London, in 1741. He was educated at Harrow, where
he exhibited an early taste for languages,[184] and was especially
distinguished in Greek and Latin metrical composition. In 1764, he
entered the University of Oxford, where he learned Arabic from a Syrian
whose acquaintance he chanced to form. To this he soon after added
Persian; and in 1770, he performed the very unusual feat of translating
the history of Nadir Shah into French. In the following year he
published his Persian Grammar, which took the general public as much by
surprise, by the beauty and eloquence of the poetical translations which
accompanied the copious examples that illustrated it, as it excited the
admiration of scholars by the simplicity and practical good sense of its
technical details. He soon afterwards applied himself to the language
and literature of China; which, however, he never made a profound study,
as about this time (1770), feeling the precariousness of a purely
literary profession, he took steps to have himself called to the English
bar, and for the following twelve years devoted himself with all his
characteristic energy, and with marked success, to its laborious and
engrossing duties. During the same period he endeavoured unsuccessfully
to obtain a seat in Parliament; but in 1783, he accepted the appointment
of Judge in the supreme court at Calcutta, and repaired to India in
the same year. His attention to the duties of his office, is said to
have been most earnest and exemplary. But, in the intervals of duty, he
travelled over a great part of India; mixed eagerly in native society;
and had acquired a familiarity with the history, antiquities, religions,
science, and laws of India, such as had never before been attained by
any European scholar, when, unhappily for the science to which he was
so thoroughly devoted, he was cut off prematurely in the year 1794, at
the early age of forty-seven. During a life thus laborious, and in great
part spent in pursuits utterly uncongenial with linguistic studies, Sir
William Jones had nevertheless amassed a store of languages which had
seldom, perhaps never, been equalled before his time. Fortunately too,
unlike most of the linguists whom we have been enumerating, he himself
left an autograph record of these studies, which Lord Teignmouth has
preserved in his interesting Biography. In this paper, he describes the
total number of languages with which he was in any degree acquainted to
have been twenty-eight; but he further distributes these into classes
according to the degree of his familiarity with each. From this curious
memorandum, it appears that he had studied critically _eight_ languages,
viz:—English, Latin, French, Italian, Greek, Arabic, Persian, Sanscrit;
_eight_ others he had studied less perfectly, but all were intelligible
to him with the aid of a Dictionary, viz:—Spanish, Portuguese, German,
Runick, Hebrew, Bengali, Hindi, Turkish; _twelve_ others, in fine, he
had studied least perfectly; but he considered all these attainable;
namely Tibetan, Pali, Palavi, Deri, Russian, Syriac, Ethiopic, Coptic,
Welsh, Swedish, Dutch, and Chinese.[185]

Now, as Lord Teignmouth[186] describes him as perfectly familiar
with Spanish, Portuguese, and German, three languages which he has
himself placed on the list of languages, “less critically studied, but
intelligible with the aid of a dictionary,” it may fairly be believed
that this estimate is, to say the least, a sufficiently modest one; and
that his acquaintance even with the languages of the third class was by
no means superficial, we may infer from another memorandum preserved by
Lord Teignmouth from which we find that he had studied the grammars of
two at least of the number, namely: Russian and Welsh. His biographer,
however, unfortunately enters into no details as to his power of speaking
languages; but he is said by the writer of the notice in the _Biographie
Universelle_ to have spoken eight languages as perfectly as his native
English.

In contrast with successes so brilliant as these, the comparatively
humble career of the other British Orientalists named in conjunction with
Sir William Jones, will appear tame and uninteresting. William Marsden
was born in Dublin, 1754; and, after having completed the ordinary
classical studies, was sent out to Bencoolen in the island of Sumatra, at
the early age of sixteen. The extraordinary facility which he exhibited
for acquiring the Malay languages led to his rapid advancement. He was
named first under-secretary, and afterwards chief secretary of the
Island; and, before his return in 1779, he had accumulated the materials
for the exceedingly valuable work on Sumatra which he published in 1782.
Marsden held several important appointments after his return,[187] and
he employed every interval of his official duties in literary pursuits.
He was a thorough master of Sanscrit, and all its kindred languages;
but he must be described, nevertheless, rather as a book-learned, than
a practical linguist. His Essay on the Polynesian or East Insular
languages, tracing their connexion with each other, and their common
relations with Sanscrit, is still a standard source of information on
this interesting ethnological question.

Henry Thomas Colebrooke,[188] well known by his numerous contributions
to Oriental literature, especially in the Asiatic Journal, was also an
official of the East India Company, whose employment he entered, while
still very young, as a civil servant. Colebrooke was well versed, not
only in the Indian languages, but also in those of the Hebrew and cognate
races; and his early education in France gave him a greater familiarity
with French and other modern tongues than is often found to accompany the
more profound linguistic studies.

Matthew Lumsden was born in Aberdeenshire in 1777, and went as a mere
boy to India, where his brother had an appointment in the service of the
Company. Lumsden’s knowledge of Hindostani and of Persian led to his
being employed first as translator in the criminal court, and afterwards
as professor in Fortwilliam College, where he remained till 1820. His
skill in Persian and Arabic is attested by several publications upon
both, chiefly elementary; but he can hardly be classed with the higher
Orientalists, much less with linguists of more universal pretensions.

Lord Cockburn, in the lively section of his amusing “Memorials of his
Own Time” which he devotes to the singular and unsteady career of John
Leyden, says that M’Intosh, to whom “his wild friend” was clearly a
source of great amusement, used to laugh at the affected modesty with
which Leyden “professed to know _but seventy_ languages.”[189] It is
plain that M’Intosh considered this an extreme exaggeration; but there
can be no doubt, nevertheless, that Leyden was a very extraordinary
linguist. This strange man, whose name will perhaps be remembered by
the frequent allusions to it in the early correspondence of Sir Walter
Scott, was born of a very humble family at Denholm in 1775. Though his
education was of the very lowest order, yet Scott relates that “before he
had attained his nineteenth year, he confounded the doctors of Edinburgh
by the portentous mass of his acquisitions in almost every department of
knowledge.”[190] Having failed very signally in the clerical profession,
to which he was brought up by his parents, he embraced that of medicine;
and, after undergoing a more than ordinary share of the privations
and vicissitudes of literary life such as it then existed, he went to
Madras in 1803 in the capacity of assistant surgeon in the East India
Company’s service. The adoption of this career decided the course of his
after studies. He had learned, while yet a mere youth, preparing for the
university, Hebrew and Arabic. He afterwards extended his researches
into all the chief languages of the East, Sanscrit, Hindustani, and
many other minor varieties of the Indian tongues. He was also thorough
master of Persian. His career as Professor of Hindustani at Calcutta
was more successful than that of any European scholar since Sir William
Jones. Having also studied the Malay language, from which he made
several translations, he was induced to accompany Lord Minto on the Java
expedition in 1811, where he was cut off after a short illness in the
same year, too soon, unhappily, to allow of his turning to full account
the important materials which he had collected for the comparative study
of the Indo-Chinese languages.

The well-known evangelical commentator, Dr. Adam Clarke, born in 1760,
of very humble parentage, at Magherafelt, in the County of Londonderry,
in the north of Ireland, and for a long course of years the most
distinguished preacher of the Methodist communion, enjoyed a high
reputation among his followers as a linguist; but his studies had been
confined almost entirely to the Biblical languages. The same may be said
of the Rev. Dr. Barrett, vice-provost of Trinity College, Dublin, who is
known to Biblical students as the editor of the Palimpsest MS. of the
Gospels, and of the celebrated Codex Montfortianus.

But there is more of curious interest in the career of a very
extraordinary individual, Richard Roberts Jones, of Aberdarvan, in
Carnarvonshire, who, if not for the extent of his attainments, at least
for the exceedingly unfavourable circumstances under which they were
acquired, deserves a place among examples of the “pursuit of knowledge
under difficulties.” A privately printed memoir of this singular
character, by Mr. Roscoe, who took much interest in him, and exerted
himself warmly in his behalf, contains several most curious particulars
regarding his studies and acquirements, as well as his personal habits
and appearance. Mr. Roscoe first met him in 1806, and described him to
Dr. Parr as “a poor Welsh fisher-lad, as ragged as a colt, and as uncouth
as any being that has a semblance of humanity. But beneath such an
exterior,” he adds, “is a mind cultivated, not only beyond all reasonable
expectation, but beyond all probable conception. In his fishing boat on
the coast of Wales, at an age little more than twenty, he has acquired
Greek, Hebrew, and Latin; has read the Iliad, Hesiod, Theocritus,
&c.; studied the refinements of Greek pronunciation; and examined the
connection of that language with Hebrew.” An attempt was made to raise
him to a position more befitting his acquirements. But his habits were
of the rudest and most uncleanly. “He loved to lie on his back in the
bottom of a ditch. His uncouth appearance, solitary habits, and perhaps
weak intellect, made him an object of ridicule and persecution to the
children of the district; and, he often _carried an iron pot on his
head_ to screen him from the stones and clods which they threw at him.
He wore a large filthy wrapper, in the pockets and folds of which he
stowed his library; and his face, covered with hair, gave him a strangely
uncouth appearance; although the mild and abstracted expression of his
features took from it much of its otherwise repulsive character.” Mr.
Roscoe gives a very curious account of an interview between Dr. Parr and
this strange genius, in 1815, in the course of which Jones “exhibited a
familiarity with French, Italian, Latin, Greek, Hebrew, and Chaldee.”
He described too, for Dr. Parr, his mode of acquiring a new language,
which consisted in carefully examining its vocabulary, ascertaining
what words in it corresponded with those of any language which he had
previously learned, and _having struck such words out of the vocabulary_,
proceeding to impress the _remaining_ words upon his memory, as being
the only ones which were peculiar to the new language which he sought to
acquire. It may easily be believed that Jones’s irreclaimably uncouth and
eccentric habits defeated the efforts made by his friends to place him
in a condition more befitting his acquirements. Clothes with which their
thoughtfulness might replace his habitual rags, in a few days were sure
to present the same filthy and dilapidated appearance. When a bed was
provided for him, he chose to sleep not _upon_, but _under_ it; and all
his habits bespoke at once weakness of mind and indisposition, or perhaps
incapacity, to accommodate himself to the ordinary usages of other men.

Dr. Thomas Young, although his fame must rest chiefly upon his brilliant
philosophical discoveries, (especially in the Theory of Light), and on
his success in deciphering and systematizing the hieroglyphical writing
of the Egyptians, as exhibited in the inscriptions of the Rosetta Stone
and in the funereal papyri, cannot be passed over in a history of
eminent British linguists. Young was born at Milverton in Somersetshire,
in 1773. His mind was remarkably precocious. He had read the whole
Bible twice through, besides other books, before he was four years
old. In his seventh year he learnt Latin; and before he left school
in his thirteenth year, he added to this Greek, French, and Italian.
Soon after his return from school, he mastered Hebrew, Chaldee, Syriac,
and Persian; and, in all those languages, as well as in his own, his
reading (of which his journals have preserved a most minute and accurate
record), was so various and so vast, as almost to exceed belief. Having
embraced the medical profession, he passed two years in different German
Universities, during which time he not only extended his knowledge of
learned languages, but also became perfect master of German;—not to speak
of various other acquisitions, some of them of a class which are seldom
found to accompany scholastic eminence, such as riding two horses at
the same time, walking or dancing on the tight rope, and various other
feats of harlequinade! Of his skill in the ancient Egyptian language, as
well as its more modern forms, in which he rivalled, and as his English
biographer, Dr. Peacock, seeks to show,[191] surpassed, Champollion and
Lepsius, it is unnecessary to speak: and it is highly probable that,
having learned Italian while a mere youth,[192] he also made himself
acquainted with Spanish, and perhaps Portuguese.

Dr. Pritchard, who may be regarded as the founder of the English
school of ethnography, can hardly, notwithstanding, be strictly called
a linguist. If we except the Celtic languages, and Greek, Latin, and
German, most of his learning regarding the rest is taken at second-hand
from Adelung and others. Nevertheless, the linguistic section of his
“Researches into the Physical History of Mankind,” is a work of very
great value. M. Bunsen pronounces it “the best of its kind; infinitely
superior, as a whole, to Adelung’s _Mithridates_”;[193] and Cardinal
Wiseman, in his masterly lecture “On the Natural History of the Human
race,” not only gives Pritchard the credit of being “almost the first who
attempted to connect ethnography with philology,” but even goes so far
as to say that it will henceforth “be difficult for any one to treat of
this theme without being indebted to Dr. Pritchard for a great portion of
his materials.”[194]

Of the school of living British linguists I shall not be expected to
speak at much length; but there are a few names so familiar to the
scholars of every country that it would be unpardonable to pass them over
entirely without notice.

The work just quoted, from the very time of its publication in 1836,
established the reputation of Dr. (now Cardinal) Wiseman, still a very
young writer, as a philologist of the first rank. His latest writings
show that, through all the engrossing duties in which he has since been
engaged, he has continued to cultivate the science of philology.[195]
The Cardinal is, moreover, a most accomplished linguist. Besides the
ordinary learned languages, he is master not only of Hebrew and Chaldee,
but also of Syriac (of his scholarship in which his _Horæ Syriacæ_ is
a most honourable testimony), Arabic, Persian, and Sanscrit. In modern
languages he has few superiors. He speaks with fluency and elegance
French, Italian, German, Spanish, and Portuguese; and in most of these
languages he has frequently preached or lectured extempore, or with
little preparation.

The interesting discoveries of Colonel Rawlinson and of Dr. Hincks, and
Dr. Cureton’s very important Syriac publications, have associated their
names with the linguistic as well as the antiquarian memories of this
age. Nor are there many English Orientalists whose foreign reputation is
so high as that of Mr. Lane. But I am unable to speak of the attainments
of any of these gentlemen in the other families of language.

By far the most noticeable names in the list of living linguists of
British race are those of Sir John Bowring, now Governor at Hong-Kong,
Professor Lee of Cambridge, and the American ex-blacksmith, Elihu
Burritt. All three, beyond their several degrees of personal merit,
possess a common claim to admiration, as being almost entirely
self-educated. John (now Sir John) Bowring, as I learn from a Memoir
published about three years since,[196] before he had attained his
eighteenth year, had learned Latin, French, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese,
German, and Dutch. He is said to have since added to his store almost
every language of Europe;—Russian, Servian, Bohemian, Polish, Hungarian,
Slovakian, Swedish, Danish, Icelandic, Lettish, Finnish, and even Basque;
and he is further described as familiar with all the provincial varieties
of each; for instance, of the various offshoots of German, and of the
several dialects of Spanish which prevail in Catalonia, Valencia and
Galicia. Dr. Bowring’s later career brought him into familiarity with
Arabic and Turkish; and his still more recent successes in China and in
Siam and its dependencies are equally remarkable. It is not so easy to
offer an opinion as to the degree of Sir John Bowring’s acquaintance with
each of the languages which are ascribed to him. His interesting poetical
translations from Russian, Servian, Bohemian, and other languages of
Europe, are rather a test of elegant literary tastes than of exact
linguistic attainments; nor am I aware to what more direct ordeal his
various attainments have been subjected. It were to be wished that the
Memoir from which these particulars are derived had entered more into
detail upon this part of the subject. But, even making every allowance
for possible exaggeration, it seems impossible to doubt the claim of Sir
John Bowring to a place in the very highest rank of modern linguists.

Dr. Samuel Lee is perhaps even a still more extraordinary example of
self-education. He was born in the very humblest rank in the village
of Longnor in Shropshire, and, after having spent a short time in the
poor-school of his native village, commenced life as a carpenter’s
apprentice, when he was but twelve years old. In the few intervals of
leisure which this laborious occupation permitted, Mr. Jerdan states[197]
that, without the least assistance from masters, he taught himself Latin,
Greek, Hebrew, and Chaldee; having contrived, from the hoardings of
his scanty wages, to procure a few elementary books in these and other
languages. On his marriage, however, he was forced to sell the little
library which he had accumulated, in order to provide for the new wants
with which he found himself encompassed: and for a time his struggle
after learning was suspended; but his extraordinary attainments having
begun to attract notice, he was relieved from the uncongenial occupation
which he had hitherto followed, and appointed master of a school at
Shrewsbury. In the more favourable position which he had thus obtained,
he soon extended his reading to Arabic, Persian, and Hindustani. In 1813
he entered Trinity College, Cambridge, where it is worthy of note that
he distinguished himself no less in science than in languages, and took
his degree with much credit. He was afterwards appointed superintendent
of the Oriental press of the British and Foreign Bible Society, for which
body he has not only edited the Arabic, Persian, Coptic, Hindustani,
Malay, and other versions of the Bible, but has also translated, or
superintended the translation, of many tracts in these various languages.
When Mr. Wheaton, an American traveller, (brother of the well-known
American jurist of that name) visited Professor Lee, he found him
acquainted with no less than “sixteen languages, in most of which he
was able to write.”[198] Neither this writer, however, nor Mr. Jerdan,
informs us as to the extent of Dr. Lee’s attainments in speaking foreign
languages.

The list of linguists of the British race may be closed not unworthily
with the still more remarkable name of Elihu Burritt, who, though born
in America (in 1811,) is descended of an English family, settled in
Connecticut for the last two centuries. The circumstances of Burritt’s
father, who was a shoemaker, were so narrow, that the education of
Elihu, the youngest of five sons, was entirely neglected. When his
father died, Elihu, then above fifteen years old, had spent but three
months at school; and, being altogether dependent on his own exertions
for support, he was obliged to bind himself as an apprentice to the
trade of blacksmith. Fortunately, however, an elder brother who was
a schoolmaster, settled in the same town before the term of Elihu’s
apprenticeship expired; and as the latter had carefully devoted each
spare moment of his laborious life to reading every book that came within
his reach, he gladly availed himself, as soon as he became his own
master, of his brother’s offer to take him as a pupil for half a year,
which was all the time he could hope to spare from his craft. During that
time, brief as it was, Elihu “became well versed in mathematics, went
through Virgil in the original, and read several French books.” Having
thus laid the foundation, he returned to his trade, resolved to labour
till he should have acquired the means of completing the work; and, in
the strong passion for knowledge which devoured him, he actually engaged
himself to do the work of two men, in order that, by receiving double
wages, he might more quickly realize the desired independence. Yet, even
while he was thus doubly tasked, and while his daily hours of labour were
no less than fourteen, he contrived to give some time in the mornings and
evenings to Latin, French, and Spanish; and he actually procured a small
“Greek grammar, which would just _lie in the crown of his hat_, and used
to carry it with him to read during his work—the casting of brass cow
bells, a task which required no small amount of attention!”

With the little store which he thus toilfully accumulated, he betook
himself to New Haven, the seat of Yale College, although without a hope
of being able to avail himself of its literary advantages. Here too he
worked almost unaided. He took lodgings at an inn frequented by the
students, though too poor to enter the university; and in the course of
a few months, by unremitting study, he read through the whole Iliad in
Greek, and had made considerable progress in Italian and German, besides
extending his knowledge of Spanish and French. Having obtained, soon
afterwards, a commercial appointment, he was partially released, for a
space, from the mechanical drudgery in which he was so long engaged; and,
as he was thus enabled to devote a little more time to his favourite
studies, he contrived to learn Hebrew, and made his first advance towards
a regular course of Oriental reading. But this interval of rest was a
brief one; after a very mortifying failure, he was at last compelled to
return once more to the anvil, as his only sure resource against poverty.
Still, nevertheless, he toiled on in his enthusiastic struggle for
knowledge. Even while engaged in this painful drudgery, “every moment,”
says Mrs. Howitt,[199] “which he could steal out of the four-and-twenty
hours was devoted to study; he rose early in the winter mornings, and,
while the mistress of the house was preparing breakfast by lamplight,
he would stand by the mantel-piece, with his Hebrew Bible on the shelf,
and his lexicon in his hand, thus studying while he ate; the same method
was pursued at the other meals; mental and bodily food being taken in
together. This severe labour of mind, as might be expected, produced
serious effects on his health; he suffered much from headaches, the
characteristic remedy for which were two or three additional hours of
hard forging, and a little less study.”

An extract from his own weekly Diary, which Mrs. Howitt has preserved,
tells the story of his struggle still more touchingly:—“_Monday_, June
18, headache; forty pages Cuvier’s Theory of the Earth, sixty-four pages
French, eleven hours forging. _Tuesday_, sixty-five lines of Hebrew,
thirty pages of French, ten pages Cuvier’s Theory, eight lines Syriac,
ten ditto Danish, ten ditto Bohemian, nine ditto Polish, fifteen names of
stars, ten hours forging. _Wednesday_, twenty-five lines Hebrew, fifty
pages of astronomy, eleven hours forging. _Thursday_, fifty-five lines
Hebrew, eight ditto Syriac, eleven hours forging. _Friday_, unwell;
twelve hours forging. _Saturday_, unwell; fifty pages Natural Philosophy,
ten hours forging. _Sunday_, lesson for Bible class.”

Through these and many similar difficulties, has this extraordinary man
found his way to eminence. Without attempting to chronicle the stages
of his progress, it will be enough to state that a writer of last year
describes him as at present acquainted with eighteen languages, besides
his native English, viz:—Latin, Greek, Hebrew, Syriac, Samaritan, Arabic,
Turkish, Persian, Ethiopic, Italian, French, Spanish, German, Danish,
Irelandic, Esthonian, Bohemian, and Polish.[200] He is author of several
works, and was for some time Editor of a Journal entitled “The Christian
Citizen.”

As in the case of Dr. Lee, no attempt is made, in either of the
biographies of Burritt which I have consulted, to define with exactness
the degree of his knowledge of each among the various languages which he
has learned; but if his proficiency in them be at all considerable, his
position among linguists must be admitted to be of the very highest; and
as he is still only in his forty-sixth year, it would be difficult to
predict what may be the limit of his future successes.


§ VII. LINGUISTS OF THE SLAVONIC RACE.

The extraordinary capacity of the Slavonic races for the acquisition of
foreign languages, has long been a subject of observation and of wonder.
In every educated foreign circle Russians and Poles may be met, whom it
is impossible to distinguish, by their language, or even by their accent,
from the natives of the country: and this accomplishment is frequently
found to embrace the entire range of the polite languages of Europe. In
the higher native Russian society, it is rare to meet one who does not
speak several languages, besides his own. Every candidate for public
office in Russia, especially in connexion with foreign affairs, must be
master of at least four languages, French, German, English, and Italian;
and in the Eastern governments of the empire, are constantly to be found
employés, who, to the ordinary stock of European languages, add an equal
number of the dialects of the Asiatic races subject to the Czar.

In most cases, however, this facility in the use of foreign languages
enjoyed by the natives of Russia and Poland, is chiefly conversational,
and acquired rather by practice than by study; and, among the numbers
who, during the last three centuries, must be presumed to have possessed
this gift in an eminent degree, very few appear to have acquired a
permanent reputation as scholars in the higher sense of the name.

Unfortunately, too, even were it otherwise, the materials for a history
of Russian linguists are extremely scanty. Not one of those who have
written upon Slavonic Literature, appears to have adverted to this
as a distinct branch of scholarship; Slavonic scholars, too, have
met but imperfect justice from the writers on general biography; and
thus, especially for one to whom the native sources of information are
inaccessible, the rare allusions which can be gleaned from the general
history of Slavonic literature supply but an uncertain and imperfect
guide,[201] even did opportunities present themselves for pursuing the
inquiry.

It would be unpardonable, nevertheless, to pass the subject over in
silence; and I can only renew in especial reference to this part of the
memoir, the claim for indulgence with which I entered upon this Essay.

       *       *       *       *       *

Christianity, and with it the first seeds of civilization, reached
Russia from Constantinople; and it is not unlikely that the friendly and
frequent intercourse which subsisted between the two courts under the
first Christian Dukes of Muscovy, Vladimir and Jaroslav, may have led to
a considerable interchange of language between the members of the two
nations. The many foreign alliances, too, with Constantinople, Germany,
Hungary, France, England, Norway, and Poland, which were formed by
the children of Jaroslav, may, perhaps, have tended to familiarize his
subjects, or at least his court, with some of the languages of Southern
and Western Europe. But no record of this—the one bright period in early
Russian history—has been preserved, from which any particulars can be
gleaned.

The division of Jaroslav’s dominions between his sons at his death, (in
1054,) plunged the Russian nation into a series of civil wars and into
the barbarism to which such wars lead, from which it did not begin to
emerge till the sixteenth century; and, although a few translations
(chiefly theological), from Greek and Latin, were made during this
period, yet, from the interruption of all intercourse with foreign
countries, it may be presumed that (with the exception, perhaps, of a
few enterprising individuals, like the merchant Nikitin,[202] who, in
the fifteenth century, traversed the entire East, and penetrated as far
as Tibet,) the natives of an empire so completely isolated concerned
themselves little about any language beyond their own.

Macarius, who was Metropolitan of Moscow in the middle of the sixteenth
century, did something to promote the introduction of foreign letters
into Russia,[203] and many translations, not only from the Greek and
Latin fathers, but also from the classical writers, were made under
his direction. A still greater impulse must have been given to this
particular branch of study by the new policy introduced by the Czar Boris
Feodorowitsch Godounoff, who not only invited learned foreigners to his
court, but sent eighteen young nobles of Russia to foreign countries to
study their arts, their literature and their languages.[204]

The results of this more liberal policy, however, had hardly begun to
be felt, when the troubles which followed the well-known revolution of
Demetrius the Impostor, revived for a time the worst forms of barbarism
in the Empire.

The elevation (in 1613,) of the family of Romanoff to the throne, in
the person of the Czar Michael, by restoring a more settled government,
contributed to advance the cause of letters. The monk Beründa Pameva,
published about this time a Slavo-Russian Lexicon, which exhibits in its
etymologies an acquaintance with Latin, Greek, and Hebrew.[205]

A school was founded at Moscow by the priest-monk Arsenius, for the
study of Greek and Latin, in 1643, one of the scholars of which,
Theodore Rtischtscheff, founded a society for translating works from
foreign languages in 1649; and another school of still more wide-spread
influence was opened in the Monastery of Saikonosspassk, in 1682. It is
worthy of remark, nevertheless, that the first Russian grammar, that of
Ludolf,[206] was printed, not at any native press, but in the University
of Oxford.

One of the members of the Translation Society alluded to above, the
monk Epiphanius Slawinezki, appears to have been regarded by his
contemporaries as a linguist of notable attainments. He published
a Greek, Latin, and Slavonic Dictionary, and commenced a Slavonic
translation of the Bible from the original Greek, which was cut short
by his death in 1676; but there is no reason to believe that he was
acquainted with any of the Oriental languages; and the inference to be
drawn from the reputation which he enjoyed on so slight a foundation, is
far from creditable to the linguistic attainments of his time.

It is only from the reign of Peter the Great that the history of
this, as of all other branches of Russian enlightenment, may be
properly said to commence. Independently of the encouragement which
Peter held out to foreign talent to devote itself to his service, the
grand and comprehensive scheme of the academy which he planned under
the direction of Leibnitz, contained a special provision for the
department of languages.[207] And although it was not formally opened
until after Peter’s death, by the Empress Catherine I. (1725), the
influence of the policy in which it originated, had made itself felt
long before. The Czar’s favourite, Mentschikoff, who from an obscure
origin (1674-1729) built up the fortunes of what is now one of the
greatest houses of Russia, was master of eight languages, most of which
he spoke with perfect fluency. Demetrius Kantemir, (1673-1723), father
of the celebrated poet of that name, deserves also to be noticed. He
was descended of a Turkish family, and held the office of Hospodar of
Moldavia; but he prized his literary reputation more than his rank. He
appears to have been a scholar in the highest sense of the name, and
was familiarly acquainted, not only with the living languages which
are so easily acquired by his countrymen, but with several of the
learned languages, both of the East and the West.[208] The poet, his
son Antiochus Demetrjewitsch, is also described as “master of several
languages, ancient and modern.”[209] The same may be inferred regarding
the great traveller, Basilius Gregorowitsch Barskj, who was born at
Kiew, in 1702. He must necessarily have acquired, during his long and
adventurous wanderings in Europe and the East, a familiarity with many
of the languages of the various countries through which he journeyed,
although he was prevented from turning it to account upon his return to
Russia by his premature death in 1747.[210]

Basilius Nikititsch Tatisscheff, one of the youths sent abroad by Peter
the Great, for the purpose of studying in the foreign universities,
enjoyed a considerable reputation as a linguist.[211] The History of
Russia which he compiled, supposes a familiarity with several Asiatic,
as well as European languages; but, as it is not improbable that part
of the materials which he employed in this history were translated
for his use by assistants engaged for the purpose, it may be doubted
whether this can be assumed as a fair test of his own capabilities. The
linguistic attainments of the celebrated poet Lemonossoff,[212] although
considerable, form his least solid title to fame. His history is so
full of interest, that its incidents, almost utterly unvarnished, have
supplied the narrative of one of the most popular of modern Russian
novels. Born (1711) in a rude fisher’s hut in the wretched village
of Denissowka on the shore of the Frozen Ocean, he rose by his own
unassisted genius not only to high eminence in science, but to the
very first rank in the literature of his native country, of which he
may truly be described as the founder; and, although he does not seem
to have made languages a special study, he deserves to be noticed even
in this department. He was perfect master of Greek, Latin, French,
and German; and possessed with other ancient and modern languages, an
acquaintance sufficient for all the purposes of study. The attainments
of his contemporary, Basilius Petrowitsch Petroff, (1736) were
perhaps more profound. He was a scholar of the celebrated convent of
Saikonosspassk; and having attracted notice by an ode which he composed
for the coronation of the Empress Catherine, he was employed, through the
influence of Potemkin, at the English and several other European courts.
Through the opportunities which he thus enjoyed, he became one of the
best linguists of his day, and we may form an estimate of his zeal and
perseverance from the circumstance of his having learned Romaic after his
sixtieth year.[213] Gabriel, Archbishop of St. Petersburg, (1775-1801)
and one of the most distinguished pulpit orators of Russia, is also
mentioned as a very remarkable linguist.[214] His success, however, lay
chiefly in modern languages.

The most eminent scholars engaged in the philological and ethnological
investigations undertaken by the Empress Catherine II. were foreigners;
as, for example, Pallas, and Bakmeister. Some, however, were native
Russians, but few details are preserved regarding them. Of Sujeff, who
accompanied Pallas in the expedition to Tartary and China, and who
translated the journals of the expedition into Russian,[215] I have not
been able to obtain any particulars. I have been equally unsuccessful
as to the history of Theodore Mirievo de Jankiewitsch, the compiler of
the alphabetical Digest of Pallas’s Comparative Vocabulary, described in
a former page; but it can scarcely be doubted, from the very nature of
his task, that he must have been a man of no ordinary acquirements as a
linguist, at least as regards the vocabularies of language.

During the present century a good deal has been done in Russia for
the cultivation of particular families of languages. The “Lazareff
Institute,” founded at Moscow in 1813,[216] by an Armenian family from
which it takes its name, comprehends in its truly munificent scheme
of education not only the Armenian, Georgian, and Tartar languages,
but also the several members of the Caucasian family.[217] An Oriental
Institute[218] on a somewhat similar plan was established at St.
Petersburg in 1823. Another was opened at the still more favourable
centre of languages, Odessa, in 1829; and a fourth, yet more recently,
at Kazan, the meeting point of the two great classes of languages
which practically divide between them the entire Russian Empire.[219]
Individual scholars, too, have taken to themselves particular branches
of the study, some of them with very remarkable success. Timkoffsky, the
well-known missionary in China,[220] and Hyacinth Bitchourin, who was
head of the Pekin Russian Mission from 1808 to 1812, have contributed to
popularize the study of Chinese.[221] Igumnoff of Irkutsch published a
useful dictionary of the Mongol: Giganoff, and more recently Volkoff, a
dictionary of the Tartar languages; of which Mirza Kazem-Beg, professor
of the Turkish and Tartar languages at St. Petersburg, has compiled an
excellent grammar. The same service has been rendered to the language
of Georgia and its several dialects by David Tchubinoff.[222] The
numerous philological writings of Goulianoff, too, and, more lately,
Prince Alexander Handjeri’s _Dictionnaire Français, Arabe, Persan, et
Turc_,[223] have established a European reputation.

The present Prefect Apostolic of the Arctic Missions, who is a convert
from the Russian Church, is said to be a very extraordinary linguist.
Even before he entered upon his missionary charge, in which, of course,
the circle of his languages is much enlarged, he habitually heard
confessions, at Paris, in six languages.

Perhaps also it may be permitted to enumerate among Russian linguists
three eminent literary men who have long been resident at St. Petersburg,
and who, although not natives of Russia, may now be regarded as
naturalised subjects of the Empire—Senkowsky, Gretsch and Mirza Kazem-Beg.

The first is by birth a Pole;[224] but having early attained to much
eminence as an Orientalist, and having travelled with some reputation as
an explorer in Syria and Egypt, he obtained the Professorship of Oriental
languages in the university of St. Petersburg, in which he has since
distinguished himself by an important controversy with the celebrated
Von Hammer. Senkowsky, since his residence in St. Petersburg, has made
the Russian language his own, and is one of the most prolific writers
in the entire range of modern Russian literature. His grammar of that
language is among the most intelligible to foreigners that has ever been
issued. With most of the languages of Europe, he is said to be perfectly
familiar, and his attainments as an Orientalist are of the very highest
rank. He is a corresponding member of the Asiatic Societies of most of
the capitals of Europe, and publishes indifferently in Polish, Russian,
German, and French.

Gretsch, the editor of the well-known St. Petersburg Journal, “The
Northern Bee,” is perhaps less profound, but equally varied in his
attainments. Although a German by birth, he writes exclusively in
Russian, and is the author of the best and most popular extant history
of Russian literature; of which Otto’s _Lehrbuch der Russischen
Literatur_, although apparently an independent work, is almost a literal
translation.[225]

Mirza Kazem-Beg is of the Tartar race, but a native of Astracan, where
his father, a man of much reputation for learning, had settled about
the commencement of the century. Soon after the establishment of the
professorship of the Turkish and Tartar languages at Kazan, Kazem-Beg was
selected to fill it; and, after some time, he was removed to the same
chair in the University of Petersburg, which he still holds. Besides the
ordinary learned languages, he is acquainted with the Hebrew, Chaldee,
Arabic, Syrian, Persian, and Turkish, as well as those of the Tartar
stock; and he is described as perfect master of the modern European
languages, especially French, Italian, German, and English. The last
named language he speaks and writes with great ease and elegance, and
has even published some translations into it, as, for example, the
“Derbend-Nâmeh.”[226]

       *       *       *       *       *

The reputation of the Poles as linguists is equally high. So far back
as the election of Henry de Valois, Choisnin, who accompanied Henry
to Poland, says that of the two hundred Polish nobles who were then
assembled, there were hardly two who did not speak, in addition to their
native Polish, German, Italian, and Latin.[227] So universal was the
knowledge of the last named language that, with perhaps a pardonable
exaggeration, Martin Kromer alleges that there were fewer in Poland than
in Latium itself who did not speak it.[228]

Nevertheless, few names present themselves in this department which have
left any permanent trace in history. Francis Meninski, the learned author
of the _Thesaurus Linguarum Orientalium_,[229] was not only a profound
scholar in most of the ancient and modern languages, but, from his long
residence in the East, and from the office of Oriental Interpreter which
he held, first in the Polish and afterwards in the Imperial service, must
be presumed to have spoken them freely and familiarly. But Meninski was a
native of Lorraine, and by some is believed to have been originally named
_Menin_, and only to have adopted the Polish affix, _ski_, on receiving
from the Diet his patent of naturalization and nobility.

Among the early Polish Jesuits were many accomplished classical and
Oriental linguists, but in the absence of any particulars of their
attainments, it would be uninteresting to enumerate them. In later times
the names of Groddek and Bobrowski may be mentioned as philologers,
if not as linguists. The learned Jesuit historian, John Christopher
Albertrandy, also, possesses this among many other lilies to fame. He
was a most laborious and successful collector of materials for Polish
history, in search of which he explored the libraries of Italy, from
whence he carried home, after three years of patient research, a hundred
and ten folio volumes of extracts copied with his own hand! From Italy
he proceeded to Stockholm and Upsala, where many important documents
connected with the time of John III. and Sigismond III. are preserved:
and here, being, from some unworthy jealousy, only permitted to inspect
the desired documents on the condition of not making notes or copies in
the library, his prodigious memory enabled him on his return each evening
to his apartments, to commit to writing what he had read during the day,
and the collection thus formed amounted to no fewer than ninety folio
volumes![230] Albertrandy’s historical works are very numerous; and when
his labours in this department are remembered, his success as a linguist
will appear almost prodigious. Besides Latin, Greek, and Hebrew, he knew
most of the modern languages, French, English, Italian, German, and
Russian, and spoke the majority of them with ease and propriety.

The well-known Polish General, Wenceslaus Rzewuski, devoted the later
years of his busy and chequered career to literary, and especially to
linguistic, pursuits. He is said to have spoken the learned tongues
as well and as freely as his native Polish, and to have been master,
moreover, of all the leading modern languages of Europe. The great
Oriental Journal published at Vienna, _Fundgruben des Orients_, which is
really what its title implies, a _mine_ of Oriental learning, was for
many years under his superintendence.

The Russo-Polish diplomatist, Count Andrew Italinski, is another example
of the union of profound scholarship with great talents for public
affairs. Born in Poland about the middle of the eighteenth century,
Italinski visited in the successive stages of his education, Kiew,
Leyden, Edinburgh, London, Paris, and Berlin, and acquired the languages
of all those various countries. Being eventually appointed to the Russian
embassy in the Kingdom of the Two Sicilies, he became even more perfect
in Italian. In addition to all these languages, he was so thoroughly
master of those of the East, Turkish, Arabic, Persian, &c., as to
challenge the admiration even of the Easterns themselves.[231]

It is perhaps right to add that the eminent Orientalist of St.
Petersburg, Senkowsky, although a Russian by residence and by
association, is not only, as I have already stated, of Polish birth, but
is, moreover, one of the most popular writers in his native language.

       *       *       *       *       *

Our notice of Bohemian linguists must be even more meagre.

The early period of Bohemian letters presents no distinguished name. From
the extraordinary activity which the Bohemians exhibited in translating
the Bible in the fifteenth century, it might be supposed that the study
of Greek and Hebrew had already taken root in the schools of Prague. But
out of the “thirty-three copies in Bohemian of the entire Bible, and
twenty-two of the New Testament,”[232] which are still extant, translated
during that period, not one was rendered from the original languages.
Blakoslav, the first translator of the Bible from Greek (in 1563) is
said to have been a man of “profound erudition.” The same is said of
George Strye a few years later; and the Jesuits Konstanj, Steyer, and
Drachovsky, are also entitled to notice.

John Amos Komnensky, also, better known by his Latinized name, Comenius,
a native of Komna in Moravia, (1592-1671) deserved well of linguistic
science, not only by his own acquirements, but by his well-known work,
the _Janua Linguarum Reserata_, which has had the rare fortune of being
translated not only into twelve European languages, but into those of
several Oriental nations besides. The _Janua Linguarum_, however, though
it attracted much attention at the time, has long been forgotten.

It would be still more unpardonable to overlook the celebrated
philologer, Father Joseph Dobrowsky, who, although born in Raab, in
Hungary, was of a Bohemian family, and devoted himself especially to
the literature and language of his nation. He had just entered the
Jesuit society at Brunn at the moment of the suppression of the order.
Repairing to Prague, he applied himself for a time to the study of the
Oriental languages, but eventually concentrated all his energies on the
history and language of Bohemia. His works upon Bohemian history and
antiquities fill many volumes; and his Slavonic Grammar may be regarded
as a classical work, not only in reference to his native language, but
to the whole Slavonian family. Father Dobrowsky survived till the year
1829, engaged until the very time of his death in active projects for the
cultivation of the language and literature of the country of his adoption.

But probably the most remarkable name among Bohemian linguists is
that of Father Dobrowsky’s friend, the poet Wenceslaus Hanka, born at
Horeneyes in 1791. Hanka’s love of languages was first stirred while he
was tending sheep near his native village, by the opportunity which he
had of learning Polish and Servian from some soldiers of these races
being quartered upon his father’s farm. When he grew somewhat older, his
parents, in order to save him from the chances of military conscription,
(from which, in Bohemia, scholars are exempted) sent him to school;
and he afterwards entered the University of Prague, and subsequently
that of Vienna. On the foundation of the Bohemian Museum at Prague,
he was appointed its librarian, through the recommendation of Father
Dobrowsky; and from that time he devoted himself almost entirely to the
antiquities, literature, and language of his native country. Besides
his own original compositions, Hanka’s name has obtained considerable
celebrity in connexion with the controversy about the genuineness of the
early Bohemian poems known under the title of “Kralodvor,”—a controversy
which, although it has ended differently, was for a time hardly less
animated than those regarding the Ossian and Rowley MSS. in England.
Notwithstanding the variety of Hanka’s pursuits, and his especial
devotion to his own language, his acquisitions in languages have been
most various and extensive. He is described in the “Oesterreichische
National Encyclopædie” as “master of eighteen languages.”[233]

       *       *       *       *       *

With the Slavonic race our Catalogue of Linguists closes. Many
particulars regarding the eminent names which it comprises are, of
necessity, left vague and undetermined. I should have especially
desired to distinguish, in all cases, between mere book knowledge of
languages and the power of writing, or still more of speaking, them. But
unfortunately the accounts which are preserved regarding these scholars
hardly ever enter into this distinction. Even Sir William Jones, though
he carefully classified the languages which he knew, did not specify
this particular; and in most other instances, the narrative, far from
particularizing, like that of Jones, the extent of the individual’s
acquaintance with each language, even leaves in uncertainty the number of
languages with which he was acquainted in any degree.

The very distribution, too, which I have found it expedient to
follow—according to nations—has had many disadvantages. But it seemed
to be upon the whole the most convenient that could be devised. A
distribution into periods, besides that it would have been difficult to
follow out upon any clear and intelligible principle, would have been
attended with the same disadvantages which characterize that according
to nations; while the more strictly philosophical distribution according
to ethnographical or philological schools, would have in great measure
failed to illustrate the object which I have chiefly had in view.
Several of the most eminent of the modern ethnographical writers, and
particularly Pritchard, disavow all claim to the character of linguists;
and the qualifications of many even of those whose pretensions seem the
highest, have, when submitted to a rigid examination, proved far more
than problematical.

       *       *       *       *       *

There are many curious details, however, into which, if space permitted,
it would be interesting to pursue this inquiry.

It might seem natural, for instance, to investigate the nature and
extent of the Miraculous Gift of Languages—the γένη γλωσσῶν of St.
Paul—whether that possessed by the Apostles and other early teachers of
Christianity, or that ascribed in later times to the missionaries among
the Heathen, and especially to the great Apostle of India, St. Francis
Xavier. Materials are not wanting for such an investigation;[234] but as
it can hardly be said to bear upon the subject of this Biography, I have
reluctantly passed it by.

The history of Royal Linguists, too, might afford much amusing material
for speculation. Mithridates, King of Pontus, as we have seen, spoke
twenty-two languages. Cleopatra was mistress, not only of seven
languages enumerated by Plutarch, but, if we may believe his testimony,
of most other known languages of the time. The accomplished, but
ill-fated, Queen of Palmyra, Zenobia, was familiar with Greek, Latin,
Syriac, and Egyptian; and it may be presumed from the notion which
prevailed among some Christian writers of her being a Jewess, that she
was also acquainted with Hebrew or its kindred tongues.[235] Most of the
Roman Emperors were able indifferently to speak Greek or Latin.

The mediæval sovereigns, with the exception of Frederic II., referred
to in a former page,[236] and the great and learned Pope Sylvester II.,
better known by his family name Gerbert,[237] share, as linguists, the
common mediocrity of the age. The learned Princess Anna Comnena does not
appear at all distinguished in this particular; Charlemagne’s reputation
rests on his acquaintance with Latin, and perhaps also Greek; and our own
Alfred was regarded as a notable example of success, although there is no
evidence that his linguistic attainments extended beyond a knowledge of
Latin.

Very early, however, after the revival of letters, Matthias Corvinus, the
learned and munificent King of Hungary, attained a rank as a linguist
not unworthy of a later day. Besides the learned languages, he was also
acquainted with most of the living tongues of Europe. Charles V. knew and
spoke five languages.[238] Henry VIII. spoke four. Several of the Roman
Pontiffs, particularly Paul IV., in other respects also a most remarkable
scholar,[239] and the great Benedict XIV., were learned Orientalists,
as well as good general linguists. The house of Stuart was eminent for
the gift of tongues. The ill-fated Mary of Scotland spoke most of the
European languages. James I., her son, with all his silly pedantry, was
by no means a contemptible linguist. His grandson, Charles II., spoke
French and Spanish fluently; and his brilliant grand-daughter, Elizabeth
of Bavaria, who alone, according to Descartes, of all her contemporaries,
was able to understand the Cartesian philosophy, was mistress, besides
many scientific and literary accomplishments, of no fewer than six
languages.[240] Christina of Sweden surpassed her in one particular.
She knew as many as eight languages, the major part of which she spoke
fluently.

Nor are the courts of our own day without examples of the same
acquirement. The late Emperor of Russia spoke five languages. Several of
the reigning sovereigns of Europe, Queen Victoria, Alexander of Russia,
and Napoleon III. among the number, enjoy the reputation of excellent
linguists. The young Emperor of Austria is an accomplished classical
scholar, and a perfect master of French, and of all the languages of
his own vast empire—German, Italian, Hungarian, Czechish, and Servian!
Prince Lewis Lucian Bonaparte is a distinguished philologer, as well as a
skilful linguist. His “Polyglot Parable of the Sower” is an interesting
contribution to the former science. Even the remote kingdom of Siam
furnishes, in its two Royal brothers, the First and the Second King,
an example more deserving of praise than would be a far higher success
in a more favoured land. The First King, Somdetch Phra Paramendt Maha
Mongkut,[241] has evinced a degree of intellectual activity, rare
indeed among the potentates of the East. Besides the ancient language
and literature of his own kingdom, and all its modern dialects and
sub-divisions, he knows Sanscrit, Cingalese, and Peguan. From the
Catholic missionaries, especially Bishop Pallegoix, he has learned Latin
and also Greek, and from the American Baptists, English. His letters,
though sometimes unidiomatical, are highly characteristic, and display
much intelligence and ability. He is also well versed in European
sciences, especially astronomy and mechanics. He has formed, moreover, a
very considerable collection of astronomical and philosophical apparatus;
has established printing and lithographic presses in the palace; and has
imported steam machinery of various kinds from America. It is gratifying
to add that his brother, the Second King, shares all his tastes, and is
treading worthily in his footsteps.

       *       *       *       *       *

A still more attractive topic would be the long line of Lady-Linguists.

It is not a little remarkable that, among the sovereigns who have
distinguished themselves as linguists, the proportion of queens is very
considerable. The three names, Cleopatra, Zenobia, and Christina of
Sweden, unquestionably represent a larger aggregate of languages than any
three of the king-linguists, if we exclude Mithridates.

Nor are the humbler lady-linguists unworthy this companionship. The nun
Roswitha, of Gandesheim, still favourably known by her sacred Latin
poetry, was also acquainted with Greek—a rare accomplishment in the tenth
century. Tarquinia Molza, grand-daughter of the gifted, but licentious
poet of the same name, knew Latin, Greek, and Hebrew, as well as the
ordinary modern languages. Elena Cornaro Piscopia knew Italian, Spanish,
French, Latin, Greek, Hebrew, and even Arabic.[242] Nay, strange as it
may seem in modern eyes, the university of Bologna numbers several ladies
among the occupants of its pulpits. The beautiful Novella d’Andrea,
daughter of the great jurist, Giovanni d’Andrea, professor of law in the
University of Bologna in the 15th century, was wont to take her father’s
place as lecturer on law; observing, however, the precaution of using
a veil, lest her beauty should distract the attention of her pupils.
Her mother Milancia, scarcely less learned, was habitually consulted by
Giovanni on all questions of special difficulty which arose.[243] Laura
Bassi held the chair of philosophy in more modern times.[244] Clotilda
Tambroni, the last and not the least distinguished of the lady professors
of Bologna, has, besides her literary glories, the honour of having
suffered in the cause of loyalty and religion. Like her friend and fellow
professor, Mezzofanti, she refused, on the occupation of Bologna by the
French, to take the oaths of the new government, and was deprived of the
professorship of Greek in consequence.

The learned ladies of Bologna are not alone among their countrywomen.
The celebrated Dominican nun, Cassandra Fedele of Venice; Alessandra
Scala of Florence; and Olympia Fulvia Morata of Ferrara, are all equally
distinguished as proficients in at least two learned languages, Latin and
Greek. Margherita Gaetana Agnesi, of Milan, was familiar with Latin at
nine years of age; and, while still extremely young, mastered Greek and
Hebrew, together with French, Spanish, and German. In the very meridian
of her fame, nevertheless, she renounced the brilliant career which lay
open to her, in order to devote herself to God as a Sister of Charity.
Another fair Italian, Modesta Pozzo, born at Venice in 1555, deserves to
be mentioned, although she is better known for her extraordinary powers
of memory, than her skill in languages.[245] She was able to repeat the
longest sermon after hearing it but once.

Nor are we without examples, although perhaps not so numerous, in other
countries. Many Spanish and Portuguese ladies learned in languages, are
enumerated by Nicholas de Antonio.[246] Dona Anna de Villegas, and D.
Cecilia di Arellano, besides being excellent Latinists, were mistresses
of French, Italian, and Portuguese.[247] To these languages D. Cecilia
de Morellas added Greek as one of her accomplishments,[248] and D.
Juliana de Morell, a nun of the Dominican order in the middle of the
seventeenth century, in addition to these languages, was not only a
learned Hebraist, but an acute and skilful disputant in the philosophy of
the schools.[249]

The accomplished Anna Maria Schurmann, of whom Cologne is still justly
proud, in addition to her numerous gifts in painting, sculpture, music,
and poetry, was mistress of eight languages, among which were Latin,
Greek, Hebrew, and Ethiopic.

The brilliant, but eccentric Russian Princess Dashkoff, holds a still
more prominent place in the world of letters. The early friend and
confidant of the Empress Catherine, and (with a few alternations
of disfavour,) the sharer of most of the literary projects of that
extraordinary woman, the Princess Dashkoff had the (for a lady rare)
honour of holding the place of President of the Russian Academy. When
the Dictionary of the Academy was projected, she actually undertook, in
her own person, three letters of the work, together with the general
superintendence of the entire! The princess was not unfamiliar with the
learned languages, some of which she not only spoke but wrote: but her
chief attainments were in those of modern Europe. Her autobiographical
Memoirs appear to have been written in French; and the English letters
embodied in the work prove her to have possessed a thorough knowledge of
that language also.

Some of our own countrywomen, if less showy, may perhaps advance a more
solid title to distinction. The beautiful Mrs. Carter, translator of
Epictetus, well deserves to be mentioned; and the amiable and singularly
gifted Elizabeth Smith, is a not unmeet consort for the most eminent
linguists of any age. “With scarcely any assistance,” writes her
biographer, Mrs. Bowdler, to Dr. Mummsen,[250] “she taught herself the
French, Italian, Greek, Latin, Spanish, German, and Hebrew languages. She
had no inconsiderable knowledge of Arabic and Persian.” Her translation
of the Book of Job is a permanent evidence that her knowledge of Hebrew
was of no ordinary kind.

Even the New World has supplied some names to this interesting catalogue.
The Mexican poetess, Juana Inez de la Cruz, better known as the “Nun of
Mexico,” (1651-95), a marvel of precocious knowledge, learned Latin in
twenty lessons, when a mere girl; and quickly became such a proficient
as to speak it with ease and fluency. Her acquisitions in general
learning were most various and extensive; and when on one occasion, in
her seventeenth year, forty learned men of Mexico were invited to dispute
with her, she proved a match for each in his own particular department.
All these accomplishments, notwithstanding, she had the humility to bury
in the obscurity of a convent in Mexico, where she silently devoted
herself for twenty-seven years to literature and religion. She died
in 1695, leaving behind many works still regarded as classics in the
language, which fill no less than three 4to. volumes, and have passed
through twelve successive editions in Spain. All, with the exception of
two, are on sacred subjects.[251]

“Infant Phenomena” of language would supply another curious and fertile
topic for inquiry—an inquiry too in a psychological point of view
eminently interesting.

Many of the great linguists enumerated in this Memoir, Pico of Mirandola,
Crichton, Martin del Rio, and several others, owed part of their
celebrity to the marvellous precociousness of their gifts. A far larger
proportion, however, of those who prematurely displayed this talent, were
cut off before it had attained any mature or healthy development.

Cancellieri[252] mentions a child named Jacopo Martino,[253] born at
Racuno, in the Venetian territory, in 1639, who not only acquired a
knowledge of Greek and Hebrew, between the age of three and seven, but
made such progress in philosophical science as successfully to maintain
a public thesis in philosophy at Rome, when no more than eight years of
age.[254] This extraordinary child, however, died of exhaustion in 1649,
before he had completed his ninth year.

It was the same for Claudio del Valle y Hernandez, a Spanish prodigy,
mentioned by the same author.

But probably the most extraordinary examples of this psychological
phenomenon upon record, occur, by a curious coincidence, almost at the
very same date in the commencement of the eighteenth century. Within
the three years, from 1719 to 1721, were born in different countries,
three children of a precociousness (even though we accept the traditions
regarding them with great deductions,) entirely without parallel in
history.

The first of these, John Lewis Candiac, was born at Nismes, in 1719.
This strangely gifted child, we are told, was able, in his third
year, to speak not only his native French but also Latin. Before he
was six years old he spoke also Greek and Hebrew. He was well versed,
besides, in arithmetic, geography, ancient and modern history, and even
heraldry.[255] But, as might be expected, these premature efforts quickly
exhausted his overtaxed powers, and he died of water on the brain in
1726, at seven years of age.

Christian Henry Heinecken, a child of equal promise, was cut off even
more prematurely. He was born at Lubeck in 1721. He is said to have been
able to speak at ten months old. By the time he attained his twelfth
month, he had learned, if his biographers can be credited, all the facts
in the history of the Pentateuch.[256] In another month he added to this
all the rest of the history of the old Testament; and, when he was but
fourteen months old, he was master of all the leading facts of the Bible!
At two and a half years of age, he spoke fluently, besides his native
German, the French and Latin languages. In this year he was presented at
the Danish court, where he excited universal astonishment. But, on his
return home, he fell sick and died in his fourth year.

The third of these marvels of precocity, John Philip Baratier, who is
probably known to many readers by Johnson’s interesting memoir,[257]
was born at Anspach in the same year with Heinecken, 1721. His career,
however, was not so brief, nor were its fruits so ephemeral, as those
of the ill-fated children just named. When Baratier was only four years
old, he was able to speak Latin, French, and German. At six he spoke
Greek; and at nine Hebrew; in which latter language the soundness of his
attainments is attested by a lexicon which he published in his eleventh
year. Nor was Baratier a mere linguist. He is said to have mastered
elementary mathematics in three months, and to have qualified himself by
thirteen month’s study for the ordinary thesis maintained at taking out
the degree of Doctor of Laws. He was also well versed in architecture,
in ancient and modern literature, in antiquities, and even the uncommon
science of numismatics. He translated from the Hebrew Benjamin of
Tudela’s “Itinerary.” He published a detailed and critical account of the
Rabbinical Bible; and communicated to several societies elaborate papers
on astronomical and mathematical subjects. This extraordinary youth died
at the age of nineteen in 1760.

Later[258] in the same century was born at Rome a child named
Giovanni Cristoforo Amaduzzi,[259] if not quite so precocious as this
extraordinary trio, at least of riper intellect, and destined to survive
for greater distinction and for a more useful career. The precise dates
of his various attainments do not appear to be chronicled; but, when he
was only twelve years old, he published a poetical translation of the
Hecuba of Euripides, which excited universal surprise; and a few years
later, on the visit of the Emperor Joseph II. and his brother Leopold to
Rome, he addressed to the Emperor a polyglot ode of welcome in Greek,
Latin, Italian, and French. His after studies, however, were more serious
and more practical. He is well-known, not only as a linguist, but also
as a philologer of some merit; and in his capacity of corrector of the
Propaganda Oriental Press, a post which he filled till his death, in
1792, he rendered many important services to Oriental studies.[260]

       *       *       *       *       *

It would be interesting too, and not without its advantage in reference
to the history of the human mind, to collect examples of what may be
called Uneducated Linguists; of Dragomans, Couriers, “Lohnbedienter,”
and others[261], who, ignorant of all else besides, have acquired a
facility almost marvellous of speaking several languages fluently, and in
many cases with sufficient, seeming accuracy.

Perhaps this is the place to mention the once notorious (to use his own
favourite designation) “Odcombian Leg-stretcher,” Tom Coryat, a native
of Odcombe in Somersetshire (1577-1617), and author of the now rare
volume, “Coryat’s Crudities.”[262] Coryat may fairly be described as
“an uneducated linguist;” for, although he passed through Westminster
School, and afterwards entered Gloucester Hall, Oxford, the languages
which he learned were all picked up, without regular study, during his
long pedestrian wanderings in every part of the world; one of which, of
nearly two thousand miles, he accomplished in a single pair of shoes,
(which he hung up in the church of Odcombe as a votive offering on his
return), and another, of no less than two thousand seven hundred, at a
cost of about three pounds sterling! This strange genius acquired, in a
sufficient degree for all the wants of conversation, Italian, Turkish,
Arabic, Persian, and Hindustani!

Another singularity of the same kind was Robert Hill, the Jewish tailor,
whom Spence has made the subject of an exceedingly curious parallel with
Magliabecchi.[263] And many similar examples might doubtless be collected
among the couriers, interpreters, and valets-de-place of most of the
European capitals. Baron von Zach mentions an ordinary valet-de-place who
could speak nearly all the European languages with the greatest ease and
correctness, although he was utterly ignorant not only of the grammar of
every one of them, but even of that of his own language. I have already
said that the same species of talent is hereditary in several families in
different ports and cities of the Levant.

The history of such cases as these, if it were possible to investigate
it accurately, might throw light on the operations of the mind in the
acquisition of languages. These, however, and many similar topics,
interesting and curious as they are for their own sake, have but little
bearing on the present inquiry; the purpose of which is simply to prepare
the way for a fitting estimate of the attainments of the illustrious
subject of the following Biography, by placing in contrast with them the
gifts of others who, at various times, have risen to eminence in the same
department. Cardinal Mezzofanti will be found to stand so immeasurably
above even the highest of these names, in the department of language,
that, at least for the purposes of comparison with him, its minor
celebrities can possess little claim for consideration.




THE LIFE OF CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI.




CHAPTER I.

[1774-1798.]


A Memoir of Cardinal Mezzofanti can be little more than a philological
essay. Quiet and uneventful as was his career, its history possesses few
of the ordinary attractions of Biography. The main interest of such a
narrative must consist in the light which it may tend to throw on the
curious problem;—what degree of perfection the human mind, concentrating
its powers upon one department of knowledge, is capable of attaining
therein; and the highest hope of the author is to escape the reproach
which Warburton directed against Boileau’s biographer, Desmaiseaux, of
having “written a book without a life.”

       *       *       *       *       *

Joseph Caspar Mezzofanti,[264] was born at Bologna,[265] on the 17th
of September, 1774.[266] His father, Francis Mezzofanti, a native
of the same city, was of very humble extraction, and by trade a
carpenter. Though almost entirely uneducated,[267] Francis Mezzofanti
is described by the few who remember him, as a man of much shrewdness
and intelligence, a skilful mechanic, and universally respected for his
integrity, piety, and honourable principles. For Mezzofanti’s mother,
Gesualda Dall’ Olmo, a higher lineage has been claimed;—the name of Dall’
Olmo[268] being extremely ancient and not undistinguished in the annals
of Bologna; but the fortunes of the immediate branch of that family from
which Gesualda Dall’ Olmo sprung, were no less humble than those of her
husband. Her education, however, was somewhat superior; and with much
simplicity and sweetness of disposition, she united excellent talents,
great prudence and good sense, and a profoundly religious mind.

Of this marriage were born several children; but they all died at an
early age, except a daughter named Teresa, and Joseph Caspar, the
subject of the present biography. Teresa was the senior by ten years,
and, while her brother was yet a boy, married a young man named Joseph
Lewis Minarelli,[269] by trade a hair dresser, to whom she bore a very
numerous family,[270] several of whom still survive. To the kind courtesy
of one of these, the Cavaliere Pietro Minarelli, I am indebted for a
few particulars of the family history, and of the early years of his
venerated uncle.[271]

It may be supposed that in the case of Mezzofanti, as in those of most
men who attain to eminence in life, there are not wanting marvellous
tales of his youthful studies, and anecdotes of the first indications of
the extraordinary gift by which his later years were distinguished.

According to one of these accounts, his first years were entirely
neglected, and he was placed, while yet a mere child, in the workshop of
his father, to learn the trade of a carpenter. As is usual in the towns
of Italy, the elder Mezzofanti, for the most part, plied his craft not
within doors, but in the open street: and it chanced that the bench at
which the boy was wont to work was situated directly opposite the window
of a school kept by an old priest, who instructed a number of pupils in
Latin and Greek. Although utterly unacquainted, not only with the Greek
alphabet, but even with that of his own language, young Mezzofanti,
overhearing the lessons which were taught in the school, caught up every
Greek and Latin word that was explained in the several classes, without
once having seen a Greek or Latin book! By some lucky accident the fact
came to the knowledge of his unwitting instructor: it led of course to
the withdrawal of the youth from the mechanical craft to which his father
had destined him, and rescued him for the more congenial pursuit of
literature.[272]

A still more marvellous tale is told by a popular American writer, Mr.
Headley, whom his transatlantic admirers have styled the “Addison of
America;” that while Mezzofanti “was still an obscure priest in the north
of Italy, he was called one day to confess two foreigners condemned for
piracy, who were to be executed next day. On entering their cell, he
found them unable to understand a word he uttered. Overwhelmed with the
thought that the criminals should leave the world without the benefits
of religion, he returned to his room, resolved to acquire the language
before morning. He accomplished his task, and next day confessed them in
their own tongue! From that time on, he had no trouble in mastering the
most difficult language. The purity of his motive in the first instance,
he thought, influenced the Deity to assist him miraculously.”[273] This
strange tale Mr. Headley relates, on the authority of a priest, a friend
of Mezzofanti; and he goes so far as to say, that “Mezzofanti himself
attributed his power of acquiring languages to the divine influence.”[274]

The imagination might dwell with pleasure upon these and similar tales
of wonder; but, happily for the moral lesson which it is the best
privilege of biography to convey, the true history of the early studies
of Mezzofanti, (although while falling far short of these marvels, it is
too wonderful to be held out as a model even for the most aspiring) is,
nevertheless, such as to show that the most gifted themselves can only
hope to attain to true eminence by patient and systematic industry.

Far from being entirely neglected, as these tales would imply,
Mezzofanti’s education commenced at an unusually early period. His
parents—

    A virtuous household, but exceeding poor,

conscious of their own want of learning, appear, from the very first, to
have bestowed upon the education of their son all the care which their
narrow circumstances permitted. According to an account obtained from
the Cavaliere Minarelli, he was sent, while a mere child, not yet three
years old, to a dame’s school, more, it would seem, for security, than
for actual instruction. Being deemed too young to be regularly taught,
he was here left for a time to sit in quiet and amuse himself as best
he could, while the other children were receiving instruction; but the
mistress soon discovered that the child, although excluded from the
lessons of his elders, had learned without any effort, all that had been
communicated to them, and was able to repeat promptly and accurately
the tasks which she had dictated. He was accordingly admitted to the
regular classes; and, child as he was, passed rapidly through the various
elementary branches of instruction, to which alone her humble school
extended.

From this dame’s school he was removed to the more advanced, but still
elementary, school of the Abate Filippo Cicotti, in which he learned
grammar, geography, writing, arithmetic, algebra, and the elements
of Latin. But, after some time, the excellent priest who conducted
this school, honestly advised the parents, young as was their boy, to
remove him to another institution, and to permit him to apply himself
unrestrainedly to the higher studies for which he was already fully
qualified.

His father appears to have demurred for a while to this suggestion.
Limiting his views in reference to the boy to the lowly sphere in which
he himself had been born, he had only contemplated bestowing upon him a
solid elementary education in the branches of knowledge suited to its
humble requirements; and, with the old-fashioned prejudices not uncommon
in his rank, he was unwilling to sanction his son’s entering upon what
appeared to him an unnatural and unprofitable career, for one who was
destined to earn his bread by a mechanical art. Fortunately, however, his
wife entertained higher and more enlightened views for their child, and
understood better his character and capabilities.

It was mainly, however, through the counsel and influence of a benevolent
priest of the Oratory, Father John Baptist Respighi, that the career
of the young Mezzofanti was decided. This excellent clergyman, to whom
many deserving youths of his native city were indebted for assistance
and patronage in their entrance into life, observed the rare talents of
Mezzofanti, and, by his earnest advice, promptly overruled the hesitation
of his father. At his recommendation, the boy was transferred from the
school of the Abate Cicotti, to one of the so-called “Scuole Pie,” of
Bologna;—schools conducted by a religious congregation, which had been
founded in the beginning of the seventeenth century, by Joseph Cazalana;
and which, though originally intended chiefly for the more elementary
branches of education, had also been directed with great success,
(especially in the larger cities,) to the cultivation of the higher
studies.

Among the clergymen who at this period devoted themselves to the service
of the Scuole Pie, at Bologna, were several members of the recently
suppressed society of the Jesuits, not only of the Roman, but also of
the Spanish and Spanish American provinces. The expulsion of the society
from Spain had preceded by more than three years the general suppression
of the order; and the Spanish members of the brotherhood, when exiled
from their native country, had found a cordial welcome in the Papal
states. Among these were several who were either foreigners by birth, or
had long resided in the foreign missions of the society. To them all the
Scuole Pie seemed to open a field of labour almost identical with that
of their own institute. Many of them gladly embraced the opportunity;
and it can hardly be doubted that the facility of learning a variety
of languages, which this accidental union of instructors from so many
different countries afforded, was, after his own natural bias, among
the chief circumstances which determined the direction of the youthful
studies of Mezzofanti.

One of these ex-Jesuits, Father Emanuel Aponte, a native of Spain, had
been for many years a member of the mission of the Philippine Islands.
Another, Father Mark Escobar, was a native of Guatemala, and had been
employed in several of the Mexican and South American missions of the
society. A third, Father Laurence Ignatius Thiulen, had passed through a
still more remarkable career. He was a native of Gottenburg, in Sweden,
where his father held the office of superintendent of the Swedish East
India Company, and had been born (1746,) a Lutheran. Leaving home in
early youth with the design of improving himself by foreign travel, he
spent some time in Lisbon, and afterwards in Cadiz, in 1768; whence,
with the intention of proceeding to Italy, he embarked for the island of
Corsica, in the same ship in which he had reached Lisbon from his native
country. In the meantime, however, this ship had been chartered by the
government as one of the fleet in which the Jesuit Fathers, on their
sudden and mysterious suppression in Spain, were to be transported to
Italy. By this unexpected accident, Thiulen became the fellow passenger
of several of the exiled fathers. Trained from early youth to regard
with suspicion and fear every member of that dreaded order, he at first
avoided all intercourse with his Jesuit fellow passengers. By degrees,
however, their unobtrusive, but ready courtesy, disarmed his suspicions.
He became interested in their conversation, even when it occasionally
turned upon religious topics. Serious inquiry succeeded; and in the end,
before the voyage was concluded, his prejudices had been so far overcome,
that he began to entertain the design of becoming a Catholic. After his
landing in the Island of Corsica, many obstacles were thrown in his
way by the Swedish consul at Bastia, himself a Lutheran; but Thiulen
persevered, and was enabled eventually to carry his design into execution
at Ferrara, in 1769. In the following year, 1770, he entered the Jesuit
society at Bologna. He was here admitted to the simple vow in 1772. But
he had hardly completed this important step, when the final suppression
of the Order was proclaimed; and, although both as a foreigner, and as
being unprofessed, he had no claim to the slender pittance which was
assigned for the support of the members, the peculiar circumstances of
his case created an interest in his behalf. He was placed upon the same
footing with the professed Fathers; and two years later, in 1776, he was
promoted to the holy order of priesthood, and continued to reside in
Bologna, engaged in teaching and in the duties of the ministry.[275]

These good Fathers, with that traditionary instinct which in their order
has been the secret of their long admitted success in the education of
youth, were not slow to discover the rare talents of their young scholar
in the Scuole Pie. In a short time he appears to have become to them more
a friend than a pupil. Two, at least, of the members, Fathers Aponte, and
Thiulen, lived to witness the distinction of his later life, and with
them, as well as with his first and kindest patron, Father Respighi,
he ever continued to maintain the most friendly and affectionate
relations.[276]

It would be interesting to be able to trace the exact history of this
period of the studies of Mezzofanti, and to fix the dates and the
order of his successive acquisitions in what afterwards became the
engrossing pursuit of his life. But, unfortunately, so few details
can now be ascertained that it is difficult to distinguish his school
life from that of an ordinary student. His chief teachers in the Scuole
Pie appear to have been the ex-Jesuit Fathers already named; of whom
Father Thiulen was his instructor in history, geography, arithmetic, and
mathematics;[277] Father Aponte in Greek; and probably Father Escobar
in Latin. As he certainly learned Spanish at an early period, it is not
unlikely that he was indebted for it, too, to the instructions of one of
these ecclesiastics, as also perhaps for some knowledge of the Mexican or
Central American languages.

But although barren in details, all the accounts of his school-days
concur in describing his uniform success in all his classes, and the
extraordinary quickness of his memory. One of his feats of memory is
recorded by M. Manavit.[278] A folio volume of the works of St. John
Chrysostom being put into his hand, he was desired to read a page of
the treatise “_De Sacerdotio_” in the original Greek. After a single
reading, the volume was closed, and he repeated the entire page, without
mistaking or displacing a single word! His manners and dispositions as
a boy were exceedingly engaging; and the friendships which he formed at
school continued uninterrupted during life. Among his school companions
there is one who deserves to be especially recorded—the well-known
naturalist, Abate Camillo Ranzani, for many years afterwards Mezzofanti’s
fellow-professor in the university. Ranzani, like his friend, was of
very humble origin, and like him owed his withdrawal from obscurity to
the enlightened benevolence of the good Oratorian, F. Respighi.[279]
Young Ranzani was about the same age with Mezzofanti; and as their homes
immediately adjoined each other,[280] they had been daily companions
almost from infancy, and particularly from the time when they began to
frequent the Scuole Pie in company. The constant allusions to Ranzani
which occur in Mezzofanti’s letters, will show how close and affectionate
their intimacy continued to be.

Joseph Mezzofanti early manifested a desire to embrace the ecclesiastical
profession; and although this wish seems to have caused some
dissatisfaction to his father, who had intended him for some secular
pursuit,[281] yet the deeply religious disposition of the child and his
singular innocence of life, in the end overcame his father’s reluctance.
Having completed his elementary studies unusually early, he was enabled
to become a scholar of the archiepiscopal seminary of Bologna, while
still a mere boy, probably in the year 1786.[282] He continued, however,
to reside in his father’s house, while he attended the schools of the
seminary.

Of his collegiate career little is recorded, except an incident which
occurred at the taking of his degree in philosophy. His master in
this study was Joseph Voglio, a professor of considerable reputation,
and author of several works on the philosophical controversies of the
period.[283] It is usual in the Italian universities for the candidate
for a philosophical degree, to defend publicly a series of propositions
selected from the whole body of philosophy. Mezzofanti, at the time that
he maintained his theses, was still little more than a child; and it
would seem that, his self-possession having given way under the public
ordeal, he had a narrow escape from the mortification of a complete
failure. One of the witnesses of his “Disputation,” Dr. Santagata,
in the Discourse already referred to, delivered at the Institute of
Bologna, gives an interesting account of the occurrence. “For a time,”
says Dr. Santagata, “the boy’s success was most marked. Each new
objection, among the many subtle ones that were proposed, only afforded
him a fresh opportunity of exhibiting the acuteness of his intellect,
and the ease, fluency, and elegance of his Latinity; and the admiring
murmurs of assent, and other unequivocal tokens of applause which it
elicited from the audience, of which I myself was one, seemed to promise
a triumphant conclusion of the exercise. But all at once the young
candidate was observed to grow pale, to become suddenly silent, and at
length to fall back upon his seat and almost faint away. The auditors
were deeply grieved at this untoward interruption of a performance
hitherto so successful; but they were soon relieved to see him, as if by
one powerful effort, shake off his emotion, recover his self-possession,
and resume his answering with even greater acuteness and solidity than
before. He was greeted with the loud and repeated plaudits of the crowded
assembly.”[284]

About this period, soon after Mezzofanti had completed his fifteenth
year, his health gave way under this long and intense application;
and his constitution for a time was so debilitated, that, at the
termination of his course of philosophy, he was compelled to interrupt
his studies;[285] nor was it until about 1793, that he entered upon the
theological course, under the direction of the Canon Joachim Ambrosi.
One of his class-fellows, the Abate Monti, the venerable arch-priest of
Bagni di Poreta, in the archdiocese of Bologna, still survives and speaks
in high terms of the ability which he exhibited. He describes him as a
youth of most engaging manners and amiable dispositions—one who, from
his habitually serious and recollected air, might perhaps be noted by
strangers

    For his grave looks, too thoughtful for his years,

but who, to his friends, was all gaiety and innocent mirthfulness. Mgr.
Monti adds that he was at this time a most laborious student, frequently
remaining up whole nights in the library for the purpose of study. His
master in moral theology was the Canonico Baccialli, author of a _Corpus
Theologiæ Moralis_, of some local reputation.

Having completed the course of theology, and also that of canon law,
he attended the lectures of the celebrated Jurist, Bonini, on Roman
Law. The great body of the students of the school of Roman Law being
laymen, the young ecclesiastic remained a considerable time unobserved
and undistinguished in the class; until, having accidentally attracted
the notice of the professor on one occasion, he replied with such
promptness and learning to a question which he addressed to him, as
at once to establish a reputation; and Dr. Santagata, who records the
circumstance,[286] observes that his proficiency in each of his many
different studies was almost as great as though he had devoted his
undivided attention to that particular pursuit.

Meanwhile, however, he continued without interruption, what, even thus
early in his career, was his chosen study of languages. Under the
direction of Father Aponte, now rather his friend and associate than
instructor in the study, he pursued his Greek reading; and as this had
been from the first one of his favourite languages, there were few Greek
authors within his reach that he did not eagerly read. Fortunately, too,
Aponte was himself an enthusiast in the study of Greek, and possessed a
solid and critical knowledge of the language, of which he had written
an excellent and practical grammar for the schools of the university,
frequently republished since his time;[287] and it was probably to the
habit of close and critical examination which he acquired under Aponte’s
instruction, that Mezzofanti owed the exact knowledge of the niceties of
the language, and the power of discriminating between all the varieties
of Greek style, for which, as we shall see later, he was eminently
distinguished.

One of his fellow pupils in Greek under Aponte was the celebrated
Clotilda Tambroni, whom I have already mentioned in the list of
lady-linguists, and whose name is the last in the catalogue of
lady-professors at Bologna. A community of tastes as well as of studies
formed a close bond of intimacy between her and Mezzofanti, and led to an
affectionate and lasting friendship in after life. To Aponte she was as
a daughter.[288]

His master in Hebrew was the Dominican Father Ceruti, a learned
Orientalist and professor of that language in the university. About the
same time also, he must have become acquainted with Arabic, a language
for the study of which Bologna had early acquired a reputation. And, what
is a still more unequivocal exhibition of his early enthusiasm, although
Coptic formed no part of the circle of university studies, Görres
states that he learned this language also under the Canon John Lewis
Mingarelli.[289] If this account be true, as Mingarelli died in March
1793, Mezzofanti must have acquired Coptic before he had completed his
nineteenth year.

Nor did he meanwhile neglect the modern languages. About the year 1792, a
French ecclesiastic a native of Blois, one of those whom the successive
decrees of the Constituent Assembly had driven into exile, came to
reside in Bologna. From him Mezzofanti speedily acquired French.[290] He
received his first lessons in German from F. Thiulen,[291] who had been
one of his masters in the Scuole Pie; and who, although a Swede by birth,
was acquainted with the cognate language of Germany. From him, too,
most probably, Mezzofanti would also have learned his native Swedish,
but, on the occupation of northern Italy by the French, F. Thiulen, who
had made himself obnoxious to the revolutionary party in Bologna, by
his writings in favour of the Papal authority, had been arrested and
sent into exile.[292] Perhaps Thiulen’s absence from Bologna was the
occasion of calling into exercise that marvellous quickness in mastering
the structure of a new language, which often, during Mezzofanti’s later
career, excited the amazement even of his most familiar friends. At
all events, the first occasion of his exhibiting this singular faculty
of which I have been able to discover any authentic record, is the
following:—

A Bolognese musician, named Uttini, had settled at Stockholm, where
he married a Swedish lady. Uttini, it would seem, died early; but his
brother, Caspar Uttini, a physician of Bologna, undertook the education
of his son, who was sent to Bologna for the purpose. The boy, at his
arrival, was not only entirely ignorant of Italian, but could not speak
a word of any language except his native Swedish. In this emergency
Mezzofanti, who, although still a student, had already acquired the
reputation of a linguist, was sent for, to act as interpreter between the
boy and his newly found relatives: but it turned out that the language
of the boy was, as yet, no less a mystery to Mezzofanti than it had
already proved to themselves. This discovery, so embarrassing to the
family, served but to stimulate the zeal of Mezzofanti. Having made a
few ineffectual attempts to establish an understanding, he asked to see
the books which the boy had brought with him from his native country. A
short examination of these books was sufficient for his rapid mind; he
speedily discovered the German affinities of the Swedish language, and
mastered almost at a glance the leading peculiarities of form, structure,
and inflexion, by which it is distinguished from the other members of the
Teutonic family; a few short trials with the boy enabled him to acquire
the more prominent principles of pronunciation; and in the space of a
few days, he was able, not only to act as the boy’s interpreter with his
family, but to converse with the most perfect freedom and fluency in the
language![293]

Mezzofanti received the clerical tonsure in the year 1795. In 1796 he
was admitted to the minor orders; and, on the 24th of September in the
same year, to the order of sub-deacon. On the first of April, 1797, he
was promoted to deaconship; and a few months later he was advanced, on
September 24th, 1797, to the holy order of priesthood.[294] At this time
he had only just completed his twenty-third year.

This anticipation of the age at which priesthood is usually conferred,
was probably owing to an appointment which he had just received (on the
15th of September,)[295] in the university—that of professor of Arabic.
Such an appointment at this unprecedented age, is the highest testimony
which could be rendered to his capacity as a general scholar, as well as
to his eminence as a linguist.

He commenced his lectures on the 15th of the following December. Dr.
Santagata, who was a student of the university at the time, speaks
very favourably of his opening lecture, not only for its learning and
solidity, but also for the beauty of its style, and its lucid and
pleasing arrangement.[296]

Unhappily his tenure of the Arabic professorship was a very brief
duration. The political relations of Bologna had just undergone a
complete revolution. Early in 1796, very soon after the advance of the
French army into Italy, Bonaparte had been invited by a discontented
party in Bologna to take possession of their city, and, in conjunction
with Saliceti, had occupied the fortresses on the 19th of January. At
first after the French occupation, the Bolognese were flattered by a
revival of their old municipal institutions; but before the close of
1796, the name of Bologna was merged in the common designation of the
Cisalpine Republic, by which all the French conquests in Northern Italy
were described. By the treaty of Tolentino, concluded in February, 1797,
the Pope was compelled formally to cede to this new Cisalpine Republic,
the three Legations of Bologna, Ferrara, and Romagna; and, in the
subsequent organization of the new territory, Bologna became the capital
of the Dipartimento del Reno.

One of the first steps of the new rulers was to require of all employés
an oath of fidelity to the Republic. The demand was enforced with great
strictness; and especially in the case of ecclesiastics, who in Italy,
as in France, were naturally regarded with still greater suspicion
by the Republican authorities, than even those civil servants of the
old government who had been most distinguished for their loyalty.
Nevertheless the republican authorities themselves consented that an
exception should be made in favour of a scholar of such promise as the
Abate Mezzofanti. The oath was proposed to him, as to the rest of the
professors. He firmly refused to take it. In other cases deprivation had
been the immediate consequence of such refusal; but an effort was made to
shake the firmness of Mezzofanti, and even to induce him without formally
accepting the oath, to signify his compliance by some seeming act of
adhesion to the established order of things. An intimation accordingly
was conveyed to him, that in his case the oath would be dispensed with,
and that he would be allowed to retain his chair, if he would only
consent to make known by any overt act whatsoever, (even by a mere
interchange of courtesies with some of the officials of the Republic,)
his acceptance of its authority as now established.[297] But Mezzofanti
was at once too conscientious to compromise what he conceived to be his
duty towards his natural sovereign, and too honourable to affect, by such
unworthy temporizing, a disposition which he did not, and could not,
honestly entertain. He declined even to appear as a visitor in the salons
of the new governor. He was accordingly deprived of his professorship in
the year 1798.

He was not alone in this generous fidelity. His friend Signora
Tambroni displayed equal firmness. It is less generally known that the
distinguished experimentalist, Ludovico Galvani,[298] was a martyr in the
same cause. Like Mezzofanti, on refusing the oath, he was stripped of all
his offices and emoluments. Less fortunate than Mezzofanti, he sunk under
the stroke. He was plunged into the deepest distress and debility; and,
although his Republican rulers were at length driven by shame to decree
his restoration to his chair, the reparation came too late. He died in
1798.




CHAPTER II.

[1798-1802.]


The years which followed this forfeiture of his professorship were a
period of much care, as well as of severe personal privation, for the
Abate Mezzofanti.

Both his parents were still living;—his father no longer able to maintain
himself by his handicraft; his mother for some years afflicted with
partial blindness, and in broken or failing health. The family of his
sister, Teresa Minarelli, had already become very numerous, and the
scanty earnings of her husband’s occupation hardly sufficed for their
maintenance, much less for the expenses of their education. In addition,
therefore, to his own necessities, Joseph Mezzofanti was now in great
measure burdened with this twofold responsibility—a responsibility to
which so affectionate a brother, and so dutiful a son could not be
indifferent. To meet these demands, he had hitherto relied mainly upon
the income arising from his professorship, although this was miserably
inadequate, the salaries attached to the professorships in Bologna, at
the time when Lalande visited Italy, (1765-6,) not exceeding a hundred
Roman crowns, (little more than £25). Small, however, as it was, this
salary was Mezzofanti’s main source of income. As a title to ordination,
the archbishop of Bologna, Cardinal Giovanetti, had conferred upon him
two small benefices, the united revenues of which, strange as it may
sound in English ears, did not exceed eight pounds sterling;[299] and
an excellent ecclesiastic, F. Anthony Magnani, who had long known and
appreciated the virtues of the family, and had taken a warm interest in
Joseph from his boyhood, settled upon him from his own private resources
about the same amount. Now, as Mezzofanti had devoted himself to
literature, and lived as a simple priest at Bologna, declining to accept
any preferment to which the care of souls was annexed, this wretched
pittance constituted his entire income. It is true that he was about
this period chaplain of the Collegio Albornoz,[300] an ancient Spanish
foundation of the great Cardinal of that name;[301] but his services
appear either to have been entirely gratuitous, or the emolument, if any,
was little more than nominal.

And thus, when the Abate Mezzofanti, relying upon Providence, had the
courage to throw up, for conscience sake, the salary which constituted
nearly two-thirds of his entire revenue, he found himself burdened with
the responsibilities already described, while his entire certain income
was considerably less than twenty pounds sterling! Nevertheless, gloomy
and disheartening as was this prospect, far from suffering himself to
be cast down by it, he was even courageous enough to venture, about
this time, on the further responsibility of receiving his sister and
her family into his own house. The renewal of hostilities in Italy, in
1799, filled him with alarm for her security; and his nephew, Cavaliere
Minarelli, who has been good enough to communicate to me a short MS.
Memoir of the events of this period of his uncle’s life, still remembers
the day on which, while the French and Austrian troops were actually
engaged before the walls, and the shot and shells had already begun to
fall within the city, his uncle came to their house, at considerable
personal risk, and insisted that his sister and her children should
remove to his own house which was in a less exposed position. From that
date (1799) they continued to reside with him.

To meet this increased expenditure, the Abate’s only resource lay in
that wearisome and ill-requited drudgery in which the best years of
struggling genius are so often frittered away—private instruction. He
undertook the humble, but responsible, duties of private tutor, and
turned industriously, if not very profitably, to account, the numerous
acquisitions of his early years. There are few of the distinguished
families of Bologna, some of whose members were not among his pupils—the
Marescalchi, Pallavicini, Ercolani, Martinetti, Bentivoglio, Marsigli,
Sampieri, Angelelli, Marchetti, and others. To these, as well as to
several foreigners, he gave instructions in ancient and modern languages,
to some in his own apartments, but more generally in their houses.

As regarded his own personal improvement in learning, these engagements,
of course, were, for the most part, a wasteful expenditure of time
and opportunities for study; but there was one of them—that with the
Marescalchi family[302]—which supplied in the end an occasion for
extending and improving his knowledge of languages. The library of the
Marescalchi palace is especially rich in that department; and, as the
modest and engaging manners of Mezzofanti quickly established him on the
footing of a valued friend, rather than of an instructor, in the family,
he enjoyed unrestricted use of the opportunities for his own peculiar
studies which it afforded. In this family, too, one of the most ancient
and distinguished in Bologna, he had frequent opportunities of meeting
and conversing with foreigners, each in the language of his own country.

       *       *       *       *       *

At all events, whatever may have been his actual opportunities of study
during the years which succeeded his deprivation, it is certain that,
upon the whole, his progress during that time was not less wonderful than
at the most favoured periods of his life. Northern Italy, during this
troubled time, was the principal seat of the struggle between Austria
and the French Republic; and from the first advance of the French in
1796, till the decisive field of Marengo in 1800, Bologna found itself
alternately in the occupation of one or other of the contending powers.
For nearly twelve months, however, after the battle of Trebbia, in July,
1799, the Austrians remained in undisturbed possession. The army of
Austria at that day comprised in its motley ranks, representatives of
most of the leading European languages—Teutonic, Slavonic, Czechish,
Magyar, Romanic, &c. The intercourse with the officers and soldiery thus
opened for Mezzofanti, in itself supplied a school of languages, which,
taken in conjunction with the university, and its other resources, it
would have been difficult to find in any other single European city,
except Rome.

And these advantages presented themselves to the Abate Mezzofanti, since
his advancement to the priesthood, in a way which enlisted still higher
feelings than that desire for knowledge which had hitherto formed his
main incentive to study.

All the accounts which have been preserved of the early years of his
ministry, concur in extolling his remarkable piety, his devotedness
to the duties of the confessional,[303] and above all his active and
tender charity. He had a share in every work of benevolence. He loved
to organize little plans for the education of the poor. Notwithstanding
his numerous and pressing occupations, he was a constant visitant of
the numerous charitable institutions for which Bologna, even among the
munificent cities of Italy, has long been celebrated. He was particularly
devoted to the sick;—not only to the class who are called in Italy “the
bashful poor,” whom he loved to seek out and visit at their own houses,
and to whom, poor as he was in worldly wealth, his active benevolence
enabled him to render services which money could not have procured;—but
also in the public hospitals, both civil and military. Now the terrible
campaign of 1796-’97, and again of 1799, had filled the camps of both
armies with sick and wounded soldiers; and thus in the public hospitals
of Bologna were constantly to be found invalids of almost every European
race. M. Manavit[304] states that, even before Mezzofanti was ordained
priest, he had begun to act as interpreter to the wounded or dying in the
hospitals, whether of their temporal or their spiritual wants and wishes.
From the date of his ordination, of course, he was moved to the same
service by a zeal still higher and more holy.

“I was at Bologna,” he himself told M. Manavit,[305] “during the time
of the war. I was then young in the sacred ministry; it was my practice
to visit the military hospitals. I constantly met there Hungarians,
Slavonians, Germans, and Bohemians, who had been wounded in battle, or
invalided during the campaign; and it pained me to the heart that from
want of the means of communicating with them, I was unable to confess
those among them who were Catholics, or to bring back to the Church those
who were separated from her communion. In such cases, accordingly, I
used to apply myself, with all my energy, to the study of the language
of the patients, until I knew enough of them to make myself understood;
I required no more. With these first rudiments I presented myself among
the sick wards. Such of the invalids as desired it, I managed to confess;
with others I held occasional conversations; and thus in a short time
I acquired a considerable vocabulary. At length, through the grace of
God, assisted by my private studies, and by a retentive memory, I came
to know, not merely the generic languages of the nations to which the
several invalids belonged, but even the peculiar dialects of their
various provinces.”

In this way, being already well acquainted with German, he became master
successively of Magyar, Bohemian, or Czechish, Polish, and even of the
Gipsy dialect, which he learned from one of that strange race, who was
a soldier in a Hungarian regiment quartered at Bologna during this
period.[306] It is probable, too, that it was in the same manner he also
learned Russian. It is at least certain that he was able to speak that
language fluently, at the date of his acquaintance with the celebrated
Suwarrow. Mezzofanti’s report of the acquirements of this “remarkable
barbarian” differs widely from the notion then popularly entertained
regarding him. He described him as a most accomplished linguist, and
a well-read scholar. This report, it may be added, is fully confirmed
by the most recent authorities, and Alison describes him as “highly
educated, polished in his manners, speaking and writing seven languages
with facility, and extensively read, especially upon the art of war.”[307]

It was about this time also that Mezzofanti learned Flemish. He acquired
that language from a youth of Brussels, who came as a student to the
University of Bologna.[308]

The reputation which he was thus gradually establishing, of itself served
to extend his opportunities of exercise in languages. Every foreigner who
visited Bologna sought his society for the purpose of testing personally
the truth of the marvellous reports which had been circulation. In these
days Bologna was the high road to Rome, and few visitors to that capital
failed to tarry for a short time at Bologna, to examine the many objects
of interest which it contains. To all of these Mezzofanti found a ready
and welcome access. There were few with whom his fertile vocabulary did
not supply some medium of communication; but, even when the stranger
could not speak any except the unknown tongue, Mezzofanti’s ready
ingenuity soon enabled him, as with the patients in the hospital, to
establish a system for the interchange of thought. A very small number
of leading words sufficed as a foundation; and the almost instinctive
facility with which, by a single effort, he grasped all the principal
peculiarities of the structure of each new language, speedily enabled
him to acquire enough of the essential inflections of each to enter
on the preliminaries of conversation. For his marvellous instinct of
acquisitiveness this was enough. The iron tenacity of his memory never
let go a word, a phrase, an idiom, or even a sound, which it once had
mastered.

In his zeal for the extension of the circle of his knowledge of
languages, too, he pushed to the utmost the valuable opportunities
derivable from the converse of foreigners. “The hotel-keepers,” he told
M. Manavit,[309] “were in the habit of apprising me of the arrival of
all strangers at Bologna. I made no difficulty when anything was to be
learned, about calling on them, interrogating them, making notes of their
communications, and taking instructions from them in the pronunciation
of their respective languages. A few learned Jesuits, and several
Spaniards, Portuguese, and Mexicans, who resided at Bologna, afforded
me valuable aid in learning both the ancient languages, and those of
their own countries. I made it a rule to learn every new grammar, and
to apply myself to every strange dictionary that came within my reach.
I was constantly filling my head with new words; and, whenever any new
strangers, whether of high or low degree, passed through Bologna, I
endeavoured to turn them to account, using the one for the purpose of
perfecting my pronunciation, and the other for that of learning the
familiar words and turns of expression. I must confess, too, that it cost
me but little trouble; for, in addition to an excellent memory, God had
blessed me with an incredible flexibility of the organs of speech.”

Occasionally, too, he received applications from merchants, bankers, and
even private individuals, to translate for them portions of their foreign
correspondence which chanced to be written in some of the languages of
less ordinary occurrence. In all such cases, Dr. Santagata[310] says,
Mezzofanti was the unfailing resource; and his good nature was as ready
as his knowledge was universal. He cheerfully rendered to every applicant
every such assistance; and it was his invariable rule never to accept any
remuneration whatsoever for this or any similar service.[311]

Even his regular priestly duties as a confessor now contributed, as his
extraordinary duties in the hospitals had done before, to enlarge his
stock of languages. He was soon marked out as the “foreigners’ confessor”
(_confessario dei forestieri_) of Bologna, an office which, in Rome and
other Catholic cities, is generally entrusted to a staff consisting
of many individuals. Almost every foreigner was sure to find a ready
resource in Mezzofanti; though it more than once happened that, as a
preliminary step towards receiving the confession of the party applying
for this office of his ministry, he had to place himself as a pupil in
the hands of the intending penitent, and to acquire from him or her the
rudiments of the language in which they were to communicate with each
other. The process to him was simple enough. If the stranger was able to
repeat for him the Commandments, the Lord’s Prayer, the Apostles’ Creed,
or any one of those familiar prayers which are the common property of all
Christian countries, or even to supply the names of a few of the leading
ideas of Christian theology, as God, sin, virtue, earth, heaven, hell,
&c., it was sufficient for Mezzofanti. In many cases he proceeded to
build, upon a foundation not a whit more substantial than this, the whole
fabric of the grammar, and to a great extent even of the vocabulary, of
a language. A remarkable instance of this faculty I shall have to relate
in the later years of his life. Another, which belongs to the present
period, has been communicated to me by Cardinal Wiseman. “Mezzofanti
told me,” says his Eminence, “that a lady from the island of Sardinia
once came to Bologna, bringing with her a maid who could speak nothing
but the Sardinian dialect, a soft patois composed of Latin, Italian, and
Spanish (e.g., Mezzofanti told me that _columba mia_ is Sardinian for “my
wife.”) As Easter approached the girl became anxious and unhappy about
confession, despairing of finding a confessor to whom she should be able
to make herself understood. The lady sent for Mezzofanti; but at that
time he had never thought of learning the language. He told the lady,
nevertheless, that, in a fortnight, he would be prepared to hear her
maid’s confession. She laughed at the idea; but Mezzofanti persisted, and
came to the house every evening for about an hour. When Easter arrived,
he was able to speak Sardinian fluently, and heard the girl’s confession!”

       *       *       *       *       *

It might be instructive to trace the order in which the several
languages which he mastered in this earlier part of his career were
successively acquired. But unfortunately neither the papers and letters
which have been preserved, nor the recollections of the few friends who
have survived, have thrown much light upon this interesting inquiry.
All accounts, however, agree in representing his life during these
years as laborious almost beyond belief. The weary hours occupied in
the drudgery of tuition; the time given to the manifold self-imposed
occupations described in this chapter; the time spent in the ordinary
devotional exercises of a priest, and in the performance of those duties
of the ministry in the hospitals and elsewhere which he had undertaken;
above all, the time regularly and perseveringly given to his great
and all-engrossing study of languages;—may well be thought to form an
aggregate of laborious application hardly surpassed in the whole range of
literary history. It fully confirms the well-known assurance of the noble
Prologue of Bacon’s “Advancement of Learning:” “Let no man doubt that
learning will expulse business, but rather it will keep and defend the
possession of the mind against idleness and pleasure, which otherwise may
enter at unawares to the prejudice of both.” Other students may perhaps
have devoted a longer time to continuous application. The celebrated
Jesuit theologian, Father Suarez, is said to have spent seventeen hours
out of the twenty-four between his studies and his devotions. Castell,
the author of the Heptaglot Lexicon, declares, in the feeling address
which accompanied its publication, that his thankless and unrequited
task had occupied him for sixteen or eighteen hours every day during
twenty years.[312] Theophilus Raynaud, during his long life of eighty
years, only allowed himself a quarter of an hour daily from his studies
for dinner;[313] and the Puritan divine, Prynne, seldom would spare
time to dine at all.[314] It may be doubted whether the actual labour
of Mezzofanti, broken up and divided over so many almost incompatible
occupations, did not equal and perhaps exceed them all in amount, if not
in intensity. According to the account of Guido Görres,[315] his time for
sleep, during this period of his life, was limited to three hours.[316]
His self-denial in all other respects was almost equally wonderful.
He was singularly abstemious both in eating and in drinking; and his
power of enduring the intense cold which prevails in the winter months
throughout the whole of Northern Italy, especially in the vicinity of the
Apennines, was a source of wonder even to his own family. During the long
nights which he devoted to study he never, even in the coldest weather,
permitted himself the indulgence of a fire.

I may here mention that he continued the same practice to the end of his
life. Even after his elevation to the cardinalate, he could hardly ever
be induced to have recourse to a fire, or even to the little portable
brazier, called _scaldino_, which students in Italy commonly employ, as a
resource against the numbness of the feet and hands produced by the dry
but piercing cold which characterizes the Italian winter.




CHAPTER III.

[1803-1806.]


From the commencement of 1803, those difficulties of the Abate
Mezzofanti’s position, which merely arose from the straitness of his
income, began gradually to diminish. On the 29th of January in that year
he was appointed assistant librarian of the _Istituto_ of Bologna; one of
those munificent literary institutions of which Italy is so justly proud,
founded in the end of the seventeenth century by the celebrated General
Count Marsigli, and enriched by the munificence of many successive
scholars and citizens of Bologna; especially of the great Bolognese Pope,
Benedict XIV. Its collections and museums are among the finest in Italy;
and the library contains above a hundred and fifty thousand volumes.

But whatever of pecuniary advantage he derived from this appointment, was
perhaps more than counterbalanced by the constant demand upon his time
from the charge of so extensive a library: especially as he confesses
that, up to that period, he had seldom bestowed a thought on the study
of bibliography. To add to the ordinary engagements of librarian, too,
it was determined, sometime after Mezzofanti’s appointment, to prepare
a Catalogue Raisonné, in which the Oriental and Greek department
naturally fell to his share. For the Oriental department of the library
there seems, up to this time, to have been no catalogue, or at least an
exceedingly imperfect and inaccurate one; and as a definite time was
fixed for the completion of the task, it became for Mezzofanti a source
of serious and protracted embarrassment, to which he alludes more than
once in his correspondence.

A more congenial occupation, however, was offered to him soon afterwards.
In the end of the same year, he was restored to his former position in
the university. On the 4th of November in that year, he was appointed
Professor of Oriental Languages;—a place which he was enabled to hold in
conjunction with his office in the Library of the Institute.

A few months after his installation, he read at the university, June
23rd, 1804, on the occasion of conferring degrees, the first public
dissertation of which I have been able to discover any record. The
subject was “The Egyptian Obelisks.” The dissertation itself has been
lost; but Count Simone Stratico, of Pavia, to whom we owe the notice of
its delivery, speaks of it as “most judicious and learned,” and replete
with antiquarian erudition.[317]

The Oriental Professorship in the neighbouring University of Parma, was
at this time held by the celebrated John Bernard de Rossi. Mezzofanti had
long desired to form the acquaintance of this distinguished Orientalist;
and more than once projected a visit to Parma, for the purpose of placing
himself in communication with him on the subject of his favourite
study. His duties as assistant Librarian at length afforded the desired
opportunity. Having occasion to order some of De Rossi’s works from
Parma, he addressed to De Rossi himself a letter which soon led to a warm
and intimate friendship, and was the commencement of an interesting,
although not very frequent, correspondence, which continued, at irregular
intervals, up to the time of De Rossi’s death. Some of Mezzofanti’s
letters to De Rossi, which are preserved in the Library of Parma, have
been kindly placed at my disposal. They are chiefly interesting as
throwing some light on the progress of his studies.

The first is dated September 15th, 1804—

    _To the Abate John Bernard de Rossi, Professor of Oriental
    Languages._

                                      _Bologna, September 15, 1804._

    Most illustrious Signor Abate.—I have long admired and
    profited by your rare acquirements, which your learned works
    have made known all over Europe; and I have, for some time,
    been projecting a visit to Parma, for the double purpose of
    tendering to you a personal assurance of my esteem, and of
    examining your far-famed library. Finding my hope disappointed
    for the present, I take advantage of a favourable opportunity
    to offer you, at least in writing, some expression of the
    profound respect which I feel for one so distinguished in the
    same studies which I myself pursue with great ardour, although
    with very inferior success. I am desirous also to procure those
    of your works marked nos. 22, 24, 25, and 26, in the catalogue
    kindly forwarded by you through Professor Ranzani. Pray give to
    the bearer of this letter any of the above numbers which may be
    in readiness: he will immediately settle for them.

    May I venture to hope that, for the future, you will allow
    me, when any difficulty occurs to me in my Oriental reading,
    to have recourse to your profound knowledge of Oriental
    literature, and also that you will accept the sincere assurance
    of the esteem with which I declare myself

                  Your most humble and devoted servant

                                    D. Joseph Mezzofanti,
                                    Professor of Oriental Languages.

De Rossi replied by an exceedingly courteous letter, accompanied
by a present of several books connected with Oriental literature,
and manifesting so friendly an interest in the studies of his young
correspondent, that Mezzofanti never afterwards hesitated to consult him
when occasion arose. Their letters, in accordance with the ceremonious
etiquette which characterizes all the correspondence of that period, are
somewhat stiff and formal; but their intercourse was marked throughout by
an active and almost tender interest upon the one side, and a respectful
but yet affectionate admiration upon the other.

Meanwhile, however, Mezzofanti’s own increasing reputation led to his
being frequently consulted upon difficulties of the same kind. On one
of these—a book in some unknown character which had been sent for his
examination by Monsignor Bevilacqua, a learned prelate at Ferrara—he,
in his turn, consults De Rossi. His letter is chiefly curious as showing
(what will appear strange to our modern philologers) that up to this
date Mezzofanti was entirely unacquainted with Sanscrit. The importance
of that language and the wide range of its relations, which Frederic
Schlegel was almost the first to estimate aright, were not at this time
fully appreciated.

    _To Professor Ab. John Bernard De Rossi._

                                        _Bologna, February 4, 1805._

    The works which I lately received from you have only served
    to confirm the estimate of your powers which I had formed
    from those with which I was previously acquainted; while the
    obliging letter and valuable present which accompanied them,
    equally convinced me of the kindness of your heart. May I
    hope that this kindness, as well as your profound erudition,
    may establish for me a title to claim the permission which I
    solicited in my last letter? I venture, therefore, to enclose
    to you a printed page in unknown characters, which the owner
    of the original, Mgr. Alessandro Bevilacqua of Ferrara, tells
    me has been already examined by several savants, but to no
    purpose. The book comes originally from Congo;[318] having
    been brought thence to Ferrara by a Capuchin of the same
    respectable family. Being full of the idea of Sanscrit, to
    which I earnestly long to apply myself as soon as I shall find
    means for the study, I was at first inclined to suspect that
    this might be the Sanscrit character; but this is a mere fancy
    of mine, or at best a guess. I look, therefore, to your more
    extensive knowledge for a satisfactory solution of the doubt;
    and meanwhile pray you to accept the assurance of my sincere
    gratitude and esteem.

This correspondence with De Rossi, also, shows very remarkably that,
however, at a later period of his career, Mezzofanti’s wonderful faculty
of language may have been sharpened by practice into what appears almost
an instinct, his method of study at this time was exact, laborious, and
perhaps even plodding. He appears, from the very first, to have pursued
as a means of study that system of written composition which was the
amusement of his later years; and he occasionally availed himself of
De Rossi’s superior knowledge and experience so far as to submit these
compositions for his judgment and correction.

It is to one of these he alludes in the following letter:—

                                          _Bologna, April 15, 1805._

    I send you a translation in twelve languages of a short Latin
    sentence, in the hope that you will kindly correct any mistakes
    into which I may have fallen. I have been obliged to write it
    almost impromptu (_su due piedi_). I mention this, however,
    not to excuse my own blunders, but to throw the blame of
    them on those who have forced me to the task. Not having a
    single individual within reach with whom to take counsel, I
    have been obliged to impose this trouble upon one whose kind
    courtesy will make it seem light to him. Accept my thanks in
    anticipation of your compliance.

    P. S. I should feel obliged if you could let me have your
    observations by return of post. Pray attribute this, perhaps
    excessive, liberty to the peculiar circumstances in which I am
    placed.

I have in vain endeavoured to ascertain what were the twelve languages
of this curious essay. As no trace of the copy is now to be found among
De Rossi’s papers, it seems probable that De Rossi, in complying with
the request contained in the letter, returned the paper to the writer
with his own corrections. But whatever these “twelve languages” may have
been, it is certain that, even at the date of this letter, Mezzofanti’s
attainments were by no means confined to that limit. My attention
has been called to a notice of him contained in a curious, though
little-known work, published at Milan in 1806,[319] which describes his
range of languages as far more extensive.

The work to which I refer is the narrative of an occurrence, which,
although not uncommon even down to a later date, it is difficult
now-a-days,—since Islam has ceased to

    ——————————wield, as of old, her thirsty lance,
    And shake her crimson plumage to the skies,—

to realize as an actual incident of the nineteenth century;[320]—the
adventures of an amateur antiquarian, who was made captive by Corsairs
and carried into Barbary. The hero of this adventure was a Milanese
ecclesiastic, Father Felix Caronni. He embarked at Palermo for Naples, in
a small merchant vessel laden with oranges, but had scarcely quitted the
shore when a pirate-ship hove in sight. The crew, as commonly happened
in such cases, took to the boat and escaped, leaving Father Caronni and
eighteen other passengers to the mercy of the Corsairs, who speedily
overpowered the defenceless little vessel. Caronni, as a subject of the
Italian Republic and a French citizen,[321] would have been secured
against capture; but his passport was in the hands of the captain who had
escaped; and thus, notwithstanding his protestations, he was seized along
with the rest, and, under circumstances of great cruelty and indignity,
they were all carried into Tunis. Here, however, at the reclamation of
the French, supported by the Austrian Consul, Father Caronni was saved
from the fate which awaited the rest of the captives—of being sold into
slavery,—and at the end of three months, (part of which he devoted to the
exploration of the antiquities of Tunis and the surrounding district,)
he was set at liberty and permitted to return to Italy.

Being at a loss, while preparing the narrative of his captivity for
publication, for a translation of the papers which he received at Tunis
when he was set at liberty, he had recourse to the assistance of the
Abate Mezzofanti, as he explains in the following passage.

“No sooner,” says he, “had I obtained the _Tiscara_[322] [passport,] than
I made an exact copy of it (with the exception of the Bey’s seal,) in
the precise dimensions of the original. It was not so easy, however, to
obtain a translation of this document in Italy, both because it had been
hastily written with a reed—the instrument which the Moors employ for
that purpose—and because there were introduced into it certain ciphers
which are peculiar to the Arabs of Barbary. These difficulties, however,
were happily overcome, thanks to the exceeding courtesy, as well as the
distinguished learning of the Abate Mezzofanti, Professor of Oriental
Languages in the Institute of Bologna, who is commonly reputed to be
master of more than twenty-four languages, the greater number of which he
speaks with fluency and purity. He has favoured me (in four long letters
which contain as much information as might supply a whole course of
lectures) with a literal and critically exact version of it, accompanied
by copious explanations, as also by a free translation in the following
terms:—

          “‘THERE IS BUT ONE GOD, AND MAHOMET IS HIS PROPHET.’

    “‘We have liberated Father Felix Caronni. He is hereby
    permitted to embark from Goletta for the country of the
    Christians, at the intervention of the French Consul, through
    the medium of his Dragoman, in consideration of the payment of
    ninety-nine sequins mahbub, and by the privilege of the mighty
    and generous Hamudah[323] Basha Bey, Ben-Dani, whom may God
    prosper!

                                 “Second Giomada, in the year 1219.’

“_Giomada_[324] is the name of the sixth month of the Arabs, and the
year indicated is the year of their Hegira.[325] And, as the Oriental
writing runs in the reverse order to ours, (that is, from right to
left,) it is necessary, in order that the words of the translation may
correspond with those of the original, to take the precaution of reading
it backwards, or, what will answer the same purpose, in a mirror. What
will strike the reader, however, as most strange, (as it did myself when
first the Tiscara was translated for me) is its particularizing the
‘payment of ninety-nine gold mahbubs,’ which, at the rate of nine _lire_
to each, would make eight hundred and ninety-one Milanese _lire_: whereas
this is utterly false as far as I am personally concerned, and the French
commissary did not give me the least intimation of any payment whatever.
The Abate Mezzofanti suggests with much probability, that it may be a
part of the _stylus curiæ_ of these greedy barbarians to boast in their
piratical diplomacy that no Christian, and still more no ecclesiastic,
has ever been made captive by them without being, even though a Frank,
supposed to be a lawful prize, and consequently without being made ‘to
bleed’ a little.”[326]

This is the first published notice of Mezzofanti which has come under my
observation; and it is particularly interesting as an early example of
his habit of cultivating not only the principal languages, but the minor
varieties of each. The knowledge that, when he had barely completed his
thirtieth year, he was reputed to be master of _more than twenty-four
languages_, may perhaps prepare us to regard with less incredulity the
marvels which we shall find related of his more advanced career.

In the autumn of the same year the Abate Mezzofanti paid his
long-intended visit to Parma and De Rossi. The Italians, and especially
the literary men of Italy, are proverbially bad travellers. Magliabecchi
never was outside of the gates of Florence in his life, except on two
occasions;—once as far as Fiesole, which may almost be called a suburb
of the city, and once again to a distance of ten miles. Many an Italian
Professor has passed an entire life without any longer excursion than
the daily walk from his lodgings to the lecture-room. Even the great
geographer, D’Anville, who lived to the age of eighty-five, is said never
to have left his native city, Paris;[327] and yet he was able to point
out many errors in the plan of the Troad made upon the spot by the Comte
de Choiseul. It has been frequently alleged of Mezzofanti, also, as
enhancing still more the marvel of his acquirements in languages, that,
until his fortieth year, he had never quitted his native city. That this
statement is not literally true appears from a letter which he wrote to
the Abate de Rossi, on his return to Bologna, after the visit to which I
have alluded.

    “Pressed as I am, by my many occupations,” he says, November
    11, 1805, “I cannot delay writing at least a few lines, in
    grateful acknowledgment of the kindnesses which I received from
    you during my happy sojourn in your city.

    “I had been prepared for this, as well by the reports of others
    regarding your amiable disposition, as by the courtesy which
    I had myself experienced; but all my anticipations had fallen
    far short of the reality. Feeling that it is impossible for me
    to offer you a suitable acknowledgment, I beg that, although
    I have neither words to express it, nor means of giving it
    effect, you will believe me to be deeply sensible of my
    obligation to you. I shall preserve all your valued presents
    with most jealous care. The ‘Persian Anthology’[328] has been
    greatly relished by all here who apply to the study of that
    language.

    “I shall often have to claim your indulgence for the trouble
    which I shall not fail to give you. After the many proofs I
    have had of your kindness, I feel that I should be offending
    you, were I to ask you to let me hope to reckon myself
    henceforward among your friends.”

The friendly courtesy of the Abate De Rossi rendered Mezzofanti’s stay at
Parma exceedingly agreeable. One of the friends whom he made during this
visit, the learned and venerable Librarian of the Ducal Library of that
city, Cavaliere Angelo Pezzana, still survives, and still speaks with an
affection which borders upon tenderness of the friendship which resulted
from their first meeting, and which was the pride of his later life.
Among the subjects of their conversation, Cavaliere Pezzana particularly
remembers some observations of Mezzofanti on certain affinities between
the Russian and Latin languages, which struck him by their acuteness and
originality.

A commission which M. Pezzana gave him at his departure led to the
following letter:—

                                       _Bologna, November 11, 1805._

    In the hope of being able to execute the little commission you
    gave me regarding the Aldine edition of Aristotle, I have put
    off writing until I should have searched in our Library.—On
    doing so, I find that I have been mistaken, as there is no
    copy of that edition here. I avail myself, however, of this
    opportunity to renew the assurance of my gratitude for the
    numberless kindnesses which you shewed me during the time it
    was my good fortune to be in your society;—kindnesses which I
    never can forget, and for which it is my most anxious desire
    to find some opportunity of making you a return. I beg you
    to present my respects to Dr. Tommasini, and to offer to
    Signor Bodoni and his lady my acknowledgments for their great
    courtesy. Should any occasion arise in which my humble services
    can be of use, I shall consider myself happy, if you will
    always put aside every idea of my occupations, and will honour
    me with your valued commands. Meanwhile accept the assurance of
    my sincere esteem and attachment.

Mezzofanti’s intimacy with the two gentlemen named in this letter,
Tommasini and Bodoni, was lasting and sincere. Tommasini, although an
eminent physician of Parma and an active member of most of the scientific
societies of his day, is little known outside of Italy: but Bodoni, the
celebrated printer and publisher of Parma, whose magnificent editions of
the classics are still among the treasures of every great library, was
a man of rare merit, and a not unworthy representative of the learned
fathers of his craft, the Stephens, the Manuzi, and Plantins of the
palmy days of typography. He was a native of Saluzzo in the kingdom of
Sardinia. His early taste for wood-engraving induced him to visit Rome
for the purpose of study: and he set out in company with a school-fellow,
whose uncle held some office in the Roman court. Bodoni supported himself
and his companion upon the way by the sale of his little engravings,
which are now prized as curiosities in the art. On their arrival,
however, being coldly received by the friend on whom they had mainly
relied, they resolved to return home; but before leaving Rome, Bodoni
paid a visit to the printing-office of the Propaganda, where he had the
good fortune to attract the notice of the Abate Ruggieri, then director
of that great press. He thus obtained employment in the establishment,
and at the same time was permitted to attend the Oriental Schools of the
Sapienza; and thus having learned Hebrew and Arabic, he was employed
exclusively upon the Oriental works printed by the Propaganda. The
excellence and accuracy of the editions of the _Missale Arabico-Coptum_,
and the _Alphabetum Tibetanum_ of Padre Giorgi which Bodoni printed,
excited universal admiration; and when, on occasion of the tragical death
of his friend and patron Ruggieri, he resolved to leave Rome, he was
earnestly invited to settle in England: but he accepted in preference an
invitation to Parma, where he was appointed Director of the Ducal Press,
and where all the well-known master-pieces of his art were successively
produced. Himself a man of much learning, and of a highly cultivated
mind, he enjoyed the friendship of most of the literati of Italy.

    Blest with a taste exact, yet unconfined,
    A knowledge both of books and human kind—

his conversation was in the highest degree entertaining and instructive;
and his correspondence, which has been published, is full of interest.
With the Abate De Rossi, who employed his press in all his Oriental
publications,[329] he was for years on terms of the closest intimacy;
and during Mezzofanti’s visit to Parma, he treated De Rossi’s young
disciple with a courtesy which Mezzofanti long and gratefully remembered.
Bodoni’s wife, who, upon his death in 1813, succeeded to his vast
establishment, was, like her husband, highly cultivated, and a most
amiable and excellent woman.

Among the languages which occupied Mezzofanti at this time, Persian
appears to have received the principal share of his attention. One of the
first presents which he received from De Rossi was, as we have seen, a
“Persian Anthology;” and in a letter to De Rossi, written early in 1806
(which Cavaliere Pezzana has published in the Modena Journal, _Memorie
di Religione_,) he expresses much anxiety to obtain a copy of the great
Persian classic, Kemal Eddin.

The same letter, however, contains another request from which it may be
inferred that much of his time was still drawn away from these studies by
his duties as librarian. Speaking of the catalogue then in preparation,
he complains of the miserably defective condition of the library in the
department of Bibliography; and begs of his correspondent to send him the
titles of the _Bibliotheca_ of Hottinger, (perhaps his _Promptuarium, seu
Bibliotheca Orientalis_, Heidelberg, 1658) and that of Wolff, in order
that he may provide himself with these works, as a guide in his task.

On this subject he speaks more explicitly in a letter of the 3rd of
March, in the same year. After alluding to a commission of De Rossi’s
which he had failed in executing, he proceeds:—

    The preparation of the Catalogue keeps me in constant
    occupation, because these Oriental books are for the most part
    without the name of the author or the title of the work. Their
    value, that is to say their scientific importance, bears no
    proportion to the labour they cost; inasmuch as they are all
    Grammatical Treatises, books of Law, and such like. However,
    should I meet any work of interest, I shall not fail to
    communicate it to you; although, I fancy, it will be difficult
    to meet with anything that you do not know already.

    I received from Vienna immediately on its publication, the
    Grammar of the learned Dombay,[330] who is well known for other
    works, particularly upon the language and history of Morocco.
    It happens that I have got two copies of it; and I have set one
    of them apart for you, for which you may perhaps give me in
    exchange one of your own duplicates. It contains the Grammar
    arranged after the manner of the Latin Grammarians; the rules
    of Persian according to Meninski,[331] with this advantage,
    that here they are given in consecutive order, whereas in
    Meninski they are found mixed up with those of the Arabic and
    Turkish. Your friend, M. Silvestre de Sacy, reviewed it in
    the _Magazin Encyclopedique_, and took exception to Dombay’s
    reducing the Persian to the system of the Latin Grammar. I hope
    shortly to receive the other from Leipsic, as also the tales of
    Nizami, in Persian and Latin, printed by Wolff, and published
    by L. Hill, who promised for the same year, 1802, an edition of
    the _Divan_ of Hafiz.[332]

    I am only waiting for a safe opportunity to forward your books.
    We cannot fail of one in the coming spring. As to the “Oriental
    Anthology,” I have given it in charge to the courier as far as
    Milan, but have not yet heard intelligence of it.

    Book-buying is undoubtedly very troublesome, and the least
    disagreeable part of it is the money the books cost, although
    in Oriental works I always find this excessive. I beg you not
    to spare me whenever any occasion offers in which my services
    may be useful.

The Abate de Rossi had requested to be furnished with a note of the
principal Oriental MSS. of the Bologna collection; but Mezzofanti’s
labour in preparing the general Catalogue was so great, and the time
fixed for its completion was so entirely inadequate, that, for a
considerable time, he was unable to comply with his friend’s request.
It is to this he alludes in the following letter, dated May 11, 1806.
After apologizing for the delay in forwarding the book referred to in the
letter of March 3rd, he proceeds:—

    My labour at the Catalogue still continues, nor can I hope at
    the period appointed for its close, to have done more than
    merely sketch it out;—that is, we shall have nothing entered
    but the bare titles of the works. This, however, in itself,
    is a task so difficult in our Oriental MSS., that, up to the
    present time, it has never been satisfactorily done. Besides
    the Oriental books, I have also to deal with the Greek; and all
    must be in readiness within the coming month. The truth is that
    I should require a year at least to give a proper shape to my
    labour, and in the beginning my impression was that it would
    require two. And in my present difficulty, what gives me most
    pain is that I am not able to send you, as early as I could
    wish, the note which you have often expressed a wish to obtain;
    but I shall send it the very first moment in my power.

    I have received your new work,[333] for which I beg you to
    accept my best thanks. I did not write at the moment, knowing
    you do not like very frequent letters; I have besides too much
    respect for time devoted like yours to the honour of Italy, on
    which your works in Oriental literature have shed a lustre. I
    long nevertheless for a fitting opportunity to prove to you the
    sincerity of my gratitude.

Under this constant and protracted labour Mezzofanti’s health began
to give way. His chest was seriously threatened during the summer of
1806, and had it not been that he fortunately obtained an extension of
the time allotted for the completion of his task at the Catalogue, it
is not unlikely that his constitution, naturally weak, might have been
permanently enfeebled. Family cares, too, formed no inconsiderable part
of his burden. The health of his mother, which had for a long time been
very uncertain, was completely broken down. She was now entirely blind.
For many weeks of this season he was in daily apprehension of her death;
and, in the pressure of his engagements, his hours of attendance on her
sick bed were subtracted from the time hitherto devoted to rest, already
sufficiently curtailed.

In the midst of these cares and occupations, Mezzofanti was surprised
by a flattering invitation to transfer his residence to Paris, with a
promise of patronage and distinction from the Emperor Napoleon, who was
at this time eagerly engaged in plans for the development of the literary
and artistic glories of his capital. More than one of Mezzofanti’s
countrymen were already in the enjoyment of high honours at Paris. First
among them may be named Volta, for many years Professor of Natural
Philosophy in the University of Pavia. More pliant than his great
fellow-discoverer, Galvani, or perhaps more favourably circumstanced as
not being, like him, a member of a Papal University, he had escaped the
proscription which brought Galvani to his grave—one of those victims of
loyalty whom Petrarch declares

          ————assai più belli
    Con la lor povertà, che Mida o Crasso
    Con l’oro, ond’ a virtù furon ribelli;—

Volta was called from Pavia to Paris, where he was rewarded with
distinctions, emoluments, titles, and, more flattering than all, with the
personal notice and patronage of the great conqueror himself, who was
often present at his experiments, and displayed a warm interest in the
results to which they led.[334]

Such were at this period the tempting rewards of scientific or literary
eminence in France. Moreover, Count Marescalchi, in whose family
Mezzofanti had acted as tutor and librarian during the years of his
deprivation, was now Resident Minister of the Kingdom of Italy at Paris.
The Count’s intercourse with Mezzofanti was but little interrupted by
their separation; and, even during his residence in Paris, the latter
continued to correspond with him; chiefly on matters connected with the
education of his children, or with the completion or extension of his
noble library. The extent of their intimacy indeed may be inferred from
one of Mezzofanti’s letters to the Count, dated September 16, 1806,
in which we find him freely employing the services of the minister in
procuring books at Paris, not only for himself but for his literary
friends in Bologna.[335]

It was through this Count Marescalchi that the invitation to Paris was
conveyed to Mezzofanti, and it cannot be doubted that it was accompanied
by a warm recommendation from the Count himself. No trace of this formal
correspondence is now discoverable; but probably far more interesting,
as it is certainly far more characteristic, than the official letter or
reply, is the following playful letter to one of Count Marescalchi’s
sons, Carlino (Charlie), Mezzofanti’s former pupil—now the representative
of the house—who had written a special letter, to add the expression of
his own wishes to those of his father, that his old instructor should
join them once again at Paris.

                                      _Bologna, September 16, 1806._

    But three letters, dearest Charlie, in an entire year—two
    from Lyons, and one from Paris—to cheer my regrets in being
    separated from you! If I were to take this as the measure of
    your love for me, I should indeed have reason to be sad. But I
    have abundant other proofs of your feelings in my regard; and
    at all events, I am not one who can afford to be too rigid in
    insisting upon the frequency of correspondence, unless I wish
    to furnish grave grounds of complaint against myself.

    Few, however, as your letters have been, I am deeply grateful
    for their warm and affectionate sentiments, which carry with
    them such an evidence of sincerity as to leave me, even when
    you do not write, no ground for doubting what your feelings
    still are towards me. I am not sure whether in your regard I
    shall be equally fortunate; for I am fully sensible that I have
    not the power of infusing into what I write all the warmth and
    sincerity that I really feel. However, you are not dependent
    on my words, in order to be satisfied of the truth of my
    affection; and, knowing it as you do, even a lesser token of it
    than this will suffice to convince you.

    I am still here at Bologna following the same old round of
    occupations. Nor am I dissatisfied with my lot, for I am quite
    sensible of my inability to take a loftier flight. I feel that
    the shade suits me best. Were I to go to Paris, I should be
    obliged to set myself up upon some candlestick, where I should
    only give out a faint and flickering gleam, which would soon
    die utterly away. Nevertheless I am not the less grateful for
    your advice; though I perceive that you are dissatisfied with
    me because I am such a little fellow.

    A thousand, thousand greetings to your dear little sisters.
    Renew my remembrance to your father, and when you have an
    occasional moment of leisure from your tasks, pray bestow it
    upon

                          Your sincere friend,

                                               D. JOSEPH MEZZOFANTI.

Besides the unaffected modesty and the distrust of his own fitness for
a prominent position (even with such advantages as those offered to him
at Paris,) which are expressed in this letter, the Abate Mezzofanti
was also moved to decline the invitation, both by affection for his
native city and love of its university life (to which we shall find him
looking back with fondness even after his elevation to the cardinalate,)
and by unwillingness to part from his family, to whom he was tenderly
attached. To the latter he had always felt himself bound by duty as well
as by affection. The expense of the education of his sister’s children,
who at this time, (as appears from a little Memoir in the archives of
the University drawn up in 1815,) were seven in number, amounted to a
considerable sum. They, as well as their parents, still continued to
reside in his house; and the same Memoir alludes to another near relative
who was at least partially dependent upon him for support.

To these children, indeed, he was as a father. Cavaliere Minarelli, in
the interesting note already cited, describes him as “most affectionately
devoted to them, and uniting in his manners the loving familiarity of
a friend with the graver authority of an instructor.” In his brief
intervals of leisure from business or study, he often joined them in
their little amusements. Without the slightest trace of austerity,
he generally managed to give their amusements, as far as possible, a
religious character. He usually made the festivals memorable to them by
some extra indulgence or entertainment. He encouraged and directed their
childish tastes in the embellishment of their little oratories, or in
those well-known Christmas devices of Catholic children, the preparation
of the “Crib of the Infant Jesus,” or the decoration of the “Christmas
Tree.” He hoarded his little resources in order to procure for them
improving and instructive books. He composed simple odes and sonnets for
the several festivals, which it was his greatest enjoyment to hear them
recite. The simplicity of his disposition, and a natural fondness for
children which was one of the characteristics even of his later life,
made all this easy to him. He was always ready, if not to take a part, at
least to manifest an interest, in the pleasures of his young friends. In
the carnival especially, when amusement seems, for a time, to form the
serious business of every Italian household, he was never wanting; and,
on one memorable occasion, he actually composed a little comedy, to be
acted by his nephews and nieces for the humble family circle.

During the whole winter of 1806-7 his time was still occupied in the
uncongenial labour of compiling the Catalogue.

On the 25th of September, he writes to the Abate De Rossi, apologizing
for delay in replying to a letter received from him.

    “A complication of unfortunate accidents has, up to this
    moment, prevented me from answering your kind letter of last
    July. My poor mother has frequently, during the summer, been
    in extreme danger of death. My own chest, too, has more than
    once been threatened, and is still far from strong. All this,
    however, does not save me from a feeling of remorse at having
    been so tardy towards one whose scientific reputation, as well
    as his courteous manners, entitle him to so much consideration.
    My labour, as you say, is not yet over. The task, as I
    had indeed anticipated from the beginning, has proved an
    exceedingly difficult one. As an evidence of the difficulty I
    need only mention that the celebrated Giuseppe Assemani, in
    the similar work which he undertook,[336] has made numerous
    mistakes, having in one instance given no less than six
    different titles to seven copies of the same work. This great
    orientalist, with all his learning, could not command the time
    necessary for so troublesome a task as that of ascertaining the
    titles and authors of books which are quite unknown and often
    imperfect. For my part, I resolved from the beginning that I
    would not, willingly at least, add to the other deficiencies of
    which I am conscious, that of haste and insufficient time. _Nam
    quo minus ingenio possum, subsidio mihi diligentiam comparavi_;
    and the condescension of his Serene Highness has in the end
    relieved me, by extending until April the time allowed for the
    completion of the task. The grammarians, rhetoricians, poets,
    prosodians, logicians, and theologians, have taken up all my
    time hitherto; in the course of the next two months, I hope to
    complete the enumeration of the other authors; and then I shall
    at last fulfil my promise of sending you, when occasion serves,
    whatever I think may interest you.”

De Rossi, in his letter, to which this is a reply, had put some
questions regarding the contents of the octavo edition of D’Herbelot’s
_Bibliothèque Orientale_, the preface of which had contained a promise
of many important improvements. Mezzofanti, referring to these promised
additions, goes on to say, “In the articles which I have compared, I
have only found a few verbal corrections. But in the preface, we are
promised additional articles, drawn from the narratives of travellers
subsequent to D’Herbelot. From this promise you will be able to infer
what information you may expect to derive from the edition, and whether
it is likely to be useful for your purpose. I have not yet received
the supplement, which was to contain certain articles which have been
postponed for reasons explained in the preface. Perhaps the reason of its
not having been printed, may be, that the articles in question, being of
use to orientalists alone, may be found by them in the former editions.

“As it would be no small distinction for the collection of Oriental MSS.
belonging to this Royal Library of ours, if among them there should be
found any deserving of a place amongst the MSS. cited in your dictionary,
I shall endeavour, in the hope that it may prove so, to complete my task
as speedily as possible, so as to send you at least an index, out of
which you may yourself choose the name of any author whom you shall judge
deserving of notice.

“I believe Dombay’s work has been published. I have the title,
‘_Geschichte der Mauritan. Könige; aus dem Arabischen übersetzt_’;[337]
but without date or place. I shall write to Vienna as soon as I can, to
order it, if it should be published. I have made a good many interesting
acquisitions lately; as for instance, _Albucasis ‘De Chirurgia.’_[338]
Oxonii, 1778. ‘_Maured Allatafet Jemaleddini filii Togri Bardii; seu
Rerum Aegyptiacarum Annales ab Anno C. 971 ad 1453_’;[339] several
‘_Anthologias_’ and ‘_Chrestomathias_;’ one of which, that of Rink and
Vater, has at the end a _Bibliotheca Arabica_ continued up to 1802; and
some other books.”

       *       *       *       *       *

At this date, Mezzofanti’s correspondence with De Rossi is interrupted;
and, although there appears to have been a pretty regular interchange of
correspondence between them for some years longer,[340] no further letter
has been found among those of De Rossi’s papers which are deposited in
the library of Parma, except one written in the year 1812.

Scanty as are the details supplied by those which are preserved, they,
at least, afford some insight into the process by which the writer’s
extraordinary faculty was developed and perfected. However acute and
almost instinctive this faculty may have been, it is plain from these
letters, that it was at this time most systematically and laboriously
cultivated. However much Mezzofanti may have owed to nature, it is
certain, that for all the practical results of his great natural gifts
he was indebted to his own patient and almost plodding industry; and
it may cheer the humble student in the long and painful course through
which alone he can aspire to success, to find that even this prodigy of
language was forced to tread the same laborious path;—to see the anxious
care with which he collected and consulted grammars, dictionaries,
manuals, reading books, and other similar commonplace appliances of the
study; and to learn, that, with all his unquestioned and unquestionable
genius, he did not consider himself above the drudgery at which even less
gifted students are but too apt to murmur or repine.

It may be added that the toilsome practice of writing out translations
from one language into another which these letters disclose, was
continued by Mezzofanti through his entire career of study, although in
his latter years he pursued it more as an amusement than as a serious
task.

It is hard, in ordinary cases, to infer from such performances the exact
degree of proficiency in the language which they should be presumed
to indicate. Some translations are only the fruit of long and careful
study.[341] On the contrary, there are instances on record in which
excellent translations have been produced by persons possessing a very
slight knowledge of the original. Thus Monte, the author of the best
Italian translation of Homer, was utterly unacquainted with Greek;[342]
Halley, without knowing a word of Arabic, was able to guess his way,
(partly by mathematical reasoning, partly by the aid of a Latin version,
which, however, only contained about one-tenth of the entire work,)
through an Arabic translation of Apollonius _De Sectione Rationis_;[343]
and M. Arnaud, the first French translator of Lalla Rookh, did not know a
word of the English language.[344]

But on all these points Mezzofanti’s fame is beyond suspicion. His
translations, at least in his later life, were at once produced with
the utmost freedom and rapidity, and are universally acknowledged to
have been models of verbal correctness; and in most instances where the
same passage is translated into many languages, the versions display a
remarkable mastery over the peculiar forms and idioms of each.

This wonderful success must be ascribed, no doubt, to his early and
systematic exercise in translation, of which the specimen submitted to De
Rossi is but one example.




CHAPTER IV.

[1807-1814.]


The _Catalogue Raisonné_ of the Oriental and Greek manuscripts was not
completed until 1807, having thus absorbed the greater part of Abate
Mezzofanti’s time during two years.

A large proportion of the Oriental MSS. had never even been entered upon
the ordinary library catalogue, and no attempt at all had been made
to describe them accurately, much less to register their character or
contents. Very many of them too, as we learn from Mezzofanti’s letters,
were imperfect; and a still more considerable number wanted at least the
title and the name of the author. It was no trivial labour, therefore,
to examine the entire collection; to decide on the name, the age, and
the authorship of each; to describe their contents; and to reduce them
all into their respective classes. For most of these particulars the
compiler of the catalogue was utterly without a guide. It is true that
Joseph Assemani’s catalogue of the Oriental MSS. of the Vatican, and
the catalogue of those of the Medicean Library at Florence by his
nephew Stephen Evodius, were in some cases available. But many of the
Bologna MSS. are not to be found in either catalogue; and for all these
Mezzofanti was of course compelled to rely altogether on his own lights.

The catalogue, as drawn up by him, is still preserved, and,
notwithstanding these disadvantages, is described as a highly creditable
performance, and “a valuable supplement to the labours of Talmar and
the Assemanis;”[345] and at all events it was to his long and laborious
researches while engaged in its preparation, that he owed that minute
familiarity with the whole literature of the East, ancient and modern,
which, as we shall see, was a subject of wonder even to learned orientals
themselves.

During the year 1807, an opportunity occurred for testing practically
how far the reputation which he had acquired corresponded with his real
attainments. On the outbreak of hostilities between the Porte and Russia
in that year, the Russian ambassador, Italinski, withdrew (not without
some risk and difficulty)[346] from Constantinople, and, being conveyed
on board the British ship of war, Canopus, to Malta, afterwards made his
way to Ancona. While the ambassador remained at Ancona, the chancellor of
the embassy, Angelo Timoni, who was of Bolognese origin, came to visit
his native city; accompanied by Matteo Pisani, the official interpreter,
who was one of the best linguists of his time, and especially a perfect
master of all the modern languages of the East. As they resided, during
their stay at Bologna, in the house of his friend, Dr. Santagata, their
visit was a severe ordeal for Mezzofanti, who was constantly in their
society; but he withstood it triumphantly; and Santagata records their
wonder and delight to find that, without ever having visited the East,
or mixed in Oriental society, the Bolognese professor had nevertheless
attained a “mastery over the many and various languages, especially
Oriental ones, in which they tried him, and that the marvellous and all
but inconceivable accounts which they had received regarding him, proved
to be not only credible but actually true.”[347]

A great and lasting mortification nevertheless soon afterwards befel
Mezzofanti, in the unexpected deprivation of his beloved professorship.
The circumstances which accompanied his removal have not been fully
detailed, but there is enough in the history of the period to supply an
intelligible explanation. The conflict of Napoleon with the Holy See
was just then approaching its crisis. From the beginning of this year
the French troops had occupied Rome. Two cardinal secretaries of state
had been forcibly ejected from office. The Pope was a prisoner in his
own palace and his authority was completely superseded. Now upon these
and the many similar outrages to which the venerable Pontiff was daily
subjected, the opinions of Mezzofanti were no secret; and there can be
no doubt that the determination of the Government to remove him from
the university was mainly influenced by this knowledge; although in
deference to public opinion, and to the universal feeling of respect
with which he was regarded, they abstained from formally depriving him
of his professorship. His removal was effected indirectly by a decree,
dated November 15, 1808, by which the Oriental professorship itself was
suppressed.

Although a pension, and as it would seem, not a very illiberal one,
was assigned to him, he felt very deeply this exclusion from a career
so congenial to his tastes. He continued nevertheless, as before, to
instruct pupils privately in these and other languages; and although, as
to details, the history of his own studies at this time is a complete
blank, yet from his known habits it may reasonably be presumed that when
the first feeling of mortification had subsided, the ultimate result of
his release from the duties of his chair, was to direct his untiring
energies into new fields of research; and it seems to have been during
this interval that he first gave his attention to the Sanscrit and other
Indian languages;—a family which had till then been but little cultivated
except in England, but to whose vast importance, as well as widely
extended philological relations, Frederic Schlegel[348] had just awakened
the attention of the learned throughout continental Europe.

       *       *       *       *       *

From the date of this second deprivation, till the year 1812, his quiet
and uniform course of life presents hardly a single interesting incident.

In June, 1810, his mother died. But her advanced age and infirm health
had long prepared him for this bereavement. She died on the feast of St.
Aloysius (June 21,) in her seventy-third year.

The only detail regarding his personal occupations, which I have been
able to discover, is derived from a letter, dated November 30th,
1811,[349] to his friend Pezzana, at Parma, which exhibits him again
engaged in the drudgery of compiling a catalogue—that of the library
of Count Marescalchi. Pezzana had published, some time before, a short
bibliographical essay on two very rare editions of Petrarch, which are
still preserved in the Parma Collection. Mezzofanti, while engaged in
cataloguing the Marescalchi library, discovered a copy of one of these
editions, and at once wrote to communicate the fact to Pezzana.

I may also mention, what, in a life so uneventful, must claim to be
regarded as an event—a short journey which he made to Modena and Mantua.
Joseph Minarelli, the eldest of his sister’s sons, was summoned to
Modena in 1813, to ballot in the conscription which followed the terrible
campaign of 1812, so fatal to the armies of France. Signora Minarelli
was naturally much alarmed at the chance of her son’s being drawn in the
conscription, and in consideration for her anxiety, his uncle accompanied
him to Modena upon the occasion.

It becomes especially difficult henceforward to follow the history of his
studies. The literary friends of this part of his career;—his colleagues
in the University; Ranzani; Caturegli, the astronomer; the eminent
botanist, Felippo Re; his fellow-pupil and fellow-teacher, Clotilda
Tambroni; Schiassi; Magistrini; and others of less note, who could have
supplied information, not only as to his habits and pursuits, but as to
the actual stages of his progress, are long since dead. The letters of
Pietro Giordani,[350] however, recently published, may, in some measure,
fill up the blank; not, it is true, as to the details of his biography,
but at least in so far as regards the opinion entertained in Bologna of
his character and acquirements. Indeed the testimony of Giordani is less
open to exception than any which could have emanated from the personal
friends of Mezzofanti. Giordani had entered the Benedictine congregation,
and had even received the order of sub-deaconship; but on the outbreak
of the Revolution, he had renounced the monastic life, cast aside the
Benedictine habit, and thrown himself into the arms of the revolutionary
party in Italy. Under the French rule at Bologna, he obtained as the
reward of his principles, the place of Assistant Librarian, and also that
of Deputy Professor of Latin and Italian Eloquence. Hence it will easily
be believed that his relations with the Papal party in the University
were by no means friendly; and, as he had had with the Abate Mezzofanti
himself (as I learn from an interesting letter of M. Libri which shall be
inserted hereafter,) some personal misunderstandings, he may be presumed
to have been but little disposed to over-rate the qualifications of an
antagonist. It is no mean evidence of Mezzofanti’s merit, therefore, that
Giordani has specially excepted him from the very disparaging estimate
which he expresses regarding the literary men of Italy at this time.
“I have held but little intercourse with literary men,” he writes to
his friend Lazzaro Papi, “finding them commonly possessed of but little
learning and a great deal of passion. Here, however, I have met an
exception to the rule—the Abate Mezzofanti—a man not only of the utmost
piety, but of attainments truly wonderful and all but beyond belief. You
must, of course, have heard of him; but indeed he well deserves a wider
fame than he enjoys, for the number of languages which he knows most
perfectly, although this is the least part of his learning. Nevertheless,
such is his excessive modesty, that he lives here in obscurity, and I
must add, to the disgrace of the age, in poverty.”[351]

Nor is Giordani’s report to be regarded as one of those vague panegyrics,
which, when Mezzofanti’s fame was established, each new visitor was
wont to re-echo. Giordani is not only well-known as one of the purest
Italian writers of the century, but enjoyed the highest reputation as a
critical scholar; and the subject on which, in another of his letters,
he defers to the judgment of Mezzofanti—a delicate question of Greek
criticism—was precisely that on which he himself was best qualified to
pronounce. In a letter to the Abate Canova (Feb 3, 1812,) he mentions a
conjecture that had recently interested him very much; viz., that the
great Roman architect, Vitruvius, was a Greek, although he wrote in
Latin. His chief argument is based upon Vitruvius’s Latinity, in which
he detects traces of foreign idiom. But, lest he should yield too much
to fancy, he had appealed to the judgment of some of his colleagues, and
he communicates the result to his correspondent. One of the persons thus
consulted was Mezzofanti. “I should not rely on my own judgment,” says
Giordani, “had I not convinced Cicognara and Mezzofanti that it is right.
The authority of the latter is the more important, because my argument
rests chiefly on the style, in every line of which I find impressed, even
where the subject is not technical, traces of halting [_storpiato_] and
ill-translated Greek; and you know what a judge Mezzofanti is of this
point.”[352]

In a letter to another friend, Count Leopoldo Cicognara, (since known
as the biographer of Canova)[353] Giordani reports the sequel of this
discussion, which confirms in a very remarkable manner, Giordani’s
judgment of Mezzofanti’s critical sagacity. Mezzofanti had at first
assented to Giordani’s conjecture; but on a closer examination he
discovered, that what Giordani had considered the Grecisms of Vitruvius’s
style, were, in reality, but _translations from various Greek authors_,
from whom Vitruvius largely borrows, and whom he actually enumerates in
the preface of the seventh book. Mezzofanti further pointed out a phrase
in the same preface which at once put an end to the discussion, and the
discovery of which, as Giordani justly observes, in itself “indicated an
inquiring and critical mind.” Vitruvius, in speaking of the Latin writers
upon his art, as contradistinguished from the Greek, calls them “antiqui
_nostri_.”[354]

To the same friend, Count Cicognara, Giordani in a previous letter,
dated January 30th, 1812, had written of Mezzofanti’s own peculiar
faculty of languages, in terms of almost rapturous admiration. “You
know Mezzofanti,” he says;—“Mezzofanti—the rarest, most unheard of,
most inconceivable of living men. I call him, and he is, the man of all
nations and all ages. By Jove! he appears as though he had been born in
the beginning of the world, and, like St. Anthony, had lived in every
age and in every country!”[355]

In connexion with this very remarkable testimony to the accuracy of
Mezzofanti’s knowledge of Greek, I may mention (although it more properly
belongs to a later period of his life) an amusing anecdote illustrative
of his accomplishments as a Latinist, which is recorded by Dr. Santagata,
and the hero of which was M. Bucheron, Professor of Latin Literature
in the University of Turin, and one of the most celebrated classical
philologists of modern Italy. M. Bucheron came to Bologna, from some
cause strongly prepossessed against Mezzofanti, and disposed to regard
him in the light of a mere literary charlatan, of showy but superficial
acquirements. Of his Latinity—especially in all that bears upon the
critical niceties of the language, and the numberless philological
questions regarding it which have arisen among modern scholars, M.
Bucheron entertained the lowest possible estimate;—considering it, in
truth, impossible, that one whose attention had been divided over so many
languages as fame ascribed to Mezzofanti, _could be_ solidly grounded
in any of them. He resolved, therefore, to put the Abate’s Latinity
to a rigorous test; and came to the library prepared with a number of
questions, bearing upon the niceties of the Latin language, which he
proposed to introduce, as it were casually, in his expected conversation.
He was presented to Mezzofanti by his friend, Michele Ferrucci, Librarian
of the University of Pisa, from whom, I may add, Dr. Santagata received
the account of their interview. The conversation, as Bucheron had
pre-determined, began upon some common-place subject: but in a short time
he artfully contrived to turn it upon those topics on which he desired
to probe his companion. The trial was a most animated one. From a series
of obscure and difficult questions of Latin philology, they passed to a
variety of oriental, historical, and archæological topics. At the moment
when the interest of the conversation was at its very height, Ferrucci
was unfortunately called away by business; but the result may be judged
from the sequel. On his return, after a somewhat lengthened absence, he
met Bucheron coming from the Library.

“Well,” said he, “what do you think of Mezzofanti?”

“_Per Bacco!_” replied the astounded Piedmontese. “_Per Bacco! é il
Diavolo!_”[356]

His celebrity, indeed, was by this time universally established. With all
his unaffected humility; with the full consciousness (which he expressed
in all simplicity and truth to his young friend, Carlino Marescalchi)
that he was “best fitted for the shade”—he had insensibly grown into
one of the notabilities of Bologna. He was constantly visited and
consulted, especially by Oriental students, from foreign countries. What
is more remarkable, more than one Jewish scholar appears in the record
of his visitors. Among the papers of the Abate De Rossi is a letter
of this period (March 18th, 1812,) in which Mezzofanti introduces to
him a certain “Signor Moise Ber;” and, notwithstanding the variety of
orthography, (a variety quite natural in an Italian letter,) there can be
no doubt that this Signor Moise Ber was no other than Rabbi Moses Beer
of the Israelite University of Rome, whose Orations and Discourses have
since been published.[357]

       *       *       *       *       *

Mezzofanti’s opportunities of conversing with foreigners were much
increased by his becoming permanently attached to the Library of the
University (with which the Library of the Institute had been incorporated
by the French) as Deputy-Librarian. This appointment he received on the
28th of March, in 1812. As the chief librarian at this time was the
Abate Pozzetti, who, like Mezzofanti, was an honorary professor of the
University, and one of his most valued friends, the appointment was
especially agreeable to him: and, independently of its other advantages,
it became for him, as I said, from the constant passing and re-passing of
strangers from every country, a school in which he was able to exercise
himself, almost hourly, in every department of his multilingual studies.

The late Lord Guilford, who was Chancellor of the University of Corfu,
made his acquaintance during one of his visits to Bologna; and on every
subsequent occasion on which he passed through that city, Mezzofanti was
invariably his guest, accompanied by all the Greeks who chanced to be at
the time students of the University.

As his reputation extended, the literary societies of the various cities
of Italy were naturally desirous to number him among their members. He
was already an associate of the _Societá Colombina_ at Florence, and of
the “Society of Letters, Sciences, and Arts,” at Leghorn; and he received
about this time, the decoration of the Royal Order of the Two Sicilies.
The only literary society, however, in whose proceedings he took an
active part, was the Scientific Academy of the Institute of his native
city. It has been commonly supposed that he rarely, if at all, appeared
in the literary arena, and it is true that he has not left behind him
anything at all commensurate with his reputation; but he frequently read
papers, chiefly on philological subjects, in the Bolognese Academy. The
first of these which is noticed by Dr. Santagata was read on the 22nd of
July, 1813; and another, “On the Symbolic Paintings of the Mexicans,” was
delivered in the following session, on the 23rd of March, 1814. Owing
to his early association with several ex-Jesuit American Missionaries
who had settled in Bologna, he had long felt an interest in the curious
subject of Mexican Antiquities. Among his MSS., which still remain in the
possession of the Cavaliere Minarelli at Bologna, is a Mexican Calendar,
drawn up by Mezzofanti’s own hand, and illustrated with fac-similes of
the original pictures and symbolical representations from the pencil of
his niece, Signora Anna Minarelli; but of the paper read in the Academy,
no trace has been found.




CHAPTER V.

[1814-1817.]


The year 1814, so memorable in general history, was also an important one
in the humble fortunes of the Abate Mezzofanti.

The success of the papal cause in Italy naturally opened a new career to
the men against whom fidelity to the papal interest had long closed the
ordinary avenues to distinction.

In the close of 1813, the reverses, which, from the disastrous Russian
expedition, had succeeded each other with startling rapidity, at length
forced upon Napoleon the conviction that he had overcalculated the
endurance of the people of France. He now learned, when too late, that
the reckless expenditure of human blood with which his splendid successes
were purchased, had brought sorrow and suffering to every fireside in
every hamlet through his wide empire, and that the enormous levies which
he still continued to demand, and which were called out only to perish
in the fruitless contest with his destiny, consummated the popular
discontent. No longer, therefore, in a position to brave the public
reprobation with which his treatment of Pius VII. had been visited,
he found it necessary to restore the semblance of those more friendly
relations which he had maintained with him in the less openly ambitious
stage of his career. Accordingly, although among the provisions of the
extorted Concordat of Fontainebleau, there was none to which Napoleon,
in his secret heart, clung more tenaciously than the renunciation which
it implied on the part of the Pontiff of the sovereignty of Rome, he
found it necessary, notwithstanding, to yield so far to public sympathy
as to issue an order for the Pope’s immediate return to Italy, dated the
22nd of January, 1814. This measure, nevertheless, had evidently been
extorted from his fears; and, as he desired nothing from it beyond the
effect which he expected it to produce on the public mind, he contrived
that upon various pretences the Pope’s progress should be interrupted
and delayed. For a short time, too, the varying success with which the
memorable campaign of 1814 commenced; the opening of the Congress of
Chatillon; the conclusion of the armistice of Lusigny;—all served to
re-animate his sinking hopes. Thus the Pope was detained day after day,
week after week, in the south of France, until the close of the Emperor’s
death struggle, by the capitulation of Paris; when Pius VII. was at
length set free to return to his capital, by an order of the provisional
government, dated the 2nd of April, 1814.

Within a few days after the communication of this order, Pius VII.
reached Bologna. Among the ecclesiastics who there hastened to offer
homage to their restored sovereign, there were few who could approach
his throne with a fuller consciousness of unsullied loyalty, or who could
present more unequivocal evidences of the truth and sincerity of the
allegiance which they tendered, than the ex-Professor Mezzofanti, driven
from his chair because he refused to compromise his loyalty even by an
indirect recognition of the Anti-Papal government, and only restored,
when, after the concordat of 1801, the occupation of the Legations had
been acquiesced in by the Pontificial government itself, he had a second
time suffered the penalty of loyalty in a similar deprivation. It will
easily be believed, therefore, that, in the more than gracious reception
accorded to him by the Pontiff, a feeling of grateful recognition of
his fidelity and of sympathy with the sacrifices which he had made, was
mingled with undisguised admiration of his talents and acquirements.

Hence the first impulse of this munificent pope was to attach to his
own immediate service a scholar who was at once eminent for learning,
distinguished by piety, by priestly zeal, and by loyalty in the hour of
trial, unstained even by the slightest compromise. The re-construction of
the various Roman tribunals and congregations which, during the captivity
of the Pope and Cardinals, had been, for the most part, suspended,
suggested an opportunity of employing, with marked advantage for the
public service, the peculiar talents which seemed almost idly wasted in
the obscurity of a provincial capital. The halls and public offices of
Rome had been the school or the arena of all the celebrated linguists of
the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries; and the very constitution of
the congregation and college, “De Propaganda Fide,” appeared specially to
invite the services of one so eminent in that department. Accordingly,
Pius VII. surprised the modest Abate by an invitation to accompany him
to Rome, and proposed for his acceptance the important office of the
secretaryship of the Propaganda[358]—one of those so called _poste
cardinalizie_, which constitute the first step in the career towards the
cardinalate.

Mezzofanti was deeply affected by this mark of the favour and confidence
of his sovereign. Independently, too, of these flattering considerations,
and of the advantages of rank and fortune which it involved, the mere
residence in Rome, and especially in the Propaganda—the great polyglot
centre of the ancient and modern world—had many attractions for a
student of language so enthusiastic and indefatigable. It was a proud
thought, moreover, to follow in the track of Ubicini, and Giorgi, and
Piromalli, and the Assemani’s. But his modesty was proof against all
these temptations. He shrank from the responsibility which this great
office involved;—and, with the every expression of gratitude for so
distinguished an honour, he declined to exchange the quiet and seclusion
of his life at Bologna, for the more brilliant, but far more anxious
position held out for his acceptance at Rome.

Not content, however, with personal solicitations, the Pope employed
Cardinal Consalvi to use his influence with Mezzofanti. But it was to no
purpose. The humble Abate could not be induced to leave his native city.
The only mark of favour, therefore, which remained at the disposal of
the pontiff, was one which Mezzofanti prized infinitely beyond the more
solid, as well as more brilliant, offer which awaited him at Rome,—his
re-establishment in the Professorship of Oriental Languages. He was
formally restored on the 28th of April, 1814,[359] a few days after the
departure of the Pope from Bologna.

There is no doubt that on this occasion, as on that of his declining
the invitation to Paris several years earlier, he was much influenced
by those considerations, arising from his relations to the children of
his sister, to which I already alluded, his presence in Bologna being
now more than ever necessary for the completion of their education.
Indeed this was now the chief family duty which bound him to Bologna; for
his father, who had survived his mother by several years, died, at the
advanced age of eighty-one, in April, 1814, during the visit of Pius VII.
to that city.

       *       *       *       *       *

The few notices of the Abate Mezzofanti which we have met up to
this period, are derived almost exclusively from Bolognese, or at
least Italian sources. During the long continental war, the ordinary
intercourse with Italy was, in great part, suspended, and few tourists,
especially of the literary class, visited the north of Italy. But the
cessation of hostilities in the spring of 1814, re-opened the long
interrupted communication, and the annual stream of visitors to Rome
and Naples again began to flow, with its wonted regularity, through the
cities of the north. Few of the tourists who published an account of
their travels at this date failed to devote some of their pages to one
who had now become one of the chief “sights” of his native city. It is
hardly necessary to say, that, in some instances, these accounts are but
the echoes of popular fame, and exhibit the usual amount of ignorance,
credulity, and superficial information, which characterise “travellers’
tales.” But very many, also, will be found to contain the judgment of
acute, learned, and impartial observers; many of them are the result
of a careful and jealous scrutiny of Mezzofanti’s attainments, made by
critics of indisputable capacity; most of them will be admitted to be of
unquestionable value, as to one point at least—Mezzofanti’s familiarity
with the native language of each particular traveller; and all, even the
least solid among them, are interesting, as presenting to us, with the
freshness of contemporary narrative, the actual impressions received by
the writer from his opportunities of personal intercourse with the great
linguist.

I have collected from many sources, published[360] and unpublished,
a variety of these travellers’ notices, which I shall use freely in
illustrating the narrative of the remaining years of the life of
Mezzofanti. I shall be careful, however, in all that regards the critical
portion of the biography, and especially in estimating the actual
extent of Mezzofanti’s linguistic attainments, only to rely, for each
language, on the authority of one who, either as a native, or at least an
unquestioned proficient in that particular language, will be admitted to
be a perfectly competent judge in its regard.

The autumn of the year 1814 supplies one such notice, which is
remarkable, as the first direct testimony to Mezzofanti’s proficiency
in speaking German. He had learned this language in boyhood; and it is
clear from his letters to De Rossi, and from the books to which he freely
refers in that correspondence, that he was intimately acquainted with it
as a language of books. But in this year we are able for the first time
to test his power of speaking German by the judgment of a native.

The writer in question is a German tourist, named Kephalides, professor
in the University of Breslau,[361] who (as may be inferred from his
alluding to the Congress of Vienna, as just opened) visited Bologna
in the October or November of 1814. “The Professor Abate Mezzofanti,”
writes this traveller, who met him in the Library, “speaks German with
extraordinary fluency, although he has never been out of Bologna. He is a
warm admirer, too, of the literature of Germany, especially its poetry;
and he has stirred up the same enthusiasm among the educated classes in
Bologna, both gentlemen and ladies.”[362] We learn incidentally, too,
from this writer’s narrative, that German was among the languages which
Mezzofanti taught to his private pupils. In a rather interesting account
of an interview which he had with old Father Emmanuel Aponte, (one of
Mezzofanti’s first instructors,) and with the celebrated lady-professor
of Greek, so often referred to, Clotilda Tambroni, Kephalides mentions
that the youth whom Mezzofanti sent to conduct him to Aponte was one of
his own pupils, who had just begun to “lisp German.” Strangely enough,
nevertheless, Kephalides does not allude to any other of Mezzofanti’s
languages, nor even to his general reputation as a linguist of more than
ordinary attainments.

In the commencement of the year 1815, the chief Librarianship of the
University became vacant by the death of Father Pompilio Pozzetti.
Pozzetti was one of the congregation of the _Scuole Pie_, and in earlier
life had been Librarian of that Ducal Library at Modena, which Tiraboschi
has made familiar to every student of Italian literature. From the time
of his appointment as Prefect of the Bologna Library, a close intimacy
had subsisted between him and Mezzofanti; and on the latter’s being
named his assistant, this intimacy ripened into a warm friendship.
Mezzofanti was at once appointed as his successor, on the 25th of April,
1815.[363] In the letter in which (May 15th,) he communicated his
appointment to his friend, Pezzana, who held the kindred office at Parma,
he speaks in terms of the highest praise of his predecessor and of the
services which he had rendered during his tenure of office, and deplores
his death as a serious loss to the institution.

The revenue of this office, which he held conjointly with his
professorship, (although both salaries united amounted to a very
moderate sum)[364] placed the Abate Mezzofanti in comparatively easy
circumstances, and for the first time above the actual struggle for
daily bread. That he still continued, nevertheless, to instruct pupils
in private, need hardly be matter of surprise, when it is remembered
that, as we have seen, the support of no less than ten individuals was
dependent upon his exertions.[365]

Indeed, once released from the sordid cares and excessive drudgery of
tuition to which his earlier years had been condemned,—

    The starving meal, and all the thousand aches
      Which patient merit of the unworthy takes—

the exercise of teaching was to him rather an enjoyment than a labour.
After his removal to the Vatican Library, and even after his elevation to
the Cardinalate, we shall find it his chief, if not his only, relaxation.
Few men have possessed in a higher degree the power of winning at
once the confidence and the love of a pupil. The perfect simplicity
of his character—his exceeding gentleness—the cheerful playfulness of
his manner—the total absence of any seeming consciousness of superior
attainments—his evident enjoyment of the society of the young, and
above all the unaffected goodness and kindness of his disposition,
attracted the love of his youthful friends, as much as his marvellous
accomplishments challenged their admiration. It is only just to add that
he repaid the affection which he thus invariably won from them by the
liveliest interest in all that regarded their progress, and a sincere
concern for their happiness which followed them in every stage of their
after life.

By degrees, too, he was beginning, in the natural advance of years, to
enjoy the best fruit of the labour of instruction, in the success, and
even distinction, attained by his quondam pupils. One of these to whom he
was especially attached, the young Marchese Angelelli, had passed through
the University with much honour; and, in the beginning of 1815, published
anonymously a metrical translation of the Electra of Sophocles, which met
with very marked favour. Mezzofanti who was much gratified by the success
of this first essay, communicated to his friend Pezzana the secret of
the authorship. “I send you,” he writes, May 8, 1815, “a first essay in
translation from the Greek, published by an able pupil of mine, whose
modesty has not permitted him to put his name to his work. From you,
however, I make no secret of it. The author is one of our young nobles,
the Marchese Maximilian Francis Angelelli, an indefatigable cultivator
of every liberal study. I may add, as there is no danger of its reaching
the ears of the modest translator, that this first effort is only the
beginning of greater things. You will accept a copy for yourself, and
place the other in your library, which I am happy to know grows daily,
both in extent and reputation, through the care of its librarian, no less
than by his distinguished name.”

This first essay of the young poet was followed in the next year by
a further publication, containing the Electra, the Antigone, and the
Trachiniæ; and, a few years later, his master had the gratification of
witnessing the successful completion of his favourite pupil’s task,
by the publication of the entire seven tragedies of Sophocles, in
1823-4.[366]

One effect of Mezzofanti’s appointment as librarian was to separate him
somewhat from his sister and her family. He occupied thenceforward the
apartments of the librarian in the Palace of the University. But he still
continued towards them the same affectionate protection and support.
Hitherto he had himself in part superintended or directed the education
of his nephews, and especially of his namesake Joseph, a youth of much
promise, whose diligence and success fully requited his uncle’s care.
Joseph had made choice of the ecclesiastical profession; and, although
falling far short of his uncle’s extraordinary gift, he became an
excellent linguist, and was especially distinguished as a Greek and Latin
scholar; so that his uncle had the satisfaction, when his own increasing
occupations compelled him to diminish the number of his pupils, of
finding the young Minarelli fully competent to undertake a portion of the
charge.

His first public appearance at the Academy after he entered upon his new
office, was for the purpose of reading, (July 11th, 1815,) a paper “On
the Wallachian Language and its Analogies with Latin;”—a subject which
has engaged the attention of philologers and historians from the days
of Chalcocondylas, and which involves many interesting ethnological, as
well as philological considerations.[367] As we shall find him, a few
years later, astonishing a German visitor by his familiarity with this
out-of-the-way language, it is worth while to note this essay, as an
evidence that here, too, his knowledge was the result of careful study,
and not of casual opportunity, or of sudden inspiration.

For a considerable time after he took charge of the Library, he seems
to have been much occupied by his duties in connexion with it. The only
letter which I have been able to obtain about this period, one addressed
to Pezzana, March 5th, 1816, is entirely occupied with details regarding
the library; and M. Manavit mentions that he not only obtained from the
authorities a considerable addition to the funds appropriated to the
purchase of books, but, moreover, devoted no trifling share of his own
humble resources to the same purpose.[368] In the course of a few months,
too, he was quite at ease in his new pursuit; and the familiarity with
the contents of the library, and even of the position of particular books
upon its shelves which he soon possessed, would, in a person of less
prodigious memory, have been a subject of wonder. His nephew, Cavaliere
Minarelli of Bologna, was present on one occasion when Professor Ranzani,
while passing an evening in the librarian’s apartments, happened to
require some rare volume from the library; and, though it was dark at the
time, Mezzofanti left the room without a light, proceeded to the library,
and in a few moments returned with the volume required.

In July, 1816, Mezzofanti read at the Academy an essay “on the Language
of the Sette Communi at Vicenza,” which has been spoken of with much
praise. This singular community—descended from those stragglers of the
invading army of Cimbri and Teutones which crossed the Alps in the
year of Rome, 640, who escaped amid the almost complete extermination
of their companions under Marius, and took refuge in the neighbouring
mountains—presents, (like the similar Roman colony on the Transylvanian
border,) the strange phenomenon of a foreign race and language preserved
unmixed in the midst of another people and another tongue for a space of
nearly two thousand years. They occupy seven parishes in the vicinity
of Vicenza,[369] whence their name is derived; and they still retain
not only the tradition of their origin, but the substance, and even the
leading forms of the Teutonic language; insomuch that Frederic IV.,
of Denmark, who visited them in the beginning of the last century,
(1708,) discoursed with them in Danish, and found their idiom perfectly
intelligible.[370]

This was a theme peculiarly suited to Mezzofanti’s powers. His essay
excited considerable interest at the time, but unfortunately was never
printed.




CHAPTER VI.

[1817-1820.]


Southey, in one of his pleasant gossiping letters to Bedford, tells that
when M. de Sagrie was going to publish a French translation of Southey’s
“Roderick,” his publisher, Le Bel, insisted upon having a life of the
poet prefixed. M. de Sagrie objected; and at last, in order to get rid of
the printer’s importunities, said that he knew nothing whatever of the
life of Mr. Southey. “N’importe!” was the printer’s cool reply, “Ecrivez
toujours, brodez! Brodez-la un peu; que ce soit vrai ou non, ce ne fait
rien.”[371]

We have come to a part of Mezzofanti’s quiet and uniform life in which
there are so few incidents to break the monotony of the uneventful
narrative, that, at least in so far as its interest is concerned, his
biographer is almost in the same condition with M. de Sagrie. The true
purpose of this narrative, however—to exhibit the faculty rather than the
man—seems to me to depend less on the accumulation of piquant anecdotes
and striking adventures, than upon a calm and truthful survey of his
intellectual attainments in the successive stages of his career. Instead,
therefore, of having recourse to the device suggested by De Sagrie’s
enterprising publisher, and supplying, by a little ingenious “broderie,”
the deficiency of exciting incident, I shall content myself with weaving
together, in the order of time, the several notices of Mezzofanti, by
travellers and others, which have come within my reach; interspersing
such explanations, incidents, illustrations, and anecdotes, as I have
been able to glean, among the scanty memorials of this period which
have survived. Fortunately, from the year which we have now reached,
there exists a tolerably connected series of such sketches. They are, of
course, from the most various hands—from authors

          of all tongues and creeds;—
    Some were those who counted beads,
    Some of mosque, and some of church,
    And some, or I mis-say, of neither;—

but their value, it need hardly be said, is enhanced by this very
variety. Proceeding from so many independent sources, produced for the
most part, too, upon the spot, and in the order of time in which they
appear in the narrative;—these unconnected sketches may be believed to
present, if a less minute and circumstantial, certainly a more vivid as
well as more reliable, portraiture of Mezzofanti, than could be hoped
even from the daily scrutiny of familiar friends, intimately conversant
with his every day life, but always viewing his character from the same
unvarying point, and rather submitting the result of their own matured
observations of what Mezzofanti seemed to them to be, than affording
materials for a calm and dispassionate estimate of what he really was.
Nor must it be forgotten that no single chronicler, even had he the
circumstantiality of a Boswell, could be capable of keeping a record
of Mezzofanti’s life, which could be available as the foundation of a
satisfactory judgment as to the real extent and nature of his linguistic
accomplishment. It is only another Mezzofanti who would be a competent
witness on such a question; and, in default of a single Polyglot critic
of his attainments in all the languages which he is supposed to have
known, we shall best consult the interests of truth and science, by
considering severally, in reference to each of these languages, the
judgment formed regarding his performance therein by those whose native
language it was.

I have already said that the office of librarian brought him into contact
with most of the strangers, especially of the literary class, who visited
Bologna. In Bolognese society, too, he was more courted and sought after
than his modest and retiring disposition would have desired. In the house
of the Cardinal-Archbishop Opizzoni, and of the Cardinal Legates, Lanti,
and Spina, he was always an honoured guest. With several of the noble
families of the city, especially the Marescalchi, the Angelelli, the
Amerini, and the Zambeccari, he lived on terms of the closest intimacy.
The Cavaliere Pezzana mentions that when, on a visit to Bologna in 1817,
he was dining at the first named palace, Mezzofanti came in uninvited,
and almost as one of the family. At all these houses his opportunities of
meeting foreigners of every race and language may easily be believed to
have been frequent, and of the most various character.

The earliest English visitor of the Abate Mezzofanti whom I have been
able to discover is Mr. Harford, author of the recent “Life of Michael
Angelo Buonarroti,”[372] and proprietor of the valuable gallery of
Blaise Castle, which Dr. Waagen describes in his “Treasures of Art in
England.”[373]

Mr. Harford visited Bologna in the autumn of 1817, at which time he first
made Mezzofanti’s acquaintance. He renewed the acquaintance subsequently
at Rome, and on both occasions had a full opportunity of observing and
of testing his extraordinary gift of language. Mr. Harford has kindly
communicated to me his recollections of Mezzofanti at both these periods
of life, which, (although the latter part anticipates the order of time
by nearly thirty years,) may most naturally be inserted together.

    “I first made the acquaintance of the Abbé Mezzofanti,” writes
    Mr. Harford, “at the table of Cardinal Lanti, brother of the
    Duke of Lanti, then Legate of Bologna. This was in the year
    1817. The Cardinal was then living at the public palace at
    Bologna, but I had previously known him in Rome. He was a man
    of highly cultivated mind, and of gentlemanly and agreeable
    manners. He made his guests perfectly at their ease, and I
    well recollect, after dinner, forming one of a group around
    Abbé Mezzofanti, and listening with deep interest to his
    animated conversation, which had reference, in consequence
    of questions put to him, to various topics, illustrating
    his wonderful acquaintance with the principal languages of
    the world. Report, at this time, gave him credit for being
    master of upwards of forty languages; and I recollect, among
    other things, his giving proof of his familiar acquaintance
    with the Welsh. I had some particular conversation with him
    upon the origin of what is called Saxon, Norman, and Lombard
    architecture, and I
The Project Gutenberg eBook of The life of Cardinal Mezzofanti, by
Charles William Russell

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States, you
will have to check the laws of the country where you are located before
using this eBook.

Title: The life of Cardinal Mezzofanti
       With an introductory memoir of eminent linguists, ancient and
       modern

Author: Charles William Russell

Release Date: December 4, 2022 [eBook #69473]

Language: English

Produced by: Tim Lindell and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
             https://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from images
             generously made available by The Internet Archive/Canadian
             Libraries)

*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE LIFE OF CARDINAL
MEZZOFANTI ***






THE LIFE OF CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI.




[Illustration: J. Card. Mezzofanti

  Perugini, del.      H. Adlard, sc.]




                                 THE LIFE
                                    OF
                           CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI;
                                   WITH
                          AN INTRODUCTORY MEMOIR
                                    OF
                  EMINENT LINGUISTS, ANCIENT AND MODERN.

                                    BY
                           C. W. RUSSELL, D.D.
              PRESIDENT OF ST. PATRICK’S COLLEGE, MAYNOOTH.

                                 LONDON:
                         LONGMAN, BROWN, AND CO.
                             PATERNOSTER-ROW.
                                  1858.

                [_The Right of Translation is reserved._]




PREFACE.


The following Memoir had its origin in an article on Cardinal Mezzofanti,
contributed to the Edinburgh Review in the year 1855. The subject
appeared at that time to excite considerable interest. The article was
translated into French, and, in an abridged form, into Italian; and I
received through the editor, from persons entirely unknown to me, more
than one suggestion that I should complete the biography, accompanied by
offers of additional information for the purpose.

Nevertheless, the notices of the Cardinal on which that article was
founded, and which at that time comprised all the existing materials
for a biography, appeared to me, with all their interest, to want the
precision and the completeness which are essential to a just estimate of
his attainments. I felt that to judge satisfactorily his acquaintance
with a range of languages so vast as that which fame ascribed to
him, neither sweeping statements founded on popular reports, however
confident, nor general assertions from individuals, however distinguished
and trustworthy, could safely be regarded as sufficient. The proof of his
familiarity with any particular language, in order to be satisfactory,
ought to be specific, and ought to rest on the testimony either of
a native, or at least of one whose skill in the language was beyond
suspicion.

At the same time the interest with which the subject seemed to be
generally regarded, led me to hope that, by collecting, while they
were yet recent, the reminiscences of persons of various countries and
tongues, who had known and spoken with the Cardinal, it might be possible
to lay the foundation of a much more exact judgment regarding him than
had hitherto been attainable.

A short inquiry satisfied me that, although scattered over every part
of the globe, there were still to be found living representatives of
most of the languages ascribed to the Cardinal, who would be able, from
their own personal knowledge, to declare whether, and in what degree, he
was acquainted with each; and I resolved to try whether it might not be
possible to collect their opinions.

The experiment has involved an extensive and tedious correspondence;
many of the persons whom I have had to consult being ex-pupils of the
Propaganda, residing in very distant countries; more than one beyond the
range of regular postal communication, and only accessible by a chance
message transmitted through a consul, or through the friendly offices of
a brother missionary.

For the spirit in which my inquiries have been met, I am deeply grateful.
I have recorded in the course of the narrative the names of many to
whom I am indebted for valuable assistance and information. Other
valued friends whom I have not named, will kindly accept this general
acknowledgment.

There is one, however, to whom I owe a most special and grateful
expression of thanks—his Eminence the Cardinal Archbishop of Westminster.
From him, at the very outset of my task, I received a mass of anecdotes,
recollections, and suggestions, which, besides their great intrinsic
interest, most materially assisted me in my further inquiries; and
the grace of the contribution was enhanced by the fact, that it was
generously withdrawn from that delightful store of Personal Recollections
which his Eminence has since given to the public; and in which his
brilliant pen would have made it one of the most attractive episodes.

Several of the autographs, also, which appear in the sheet of
fac-similes, I owe to his Eminence. Others I have received from friends
who are named in the Memoir.




CONTENTS.


    PREFACE,                                                     pp. v-vii.

                          INTRODUCTORY MEMOIR.

          ANCIENT PERIOD:—

      History of Linguists little known—Legendary Linguists—The
    Jews—The Asiatics—The Greeks—Mithridates—Cleopatra—The
    Romans—Prevalence of Greek under the Empire—The Early
    Christians—Decline of the Study—Separation of the two
    Empires—The Crusaders—Frederic II—The Moorish Schools
    in Spain—Council of Vienne—Roderigo Ximenes—Venetian
    travellers—Fall of Constantinople—Greeks in
    Italy—Complutensian Polyglot,                                 pp. 5-18.

          MODERN PERIOD:—

      I. _Linguists of the East._ Dragomans—Genus Bey—Jonadab
    Alhanar—Interpreters in the Levant—Ciceroni at Mecca—Syrian
    Linguists—The Assemani—Greeks—Armenians—The Mechitarists,    pp. 18-24.

      II. _Italian Linguists._ Pico della Mirandola—Teseo
    Ambrosio—Pigafetta—Linguistic Missionary
    Colleges—The Propaganda—Schools of the Religious Orders—
    Giggei—Galani—Ubicini—Maracci—Podestà—Piromalli—Giorgi—De
    Magistris—Finetti—Valperga de Galuso—The De Rossis,          pp. 25-34.

      III. _Spanish and Portuguese Linguists._ Fernando di
    Cordova—Covilham—Libertas Cominetus—Arias Montanus—Del
    Rio—Lope de Vega—Missionaries—Antonio Fernandez—Carabantes—
    Pedro Paez—Hervas-y-Pandura,                                 pp. 34-41.

      IV. _French Linguists._
    Postel—Polyglot-Pater-Nosters—Scaliger—Le
    Cluse—Peiresc—Chasteuil—Duret—Bochart—Picquet—Le Jay—De la
    Croze—Renaudot—Fourmont—Deshauterayes—De Guignes—Diplomatic
    affairs in the Levant—De Paradis, Langlés—Abel Remusat—Modern
    School, Julien, Bournouf, Renan, Fresnel, the d’Abbadies,    pp. 41-58.

      V. _German, Dutch, Flemish, and Hungarian Linguists._
    Müller—(Regiomontanus)—Bibliander—Gesner—Christmann—Drusius—
    Schultens—Maes—Haecx—Gramaye—Erpen—The
    Goliuses—Hottinger—Kircher—Ludolf—Rothenacker—Andrew
    Müller—Witzen—Wilkins—Leibnitz—Gerard
    Müller—Schlötzer—Buttner—Michaelis—Catholic
    Missionaries—Richter, Fritz, Widmann, Grebmer, Dobritzhofer,
    Werdin—Berchtold, Adelung, Vater, Pallas, Klaproth, Niebuhr,
    Humboldt and his School—Castrén, Rask, Bunsen, Biblical
    Linguists—Hungarian Linguists—Csoma de Körös,                pp. 59-81.

      VI. _British and Irish Linguists._ Crichton—Andrews—Gregory—
    Castell, Walton, Pocock, Ockley, Sale, Clarke, Wilkins,
    Toland, “Orator” Henley, Carteret, Jones, Marsden, Colebrooke,
    Craufurd, Lumsden, Leyden, Vans Kennedy, Adam Clarke, Roberts
    Jones, Young, Pritchard, Cardinal Wiseman, Browning, Lee,
    Burritt,                                                     pp. 81-99.

      VII. _Slavonian Linguists._ _Russians_—Scantiness of
    Materials—Early Period—Jaroslav, Boris—The Romanoffs—Beründa
    Pameva, Peter the Great, Catherine I., Mentschikoff,
    Timkoffsky, Bitchourin, Igumnoff, Giganoff, Tchubinoff,
    Goulianoff, Senkowsky, Gretsch, Kazem-Beg—_Poles_—Meninski,
    Groddek, Bobrowski, Albertrandy, Rzewuski,
    Italinski—_Bohemians_—Komnensky, Dobrowsky, Hanka,          pp. 99-110.

      Miraculous gift of tongues—Royal Linguists—
    Lady-Linguists—Infant Phenomena—Uneducated Linguists,      pp. 110-121.

                      LIFE OF CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI.

                          CHAPTER I. (1774-98.)

      Birth and family history—Legendary tales—Early
    education—First masters—School friends—Ecclesiastical
    studies—Illness and interruption of studies—Study of
    languages—Anecdote—Ordination—Appointment as Professor of
    Arabic—Deprivation of professorship,                       pp. 125-147.

                        CHAPTER II. (1798-1802.)

      Straitened circumstances—Private tuition—The Marescalchi
    family—The military hospitals—Manner of study—The Magyar,
    Czechish, Polish, Russian, and Flemish languages—Foreigners—The
    Confessional—Intense application—Examples of literary
    labour,                                                    pp. 148-161.

                        CHAPTER III. (1803-1806.)

      Appointed as Assistant Librarian of the _Istituto di
    Bologna_—_Catalogue Raisonné_—Professorship of Oriental
    Languages—Paper on Egyptian obelisks—De Rossi—Correspondence
    with him—Polyglot translations—Caronni’s account of him—Visit
    to Parma, Pezzana, Bodoni—Persian—Illness—Invitation to settle
    at Paris—Domestic relations—Correspondence—Translations,   pp. 162-190.

                         CHAPTER IV. (1807-14.)

      Labour of compiling Catalogue—His skill as linguist tested by
    the Russian Embassy—Deprivation of Professorship—Death of his
    mother—Visit to Modena and Parma—Literary friends—Giordani’s
    account—Greek scholarship—Bucheron’s trial of his
    Latinity—Deputy Librarianship of University—Visitors—Lord
    Guildford—Learned societies—Academy of Institute—Paper on
    Mexican symbolic Paintings,                                pp. 191-204.

                          CHAPTER V. (1814-17.)

      Restoration of the Papal Government—Pius VII. at
    Bologna—Invites Mezzofanti to Rome—Re-appointment as
    Professor of Oriental languages—Death of his father—Notices
    of Mezzofanti by Tourists—Kephalides—Appointed head
    librarian—Pupils—Angelelli—Papers read at Academy,          pp. 205-18.

                         CHAPTER VI. (1817-20.)

      Tourists’ Notices of Mezzofanti—Society in Bologna—Mr.
    Harford—Stewart Rose—Byron—The Opuscoli Letterarj di
    Bologna—Panegyric of F. Aponte—Emperor Francis I. at
    Bologna—Clotilda Tambroni—Lady Morgan’s account of
    Mezzofanti—Inaccuracies—The Bologna dialect—M. Molbech,     pp. 219-40.

                         CHAPTER VII. (1820-28.)

      Illness—Visit to Mantua, Modena, Pisa, and Leghorn—Solar
    Eclipse—Baron Von Zach—Bohemian—Admiral Smyth—The Gipsy
    language—Blume—Armenian—Georgian—Flemish—Pupils—Cavedoni,
    Veggetti, Rosellini—Foreigners—Daily duties—Correspondence—
    Death of Pius VII.—Appointment as member of Collegio dei
    Consultori—Jacobs’ account of him—Personal appearance—Cardinal
    Cappellari—Translation of Oriental Liturgy—Mezzofanti’s
    disinterestedness—Birmese,                                  pp. 241-70.

                        CHAPTER VIII. (1828-30.)

      Visit of Crown Prince of Prussia—Trial of skill in
    languages—Crown Prince of Sweden—M. Braunerhjelm—Countess of
    Blessington—Irish Students—Lady Bellew—Dr. Tholuck—Persian
    couplet—Swedish—Cornish Dialect—Frisian—Abate
    Fabiani—Letters—Academy of the Filopieri,                   pp. 271-86.

                           CHAPTER IX. (1831.)

      Political parties at Bologna—M. Libri’s account of
    Mezzofanti—Hindoo Algebra—Indian literature and history—Indian
    languages—Manner of study—Revolution of Bologna—Delegates to
    Rome—Mezzofanti at Rome—Reception by Gregory XVI.—Visit to the
    Propaganda—Dr. Cullen—Polyglot conversation—Renewed Invitation
    to settle at Rome—Consents—Calumnies of revolutionary party—Dr.
    Wordsworth—Mr. Milnes—Removal to Rome,                     pp. 287-300.

                          CHAPTER X. (1831-33.)

      Rome a centre of many languages—Mezzofanti’s pretensions
    fully tested—Appointments at Rome—Visit to the Chinese
    College at Naples—History of the College—Study of
    Chinese—Its difficulties—Illness—Return to Rome—Polyglot
    society of Rome—The Propaganda—Amusing trials of
    skill—Gregory XVI.—Library of Propaganda rich in rare
    books on languages—Appointed First Keeper of the Vatican
    Library—Letters,                                            pp. 301-17.

                           CHAPTER XI. (1834.)

      The Welsh language—Dr. Forster—Dr. Baines—Dr. Edwards—Mr.
    Rhys Powell—Flemish—Mgr. Malou—Mgr. Wilde—Canon Aerts—Pere
    van Calven—Pere Legrelle—Dutch—M. Leon—Dr. Wap—Mezzofanti’s
    extempore Dutch verses—Bohemian—The poet Frankl—Conversations
    on German and Magyar Poetry—Maltese—Padre Schembri—Canonico
    Falzou—Portuguese—Count de Lavradio,                        pp. 318-37.

                         CHAPTER XII. (1834-36.)

      The Vatican Library—Mezzofanti’s colleagues—College of St.
    Peter’s—Mezzofanti made Rector—His literary friends in
    Rome—Angelo Mai—Accademia della Cattolica Religione—He reads
    papers in this Academy—Gregory XVI.’s kindness—Cardinal
    Giustiniani—Albani—Pacca—Zurla—Polyglot party at Cardinal
    Zurla’s in his honour—Opinions regarding him—Number of
    his languages—Mr. Mazzinghi—Dr. Cox—Dr. Wiseman—Herr
    Fleck—Greek Epigram—Herr Fleck’s criticisms—Mezzofanti’s
    Latinity—His English—Dr. Baines—Cardinal Wiseman—Mr. Monckton
    Milnes—Mezzofanti’s style formed on books—Lady Morgan’s opinion
    of his English—Swedish Literature—Professor Carlson—Count
    Oxenstjerna—Armenian Literature—Mgr. Hurmuz—Padre Angiarakian
    Arabic of Syria—Greek Literature—Mgr. Missir—Romaic—Abate
    Matranga—Polish Literature—Sicilian—The poet Meli,          pp. 338-54.

                        CHAPTER XIII. (1836-38.)

      Californian students in Propaganda—Californian
    language—Mezzofanti’s success in it—Nigger Dutch of
    Curaçoa—American Indians in Propaganda—Augustine
    Hamelin—“The Blackbird”—Mezzofanti’s knowledge of Indian
    languages—Dr. Kip—Algonquin—Chippewa Delaware—Father
    Thavenet—His studies in the Propaganda—Arabic—Albanese—Mr.
    Fernando’s notice of him—Cingalese—East Indian
    languages—Hindostani—Mahratta—Guzarattee—Dr. M’Auliffe—Count
    Lackersteen—M. Eyoob—Chinese, difficulty of—Chinese
    students—Testimony of Abate Umpierres—Cardinal Wiseman—West
    African languages—Father Brunner—Angolese—Oriental
    languages—Paul Alkushi—“Shalom”—Letter,                     pp. 355-72.

                         CHAPTER XIV. (1838-41.)

      Created Cardinal—The Cardinalate—Its history, duties,
    emoluments, congregations, offices—Mezzofanti’s
    poverty—Kindness of Gregory XVI.—Congratulations
    of his Bolognese friends—The Filopieri—Polyglot
    congratulations of the Propaganda—Friends among the
    Cardinals—His life as Cardinal—Still continues to acquire
    new languages—Abyssinian—M. d’Abbadie—His visit to
    Mezzofanti—Basque—Amarinna—Arabic—Ilmorma—Mezzofanti’s
    failure—Studies Amarinna—Abyssinian Embassy to Rome—Their
    account of the Cardinal—The Basque language—M. d’Abbadie—Prince
    L.L. Bonaparte—M. Dassance—Strictures on Mezzofanti—Mrs.
    Paget—Baron Glucky de Stenitzer—Guido Görres—Modesty of
    Mezzofanti—Mr. Kip—Görres—Cardinal Wiseman—Mezzofanti among
    the pupils of the Propaganda,                               pp. 373-97.

                         CHAPTER XV. (1841-43.)

      Author’s recollections of Mezzofanti in 1841—His personal
    appearance and manner; his attractive simplicity—Languages
    in which the author heard him speak—His English
    conversation—Various opinions regarding it—Impressions of
    the author—Anecdotes—Cardinal Wiseman—Rev. John Smyth—Father
    Kelleher—His knowledge of English literature—Mr. Harford—Dr.
    Cox—Cardinal Wiseman—Mr. Grattan—Mr. Badeley—Hudibras—Author’s
    own conversation with the Cardinal—The Tractarian movement—Mr.
    Grattan—Baron Bunsen—Author’s second visit to Rome—The
    Polyglot Academy of the Propaganda—Playful trial of
    Mezzofanti’s powers by the students—His wonderful versatility
    of language—Analogous examples of this faculty—Description
    of it by visitors—His own illustration—The Irish
    language—Mezzofanti’s admission regarding it—The Etruria
    Celtica—The Eugubian Tables—Amusing experiment suggested
    by Mezzofanti—Dr. Murphy—The Gælic language—Mezzofanti’s
    extempore Metrical compositions—Specimens—Rapidity with which
    he wrote them—Power of accommodating his pronunciation of
    Latin to that of the various countries—National interjectional
    sounds—Playfulness—Puns,                                   pp. 398-431.

                         CHAPTER XVI. (1843-49.)

      Death of his nephew Mgr. Minarelli—His sister
    Teresa—Letter—Visitors—Rev. Ingraham Kip—English
    conversation—English literature—American literature—The
    American Indian languages—Scottish dialect—Burns and Walter
    Scott—Rev. John Gray—Mezzofanti as a philologer—Baron
    Bunsen—The Abbé Gaume—French patois—Spanish—Father
    Burrueco—Mexican—Peruvian—New Zealand language—Armenian
    and Turkish—Father Trenz—Russian—M. Mouravieff—The
    Emperor Nicholas—Polish—Klementyna z Tanskich
    Hoffmanowa—Makrena, Abbess of Minsk—Her history—Her account
    of Mezzofanti—His occupations—House of Catechumens—First
    communion—_Fervorini_—The confessional—Death of Gregory
    XVI.—Election of Pius IX.—Mezzofanti’s epigrams on the
    occasion—His relations with the new Pope—Father Bresciani’s
    account of him—The revolution of 1848—Its effect on Cardinal
    Mezzofanti—His illness—Death and funeral,                   pp. 432-56.

                     CHAPTER XVII. (RECAPITULATION.)

      Plan pursued in preparing this Biography—Points of
    inquiry—Number of languages known to Mezzofanti—What is meant
    by knowledge of a language—Popular notion of it—Mezzofanti’s
    number of languages progressive—Dr. Minarelli’s list of
    languages known by him—Classification of languages according
    to the degrees of his knowledge—Languages spoken by him with
    great perfection—Languages spoken less perfectly—Languages in
    which he could initiate a conversation—Languages known from
    books—Dialects—Southern and central American languages—Total
    number known to him in various degrees—His speaking of
    languages not literally faultless, but perfect to a degree
    rare in foreigners—Comparison with other linguists—His plan
    of studying languages—Various systems of study—Mezzofanti’s
    method involved much labour—Habit of thinking in foreign
    languages—His success a special gift of nature—In what this
    consisted—Quickness of perception—Analysis—Memory—Peculiarity
    of his memory—His enthusiasm and simplicity—Mezzofanti as a
    philologer, as a critic, a historian, a man of science—Piety
    and charity, liberal and tolerant spirit—Social virtues,   pp. 457-493.

    APPENDIX,                                                  pp. 495-502.




CORRIGENDA.


    Page  35, Line 5, for “yards” read “feet.”
          52,      last, after “(1704),” supply “who.”
          57,      21, for “Bourmouf,” read “Bournouf.”
          59,      8, for “John and,” read “and John.”
          76,      2nd last, for “Boehthingk,” read “Boehtlingk.”
         117,      4th last, (and three other places,) for “marvelous,”
                     read “marvellous.”
         119,      2nd last, for “months,” read “years.”
         121,      2nd last, for “Hall,” read “Hill.”
         281,      22, for “Grüner,” read “Grüder.”
         283,      17, for “Rabinical,” read “Rabbinical.”
         312,      10, for “unable,” read “able.”
         426,      4th last, for “seneeta,” read “senecta;” also
                     interchange ; and !

Transcriber’s Note: The corrections have been made.




[Illustration: _Fac-similes in Sixteen Languages._]




MEMOIRS OF EMINENT LINGUISTS.


In the Life of Cardinal Mezzofanti I have attempted to ascertain, by
direct evidence, the exact number of languages with which that great
linguist was acquainted, and the degree of his familiarity with each.

Eminence in any pursuit, however, is necessarily relative. We are
easily deceived about a man’s stature until we have seen him by the
side of other men; nor shall we be able to form a just notion of the
linguistic accomplishments of Cardinal Mezzofanti, or at least to bring
them before our minds as a practical reality, until we shall have first
considered what had been effected before him by other men who attained to
distinction in the same department.

I have thought it desirable, therefore, to prefix to his Life a summary
history of the most eminent linguists of ancient and modern times. There
is no branch of scholarship which has left fewer traces in literature,
or has received a more scanty measure of justice from history. Viewed in
the light of a curious but unpractical pursuit, skill in languages is
admired for a time, perhaps indeed enjoys an exaggerated popularity; but
it passes away like a nine days’ wonder, and seldom finds an exact or
permanent record. Hence, while the literature of every country abounds
with memoirs of distinguished poets, philosophers, and historians, few,
even among professed antiquarians, have directed their attention to the
history of eminent linguists, whether in ancient or in modern times. In
all the ordinary repositories of curious learning—Pliny, Aulus Gellius,
and Athenæus, among the ancients; Bayle, Gibbon, Feyjoo, Disraeli,
and Vulpius, among the moderns—this interesting chapter is entirely
overlooked; nor does it appear to have engaged the attention even of
linguists or philologers themselves.

The following Memoir, therefore, must claim the indulgence due to a first
essay in a new and difficult subject. No one can be more sensible than
the writer of its many imperfections;—of the probable omission of names
which should have been recorded;—of the undue prominence of others with
inferior pretensions; and perhaps of still more serious inaccuracies of
a different kind. It is only offered in the absence of something better
and more complete; and with the hope of directing to what is certainly a
curious and interesting subject, the attention of others who enjoy more
leisure and opportunity for its investigation.

       *       *       *       *       *

The diversity of languages which prevails among the various branches
of the human family, has proved, almost equally with their local
dispersion, a barrier to that free intercommunion which is one of
the main instruments of civilization. “The confusion of tongues, the
first great judgment of God upon the ambition of man,” says Bacon, in
the Introductory Book of his “Advancement of Learning,” “hath chiefly
imbarred the open trade and intercourse of learning and knowledge.”[1]
Perhaps it would be more correct to say that these two great impediments
to intercourse have mutually assisted each other. The divergency of
languages seems to keep pace with the dispersion of the population.
Adelung lays it down as the result of the most careful philological
investigations, that where the difficulties of intercourse are such as
existed among the ancients and as still prevail among the less civilized
populations, no language can maintain itself unchanged over a space of
more than one hundred and fifty thousand square miles.[2]

It might naturally be expected, therefore, that one of the earliest
efforts of the human intellect would have been directed towards the
removal of this barrier, and that one of the first sciences to invite
the attention of men would have been the knowledge of languages. Few
sciences, nevertheless, were more neglected by the ancients.

It is true that the early literatures of many of the ancient nations
contain legends on this head which might almost throw into the shade the
greatest marvels related of Mezzofanti. In one of the Chinese stories
regarding the youth of Buddha, translated by Klaproth, it is related
that, when he was ten years old, he asked his preceptor, Babourenou, to
teach him all the languages of the earth, seeing that he was to be an
apostle to all men; and that when Babourenou confessed his ignorance
of all except the Indian dialects, the child himself taught his master
“fifty foreign tongues with their respective characters.”[3] A still
more marvellous tale is told by one of the Rabbinical historians, Rabbi
Eliezer, who relates that Mordechai, (one of the great heroes of Talmudic
legend), was acquainted with seventy languages; and that it was by means
of this gift he understood the conversation of the two eunuchs who were
plotting in a foreign tongue the death of the king.[4] Nor is the Koran
without its corresponding prodigy. When the Prophet was carried up to
Heaven, before the throne of the Most High, “God promised that he should
have the knowledge of all languages.”[5]

But when we turn to the genuine records of antiquity, we find no ground
for the belief that such legends as these have even that ordinary
substructure of truth which commonly underlies the fables of mythology.
Neither the Sacred Narratives, nor those of the early profane authors,
contain a single example of remarkable proficiency in languages.

It is true that in the later days of the Jewish people, interpreters
were appointed in the synagogues to explain the lessons read from the
Hebrew Scriptures for the benefit of their foreign brethren; that in
all the courts of the Eastern monarchs interpreters were found, through
whom they communicated with foreign envoys, or with the motley tribes of
their own empire; and that professional interpreters were at the service
of foreigners in the great centres of commerce or travel,[6] who, it
may be presumed, were masters of several languages. The philosophers,
too, who traversed remote countries in pursuit of wisdom, can hardly be
supposed to have returned without some acquaintance with the languages
of the nations among whom they had voyaged. Solon and Pythagoras are
known to have visited Egypt and the East; the latter also sojourned for
a considerable time in Italy and the islands; the wanderings of Plato
are said to have been even more extensive. Nay, in some instances these
pilgrims of knowledge extended their researches beyond the limits of
their own ethnographical region. Thus, on the one hand, the Scythian
sages, Anacharsis and Zamolxis, themselves most probably of the Mongol
or Tartar tongue, sojourned for a long time in countries where the
Indo-European family of languages alone prevailed; on the other, the
merchants of Tyre were in familiar and habitual intercourse with the
Italo-Pelasgic race; and the Phœnician explorers, in their well-known
circumnavigation of Africa described by Herodotus, must have come
in contact with still more numerous varieties both of race and of
tongue. Nevertheless it may fairly be doubted whether these or similar
opportunities among the ancients, resulted in any very remarkable
attainments in the department of languages. The absence of all record
furnishes a strong presumption to the contrary; and there is one example,
that of Herodotus, which would almost be in itself conclusive. This acute
and industrious explorer devoted many years to foreign travel. He visited
every city of note in Greece and Asia Minor, and every site of the
great battles between the Greeks and Barbarians. He explored the whole
line of the route of Xerxes in his disastrous expedition. He visited in
succession all the chief islands of the Egean, as well as those of the
western coast of Greece. His landward wanderings extended far into the
interior. He reached Babylon, Ecbatana, and Susa, and spent some time
among the Scythian tribes on the shores of the Black Sea. He resided
long in Egypt, from which he passed southwards as far as Elephantine,
eastwards into Arabia, and westwards through Lybia, at least as far as
Cyrene. And yet Dahlmann is of opinion that, with all his industry, and
all the spirit of inquiry which was his great characteristic, Herodotus
never became acquainted even with the language of Egypt, but contented
himself with the service of an interpreter.[7]

In like manner, it would be difficult to shew, either from the Cyropædia,
or the Expedition of Cyrus, that Xenophon, during his foreign travel,
became master of Persian or any kindred Eastern tongue. Nor am I aware
that there has ever been discovered in the writings of Plato any evidence
of familiarity with the language of those Eastern philosophers from whose
science he is believed to have drawn so largely.

It is strange that the two notable exceptions to this barrenness of
eminent linguists which characterizes the classic times, Mithridates
and Cleopatra, should both have been of royal rank. The former, the
celebrated king of Pontus, long one of the most formidable enemies of
the Roman name, is alleged to have spoken fluently the languages of all
the subjects of his empire; an empire so vast, and comprising so many
different nationalities as to throw an air of improbability over the
story. According to Aulus Gellius,[8] he “was thoroughly conversant”
(_percalluit_) with the languages of all the nations (_twenty-five in
number_) over which his rule extended.[9] The other writers who relate
the circumstance—Valerius Maximus,[10] Pliny,[11] and Solinus—make the
number only twenty-two. Some commentators have regarded the story as a
gross exaggeration; and others have sought to diminish its marvellousness
by explaining it of different dialects, rather than of distinct
languages. But there does not appear in the narrative of the original
writers any reason whether for the doubt or for the restriction. Pliny
declares that “it is quite certain;” and the matter-of-fact tone in which
they all relate it, makes it clear that they wished to be understood
literally. It was the king’s invariable practice, they tell us, to
communicate with all the subjects of his polyglot empire directly and in
person, and “never through an interpreter;” and Gellius roundly affirms
that he was able to converse in each and every one of these tongues
“with as much correctness as if it were his native dialect.”

The attainments of Cleopatra, although far short of what is reported
of Mithridates, are nevertheless described by Plutarch[12] as very
extraordinary. He says that she “spoke most languages, and that there
were but few of the foreign ambassadors to whom she gave audience through
an interpreter.” The languages which he specifies are those of the
Ethiopians, of the Troglodytes (probably a dialect of Coptic), of the
Hebrews, of the Arabs, the Syrians, the Medes, and the Persians; but
he adds that this list does not comprise all the languages which this
extraordinary woman understood.

Now the very prominence assigned to these examples, and the absence of
all allusion to any other which might be supposed to approximate to them,
may afford a presumption that they are almost solitary. Valerius Maximus,
in his well-known chapter _De Studio et Industria_, cites the case of
Mithridates as a very remarkable example “of study and industry.” It is
highly probable therefore, that, if he knew any other eminent linguists,
he would have added their names. Yet the only cases which he instances
are those of Cato learning Greek in his old age, of Themistocles
acquiring Persian during his exile, and of Publius mastering all the five
dialects of Greece during the time of his Prætorship. In like manner,
Aulus Gellius has no more notable linguist to produce, in contrast with
Mithridates, than the old poet Ennius, who used to boast that he had
three hearts,[13] because he could speak Greek, Latin, and his rude
native dialect, Oscan. And Pliny, with all his love of parallels, is even
more meagre:—he does not recite a single name in comparison with that of
Mithridates.

       *       *       *       *       *

The Romans, especially under the early Republic, appear to have been
singularly indifferent or unsuccessful in cultivating languages; and
the bad Greek of the Roman ambassadors to Tarentum, for their ridicule
of which the Tarentines paid so dearly, is almost an average specimen
of the accomplishments of the earlier Romans as linguists. Nor can
this circumstance fail to appear strange, when it is remembered over
how many different races and tongues the wide domain of Rome extended.
The very multiplicity of languages submitted to her government would
seem to have imposed upon her public men the necessity of familiarizing
themselves, even for the discharge of their public office, with at least
the principal ones among them. But, on the contrary, for a long time they
steadily pursued the policy of imposing, as far as practicable, upon
the conquered nationalities the Latin language, at least in public and
official transactions.[14]

And, so far as regards the Eastern and Northern languages, this exclusion
was successfully and permanently enforced at Rome. The slave population
of the city comprised almost every variety of race within the limits of
the Empire. The very names of the slaves who are introduced in the plays
of Plautus and Terence—Syra, Phœnicium, Afer, Geta, Dorias, &c. (which
are but their respective gentile appellatives)—embrace a very large
circle of the languages of Asia, Africa, and Northern Europe. And yet,
with the exception of a single scene in the Pænulus of Plautus, in which
the well-known Punic speech of Hanno the Carthaginian is introduced,[15]
there is nothing in either of these dramatists from which we could
infer that any of the manifold languages of the slave population of
Rome effected an entrance among their haughty masters. They were all as
completely ignored by the Romans, as is the vernacular Celtic of the
Irish agricultural servant in the midland counties of England.

But it was not so for Greek. From the Augustan age onwards, this polished
language began to dispute the mastery with Latin, even in Rome itself.

    “Græcia capta ferum cepit captorem, et artes
    Intulit agresti Latio—”

applies to the language, even more than to the arts. In the days of the
Rhetorician, Molon, (Cicero’s master in eloquence,) Greek had obtained
the entrée of the Senate. In the time of Tiberius, its use was permitted
even in forensic pleadings. With the emperors who succeeded,[16] the
triumph of Greek was still more complete. From Pliny downwards, there is
hardly an author of eminence in the Roman Empire who did not write in
that language;—Pausanias, Dion, Galen, even the Emperor Marcus Aurelius
himself, with all the traditionary Roman associations of his name.

It was so also with the Christian population and the Christian literature
of Rome. Almost all the Christian writings of the first two centuries
are in Greek. The early Roman liturgy was Greek. The population of Rome
was in great part a Greek-speaking race. A large proportion of the
inscriptions in the Roman Catacombs are Greek, and some even of the Latin
ones are engraved in Greek characters. Nay, the early Christian churches
in Gaul, Vienne, Lyons, and Marseilles, and the few remains of their
literature which have reached us, are equally Greek.[17]

In a word, during the first two centuries of the Christian era, making
due allowance for the difference of the periods, Greek and Latin held
towards each other in Rome the same relation which we find between
Norman-French and Saxon in England after the Conquest; and we may safely
say that, during those centuries, a knowledge of both languages was the
ordinary accomplishment of all educated men, and was shared by many of
the lowest of the population.

Beyond this limit, however, we read of no remarkable linguists even among
the accomplished scholars of the Augustan age. No one will doubt that the
two Varros may fairly be taken as, in this respect, the most favourable
specimens of the class. Now neither of them seems to have gone further
than a knowledge of Greek. Out of the four hundred and ninety books which
Marcus Terentius Varro wrote, there is not one named which would indicate
familiarity with any other foreign language.

The Neo-Platonists of the second and third centuries, whose researches
in Oriental Philosophy must have brought them into contact with some of
the Eastern languages, may possibly form an exception to this general
statement; but, on the whole, in the absence of positive and exact
information on the subject, it may not unreasonably be conjectured that,
among the Christian scholars of the second, third, and fourth centuries,
we might find a wider range of linguistic attainments than among their
gentile contemporaries. The critical study of the Bible itself involved
the necessity of familiarity, not only with Greek and Hebrew, but with
more than one cognate oriental dialect besides. St. Jerome, besides
the classic languages and his native Illyrian, is known to have been
familiar with several of the Eastern tongues; and it is not improbable
that some of the earlier commentators and expositors of the Bible may be
taken as equally favourable specimens of the Christian linguists.[18]
Origen’s Hexapla is a monument of his scholarship in Hebrew, and probably
in Syriac and Samaritan. St. Clement of Alexandria was perhaps even a
more accomplished linguist; for he tells that of the masters under whom
he studied, one was from Greece, one from Magna Græcia, a third from
Cœle-Syria, a fourth from Egypt, a fifth an Assyrian, and a sixth a
Hebrew.[19] And St. Gregory Nazianzen expressly relates of his friend St.
Basil, that, even before he came to Athens to commence his rhetorical
studies, he was already well-versed in many languages.[20]

From the death of Constantine, however, the study began rapidly to
decline, even among ecclesiastics. The disruption of the Empire naturally
tended to diminish the intercourse between East and West, and by
consequence the interchange of their languages. It would appear, too, as
if the barbarian conquerors adopted, in favour of their own languages,
the same policy which the Romans had pursued for Latin. Attila is said
to have passed a law prohibiting the use of the Latin language in his
newly conquered kingdom,[21] and to have taken pains, by importing native
teachers, to procure the substitution of Gothic in its stead. At all
events, in whatever way the change was brought about, a knowledge of
both Greek and Latin, which in the classic times of the Empire had been
the ordinary accomplishment of every educated man, became uncommon and
almost exceptional. Pope Gregory the Great, who, bitterly as he has been
assailed as an enemy of letters, must be confessed to have been the
most eminent Western scholar of his day, spoke Greek very imperfectly;
he complains that it was difficult, even at Constantinople, to find any
one who could translate Greek satisfactorily into Latin;[22] and a still
earlier instance is recorded, in which a pope, in other respects a man
of undoubted ability, was unable to translate the letter of the Greek
patriarch, much less to communicate with the Greek ambassadors, except
through an interpreter.[23]

More than one, indeed, of the early theological controversies was
embittered through the misunderstandings caused between the East and
West by mutual ignorance of each other’s language. Pelagius succeeded
in obtaining a favourable decision from the Council of Jerusalem in
415, chiefly because, while his Western adversary, Orosius, was unable
to speak Greek, the fathers of the Council were ignorant of Latin. The
protracted controversy on the Three Chapters owed much of its inveteracy
to the ignorance of the Westerns[24] of the original language of the
works whose orthodoxy was impugned; and it is well known that the
condemnation of the decree of the sixth council on the use of sacred
images issued by the fathers of Francfort, was based exclusively on a
strangely erroneous Latin translation of the acts of the council, through
which translation alone they were known in Germany and Gaul.[25]

The foundation of the Empire of Charlemagne consummated the separation
between the Greek and Latin races and their languages. The venerated
names of Bede and of Alcuin in the Western Church, and the more
questionable celebrity of the Patriarch Photius in the Eastern,
constitute a passing exception. But it need hardly be added that they
stand almost entirely alone; and it will readily be believed that,
amid the Barbarian irruptions from without, and the fierce intestine
revolutions, of which Europe was the theatre during the rest of the
earlier mediæval period, even that familiarity with the Greek and
oriental languages which we have described, entirely disappeared in the
West.

The wars of the Crusades, and the reviving intellectual activity
in which this and other great events of the second mediæval period
originated, gave a new impulse to the study of languages. Frederic II.,
a remarkable example of the union of great intellectual gifts with deep
moral perversity, spoke fluently six languages, Latin, Greek, Italian,
German, Hebrew, and even Arabic.[26] The Moorish schools in Spain began
to be visited by Christian students. In this manner Arabic found its
way into the West; and the intermixture of learned Jews in the European
kingdoms afforded similar opportunities for the cultivation of Hebrew,
which were turned to account by many, especially among biblical scholars.
On the other hand, notwithstanding the contempt for profane learning
which breathes through the Koran, the Saracen scholars began to direct
their attention to the learning of other creeds, and the languages of
other races. Ibn Wasil, who came into Italy in 1250 as ambassador to
Manfred, the son of Frederic II., was reported to be familiar with the
Western tongues. The Spanish Moors, too, began sedulously to cultivate
Greek. The works of Aristotle, of Galen, of Dioscorides, and many other
Greek writers, chiefly philosophical, were translated into Arabic by
Averroes, Ibn Djoldjol and Avicenna. And the Jewish scholars of that age
were equally assiduous in the cultivation of Greek. The learned Rabbi
Maimonides, born in Cordova in the early part of the 12th century, was
not only master of many Eastern tongues, but was also thoroughly familiar
with the Greek language.

It would be a mistake, however, to imagine that it was among the Moors or
the Hebrews that the revival of the study of languages first commenced.
Alcuin, in addition to the modern languages with which his sojourn in
various kingdoms must have made him acquainted, was also familiar with
Latin, Greek, and Hebrew. Hermann, the Dalmatian, the first translator
of the Koran, was well acquainted with Latin, Greek, Hebrew, and Arabic.
The celebrated Raymond Lully, who was a native of Majorca, was able to
lecture in Latin Greek, Arabic, and perhaps Hebrew;—an accomplishment
especially wonderful in one who was among the most laborious and
prolific writers of his age, and who left after him, according to some
authorities, (though this, no doubt, is a great exaggeration), not less
than a thousand[27] works on the most diversified subjects. At the
instance of this eminent orientalist, the council of Vienne directed that
professorships should be founded in all the great Universities, for the
Hebrew, Chaldee, and Arabic languages.[28]

An example of, for the period, very remarkable proficiency in modern
languages is recorded in the history of the Fourth Lateran Council, 1215.
Roderigo Ximenes,[29] Archbishop of Toledo in the early part of the
thirteenth century, a native of Navarre, but a scholar of the University
of Paris, was one of the representatives of the Spanish Church at that
Council. A controversy regarding the Primacy of Spain had arisen between
the Sees of Toledo and Compostella, which was referred for adjudication
to the bishops there assembled. Ximenes addressed to the council a long
Latin oration in defence of the claim of Toledo; and, as many of his
auditory, which consisted both of the clergy and the laity, were ignorant
of that language, he repeated the same argument in a series of discourses
addressed to the natives of each country in succession; to the Romans,
Germans, French, English, Navarrese, and Spaniards,[30] each in their
respective tongues. Thus the number of languages in which he spoke was
at least seven, and it is highly probable that he had others at his
disposal, if his auditory had been of such a nature as to render them
necessary.

The taste for the languages and literature of the East received a
further stimulus from the foundation of the Christian principalities
at Antioch and Jerusalem, from the establishment of the Latin Empire
at Constantinople, and in general from the long wars in the East, to
which the enthusiasm of the age attracted the most enterprising spirits
of European chivalry. The pious pilgrimages, too, contributed to the
same result. Many of the knights or palmers, on their return from the
East, brought with them the knowledge, not only of Greek, but of more
than one of the oriental languages besides. The long imprisonments to
which, during the holy wars, and the Latin campaigns against the Turks,
they were often subjected, supplied another occasion of familiarity with
Arabic, Syriac, Turkish, or Persian.

The commercial enterprise of the Western Nations, and especially of
the Venetians and Genoese, was a still more powerful instrument of the
interchange of languages. Few modern voyagers have possessed more of
that spirit of travel which is the best aid towards the acquisition of
foreign tongues, than the celebrated Marco Polo. It is hard to suppose
that he can have returned from his extensive wanderings in Persia, in
Tartary, in the Indian Archipelago, and in China and Tibet, without some
tincture of their languages. Still less can this be supposed of his
countryman, Josaphat Barbaro, who sojourned for sixteen years among the
Tartar tribes.[31] It was in the commercial settlements of the Venetians
in the Levant that the profession of interpreters, of which I shall have
to speak hereafter, and which has since become hereditary in certain
families, was originated or brought to perfection.[32]

       *       *       *       *       *

It is only, however, from the revival of letters, properly so called,
that the history of linguistic studies can be truly said to commence.

The attention of Scholars, in the first instance, was chiefly directed
towards the classical languages and the languages of the Bible. The
Greek scholars who were driven to the West by the Moslem occupation of
Constantinople brought their language, in its best and most attractive
form, to the Universities of Italy. In the Council of Florence, in 1438,
more than one Italian divine, especially Ambrogio Traversari, was found
capable of holding discussions with the Greek representatives in their
native tongue. In like manner, the Jews and Moors, who were exiled from
Spain by the harsh and impolitic measures of Ferdinand and Isabella,
deposited through all the schools of Europe the seeds of a solid and
critical knowledge of Hebrew and Arabic and their cognate languages. The
fruits of their teaching may be discerned at a comparatively early period
in the biblical studies of the time. Antonio de Lebrixa published, in
1481, a grammar of the Latin, Castilian and Hebrew languages: and I need
only allude to the mature and various oriental learning which Cardinal
Ximenes found ready to his hand, in the very first years of the sixteenth
century, for the compilation of the Complutensian Polyglot. Although
some of the scholars whom he engaged, as for instance, Demetrius Ducas,
were Greeks; and others, as Alfonzo Zamora or Pablo Coronell,[33] were
converted Jews; yet, the names of Lopez de Zuniga, Nunez de Guzman, and
Vergara[34] are a sufficient evidence of the success with which the
co-operation of native scholars was enlisted in the undertaking.[35]

       *       *       *       *       *

From this period the number of scholars eminent in the department
of languages becomes so great, and the history of many among them
presents so frequent points of resemblance, that it may conduce to the
greater distinctness of the narrative to classify separately the most
distinguished linguists of each among the principal nations.


§ I. LINGUISTS OF THE EAST.

Although the inquiry must of course commence with the East, the cradle
of human language, unfortunately the materials for this portion of the
subject are more meagre and imperfectly preserved than any other.

In the East indeed, the faculty of language appears, for the most part,
in a form quite different from what we shall find among the scholars of
the West. The Eastern linguists, with a few exceptions, have been eminent
as mere _speakers_ of languages, rather than scholars even in the loosest
sense of the word.

As it is in the East that the office of _Dragoman_ or “interpreter” first
rose to the dignity of a profession, so all the most notable Oriental
linguists have belonged to that profession.

A very remarkable specimen of this class occurs in the reign of Soliman
the Magnificent, and flourished in the early part of the sixteenth
century. A most interesting account is given of him, under his Turkish
name of Genus Bey, by Thevet, in that curious repertory—his _Cosmographie
Universelle_.[36] He was the son of a poor fisherman, of the Island of
Corfu; and while yet a boy, was carried away by pirates and sold as a
slave at Constantinople. Thence he was carried into Egypt, Syria, and
other Eastern countries; and he would also seem to have visited most of
the European kingdoms, or at least to have enjoyed the opportunity of
intercourse with natives of them all. His proficiency in the languages
both of the East and West, drew upon him the notice of the Sultan, who
appointed him his First Dragoman, with the rank of Pasha. Thevet (who
would seem to have known him personally during his wanderings,) describes
him in his quaint old French, as “the first man of his day for speaking
divers sorts of languages, and of the happiest memory under the Heavens.”
He adds, that this extraordinary man “knew perfectly no fewer than
sixteen languages, viz: Greek, both ancient and modern, Hebrew, Arabic,
Persian, Turkish, Moorish, Tartar, Armenian, Russian, Hungarian, Polish,
Italian, Spanish, German, and French.” Genus Bey, was, of course, a
renegade; but, from a circumstance related by Thevet, he appears to have
retained a reverence for his old faith, though not sufficiently strong to
be proof against temptation. He was solicited by some bigoted Moslems to
remove a bell, which the Christians had been permitted to erect in their
little church. For a time he refused to permit its removal; but at last
he was induced by a large bribe, to accede to the demand. Thevet relates
that, in punishment of his sacrilegious weakness, he was struck with that
loathsome disease which smote King Herod, and perished miserably in nine
days from the date of this inauspicious act.

In Naima’s “Annals of the Turkish Empire,” another renegade, a Hungarian
by birth, is mentioned, who spoke fourteen languages, and who, in
consequence of this accomplishment, was employed during a siege to carry
a message through the lines of the blockading army.[37]

A still more marvellous example of the gift of languages is mentioned by
Duret, in his _Trésor des Langues_ (p. 964)—that of Jonadab, a Jew of
Morocco, who lived about the same period. He was sold as a slave by the
Moors, and lived for twenty-six years in captivity in different parts
of the world. With more constancy to his creed, however, than the Corfu
Christian, he withstood every attempt to undermine his faith or to compel
its abjuration; and, from the obduracy of his resistance, received from
his masters the opprobrious name _Alhanar_, “the serpent” or “viper.”
Duret says that Jonadab spoke and wrote twenty-eight different languages.
He does not specify their names, however, nor have I been able to find
any other allusion to the man.

It would be interesting, if materials could be found for the inquiry,
to pursue this extremely curious subject through the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries, and especially in the military and commercial
establishments of the Venetians in the Morea and the islands. The race
of Dragomans has never ceased to flourish in the Levant. M. Antoine
d’Abbadie informed me that there are many families in which this office,
and sometimes the consular appointment for which it is an indispensable
qualification, have been hereditary for the last two or three centuries;
and that it is very common to find among them men and women who,
sufficiently for all the ordinary purposes of conversation, speak Arabic,
Turkish, Greek, Italian, Spanish, English, German, and French, with
little or no accent. This accomplishment is not confined to one single
nation. Mr. Burton, in his “Pilgrimage to Medinah and Meccah,” mentions
an Afghan who “spoke five or six languages.”[38] He speaks of another,
a Koord settled at Medinah, who “spoke five languages in perfection.”
The traveller, he assures us, “may hear the Cairene donkey-boys shouting
three or four European dialects with an accent as good as his own;” and
he “has frequently known Armenians (to whom, among all the Easterns, he
assigns the first place as linguists) speak, besides their mother tongue,
Turkish, Arabic, Persian, and Hindostanee, and at the same time display
an equal aptitude for the Occidental languages.”[39]

But of all the Eastern linguists of the present day the most notable
seem to be the ciceroni who take charge of the pilgrims at Mecca, many
of whom speak fluently every one of the numerous languages which prevail
over the vast region of the Moslem. Mr. Burton fell in at Mecca with
a one-eyed Hadji, who spoke fluently and with good accent Turkish,
Persian, Hindostani, Pushtu, Armenian, English, French, and Italian.[40]
In the “Turkish Annals” of Naima, already cited, the learned Vankuli
Mohammed Effendi, a contemporary of Sultan Murad Khan, is described as
“a perfect linguist.”[41] Many similar instances might, without much
difficulty, be collected; nor can it be doubted that, among the numerous
generations which have thus flourished and passed away in the East, there
may have been rivals for Genus Bey, or even for “the Serpent” himself.
But unhappily their fame has been local and transitory. They were admired
during their brief day of success, but are long since forgotten; nor is
it possible any longer to recover a trace of their history. They are
unknown,

    Carent quia vate sacro.[42]

It would be a great injustice, however, to represent this as the
universal character of the Eastern linguists. On the contrary, it has
only needed intercourse with the scholars of the West in order to draw
out what appears to be the very remarkable aptitude of the native
Orientals for the scientific study of languages. Thus the learned
Portuguese Jew, Rabbi Menasseh Ben Israel (1604-1657), was not only a
thorough master of the Oriental languages, but was able to write with
ease and exactness several of the languages of the West, and published
almost indifferently in Hebrew, Latin, Spanish, and English.[43] I allude
more particularly, however, to those bodies of Eastern Christians, which,
from their community of creed with the Roman Church, have, for several
centuries, possessed ecclesiastical establishments in Rome and other
cities of Europe.

The Syrians had been remarkable, even from the classic times,[44] for
the patient industry with which they devoted themselves to the labour of
translation from foreign languages into their own. Many of the modern
Syrians, however, have deserved the still higher fame of original
scholarship.

The Maronite community of Syrian Christians has produced several scholars
of unquestioned eminence. Abraham Echellensis was one of the chief
assistants of Le Jay, at Paris, in the preparation of his Polyglot. His
services in a somewhat similar capacity at Rome are familiar to all
Oriental scholars. But it is to the name of Assemani that the Maronite
body owes most of its reputation. For a time, indeed, literature would
seem to have been almost an inheritance in the family of Assemani. It has
contributed to the catalogue of Oriental scholars no less than five of
its members—Joseph Simon, who died in 1768; his nephews, Stephen Evodius
and Joseph Lewis; Joseph Aloysius, who died at Rome in 1782; and Simon,
who died at Padua in 1821. The first of them is the well-known editor of
the works of St. Ephrem, and author of the great repertory of Oriental
ecclesiastical erudition, the _Bibliotheca Orientalis_.

The Greeks, with greater resources, and under circumstances more
favourable, are less distinguished as linguists. John Matthew
Caryophilos, a native of Corfu, who was archbishop of Iconium and
resided at Rome in the early part of the seventeenth century, was a
learned Orientalist, and, besides several literary works of higher
pretension, published some elementary books on the Chaldee, Syriac, and
Coptic languages. But he has few imitators among his countrymen. Leo
Allatius (Allazzi), although a profound scholar, and familiar with every
department of the literature of the West, whether sacred or profane,[45]
can hardly be considered a linguist in the ordinary sense of the word.
The same may be said of the many Greek students, as, for instance,
Metaxa, Meletius Syrius, and others, who, during the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries, repaired to the universities of Italy, France,
and even England.[46] It can hardly be doubted, of course, that many of
them acquired a certain familiarity with the languages of the countries
in which they sojourned, but no traces of this knowledge appear to be
now discoverable. By far the most notable of them, Cyrillus Lucaris,
the well-known Calvinistic Patriarch of Constantinople, spoke and
wrote fluently Arabic, Greek, Latin, and Italian; but, if his latinity
be a fair sample of his skill in the other languages, his place as a
linguist must be held low indeed.[47] It should be added, however,
that as polyglot speakers, the Greeks have long enjoyed a considerable
reputation. The celebrated Panagiotes Nicusius[48] (better known by his
Italianized name Panagiotti) obtained, despite all the prejudices of
race, the post of First Dragoman of the Porte, about the middle of the
seventeenth century; and, from his time forward, the office was commonly
held by a Greek, until the separation of Greece from the Ottoman Empire.

Mr. Burton’s observation that no natives of the East seem to possess the
faculty of language in a higher degree than the Armenians, is confirmed
by the experience of all other travellers; and the commercial activity
which has long distinguished them, and has led to their establishing
themselves in almost all the great European centres of commerce, has
tended very much to develope this national characteristic. A far higher
spirit of enterprise has led to the foundation of many religious
establishments of the Armenians in different parts of Europe, which have
rendered invaluable services, not only to their own native language
and literature, but to Oriental studies generally. Among these the
fathers of the celebrated Mechitarist order have earned for themselves,
by their manifold contributions to sacred literature, the title of
the Benedictines of the East. The publications of this learned order
(especially at their principal press in the convent of San Lazzaro,
Venice,) are too well known to require any particular notice. Most of
their publications regard historical or theological subjects; but many
also are on the subject of language,[49] as grammars, dictionaries,
and philological treatises. A little series of versions, the Prayers
of St. Nerses in twenty-four languages, printed at their press, is
one of the most beautiful specimens of polyglot typography with which
I am acquainted. Among the scholars of the order the names of Somal,
Rhedeston, Ingigean, Avedichian, Minaos, and, above all, of the two
Auchers, are the most prominent. One of the latter is best known to
English readers as the friend of Byron, his instructor in Armenian, and
his partner in the compilation of an Anglo-Armenian grammar. The fathers
of this order generally, however, both in Vienna and in Italy, have long
enjoyed the reputation of being excellent linguists. Visitors of the
Armenian convent of St. Lazzaro at Venice cannot fail to be struck by
this accomplishment among its inmates. Besides the ordinary Oriental
languages, most of them speak Italian, French, and often German. I have
heard from M. Antoine d’Abbadie that, in 1837, Dr. Pascal Aucher spoke no
less than twelve languages.


§ II. LINGUISTS OF ITALY.

The most prominent among the nations of the West at the period
immediately succeeding the Revival of Letters, is of course Italy.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first in order, dating from this period, among the linguists of
Italy, is also in many respects the most remarkable of them all;—at least
as illustrating the possibility of uniting in a single individual the
most diversified intellectual attainments, each in the highest degree
of perfection;—the celebrated Giovanni Pico della Mirandola, son of the
Duke John Francis of that name.[50] He was born in 1463, and from his
childhood was regarded as one of the wonders of his age. Before he had
completed his tenth year, he delivered lectures in civil and canon law,
not less remarkable for eloquence than for learning. While yet a boy he
was familiar with all the principal Greek and Latin classics. He next
applied himself to Hebrew; and, while he was engaged in that study,
a large collection of cabalistic manuscripts, which were represented
to him as genuine works of Esdras, turned his attention to the other
Eastern languages, and especially the Chaldee, the Rabbinical dialect
of Hebrew, and the Arabic. Unfortunately, the strange and fantastic
learning with which he was thus thrown into contact gave a tinge to his
mind, which appears to have affected all his later studies. His progress
in languages, however, cannot but be regarded as prodigious, when we
consider the poverty of the linguistic resources of his age. At the age
of eighteen he had the reputation of knowing no fewer than twenty-two
languages, a considerable number of which he spoke with fluency. And
while he thus successfully cultivated the department of languages, he
was, at the same time, an extraordinary proficient in all the other
knowledge of his day. His memory was so wonderful as to be reckoned
among the marvellous examples of that gift which are enumerated by the
writers upon this faculty of the human mind. Cancellieri states that he
was able, after a single reading, not only to recite the contents of
any book which was offered to him, but to repeat the very words of the
author, and even in an inverted order.[51] In 1486 he maintained a thesis
in Rome, _De omni Re Scibili_. Much of the learning which it displayed
was certainly of a very idle and puerile character; much of it, too, was
the merest pedantry; but nevertheless it is undeniable that the nine
hundred propositions of which it consisted, comprised every department of
knowledge cultivated at that period. And it is impossible to doubt that,
if Pico’s career had been prolonged to the usual term of human life, his
reputation would have equalled that of the greatest scholars, whether of
the ancient or the contemporary world. He was cut off, however, at the
early age of thirty-one.

It is not unnatural to suppose that this circumstance, as well as the
rank of Pico, and the singular precocity of his talents, may have led to
a false or exaggerated estimate of his acquirements. But, even allowing
every reasonable deduction on this score, his claim must be freely
admitted to the character of one of the greatest wonders of his own or
any other age, whether he be considered as a linguist or as a general
scholar.

Marvellous, however, as is the reputation of Pico della Mirandola,
perhaps the science of language owes more to a less brilliant but more
practical scholar of the same period, Teseo Ambrosio, of the family of
the Albonesi. He was born at Pavia, in 1469. His admirers have not failed
to chronicle such precocious indications of genius as his composing
Italian, Latin, and even Greek poetry, before he was fifteen; but he
himself confesses that his proficiency in these studies dates from a
considerably later time. He entered the order of Canons Regular of St.
Augustine, and fixed his residence at Rome, where he devoted himself with
great assiduity to Oriental studies, and acquired such a reputation,
that when, in the Lateran Council of 1512, the united Ethiopic and
Maronite Christians solicited the privilege of using their own peculiar
liturgies while they maintained the communion of the Roman church, it was
to him the task of examining those liturgies, and of ascertaining how
far their teaching was in accordance with the doctrines of the Church,
was entrusted by the Holy See. Teseo assures us that, at the time when
he received this commission, he knew little more than the elements
of Hebrew, Chaldee, and Arabic. He set to work with the assistance of
a native Syrian (who, however, was entirely ignorant of Latin); and,
carrying on their communication by mutual instruction, he was soon able
not only to master the difficulties of these languages, but to set on
foot what may be regarded as (at least conjointly with the Complutensian
Polyglot) one of the earliest systematic schemes for the promotion of
Oriental studies. He had types cast expressly for his projects; and he
himself prepared the Chaldee Psalter for the press, and repaired to his
native city of Pavia for the purpose of having it printed. He died (1539)
before it was completed;[52] but his types were turned to account by
other scholars. It was with Teseo’s types that William Postel printed two
out of the five Pater Nosters contained in his collection—the Chaldee
and the Armenian.[53] And to him we owe a still greater boon—the first
regular attempt at a Polyglot Grammar; which, however imperfectly,
comprises the elements of Chaldee, Syriac, Armenian, and ten other
languages.

The scholarship of Ambrogio was derived almost entirely from books.
His countryman, Antonio Pigafetta, enjoyed among his contemporaries a
different reputation, that of considerable skill as a speaker of foreign
languages, acquired during his extensive and protracted wanderings.
Pigafetta was born at Vicenza, towards the end of the fifteenth century.
In the expedition undertaken, under the patronage of Charles V., for the
conquest of the Moluccas, by the celebrated Fernando Magellan, the first
circumnavigator of the globe, one of the literary staff was Pigafetta,
who acted as historiographer of the expedition, and to whose narrative we
are indebted for all the particulars of it, which have been preserved.

Marzari describes Pigafetta as a prodigy of learning; and, although this
has been questioned by later inquirers,[54] there is no reason to doubt
his acquirements in modern languages at least, and particularly his
skill and success in obtaining information as to the languages of the
countries which he visited. It is to him[55] we are indebted for the
first vocabularies of the language of the Philippine and Molucca islands,
the merit of which is recognized even by recent philologers.[56]

It may be permitted to class with the linguists of Italy, a Corsican
scholar of the same period, Augustine, bishop of Nebia. It is difficult
to pronounce definitively as to the extent of his attainments; but his
skill in the ancient languages, at least, is sufficiently attested
by the polyglot Bible which he published, (containing the Hebrew,
Greek, Chaldee, and Arabic texts,) of which Sixtus of Sienna speaks
in the highest terms; and if we could receive without qualification
the statement of the same writer, we should conclude that Augustine’s
familiarity with modern languages was even more extensive. Sixtus of
Sienna describes him as “deeply versed in the languages of all the
nations which are scattered over the face of the earth.”

Towards the close of the sixteenth century the study of languages
in Italy assumed that practical character in relation to the actual
exigencies of missionary life by which it has ever since been mainly
characterized in that country. The Oriental press established at Florence
by the Cardinal Ferdinand de Medici, under the superintendence of the
great orientalist Giambattista Raimondi;[57] the opening at Rome of
the College _De Propaganda Fide_; the foundation of the College of San
Pancrazio, for the Carmelite Oriental Missions in 1662; the opening of
similar Oriental schools in the Dominican, the Franciscan, Augustinian,
and other orders, for the training of candidates for their respective
missions in the East; and above all, the constant intercourse with
the Eastern missions which began to be maintained, gave an impulse to
Oriental studies, the more powerful and the more permanent, because it
was founded on motives of religion; and although we do not meet among
the missionary linguists that marvellous variety of languages which
excites our wonder, yet we find in them abundant evidences of a solid and
practical scholarship, whose fruits, if less attractive, are more useful
and more enduring. Nearly all the linguists of Italy from the close of
the sixteenth century, appear to have been either actually missionaries,
or connected with the colleges of the foreign mission.

Thus, Antonio Giggei, one of the “Oblates of Mary,” taught Persian in
a missionary college, at Milan, and, at a later period, taught Arabic
in Florence. Giggei’s _Thesaurus Linguæ Arabicæ_,[58] is still much
esteemed. He wrote besides, a Grammar of Chaldee and of Rabbinical
Hebrew, which is still preserved in manuscript in the Ambrosian Library
at Milan; and his translation of a Rabbinical commentary on the
Proverbs of Solomon, published at Milan in 1620, is an evidence of his
familiarity, not only with Biblical Hebrew, but with the language of the
Talmud in all its successive phases.

In like manner, Clemente Galani, the eminent Armenian scholar, spent
no less than twelve years as a missionary in Armenia. On his return to
Rome, in 1650, he was such a proficient in the language that he was able,
not only to write both in Armenian and Latin his well-known work on the
conformity of the creeds of the Armenian and Roman Churches,[59] but also
to deliver theological lectures to the Armenian students in Rome in their
native tongue.[60]

Tommaso Ubicini was a Franciscan missionary in the Levant.[61] He was
born at Novara, and entered young into the order of Friar-minors. He
was named guardian of the Franciscan convent in Jerusalem; and, during
a residence of many years, made himself master, in addition to Hebrew
and Chaldee, of the Syriac, Arabic, and Coptic languages. The latter
years of his life were spent in the convent of San Pietro in Montorio
at Rome; where, besides publishing several works upon these languages,
be taught them to the students of his order. His great work, _Thesaurus
Arabico-Syro-Latinus_ was not published till 1636, several years after
his death.[62]

Ludovico Maracci, best known to English readers by the copious use to
which Gibbon has turned his translation and annotations of the Koran, was
one of the missionary “Clerks of the Mother of God.” He was born at Lucca
in 1612, and first obtained notice by the share which he had in the Roman
edition of the Arabic Bible, published in 1671. He taught Arabic for many
years with great distinction in the University of the Sapienza at Rome.
But his best celebrity is due to his critical edition of the Koran, and
the admirable translation which accompanies it.[63] From this repertory
of Arabic learning, Sale has borrowed, almost without acknowledgment, or
rather with occasional depreciatory allusions, all that is most valuable
in his translation and notes.

One of Maracci’s pupils, John Baptist Podestà, (born at Fazana early
in the 17th century), is another exception to the general rule. Having
perfected his Oriental studies in Constantinople, he was appointed
Oriental Secretary of the Emperor Leopold at Vienna, and attained
considerable reputation as Professor of Arabic in that university. He
published a Grammar of Arabic, Persian, and Turkish; which, however, was
severely, and, indeed, ferociously, criticised by his contemporary and
rival, Meninski.

But Podestà’s contemporary, Paolo Piromalli, was trained in the school
of the Mission. He was a native of Calabria, and became a member of the
Dominican order. Piromalli was for many years attached to the Mission
of his order in Armenia, and was eminently successful in reconciling
the separated Armenians to the Roman Church, having even the happiness
to number among his converts the schismatical patriarch himself. From
Armenia, Piromalli passed into the Missions of Georgia and Persia. He
afterwards went, in the capacity of Apostolic Nuncio, to Poland, with
a commission of much importance to the Emperor from the Pope, Urban
VIII. In the course of one of his voyages he was made prisoner by the
Algerine corsairs, and carried as a slave to Tunis; but he was soon after
redeemed and called to Rome, whence, after he had been entrusted with the
revision of an Armenian Bible, he was sent back to the East, as Bishop
of Nachkivan in 1655. He remained in this charge for nine years, and was
called home as Bishop of Bisignano, where he died in 1667. Piromalli
published two dictionaries, Persian and Armenian, and several other works
upon these languages.[64]

The Augustinian order in Italy, also, produced a linguist, not inferior
in solidity, and certainly superior in range of attainments, to any of
those hitherto enumerated—Antonio Agostino Giorgi.[65] He was born at
San Mauro, near Rimini, in 1711, and entered the Augustinian order at
Bologna; but Benedict XIV., who, during his occupancy of the see of
Bologna, had become acquainted with his merit, invited him to Rome after
his elevation to the Papacy, and appointed him to a professorship in
the Sapienza. Father Giorgi occupied this post with much distinction
for twenty-two years, till his death, in 1797. His acquirements as a
linguist were more various than those of any of the scholars hitherto
named. Besides modern languages, he knew not only Greek, Hebrew, Chaldee,
Samaritan, and Syriac, but also Coptic and (what was at that period a
much more rare accomplishment) Tibetan. On the last named language he
compiled an elementary work for the use of missionaries, which, although
it is not free from inaccuracies, deserves, nevertheless, the highest
praise as a first essay in that till then untried language.

Simon De Magistris, one of the priests of the Oratory, (born at Ferrara
in 1728) was for many years at the head of the Congregation of the
Oriental Liturgies in Rome. He was not only deeply versed in the written
languages of the East, but spoke the greater number of them with the same
ease and fluency as his native Italian.[66]

Of the learned Dominican, Finetti, I am unable to offer any particulars.
His treatise “On the Hebrew and its cognate Languages” is a sufficient
evidence of his ability as an Orientalist; but it contains no indication
of anything beyond the learning which is acquired from books.

The same may be said of the Oratorian, Valperga de Galuso. He was born at
Turin in 1737, but lived chiefly in the convents of his order at Naples,
Malta, and Rome. In addition, however, to his accomplishments as an
Orientalist, Padre de Galuso had the reputation of being one of the most
skilful mathematicians of his day. He died in 1815.

Our information regarding the two De Rossi’s, Ignazio, author of the
_Etymologicum Copticum_, and Giambernardo, of Parma, is more detailed and
more satisfactory.

Ignazio de Rossi was born at Viterbo in 1740, and entered the Jesuit
society at a very early age. In the schools of Macerata, Spoleto, and
Florence, he was employed in teaching the Humanities and Rhetoric until
the suppression of the order in 1773; after which event he repaired
to Rome, and received an appointment as professor of Hebrew in the
University, which he held for thirty years, rejoining his brethren,
however, at the first moment of their restoration under Pius VII.

As a general scholar, Father De Rossi was one of the first men of his
day. His memory may be ranked among the most prodigious of which any
record has been preserved. On one occasion, during the _villeggiatura_
at Frascati, it was tried by a test in some respects the most wonderful
which has ever been applied in such cases. A line being selected at
pleasure from any part of any one of the four great Italian classics,
Dante, Petrarca, Tasso, and Ariosto, De Rossi immediately repeated
the hundred lines _which followed next in order_ after that which had
been chosen; and, on his companions expressing their surprise at this
extraordinary feat (which he repeated several times), he placed the
climax to their amazement by reciting _in the reverse order_ the hundred
lines immediately _preceding_ any line taken at random from any one of
the above-named poets.[67] His reputation as an Orientalist was founded
chiefly upon his familiarity with Hebrew and the cognate languages. But
he was also a profound Coptic scholar; and it is a subject of regret to
many students of that language that his numerous MSS. connected therewith
have been suffered to remain so long unpublished. He died in 1824.

Giovanni Bernardo de Rossi was a linguist of wider range. He was born
at Castel Nuovo, in Piedmont, in 1742, and in his youth was destined
for the ecclesiastical state. He began his collegiate studies at Turin,
and manifested very early that taste for Oriental literature which
distinguished his after life. Within six months after he commenced his
Hebrew studies, he produced a long Hebrew poem. In addition to the
Biblical Hebrew, he was soon master of the Rabbinical language, of
Chaldee, Syriac, and Arabic. He learned besides, by private study, most
of the languages of modern Europe;—his plan being to draw up in each a
compendious grammar for his own use. In this way he prepared grammars
of the German, English, and Russian languages. In 1769, he obtained an
appointment in the Royal Museum at Turin; but, being invited at the same
time to undertake the much more congenial office of Professor of Oriental
Languages in the new University of Parma, he gladly transferred himself
to that city, where he continued to reside, as Professor of Oriental
Literature, for more than forty years. During the latter half of this
period, De Rossi maintained a frequent correspondence with Mezzofanti,
upon the subject of their common studies.[68] From the terms in which
such a scholar as Mezzofanti speaks of De Rossi, and the deference with
which he appeals to his judgment, we may infer what his acquirements
must have been. On occasion of the marriage of the Infante of Parma,
Charles Emanuel, he published a polyglot epithalamium,[69]—a Collection
of Hymeneal Odes in various languages—which even still is regarded as
the most extraordinary of that class of compositions[70] ever produced
by a single individual. It does not belong to my present plan to allude
to the works of De Rossi, or to offer any estimate of his learning; but
without entering into any such particulars, or attempting to specify
the languages with which he was acquainted, it may safely be said that
no Italian linguist from the days of Pico della Mirandola can be
compared with him, either in the solidity or the extent of his linguistic
attainments. De Rossi died in 1831.[71]

The fame of the linguists of Italy during the nineteenth century has been
so completely eclipsed by that of Mezzofanti, that I shall not venture
upon any enumeration of them, though the list would embrace such names as
Rossellini, Luzatto, Molza, Laureani, &c. There are few of whom it can be
said with so much truth as of Mezzofanti:—

                Prœgravat artes
    Infra se positas.


§ III. SPANISH AND PORTUGUESE LINGUISTS.

The catalogue of Spanish linguists opens with a name hardly less
marvellous than that which I have placed at the head of the linguists
of modern Italy—that of Fernando di Cordova;—one of those universal
geniuses, whom Nature, in the prodigal exercise of her creative powers,
occasionally produces, as if to display their extent and versatility. He
was born early in the fifteenth century, and was hardly less precocious
than his Italian rival, Pico della Mirandola. At ten years of age he
had completed his courses of grammar and rhetoric. He could recite
three or four pages of the Orations of Cicero after a single reading.
Before he attained his twenty-fifth year, he was installed Doctor in all
the faculties; and he is said by Feyjoo to have been thorough master
(supo con toda la perfeccion) of Latin, Greek, Hebrew, Chaldee, and
Arabic. Feyjoo adds, that he knew, besides, all the principal European
languages.[72] He could repeat the entire Bible from memory. He was
profoundly versed in theology, in civil and canon law, in mathematics,
and in medicine. He had at his perfect command all the works of St.
Thomas, of Scotus, of Alexander of Hales, of Galen, Avicenna, and the
other lights of the age in every department of science.[73] Like the
Admirable Crichton, too, he was one of the most accomplished gentlemen
and most distinguished cavaliers of his time. He could play on every
known variety of instrument; he sang exquisitely; he was a most graceful
dancer; an expert swordsman; and a bold and skilful rider; and he was
master of one particular art of fence by which he was able to defeat all
his adversaries, by springing upon them at a single bound of twenty-three
or twenty-four feet! In a word, to adopt the enthusiastic panegyric of
the old chronicler on whose simple narrative these statements rest, “if
you could live a hundred years without eating or drinking, and were to
give the whole time to study, you could not learn all that this young
man knew.”[74] The occasion to which this writer, quoting Monstrelet’s
Chronicle,[75] refers was the Royal Fête at Paris in 1445; so that
Fernando must have been born about 1425. Of his later history but little
is known. He was sent as ambassador to Rome in 1469, and died in 1480.

A Portuguese of the same period, Pedro de Covilham, is mentioned by
Damian a Goes in his curious book, _De Ethiopum Moribus_ in terms which,
if we could take them literally, should entitle him to a place among the
linguists. During the reign of John II. of Portugal (1481-95) Covilham,
who had already distinguished himself as an explorer under Alfonzo V.,
was sent, in company with Alfonzo de Payva, in search of the kingdom
of Prester John, which the traditional notions of the time placed in
Abyssinia. Payva died upon the expedition. Covilham, after visiting
India, the Persian Gulf, and exploring both the coasts of the Red Sea,
at length reached Abyssinia, where he was received with much distinction
by the King. He married in the country, and obtained large possessions;
but, in accordance with a law of Abyssinia[76] similar to that which
still exists in Japan, prohibiting any one who may have once settled in
the country ever again to leave it, he was compelled to adopt Abyssinia
as a second home. When, therefore, he was recalled by John II., the King
of Abyssinia refused to relinquish him, pleading “_that he was skilled
in almost all the languages of men_,”[77] and that he had made to him,
as his own adopted subject, large grants of land and other possessions.
Covilham, after a residence of thirty-three years, was still alive in
1525, when the embassy under Alvarez de Lima reached Abyssinia.

Very early in the sixteenth century, I find a notice of a Spanish convert
from Judaism, called in Latin “Libertas Cominetus” (_Libertas_ being,
in all probability, but the translation of his Hebrew patronymic,)
whose acquirements are more precisely defined. He was born at Cominedo,
towards the close of the fifteenth century, and renounced his creed
about 1525. His fellow-convert Galatinus, an Italian Jew, and himself
no mean linguist, describes Libertas in his work “_De Arcanis Catholicæ
Veritatis_,” as not only deeply versed in Holy Writ, but master of
fourteen languages.[78] The Biographical Dictionaries and other books of
reference are quite silent regarding him.

The name of Benedict Arias Montanus, editor of the so-called “King of
Spain’s Polyglot Bible,” is better known to Biblical students. He was
born at Frexenal[79] in Estremadura in 1527 and studied in the university
of Alcala, then in the first freshness of the reputation which it owed
to the magnificence of the great Cardinal Ximenes. Montanus entered the
order of St. James, and after accompanying the Bishop of Segovia to the
Council of Trent, where he appeared with great distinction, returned
to the Hermitage of Nuestra Señora de los Angelos near Aracena, with
the intention of devoting himself entirely to study and prayer. From
this retreat, however, he was drawn by Philip II., who employed him
to edit a new Polyglot Bible on a more comprehensive plan than the
Complutensian Polyglot. On the completion of this task, Philip sought to
reward the learned editor by naming him to a bishopric; but Montanus
had humility and self-denial enough to decline the honour, and died an
humble chaplain, in 1598. The estimate formed by his contemporaries of
Montanus’s attainments in languages falls little short of the marvellous.
Le Mire describes him as _omnium fere gentium linguis et literis raro
exemplo excultus_; but we may more safely take his own modest statement
in the preface of his Polyglot, that he knew ten languages.[80]

The celebrated Father Martin Del Rio, best known perhaps to English
readers, since Sir Walter Scott’s pleasant sketch, by his vast work on
Demonology, was also a very distinguished linguist. Del Rio, although of
Spanish parentage, was born at Antwerp in May 1551. His first university
studies were made at Paris; but he received the Doctor’s degree at
Salamanca, and has merited a place in Baillet’s _Enfans Celebres_, by
publishing an edition of Solinus, with a learned commentary, before he
was twenty years old.[81] Del Rio’s talents and reputation opened for him
a splendid career; but he abandoned all his offices and all his prospects
of preferment, in order to enter the Society of the Jesuits at Valladolid
in 1580. According to Feyjoo,[82] Del Rio knew ten languages; and Baillet
would appear to imply even more, when he says that he was master of _at
least_ that number. Del Rio died at Louvain in 1608.

One of Del Rio’s most distinguished contemporaries, the celebrated
dramatic poet, Lope de Vega, although his celebrity rests upon a very
different foundation, was also a very respectable linguist, so far, at
least, as regards the modern languages. The extraordinary fecundity of
this author, especially when we consider his extremely chequered and
busy career as a secretary, a soldier, and eventually a priest, would
seem to preclude the possibility of his having applied himself to any
other pursuit than that of dramatic literature. The mere physical labour
of committing to paper (putting composition out of view altogether)
his _fifteen hundred_ versified plays,[83] three hundred interludes
and sacred dramas[84], ten epic poems, and eight prose novels, besides
an infinity of essays, prefaces, dedications, and other miscellaneous
pieces, would appear more than enough to occupy the very busiest human
life. Yet notwithstanding all this prodigious labour, Lope de Vega
contrived to find time for the acquisition of Greek, Latin, Italian,
Portuguese, French, and probably English! Well might Cervantes call him
“a Prodigy of Nature!”

Although the missionaries of Spain and Portugal are, as a body, less
distinguished in the department of languages than those of Italy, yet
there are some among them not inferior to the most eminent of their
Italian brethren. The great Coptic and Abyssinian scholar, Antonio
Fernandez, was a Portuguese Jesuit. He was born at Lisbon in 1566, and
entered the Jesuit society as a member of the Portuguese province of
the order. After a long preparatory training, he was sent, in 1602,
to Goa, the great centre of the missionary activity of Portugal. His
ultimate destination, however, was Abyssinia, which country he reached
in 1604, in the disguise of an Armenian. He resided in Abyssinia for
nearly thirty years, and was charged with a mission to the Pope Paul
III. and Philip IV. of Spain, from the king, who, under the influence of
the missionaries, had embraced the Catholic religion. Fernandez set out
with some native companions in 1615; but they were all made prisoners
at Alaba, and narrowly escaped being put to death; nor was he released
in the end, except on condition of relinquishing this intended mission,
and returning to Abyssinia. On the death of the king, who had so long
protected them, the whole body of Catholic missionaries were expelled
from Abyssinia by the new monarch in 1632; and Fernandez returned,
after a most chequered and eventful career, to Goa, where he died, ten
years later, in 1642. Of his acquirements in the Western languages, I
am unable to discover any particulars, but he was thoroughly versed in
Armenian, Coptic, and Amharic or Abyssinian, in both of which last named
languages he has left several ritual and ascetic works for the use of the
missionaries and native children.

The Spanish and Portuguese missionaries in America, too, (especially
those of the Jesuit order) rendered good service to the study of the
numerous native languages of both continents.[85] Most of the modern
learning on the subject is derived from their treatises, chiefly
manuscript, preserved by the Society.

Nor were the other orders less efficient. Padre Josef Carabantes, a
Capuchin of the province of Aragon, (born in 1648) wrote a most valuable
practical treatise for the use of missionaries, which was long a text
book in their hands.

One of the Portuguese missionaries in Abyssinia, Father Pedro Paez, who
succeeded Fernandez, and whose memory still lingers among the native
traditions of the people,[86] not only became thorough master of the
popular dialects of the various races of the Valley of the Nile, but
attained a proficiency in Gheez, the learned language of Abyssinia, not
equalled even by the natives themselves.[87] A Franciscan missionary
at Constantinople about the same time, mentioned by Cyril Lucaris, is
described by him as “acquainted with many languages;”[88] but I have not
been able to discover his name.

By far the most eminent linguist of the Peninsula, however, is the
learned Jesuit, Father Lorenzo Hervas-y-Pandura. He was born in 1735,
of a noble family, at Horcajo, in la Mancha. Having entered the Jesuit
society, he taught philosophy for some years in Madrid, and afterwards in
a convent in Murcia; but at length, happily for the interests of science
as well as of religion, he embraced a missionary career, and remained
attached to the Jesuit mission of America, until 1767. On the suppression
of the order, Father Hervas settled at Cesena, and devoted himself to
his early philosophical studies, which, however, he ultimately, in a
great measure, relinquished in order to apply himself to literature and
especially to philology. When the members of the society were permitted
to re-establish themselves in Spain, Hervas went to Catalonia; but he was
obliged to return to Italy, and settled at Rome, where he was named by
Pius VII. keeper of the Vatican Library. In this honourable charge he
remained till his death in 1809.

Father Hervas may with truth be pronounced one of the most meritorious
scholars of modern times. His works are exceedingly numerous; and, beside
his favourite pursuit, philology, embrace almost every other conceivable
subject, theology, mathematics, history, general and local, palæography;
not to speak of an extensive collection of works connected with the
order, which he edited, and a translation of Bercastel’s History of the
Church, (with a continuation), executed, if not by himself, at least
under his superintendence. Besides all the stupendous labour implied
in these diversified undertakings, Father Hervas has the still further
merit of having devoted himself to the subject of the instruction of the
deaf-mute, for whose use he devised a little series of publications, and
published a very valuable essay on the principles to be followed in their
instruction.[89]

Our only present concern, however, is with his philological and
linguistic publications, especially in so far as they evince a knowledge
of languages. They form part of a great work in twenty-one 4to. volumes,
entitled _Idea dell’ Universo_; and were printed at intervals, at Cesena,
in Italian, from which language they were translated into Spanish by
his friends and associates, and republished in Spain. It will only be
necessary to particularize one or two of them—the _Saggio Prattico delle
Lingue_, which consists of a collection of the Lord’s Prayer in three
hundred and seven languages, together with other specimens of twenty-two
additional languages, in which the author was unable to obtain a version
of the Lord’s Prayer, all illustrated by grammatical analyses and
annotations; and the _Catalogo delle Lingue conosciute, e Notizia delle
loro Affinità e Diversità_.[90] In the compilation of these, and his
other collections, it is true, Hervas had the advantage, not alone of
his own extensive travel, and of his own laborious research, but also of
the aid of his brethren; and this in an Order which numbered among its
members, men to whose adventurous spirit every corner of the world had
been familiar:—

    “In Greenland’s icy mountains,
    On India’s coral strand,
    Where Afric’s sunny fountains
    Roll down their golden sand.”

But he, himself, compiled grammars of no less than eighteen of the
languages of America; which, with the liberality of true science, he
freely communicated to William von Humboldt for publication in the
_Mithridates_ of Adelung. He was a most refined classical scholar and a
profound Orientalist. He was perfectly familiar, besides, with almost
all the European languages; and, wide as is the range of tongues which
his published works embrace, his critical and grammatical notes and
observations, even upon the most obscure and least known of the languages
which they contain, although in many cases they have of course all the
imperfections of a first essay, exhibit, even in their occasional errors,
a vigorous and original mind.

The name of Father Hervas-y-Pandura is a fitting close to the
distinguished line of linguistic “Glorias de España.”


§ IV. FRENCH LINGUISTS.

The University of Paris did not enter into the study of languages so
early, or with so much zeal as the rival schools of Spain and Italy.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first[91] great name in this department which we meet in the history
of French letters, is that of the celebrated Rabbinical scholar, William
Postel. This extraordinary man was born at Dolerie in 1510. Having lost
both his parents at a very early age, he was left entirely dependent
upon his own exertions for support; and, with that indomitable energy
which often accompanies the love of knowledge, he began, from his very
boyhood, a systematic course of self-denial, by which he hoped to realize
the means of prosecuting the studies for which he had conceived an early
predilection. Having scraped together, in the laborious and irksome
occupation of a school-master, what he regarded as a sufficient sum for
his modest wants, he repaired to Paris; but he had scarcely reached
that city, when he was robbed by some designing sharpers, of the fruits
of all his years of self-denial; and a long illness into which he was
thrown by the chagrin and privation which ensued, reduced him to the
last extremity. Even still, however, his spirit was unbroken. He went to
Beauce, where, by working as a daily labourer, he earned the means of
returning to Paris as a poor scholar. Presenting himself at the College
of Saint Barbara, he obtained a place as a servant, with permission to
attend the lectures; and having in some way got possession of a Hebrew
grammar, he contrived, in his stolen half hours of leisure, to master
the language so thoroughly, that in a short time his preceptors found
themselves outstripped by their singular dependent.

His reputation as an Oriental scholar spread rapidly. When La Fôret’s
memorable embassy to the Sultan was being organized by Francis I., the
king was recommended to entrust to Postel a literary mission, somewhat
similar to that undertaken during the reign of Louis Philippe, at the
instance of M. de Villemain, one of the objects of which was to collect
Greek and Oriental MSS. It was on his return from this expedition, (in
which he visited Constantinople, Greece, Asia Minor, and part of Syria,)
that Postel met Teseo Ambrosio at Venice, and published what may be
said to have been the first systematic attempt as yet made to bring
together materials for the philosophical investigation of the science of
language—being a collection of the alphabets of twelve languages, with a
slight account of each among the number.[92] He was soon after appointed
Professor of Mathematics, and also of Oriental Languages, in the College
de France; but the wild and visionary character of his mind appears to
have been quite unsuited to any settled pursuit. He had conceived the
idea that he was divinely called to the mission of uniting all Christians
into one community, the head of which he recognized in Francis I. of
France, whom he maintained to be the lineal descendant of Sem, the eldest
of the sons of Noah. Under the notion that this was his pre-ordained
vocation, he refused to accompany La Fôret on a second mission to the
East, although he was pressed to do so by the king himself, and a sum
of four thousand crowns was placed at his disposal for the purchase of
manuscripts. He offered himself, in preference, to the newly founded
society of the Jesuits; but his unsuitableness for that state soon became
so apparent, that St. Ignatius of Loyola, then superior of the society,
refused to receive him. After many wanderings in France, Italy, and
Germany, and an imprisonment in Venice, (where his fanaticism reached its
greatest height,) he undertook a second expedition to the East, in 1549,
whence he returned in 1551, with a large number of valuable MSS. obtained
through the French ambassador, D’Aramont, but wilder and more visionary
than ever. He resumed his lectures in the College des Lombards, now the
property of the Irish College in Paris. The crowds who flocked to hear
him were so great, that they were obliged to assemble in the court, where
he addressed them from one of the windows. His subsequent career was a
strange alternation of successes and embroilments. The Emperor Ferdinand
invited him to Vienna, as Professor of Mathematics. While there, he
assisted Widmandstadt in the preparation of his Syriac New Testament.
He left Vienna, however, after a short residence, and betook himself to
Italy, in 1554 or 1555. He was put into prison in Rome, but liberated in
1557. In 1562 he returned to Paris. The extravagancies of his conduct
and his teaching led to his being placed under a kind of honourable
surveillance, in 1564, in the monastery of St. Martin des Champs, near
Paris. Yet so interesting was his conversation that crowds of the most
distinguished of all orders continued to visit him in this retreat till
his death in 1581. Postel’s attainments in languages living or dead, were
undoubtedly most extensive. Not reckoning the modern languages, which
he may be presumed to have known, his Introduction exhibits a certain
familiarity with not less than twelve languages, chiefly eastern; and he
is said to have been able to converse in most of the living languages
known in his time. Duret states, as a matter notorious to all the
learned, that he “knew, understood, and spoke fifteen languages;”[93] and
it was his own favourite boast, that he could traverse the entire world
without once calling in the aid of an interpreter. In addition to his
labours as a linguist, Postel was a most prolific writer. Fifty-seven of
his works are enumerated by his biographer.

It is to this learned but eccentric scholar that we owe the idea
of the well-known polyglot collections of the Lord’s Prayer. These
compilations as carried out by later collectors, have rendered such
service to philology, that, although many of their authors were little
more than mere compilers, and have but slender claims to be considered
as linguists, in the higher sense of the word, it would be unpardonable
to pass them over without notice in a Memoir like the present. Towards
the close of the fourteenth century, a Hungarian soldier named John
Schildberger, while serving in a campaign against the Turks in Hungary,
was made prisoner by the enemy; and on his return home, after a captivity
of thirty-two years, published (in 1428) an account of his adventures. He
appended to his travels, as a specimen of the languages of the countries
in which he had sojourned, the Lord’s Prayer in Armenian, and also in
the Tartar tongue. This, however, was a mere traveller’s curiosity:
but Postel’s publication (Paris, 1558) is more scientific. It contains
specimens of the characters of twelve different languages, in five of
which—Chaldee, Hebrew, Arabic, Greek, and Armenian, the Pater Noster is
printed both in Roman characters and in those of the several languages.
This infant essay of Postel was followed, ten years after, by the
collection of Theodore Bibliander, (the classicized form of the German
name _Buchmann_,) which contains fourteen different Pater Nosters. Conrad
Gesner, in 1555, increased the number to twenty-two, to which Angelo
Rocea, an Augustinian Bishop, added three more (one of them Chinese) in
1591. Jerome Megiser, in 1592, extended the catalogue to forty. John
Baptist Gramaye, a professor in Louvain, made a still more considerable
stride in advance. He was taken prisoner by the Algerine corsairs, in the
beginning of the next century, and after his return to Europe, collected
no fewer than a hundred different versions of the Pater Noster, which he
published in 1622. But his work seems to have attracted little notice;
for more than forty years later, (1668) a collection made by Bishop
Wilkins, the learned linguist, to whom I shall hereafter return, contains
no more than fifty.

In all these, however, the only object appears to have been to collect
as large a number of languages as possible, without any attention to
critical arrangement. But, in the latter part of the same century,
the collection of Andrew Müller (which comprises eighty-three Pater
Nosters) exhibits a considerable advance in this particular. Men began,
too, to arrange and classify the various families. Francis Junius
(Van der Yonghe) published the Lord’s Prayer in nineteen different
languages of the German family; and Nicholas Witsen devoted himself to
the languages of Northern Asia—the great Siberian family,—in eleven
of which he published the Lord’s Prayer in 1692. This improvement in
scientific arrangement, however, was not universal; for although the
great collection of John Chamberlayne and David Wilkins, printed at
Amsterdam in 1715, contains the Lord’s Prayer in a hundred and fifty-two
languages, and that of Christian Frederic Gesner—the well-known
_Orientalischer und Occidentalischer Sprachmeister_ (Leipzic 1748)—in
two hundred, they are both equally compiled upon the old plan, and have
little value except as mere specimens of the various languages which they
contain.[94]

It is not so with a collection already described, which was published
near the close of the same century, by a learned Spanish Jesuit,
Don Lorenzo Hervas y Pandura. It is but one of that vast variety of
philological works from the same prolific pen which, as I have stated,
appeared, year after year, in Cesena, originally in Italian, though they
were all afterwards published in a Spanish translation, in the author’s
native country. Father Hervas’s collection, it will be remembered,
contains the Lord’s Prayer in no less than _three hundred and seven_
languages, besides hymns and other prayers in twenty-two additional
dialects, in which the author was not able to find the Pater Noster.

Almost at the very same time with this important publication of Hervas,
a more extensive philological work made its appearance in the extreme
north, under the patronage and indeed the direct inspiration, of the
Empress Catherine II. of Russia. The plan of this compilation was more
comprehensive than that of the collections of the Lord’s Prayer. It
consisted of a Vocabulary of two hundred and seventy-three familiar and
ordinary words, in part selected by the Empress herself, and drawn up
in her own hand. This Vocabulary, which is very judiciously chosen, is
translated into two hundred and one languages. The compilation of this
vast comparative catalogue of words was entrusted to the celebrated
philologer, Pallas, assisted by all the eminent scholars of the northern
capital; among whom the most efficient seems to have been Bakmeister, the
Librarian of the Imperial Academy of St. Petersburg. The opportunities
afforded by the patronage of a sovereign who held at her disposition the
services of the functionaries of a vast, and, in the literal sense of
the word, a polyglot empire like Russia, were turned to the best account.
Languages entirely beyond the reach of private research, were unlocked
at her command; and the rude and hitherto almost unnamed dialects of
Siberia, of Northern Asia, of the Halieutian islanders, and the nomadic
tribes of the Arctic shores, find a place in this monster vocabulary,
beside the more polished tongues of Europe and the East. Nevertheless,
the Vocabulary of Pallas (probably from the circumstance of its being
printed altogether in the Russian character)[95] is but little familiar
to our philologers, and is chiefly known from the valuable materials
which it supplied to Adelung and his colleagues in the compilation of the
well-known _Mithridates_.

The _Mithridates_ of Adelung closes this long series of philological
collections; but although in its general plan, it is only an expansion
of the original idea of the first simple traveller who presented to his
countrymen, as specimens of the languages of the countries which he had
visited, versions in each language of the Prayer which is most familiar
to every Christian, yet it is not only far more extensive in its range
than any of its predecessors, but also infinitely more philosophical
in its method. There can be no doubt that the selection of a prayer so
idiomatical, and so constrained in its form as the Lord’s Prayer, was far
from judicious. As a specimen of the structure of the various languages,
the choice of it was singularly infelicitous; and the utter disregard of
the principles of criticism (and in truth of everything beyond the mere
multiplication of specimens), which marks all the early collections, is
an additional aggravation of its original defect. But it is not so in the
_Mithridates_ of Adelung. It retains the Lord’s Prayer, it is true, like
the rest, as the specimen (although not the only one) of each language;
but it abandons the unscientific arrangement of the older collections,
the languages being distributed into groups according to their
ethnographical affinities. The versions, too, are much more carefully
made; they are accompanied by notes and critical illustrations; and in
general, each language or dialect, with the literature bearing upon it,
is minutely and elaborately described. In a word, the _Mithridates_,
although, as might be expected, still falling far short of perfection, is
a strictly philosophical contribution to the study of ethnography; and
has formed the basis, as well as the text, of the researches of all the
masters in the modern schools of comparative philology.[96]

To return, however, to the personal history of linguists, from which we
have been called aside by the mention of the work of Postel.

A celebrity as a linguist equally distinguished, and even more unamiable,
than Postel’s, is that of his countryman and contemporary, the younger of
the two Scaligers.

Joseph Justus Scaliger was born at Agen in 1544, and made his school
studies at Bordeaux, where he was only remarkable for his exceeding
dulness, having spent three years in a fruitless, though painfully
laborious, attempt to master the first rudiments of the Latin language.
These clouds of the morning, however, were but the prelude of a brilliant
day. His after successes were proportionately rapid and complete. The
stories which are told of him seem almost legendary. He is said to have
read the entire Iliad and Odyssey in twenty-one days, and to have run
through the Greek dramatists and lyric poets in four months. He was but
seventeen years old when he produced his Œdipus. At the same age he was
able to speak Hebrew with all the fluency of a Rabbi. His application
to study was unremitting, and his powers of endurance are described as
beyond all example. He himself tells, that even in the darkness of the
night, when he awoke from his brief slumbers, he was able to read without
lighting his lamp![97] So powerful, according to his own account, was
his eye-sight, that like the knight of Deloraine:—

    “Alike to him was tide and time,
    Moonless midnight, and matin prime!”

After a brilliant career at Paris, he was invited to occupy the chair
of Belles Lettres at Leyden, where the best part of his life was spent.
Like most eminent linguists, Scaliger possessed the faculty of memory in
an extraordinary degree. He could repeat eighty couplets of poetry after
a single reading: he knew by heart every line of his own compositions,
and it was said of him that he never forgot anything which he had learnt
once. But with all his gifts and all his accomplishments, he contrived
to render himself an object of general dislike, or at least of general
dis-esteem. His vanity was insufferable; and it was of that peculiarly
offensive kind which is only gratified at the expense of the depreciation
of others. His life was a series of literary quarrels; and in the whole
annals of literary polemics, there are none with which, for acrimony,
virulence, and ferocity of vituperation, these quarrels may not compete.
And hence, although there is hardly a subject, literary, antiquarian,
philological, or critical, on which he has not written, and (for his
age) written well, there are few, nevertheless, who have exercised less
influence upon contemporary opinion. Scaliger spoke thirteen languages,
in the study of which Baillet[98] says he never used either a dictionary
or a grammar. He himself declares the same. The languages ascribed to him
are strangely jumbled together in the following lines of Du Bartas:—

    —————“Scaliger, merveille de notre age,
    Soleil des savants, qui parle elegamment
    Hebreu, Greçois, Romain, Espagnol, Allemand,
    François, Italien, Nubien, Arabique,
    Syriaque, Persian, Anglois, Chaldaique.”[99]

In his case it is difficult, as in most others, to ascertain the degree
of his familiarity with each of these. To Du Bartas’s poetical epithet,
_elegamment_, of course, no importance is to be attached; and it would
perhaps be equally unsafe to rely on the depreciatory representations
of his literary antagonists. One thing, at least, is certain, that he
himself made the most of his accomplishment. He was not the man to hide
his light from any overweening delicacy. He was one of the greatest
boasters of his own or any other time. In one place he boasts that there
is no language in which he could write with such elegance as Arabic.[100]
In another he professes to write Syriac as well as the Syrians
themselves.[101] And it is curiously significant of the reputation which
he commonly enjoyed, that the wits of his own day used to say that there
was one particular department of each language in which there could be no
doubt of his powers—its Billingsgate vocabulary! There was not one, they
confessed, of the thirteen languages to which he laid claim, in which he
was not fully qualified to scold![102]

The eminent botanist, Charles Le Cluse, (Clusius), a contemporary of
Scaliger, can hardly be called a great linguist, as his studies were
chiefly confined to the modern European languages, with several of which
he was thoroughly conversant; but he is remarkable as having contributed,
by a familiarity with modern languages very rare among the naturalists of
his day, to settle the comparative popular nomenclature of his science.
He is even still a high authority on this curious branch of botanical
study.

The reader who remembers the extraordinary reputation enjoyed among his
contemporaries by the learned Nicholas Peiresc, may be disappointed at
finding him overlooked in this enumeration: but, as of his extraordinary
erudition he has left no permanent fruit in literature, so of his
acquirements as a linguist no authentic record has been preserved. The
same is true of his friend, Galaup de Chasteuil, a less showy, perhaps,
but better read orientalist. Through devotion to these studies, quite
as much as under the influence of religious feeling, Chasteuil made a
pilgrimage to the Holy Land, and, in 1631, permanently fixed his abode
in Palestine; and so thoroughly conversant did he become, not only with
the language and literature, but also with the manners, usages and
feelings of the Maronites of the Lebanon, that, on the death of their
patriarch, despite the national predilections by which all Easterns are
characterized, they desired to elect him, a Western as he was, head of
their national church.[103] Lewis de Dieu, the two Morins—Stephen, the
Calvinist minister, and John, the learned Oratorian convert—the two
Cappels, Lewis and James, and even the celebrated D’Herbelot, author of
the _Bibliothèque Orientale_, all belong rather to the class of oriental
scholars than of linguists in the popular acceptation of the word. The
two Cappels, as well as their adversaries, the Buxtorfs, are best known
in connexion with the controversy about the Masoretic Points.

One of the writers named in a previous page, Claude Duret, although
Adelung[104] could not discover any particulars regarding him, beyond
those which are detailed in the title of his book, (where he is merely
described as “Bourbonnais, President a Moulins,”) nevertheless deserves
very special mention on account of the extensive and curious learning,
not alone in languages, but also in general literature, history and
science, which characterize his rare work, _Thresor de l’Histoire des
Langues de cet Univers_.[105] This work is undoubtedly far from being
exempt from grave inaccuracies; but it is nevertheless, for its age,
a marvel, as well of curious learning and extensive research, as of
acquaintance with a great many (according to one account, seventeen,)
languages, both of the East and of the West.[106] How much of this,
however, is mere book-scholarship, and how much is real familiarity, it
is impossible, in the absence of all details of the writer’s personal
history, to decide.

Although far from being so universal a linguist as Duret, the great
biblical scholar, Samuel Bochart (born at Rouen in 1599) was much
superior to him in his knowledge of Hebrew and the cognate languages,
Chaldee, Syriac, Arabic, and even Coptic. His _Hierozoicon_ and
_Geographia Sacra_, as monuments of philological as well as antiquarian
knowledge, have maintained a high reputation even to the present time,
notwithstanding the advantages enjoyed by modern students of biblical
antiquities and history.[107]

Bochart’s pupil and his friend in early life, (although they were
bitterly alienated from each other at a later period, and although
Bochart’s death is painfully associated with their literary quarrel[108])
the celebrated Peter Daniel Huet, can hardly deserve a place in the
catalogue of French linguists; but he was at least a liberal and
enlightened patron of the study.

Many of the French missionaries of the seventeenth century would deserve
a place in this series, and among them especially Francis Picquet, who,
after serving for several years as French consul at Aleppo, embraced a
missionary life, and at last was consecrated Archbishop of Bagdad in
1674. Le Jay, the projector and editor of the well-known polyglot Bible
which appeared in France a few years before the rival publication of
Brian Walton, though he is often spoken of as the mere patron of the
undertaking, was in reality a very profound and accomplished Orientalist.
The same may be said of Rapheleng, the son-in-law of Plantin, and often
described as his mere assistant in the publication of the King of
Spain’s Polyglot Bible. Matthew Veysiere de la Croze, too, the apostate
Benedictine, although a superficial scholar and a hasty and inaccurate
historian, was a very able linguist.

But, as we descend lower in the history of this generation of French
linguists, we find comparatively few names which, for variety of
attainments, can be compared with those of Italy or Germany. Beyond the
cultivation of the Biblical languages, little was done in France for this
department of study during the rest of the seventeenth century. There
seems but too much reason to believe that the reputation of the learned
but pedantic Menage as a linguist, is extravagantly exaggerated. He was
an accomplished classicist, and his acquaintance with modern languages
was tolerably extensive. He was a good etymologist, too, according
to the servile and unscientific system of the age. But his claims to
Oriental scholarship appear very questionable. And in truth during this
entire period, if it were not for the interest of the controversy above
referred to, on the antiquity and authority of the Masoretic Points,
it might almost be said that Oriental studies had fallen entirely into
disuse in France. Even of those who took a part in that discussion, the
name of Masclef (who knew Greek, Hebrew, Syriac, Chaldee, and Arabic,
with perhaps some of the modern languages) is the only one which can
approach the rank of the higher masters of the study. The three Buxtorfs
(father, son, and grandson), Guarin, and even Girandeau, were mere
Hebraists; patient and accurate scholars, it is true, but with few of the
characteristics of an eminent linguist. La Bletterie can hardly claim
even this qualified reputation.

There is one brilliant exception—the eminent historian and
controversialist, Eusebius Renaudot. He was born at Paris in 1646. Having
made his classical studies under the Jesuits, and those of Philosophy in
the College d’Harcourt, he entered the congregation of the Oratory. But
he very soon quitted that society; and, although he continued to wear the
ecclesiastical dress, he never took holy orders. His life, however, was
a model of piety and of every Christian virtue; and it was his peculiar
merit that, while many of his closest friends and most intimate literary
allies were members of the Jansenist party, Renaudot was inflexible
in his devotion to the judgment of the Holy See. His first linguistic
studies lay among the Oriental languages, the rich fruit of which we
still possess in his invaluable Collection of Oriental Liturgies, and in
the last two volumes of the _Perpetuitè de la Foi sur l’Eucharistie_,
which are also from his prolific pen. But he soon extended his researches
into other fields; and he is said to have been master of seventeen
languages,[109] the major part of which he spoke with ease and fluency.

But Renaudot stands almost alone.[110] The only names which may claim to
be placed in comparison with his, are those of the two Petis, François
Petis, and François Petis de la Croix. The latter especially, who
succeeded his father as royal Oriental interpreter, under Lewis XIV., and
made several expeditions to the East in this capacity, was well versed,
not only in Arabic, Persian, Turkish, and Tartar, but also in Coptic and
Armenian. His translation of the Arabian Nights Entertainments is the
work by which he is best known; but his dissertations and collections on
Oriental history are full of valuable learning. The eighteenth century
in France was a period of greater activity. Etienne Fourmont, although
born in 1683, belongs properly to the eighteenth century. He is often
cited as an example of extraordinary powers of memory, having, when a
mere boy, learnt by rote the whole list of Greek Roots in the Port Royal
Treatise, so as to repeat them in every conceivable order. He soon after
published in French verse all the roots of the Latin language. But it is
as an Orientalist that he is chiefly remarkable. He was appointed to the
chair of Arabic in the College Royal, and also to the office of Oriental
interpreter in the Bibliothèque du Roi; and soon established such a
reputation as an Orientalist, that he was consulted on philological
questions by the learned of every country in Europe. He was thoroughly
master of Greek, Hebrew, Arabic, Syriac, and Persian, and was one of the
first French scholars who, without having visited China,[111] attained to
any notable proficiency in Chinese.

His nephew, Michael Angelo Deshauterayes, born at Conflans Ste. Honorine,
near Pontoise, 1724, was even more precocious. At the age of ten, he
commenced his studies under Fourmont’s superintendence. He thus became
familiar at an early age with Hebrew, Arabic, Syriac, and Chinese; so
that in his twenty-second year he was appointed to succeed his uncle as
Oriental Interpreter to the Royal Library, to which post, a few years
later, was added the Arabic professorship in the College de France. In
these employments he devoted himself to Oriental studies for above thirty
years.

Another pupil of Fourmont, Joseph de Guignes, born at Pontoise in 1721,
attained equal eminence as an Orientalist. At Fourmont’s death, he
was associated with the last named linguist on the staff of the Royal
Library. But De Guignes’ merit in the department of Oriental history and
antiquities, has almost overshadowed his reputation as a mere linguist,
although he was a proficient in all the principal Eastern languages, and
in many of those of Europe. His History of the Huns, Turks, Moguls, and
other Tartar nations, notwithstanding that many of its views are now
discarded, is still regarded as a repertory of Oriental learning; and,
while both in this and also in some others of his works, De Guignes is
often visionary and even paradoxical,[112] he is acknowledged to have
done more for Chinese literature in France, than any linguist before Abel
Remusat; nor is there one of the scholars of the eighteenth century, who
in the spirit, if not in the letter, of the views which he put forward,
comes so near to the more enlarged and more judicious theories of the
scholars of our own day, on the general questions of philology.

From the days of De Guignes the higher departments of linguistic science
fell for a time into disrepute in France; but a powerful impulse
was given to the practical cultivation of Oriental languages by the
diplomatic relations of that kingdom with Constantinople and the Levant.
The official appointments connected with that service served to supply
at once a stimulus to the study and an opportunity for its practice.
Cardonne, Ruffin,[113] Legrand, Kieffer, Venture de Paradis, and Langlés,
were all either trained in that school, or devoted themselves to the
study as a preparation for it.

Of these, perhaps John Michael Venture De Paradis is the most remarkable.
His father had been French Consul in the Crimea, and in various cities
of the Levant, and appears to have educated the boy with a special
view to the Oriental diplomatic service. From the College de Louis le
Grand, he was transferred, at the age of fifteen, to Constantinople,
and, before he had completed his twenty-second year, he was appointed
interpreter of the French embassy in Syria. Thence he passed into
Egypt in the same capacity, and, in 1777, accompanied Baron de Tott in
his tour of inspection of the French establishments in the Levant. He
was sent afterwards to Tunis, to Constantinople, and to Algiers; and
eventually was attached to the ministry of Foreign Affairs in Paris, with
the Professorship of Oriental Languages. His last service was in the
memorable Egyptian expedition under Bonaparte, in which he fell a victim
to fatigue, and the evil effects of the climate, in 1799.[114]

Lewis Matthew Langlés[115] was a Picard, born at Peronne, in 1763. From
his boyhood he too was destined for the diplomatic service; and studied
first at Montdidier, and afterwards in Paris, where he obtained an
employment which afforded him considerable leisure for the pursuit of
his favourite studies. He learned Arabic under Caussin de Perceval, and
Persian under Ruffin. Soon afterwards, however, he engaged in the study
of Mantchu, and in some time became such a proficient in that language,
that he was entrusted with the task of editing the Mantchu Dictionary
of Pere Amiot. From that time his reputation was established, at least
with the general public. His subsequent publications in every department
of languages are numerous beyond all precedent. He had the reputation
of knowing, besides the learned languages, Chinese, Tartar, Japanese,
Sanscrit, Malay, Armenian, Arabic, Turkish, and Persian. But it must be
added that the solidity of these attainments has been gravely impeached,
and that by many he is regarded more as a charlatan than as a scholar.

No such cloud hangs over the fame of, after De Guignes, the true reviver
of Chinese literature, Abel Remusat.[116] He was born at Paris in 1788,
and brought up to the medical profession; and it may almost be said that
the only time devoted by him to his early linguistic studies was stolen
from the laborious preparation for the less congenial career to which
he was destined by his father. By a very unusual preference, he applied
himself, almost from the first, to the Chinese and Tartar languages. Too
poor to afford the expensive luxury of a Chinese dictionary, he compiled,
with incredible labour, a vocabulary for his own use; and the interest
created at once by the success of his studies, and by the unexampled
devotedness with which they were pursued, were so great as to procure
for him, at the unanimous instance of the Academy of Inscriptions, the
favour, at that period rare and difficult, of exemption from the chances
of military conscription. From that time forward he applied himself
unremittingly to philological pursuits; and, although he was admitted
doctor of the faculty of medicine, at Paris in 1813, he never appears to
have practised actively in the profession. On the creation of the two
new chairs of Chinese and Sanscrit, in the College de France, after the
Restoration, Remusat was appointed to the former, in November, 1814;
from which period he gave himself up entirely to literature. He was
speedily admitted into all the learned societies both of Paris and of
other countries; and in 1818 he became one of the editors of the _Journal
des Savans_. On the establishment (in which he had a chief part,) of the
Société Asiatique, in 1822, he was named its perpetual secretary; and,
on the death of Langlés, in 1824, he succeeded to the charge of keeper
of Oriental MSS. in the Bibliothèque du Roi. This office he continued to
hold till his early and universally lamented death in 1832. Remusat’s
eminence lay more in the depth and accuracy of his scholarship in
the one great branch of Oriental languages, which he selected as his
own—those of Eastern Asia—and in the profoundly philosophical spirit
which he brought to the investigation of the relations of these languages
to each other, and to the other great families of the earth, than in the
numerical extent of his acquaintance with particular languages. But this,
too, was such as to place him in the very first rank of linguists.

A few words must suffice for the French school since Remusat, although it
has held a very distinguished place in philological science. The Société
Asiatique, founded at Remusat’s instance, and for many years directed
by him as secretary, has not only produced many eminent individual
philologers, as De Sacy, Quatremere, Champollion, Renan, Fresnel, and
De Merian; but, what is far more important, it has successfully carried
out a systematic scheme of investigation, by which alone it is possible,
in so vast a subject, to arrive at satisfactory results. M. Stanislas
Julien’s researches in Chinese; M. Dulaurier’s in the Malay languages;
Father Marcoux’s in the American Indian; Eugene Bournouf’s in those of
Persia; the brothers Antoine and Arnauld d’Abbadie in the languages of
East Africa, and especially in the hitherto almost unknown Abyssinian
and Ethiopian families; Eugene Borè in Armenian;[117] M. Fresnel’s
explorations among the tribes of the western shores of the Red Sea; and
many similar successful investigations of particular departments, are
contributing to lay up such a body of facts, as cannot fail to afford
sure and reliable data for the scientific solution by the philologers
of the coming generation, of those great problems in the science of
language, on which their fathers could only speculate as a theory, and
at the best could but address themselves in conjecture. Although I have
no intention of entering into the subject of living French linguists,
yet there is one of the gentlemen whom I have mentioned, M. Fulgence
Fresnel, whom I cannot refrain from alluding to before I pass from
the subject of French philology. His name is probably familiar to the
public at large, in connexion with the explorations of the French at
Nineveh; but he is long known to the readers of the Journal Asiatique
as a linguist not unworthy of the very highest rank in that branch of
scholarship. M. d’Abbadie,[118] himself a most accomplished linguist,
informed me that M. Fresnel, although exceedingly modest on the subject
of his attainments, has the reputation of knowing twenty languages. The
facility with which he has acquired some of these languages almost rivals
the fame of Mezzofanti. M. Arago having suggested on one occasion the
desirableness of a French translation of Berzelius’s Swedish Treatise
“On the Blow-pipe,” Fresnel at once set about learning Swedish, and in
three months had completed the desired translation! He reads fluently
Hebrew, Greek, Romaic, Latin, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, and
what little is known of the Hieroglyphical language. He is second only
to Lane as an Arabic scholar. Among the less known languages of which M.
Fresnel is master, M. d’Abbadie heard him speak a few sentences of one,
of which he may be said to have himself been the discoverer, and which
is, in some respects, completely anomalous. M. Fresnel describes this
curious language in the Journal Asiatique, July, 1838. It is spoken by
the savages of Mahrak; and as it is not reducible to any of the three
families, the Aramaic, the Canaanitic, or the Arabic, of which, according
to Gesenius, the Ethiopic is an elder branch, M. Fresnel believes it to
be the very language spoken by the Queen of Saba! Its present seat is in
the mountainous district of Hhacik, Mirbât, and Zhafâr. Its most singular
characteristic consists in its articulations, which are exceedingly
difficult and most peculiar. Besides all the nasal sounds of the French
and Portuguese, and that described as the “sputtered sound” of the
Amharic, this strange tongue has three articulations, which can only be
enunciated with _the right side of the mouth_; and the act of uttering
them produces a contortion which destroys the symmetry of the features!
M. Fresnel describes it as “horrible, both to hear and to see spoken.”
Endeavouring to represent the force of one of these sounds by the letters
_hh_, he calls the language _Ehhkili_.[119]


§ V. LINGUISTS OF THE TEUTONIC RACE.[120]

If we abstract from the Sacred Languages, the German scholars were slow
in turning themselves to Oriental studies.

John Müller, of Königsberg, commonly known as Regiomontanus, although he
had the highest repute for learning of all the German scholars of the
fifteenth century, does not appear to have gone beyond the classical
languages. Martin Luther, Reuchlin,[121] Ulrich Van Hutten, Hoogenstraet,
were Hebraists and no more; and John Widmanstadt, when he wished to study
Arabic, was forced to make a voyage to Spain expressly for the purpose.

       *       *       *       *       *

The first student of German race at all distinguished by scholarship in
languages, was Theodore Bibliander,[122] who, besides Greek and Hebrew,
was also well versed in Arabic, and probably in many other Oriental
tongues.[123] The celebrated naturalist, Conrad Gesner, though perhaps
not so solidly versed as Bibliander, in any one language, appears to have
possessed a certain acquaintance with a greater number. His _Mithridates;
de Differentiis Linguarum_,[124] resembles in plan as well as in name,
the great work of Adelung. The number and variety of the languages which
it comprises is extraordinary for the period. It contains the Pater
Noster in twenty-two of these; and, although the observations on many of
the specimens are exceedingly brief and unsatisfactory, yet they often
exhibit much curious learning, and no mean familiarity with the language
to which they belong.[125] Gesner’s success as a linguist is the more
remarkable, inasmuch as that study by no means formed his principal
pursuit. Botany and Natural History might much better be called the real
business of his literary life. Accordingly, Beza says of him, that he
united in his person the very opposite genius of Varro and Pliny; and,
although he died at the comparatively early age of forty-nine, his works
on Natural History fill nearly a dozen folio volumes. Both Gesner and
Bibliander fell victims, one in 1564, the other in 1565, to the great
plague of the sixteenth century.

Jerome Megiser, who, towards the close of the same century compiled the
more extensive polyglot collection of Pater Nosters already referred to,
need scarcely be noticed. He is described by Adelung,[126] as a man of
various, but trivial and superficial learning.

Not so another German scholar of the same age, Jacob Christmann, of
Maintz. Christmann was no less distinguished as a philosopher than as a
linguist. He held for many years at Heidelberg the seemingly incompatible
professorships of Hebrew, Arabic, and Logic, and is described as
deeply versed in all the ancient and modern languages, as well as in
mathematical and astronomical science.[127]

It would be unjust to overlook the scholars of the Low Countries during
the same period. Some of these, as for example, Drusius, and the three
Schultens, father, son, and grandson, were chiefly remarkable as
Hebraists. But there are many others, both of the Belgian and the Dutch
schools, whose scholarship was of a very high order. Among the former,
Andrew Maes (Masius,) deserves a very special notice. He was born in
1536, at Linnich in the diocese of Courtrai. In 1553 he was sent to
Rome as chargé d’affaires. During his residence there, in addition to
Greek, Latin, Spanish, and other European languages, with which he was
already familiar, he made himself master, not only of Italian, but also
of Hebrew, Chaldee, and Syriac. He is said[128] to have assisted Arias
Montanus in the compilation of his Polyglot Bible; but of this no mention
is made by Montanus in the preface. No doubt, however, can be entertained
of his great capacity as an Orientalist; and Sebastian Munster used to
say of him that he seemed to have been brought up among the Hebrews, and
to have lived in the classic days of the Roman Empire. About the same
period, or a few years later, David Haecx published his dictionary of the
Malay languages, one of the earliest contributions to the study of that
curious family. Haecx, though he spent his life in Rome, was a native of
Antwerp.

John Baptist Gramaye, already named as a collector of Pater Nosters,
acquired some reputation as one of the first contributors to the history
of the languages of Africa, although his work is described by Adelung as
very inaccurate. Gramaye was a native of Antwerp, and became provost of
Arnheim and historiographer of the Low Countries. On a voyage from Italy
to Spain, he fell into the hands of Algerine corsairs, who carried him to
Algiers. There he was sold as a slave, and was detained a considerable
time in Barbary. Having at length obtained his liberty, he published,
after his return, a diary of his captivity, a descriptive history of
Africa, and a polyglot collection of Pater Nosters, among which are
several African languages not previously known in Europe.[129] Very
little, however, is known of his own personal acquirements, which are
noticeable, perhaps, rather on account of their unusual character, than
of their great extent or variety.

Some of the linguists of Holland may claim a higher rank. The well-known
Arabic scholar, Erpenius, (Thomas Van Erpen,) was also acquainted with
several other Oriental languages, Hebrew, Chaldee, Persian, Turkish, and
Ethiopic. His countryman and successor in the chair of Oriental languages
at Leyden, James Golius, was hardly less distinguished. Peter Golius,
brother of James, who entered the Carmelite Order and spent many years
as a missionary in Syria and other parts of the East, became equally
celebrated in Rome for his Oriental scholarship. In all these three cases
the knowledge of the languages was not a mere knowledge of books, but had
been acquired by actual travel and research in the various countries of
the East.

John Henry Hottinger, too, a pupil of James Golius at Leyden, and the
learned Jesuit, Father Athanasius Kircher, belong also to this period.
The latter, who is well known for his varied and extensive attainments
in every department of science, was moreover a linguist of no ordinary
merit.[130] He was born at Geyzen, near Fulda, in 1602, and entered the
Jesuit society in 1618, when only sixteen years old. No detailed account
is given by his biographers (with whom languages were of minor interest,)
of the exact extent of his attainments in the department of languages;
but they were both diversified and respectable, and in some things he was
far beyond the men of his own time. His _Lingua Egyptiaca Restituta_ may
still be consulted with advantage by the student of Coptic.

Most of these men, however, confined themselves chiefly to one particular
department. The first really universal linguist of Germany is the great
Ethiopic scholar, Job Ludolf, who was born at Erfurt, in 1624. Early in
life he devoted himself to the study of languages; and his extensive
travels—first as preceptor to the sons of the Duke of Saxe-Gotha,
and afterwards as tutor to the children of the Swedish ambassador in
Paris—coupled with his unexampled industry,[131] enabled him, not only to
hold a high rank in history and general literature, but also to attain to
a success as a linguist which had rarely been equalled before his time.
He is said to have been master of twenty-five languages,[132] but as I
have never seen any exact enumeration of them, I am inclined to allow for
considerable exaggeration.

There is even more reason to suspect of exaggeration the popular accounts
which have come down to us of a self-educated linguist of the same
period—a Saxon peasant called Nicholas Schmid, more commonly known as
Cüntzel of Rothenacker, from the name of the village where he was born,
in 1606. This extraordinary man was the son of a peasant. His youth
was entirely neglected. He worked as a common labourer on his father’s
farm, and, until his sixteenth year, never had learned even the letters
of the alphabet. At this age one of the farm-servants taught him to
read, greatly to the dissatisfaction of his father, who feared that such
studies would withdraw him from his work. Soon afterwards, a relative who
was a notary, gave him a few lessons in Latin; and, under the direction
of the same relative, he learned the rudiments of Greek, Hebrew, and
other languages. During all this time, he continued his daily occupation
as a farm-labourer, and had no time for his studies but what he was able
to steal from the hours allotted for sleep and for meals; the latter of
which he snatched in the most hurried manner, and always with an open
book by his side. In this strange way, amid the toils of the field and
of the farm-yard, Schmid is said to have acquired a store of knowledge
the details of which border upon the marvelous, one of his recorded
performances being a translation of the Lord’s Prayer into fifty-one
languages![133]

One of the scholars engaged in the compilation of Walton’s Polyglot,
Andrew Müller, has left a reputation less marvellous, but more solid.
He was born about 1630, at Greiffenhagen in Pomerania. Müller, like
Crichton, was a precocious genius. At eighteen he wrote verses freely in
Latin, Greek, and Hebrew. On the completion of his studies, he became
pastor of Königsberg on the Warta; but the duties of that charge soon
became distasteful to him, and, after a short trial, he resolved, at
the invitation of Castell, to settle in England, and devote himself to
literature. He arrived just as Brian Walton was making arrangements for
the publication of his celebrated Polyglot Bible, and at once entered
earnestly into the scheme. He took up his residence in the house of
John Castell in the Strand, where, for ten years, he applied himself
unremittingly to study. It is told of him that, in the ardour of study
or the indifference of scholastic seclusion, he would not raise his
head from his books to look out of the window, on occasion of Charles
II.’s triumphal progress at the Restoration! Having received from Bishop
Wilkins some information on the subject of Chinese, he conceived a
most enthusiastic passion for that language. He obtained some types at
Antwerp, and, through the instructions of the celebrated Jesuit, Father
Kircher, and other members of the society, he was perhaps the first
European scholar who, without actually visiting China, acquired a mastery
of its language; as he is certainly one of the first who deserted the
track of the old philologers, and attempted the comparative study of
languages on principles approaching to those which modern science has
made familiar. Soon after the completion of Walton’s Polyglot Müller
returned to Germany. He was named successively Pastor of Bernau and
Provost of Berlin in 1667, but resigned both livings in 1685, and lived
thenceforth in retirement at Stettin. He died in 1694. Although a most
laborious man and a voluminous writer, Müller’s views were visionary
and unpractical. He professed to have devised a plan of teaching, so
complete, that, by adopting it, a perfect knowledge of Chinese could be
acquired in half a year, and so simple, that it could be applied to the
instruction of persons of the most ordinary capacity. Haller states that
he spoke no less than twenty languages.

A Burgomaster-linguist is a more singular literary phenomenon. We are
so little accustomed to connect that title with any thing above the
plodding details of the commerce with which it is inseparably associated,
that the name of Nicholas Witzen, Burgomaster of Amsterdam, deserves to
be specially commemorated, as an exception to an unliterary class. It
was in the pursuit of his vocation as a merchant that Witzen acquired
the chief part of the languages with which he was acquainted. He made
repeated expeditions to Russia between the years 1666 and 1677, in
several of which he penetrated far into the interior of the country,
and had opportunities of associating with many of the motley races of
that vast empire; Slavonians, Tartars, Cossacks, Samoiedes, and the
various Siberian tribes; as well as with natives of Eastern kingdoms not
subject to Russia.[134] Besides inquiries into the geography and natural
history of those countries which lie upon the north-eastern frontier of
Europe and the contiguous provinces of Asia, Witzen used every effort
to glean information regarding their languages. He obtained, in most
of these languages, not only versions of the Lord’s Prayer, but also
vocabularies comprising a considerable number of words; both of which
he supplied to his friend and correspondent, Leibnitz, for publication
in his _Collectanea Etymologica_.[135] How far Witzen himself was
acquainted with these languages it is difficult to determine; but he is
at least entitled to notice as the first collector of materials for this
particular branch of the study.

David Wilkins, Chamberlayne’s fellow-labourer in the compilation of
the Collection of Pater Nosters referred to in a former page, may also
deserve a passing notice. The place of his birth, which occurred about
1685, is a matter of some uncertainty. Adelung[136] thinks he was a
native of Dantzig; by others he is believed to have been a native of
Holland. The best part of his life, however, was spent in England; where,
at Cambridge, he took the degree of Doctor of Divinity, in 1717. He was
afterwards appointed Librarian of Lambeth and Archdeacon of Suffolk.
His qualifications as Polyglot editor, at the time when he undertook
to assist Chamberlayne, appear to have consisted rather in patient
industry and general scholarship, than in any extraordinary familiarity
with languages; though he afterwards obtained considerable reputation,
especially by an edition of the New Testament in Coptic, in 1716.

With the illustrious name of Leibnitz we commence a new era in the
science of languages. This extraordinary man, who united in himself all
the most varied, and it might seem incompatible, excellencies of other
men—a jurist and a divine, a mathematician and a poet, a historian and
a philosopher—added to all his other prodigious attainments a most
extensive and profound knowledge of languages. It is not, however, on the
actual extent of his acquaintance with particular languages (although
this too was most remarkable), that his fame as a scientific linguist
rests. He was the first to recognize the true nature and objects of
linguistic science, and to direct its studies to an object at once
eminently practical and profoundly philosophical. It is not alone that,
deserting the trivialities of the old etymologists, he laid down the
true principles of the great science of comparative philology, and
detected its full importance; Leibnitz may claim the further merit of
having himself almost created that science, and given it forth, a new
Minerva, in its full and perfect development. There is hardly a principle
of modern philology the germ of which may not be discovered in his
singularly pregnant and suggestive essays and letters; and, what is far
more remarkable, he has often, with the instinctive sagacity of original
genius, anticipated sometimes by conjecture, sometimes by positive
prediction, analogies and results which the investigations of actual
explorers have since realized.[137]

One of the most important practical services rendered by Leibnitz to
science, was the organization of academies and other scientific bodies,
by which the efforts of individuals might be systematically guided to one
common end, and the results of their researches, whether in collecting
facts or in developing theories, might, through the collision of many
minds, be submitted to the ordeal of careful examination and judicious
discussion. It is chiefly to him that science is indebted for the Royal
Society of Berlin and the Academy of St. Petersburg. Both of these
bodies, although embracing the whole circle of science, have proved most
eminent schools of languages; and it is a curious illustration of that
profound policy, in pursuance of which we see Russia still availing
herself of the service of genius wherever it is to be found, that many
of the ablest German linguists of the eighteenth century were, either
directly or indirectly, connected with the latter institution.

Gerard Frederic Müller is an early example. He was born, at Herforden
in Westphalia, in 1705, and was a pupil of the celebrated Otto Mencken.
Mencken, having been invited to become a member of the new academy of St.
Petersburg, declined the honour for himself, but recommended his scholar
Müller in his stead.[138] Müller accordingly accompanied the scientific
expedition which was sent to Siberia under the elder Gmelin, (also a
German,) from 1733 to 1741. On his return, he was appointed keeper of
the Imperial Archives, and Historiographer of Russia. Müller does not
appear to have given much attention to Oriental languages; but he was
more generally familiar with modern languages than most of the scholars
of that period.[139]

Augustus Lewis Schlötzer, another German literary adventurer in the
Russian service, and for a time secretary of Müller, was a more generally
accomplished linguist. Unlike Müller, he was a skilful Orientalist;
and he was versed, moreover, in several of the Slavonic languages with
which Müller had neglected to make himself acquainted, before engaging
in the compilation of his great collection of Russian Historians. For
this he availed himself of the assistance of his secretary Schlötzer.
Gottlieb Bayer of Königsberg, one of the earliest among the scholars of
Germany, author of the _Museum Sinicum_, also occupied for some years
a chair at St. Petersburg; but he is better known by his ferocious
controversial writings, than by his philological works. A much more
distinguished scholar of modern Germany, almost entirely unknown in
England, is Christian William Buttner. He was born at Wolfenbüttel in
1716, and was destined by his father (an apothecary) for the medical
profession; but, although he gave his attention in the first instance to
the sciences preparatory to that profession, the real pursuit of his life
became philology, and especially in its relation to the great science
of ethnography. It was a saying of Cuvier’s, that Linnæus and Buttner
realised by their united studies the title of Grotius’s celebrated work,
“De Jure _Naturæ_ et _Gentium_;”—Linnæus by his pursuit of _Natural_
History assuming the first, and Buttner, by his _ethnological_ studies,
appropriating the second—as the respective spheres of their operations.
In every country which Buttner visited, he acquired not only the
general language, but the most minute peculiarities of its provincial
dialects. Few literary lives are recorded in history which present such
a picture of self-denial and privation voluntarily endured in the cause
of learning, as that of Buttner. His library and museum, accumulated
from the hoardings of his paltry income, were exceedingly extensive and
most valuable. In order to scrape together the means for their gradual
purchase, he contented himself during the greater part of his later
life with a single meal per day, the cost of which never exceeded a
silber-groschen, or somewhat less than three half-pence![140] It may be
inferred, however, from what has been said, that Buttner’s attainments
were mainly those of a book-man. In the scanty notices of him which we
have gleaned, we do not find that his power of speaking foreign languages
was at all what might have been expected from the extent and variety
of his book-knowledge. But his services as a scientific philologer
were infinitely more important, as well as more permanent, than any
such ephemeral faculty. He was the first to observe and to cultivate
the true relations of the monosyllabic languages of southern Asia, and
to place them at the head of his scheme of the Asiatic and European
languages. He was the first to conceive, or at least to carry out, the
theory of the geographical distribution of languages; and he may be
looked on as the true founder of the science of glossography. He was
the first to systematise and to trace the origin and affiliations of
the various alphabetical characters; and his researches in the history
of the palæography of the Semitic family may be said to have exhausted
the subject. Nevertheless, he has himself written very little; but he
communicated freely to others the fruits of his researches; and there
are few of the philologers of his time who have not confessed their
obligations to him. Michaelis, Schlötzer, Gatterer, and almost every
other contemporary German scholar of note, have freely acknowledged both
the value of his communications and the generous and liberal spirit in
which they were imparted.[141]

John David Michaelis[142] (1717-91) is so well known in these countries
by his contributions to Biblical literature[143] that little can be
necessary beyond the mention of his name. His grammar of the Hebrew,
Chaldee, Syriac, and Arabic languages, sufficiently attest his abilities
as an Orientalist; and, as regards that particular family of languages,
his philological views are generally solid and judicious. But I am
unable to discover what were his attainments in modern languages; and to
the general science of comparative philology he cannot be said to have
rendered any important original contribution.

The Catholic Missionaries of Germany, although of course less numerous
than their brethren of Italy and the Spanish Peninsula, have contributed
their share to the common stock of linguistic science. Many of the Jesuit
Missionaries of Central and Southern America;—for example, Fathers
Richter, Fritz, Grebmer, and Widmann—whose papers are the foundation of
Humboldt’s Essay in the _Mithridates_, were of German origin. Father
Dobritzhofer, whose interesting account of the Abipones has been
translated into English[144], under Southey’s advice and superintendence,
was a native of Austria; and the learned Sanscrit scholar, Father
Paulinus de Sancto Bartholomeo, (although less known under his German
name, John Philip Werdin) was an Austrian Carmelite, and served for above
fourteen years in the Indian missions of his order.

A German philanthropist of a different class, Count Leopold von Berchtold
(1738-1809) the Howard of Germany, deserves to be named, not merely for
his devoted services to the cause of humanity throughout the world, but
for his remarkable acquirements as a linguist. He spoke fluently eight
European languages;[145] and, what is more rare, wrote and published in
the greater number of them, tracts upon the great subject to which he
dedicated his life. He died, at a very advanced age, of the plague, and
has long been honoured as a martyr in the cause of philanthropy; but he
has left no notable work behind him.

Very different the career of the great author of the _Mithridates_, John
Christopher Adelung, who lived almost exclusively for learning. He was
born in 1734, at Spantekow in Pomerania. In 1759, he was appointed to
a professorship at Erfurt; but he exchanged it, after a few years, for
a place at Leipsic, where he continued to reside for a long series of
years. Although habitually of a gay and cheerful disposition, and a most
agreeable member of society, he was one of the most assiduous students
upon record, devoting as a rule no less than fourteen hours a day to his
literary occupations.[146] His services to his native language are still
gratefully acknowledged by every German etymologist, and his Dictionary,
(although since much improved by Voss and Campe,) has been declared as
great a boon to Germany, as the united labours of the Academy had been
able to offer to France. Adelung’s personal reputation as a linguist was
exceedingly high, but his fame with posterity must rest on his great
work, the _Mithridates_, which I have already briefly described. The very
origination of such a work, or at least the undertaking it upon the scale
on which he has carried it out, would have made the reputation of an
ordinary man. In the touching preface of the first volume, (the only one
which Adelung lived to see published,) he describes it as “the youngest
and probably the last child of his muse;” and confesses that “he has
nurtured, dressed, and cherished it, with all the tenderness which it
is commonly the lot of the youngest child to enjoy.”[147] It is indeed
a work of extraordinary labour, and, although from the manner in which
its materials were supplied, necessarily incomplete and even inaccurate
in its details, a work of extraordinary ability. The first volume alone
(containing the languages of Asia, and published in 1806,) is exclusively
Adelung’s. Of the second, only a hundred and fifty pages had been printed
when the venerable author died in his seventy-third year. These printed
sheets, and the papers which he had collected for the subsequent
volumes, he bequeathed to Dr. Severinus Vater, professor of theology at
Königsberg, under whose editorship, with assistance from several friends,
(and especially from the lamented William von Humboldt and Frederic
Adelung,) the second volume, which comprises the languages of Europe with
all their ramifications, appeared in 1809. The third, on the languages
of Africa, and of America, (for which last the work is indebted to
Humboldt,) appeared, in parts, between 1812 and 1816; and a supplementary
volume, containing additions to the earlier portions of the work, by
Humboldt, Frederic Adelung, and Vater himself, was published in 1817.
It is impossible to overstate the importance and value of this great
linguistic repertory. The arrangement of the work is strictly scientific,
according to the views then current. The geographical distribution, the
origin and history, and the general structural peculiarities of each,
not only of the great families, but of the individual languages, and in
many cases even of the local dialects, are carefully, though briefly
described. The specimen Pater Noster in each language and dialect, is
critically examined, and its vocabulary explained. To each language,
too, is prefixed a catalogue of the chief philological or etymological
works which treat of its peculiarities; and thus abundant suggestions
are supplied for the prosecution of more minute researches into its
nature and history. And for the most part, all this is executed with so
much simplicity and clearness, with so true a perception of the real
points of difficulty in each language, and with so almost instinctive
a power of discriminating between those peculiarities in each which
require special explanation, and those less abnormal qualities which a
philosophical linguist will easily infer from the principles of general
grammar, or from a consideration of the common characteristics of the
family to which it belongs, that one may learn as much of the real
character of a language, in a few hours, from the few suggestive pages
the _Mithridates_, as from the tedious and complicated details of its
professional grammarians.

Adelung’s associate in the _Mithridates_ and its continuator, Dr.
Severinus Vater, was born at Altenburg, in 1771; he studied at Jena and
Halle, in both of which universities he afterwards held appointments
as professor; at Jena, as extraordinary Professor of Theology in 1796,
and at Halle, as Professor of Oriental Languages in 1800. Thence he
was transferred, in 1809, to Königsberg in the capacity of Professor
of Theology and Librarian; but he returned, in 1820, to Halle, where
he continued to reside till his death, in 1826. Although Vater was
by no means a very scientific linguist,[148] the importance of his
contributions to the study of languages cannot be too highly estimated.
Besides the large share which he had in the preparation of the
_Mithridates_ (the last three volumes of which were edited by him,) he
also wrote well on the grammar of the Hebrew, Polish, Russian, and German
languages. Nevertheless, his reputation is rather that of a scholar than
of a linguist.

A few years after the author of the _Mithridates_ appears the celebrated
Peter Simon Pallas, to whom we are indebted for the great “Comparative
Vocabulary” already described. He was born at Berlin in 1741, and his
early studies were mainly directed to natural philosophy, which he seems
to have cultivated in all its branches. His reputation as a naturalist
procured for him, in 1767, an invitation from Catherine II. of Russia,
to exchange a distinguished position which he had obtained at the Hague
for a professorship in the Academy of St. Petersburg. His arrival in that
capital occurred just at the time of the departure of the celebrated
scientific expedition to Siberia for the purpose of observing the transit
of Venus; and, as their mission also embraced the geography and natural
history of Siberia, Pallas gladly accepted an invitation to accompany
them. They set out in June, 1768, and after exploring the vast plains of
European Russia, the borders of Calmuck Tartary, and the shores of the
Caspian, they crossed the Ural Mountains, examined the celebrated mines
of Catherinenberg, proceeded to Tobolsk, the capital of Siberia, and
penetrated across the mountains to the Chinese frontier, whence Pallas
returned by the route of Astrakan and the Caucasus to St. Petersburg. He
reached that city in July, 1774, with broken health, and hair prematurely
whitened by sickness and fatigue. He resumed his place in the Academy;
and was rewarded by the Empress with many distinctions and lucrative
employments, one of which was the charge of instructing the young
grand-dukes, Alexander and Constantine. It was during these years that
he devoted himself to the compilation of the _Vocabularia Comparativa_,
which comprises two hundred and one languages; but, in 1795, he returned
to the Crimea, (where he had obtained an extensive gift of territory
from the Empress) for the purpose of recruiting his health and pursuing
his researches. After a residence there of fifteen years, he returned
to Berlin in 1810, where he died in the following year. It will be
seen, therefore, that, prodigious as were his acquirements in that
department, the study of languages was but a subordinate pursuit of this
extraordinary man. His fame is mainly due to his researches in science.
It is to him that we owe the reduction of the astronomical observations
of the expedition of 1768; and Cuvier gives him the credit of completely
renewing the science of geology, and of almost entirely re-constructing
that of natural history. It is difficult, nevertheless,[149] to arrive
at an exact conclusion as to the share which he personally took in the
compilation of the Vocabulary; and still more so, as to his powers as a
speaker of foreign languages; although it is clear that his habits of
life as a traveller and scientific explorer, not only facilitated, but
even directly necessitated for him, the exercise of that faculty, to a
far greater degree than can be supposed in the case of most of the older
philologers.

The career of Pallas bears a very remarkable resemblance to that of a
more modern scholar, also a native of Berlin, Julius Henry Klaproth.
He was the son of the celebrated chemist of that name, and was born in
1783. Although destined by his father to follow his own profession, a
chance sight of the collection of Chinese books in the Royal Library at
Berlin, irrevocably decided the direction of his studies. With the aid
of the imperfect dictionary of Mentzel and Pere Diaz, he succeeded in
learning without a master that most difficult language; and, though he
complied with his father’s desire, so far as to pursue with success the
preparatory studies of the medical profession, he never formally embraced
it. After a time he gave his undivided attention to Oriental studies;
and, in 1802, established, at Dresden, the _Asiatisches Magazin_. Like so
many of his countrymen, he accepted service in Russia, at the invitation
of Count Potocki, who knew him at Berlin; and he was a member of the
half-scientific, half-political, mission to Pekin, in 1805, under that
eminent scholar and diplomatist. He withdrew, however, from the main
body of this expedition, in order to be able to pursue his scientific
researches more unrestrainedly; and, after traversing eighteen hundred
leagues in the space of twenty months, in the course of which he passed
in review all the motley races of that inhospitable region, Samoiedes,
Finns, Tartars, Monguls, Paskirs, Dzoungars, Tungooses, &c., he returned
to St. Petersburg, in 1806, with a vast collection of notes on the
Chinese, Mantchu, Mongul, and Japanese[150] languages. With a similar
object, he was soon afterwards sent by the Academy, in September, 1807,
to collect information on the languages of the Caucasus, a journey of
exceeding difficulty and privation, in which he spent nearly three years.
On his return to St. Petersburg, he obtained permission to go to Berlin
for the purpose of completing the necessary engravings for his work;
and he availed himself of this opportunity to withdraw altogether from
the Russian service, although with the forfeiture of all his titles
and honours. After a brief sojourn in Italy, he fixed his residence in
Paris. To him the _Société Asiatique_ may be said to owe its origin; and
he acted, almost up to his death in 1835, as the chief editor of its
journal—the well-known _Journal Asiatique_. In Paris, also, he published
his _Asia Polyglotta_, and “New Mithridates.” Klaproth, perhaps, does not
deserve, in any one of the languages which he cultivated, the character
of a very deep scholar; but he was acquainted with a large number: with
Chinese, Mongol, Mantchu, and Japanese, also with Sanscrit, Armenian,
Persian, and Georgian;[151] he was of course perfectly familiar with
German, Russian, French, and probably with others of the European
languages.

The eminent historical successes of Berthold George Niebuhr, (born at
Copenhagen in 1776), have so completely eclipsed the memory of all his
other great qualities, that perhaps the reader will not be prepared
to find that in the department of languages his attainments were of
the highest rank. His father, Carsten Niebuhr, the learned Eastern
traveller, had destined him to pursue his own career; but the delicacy
of the youth’s constitution, and other circumstances, forced his father
to abandon the idea, and saved young Niebuhr for the far more important
studies to which his own tastes attracted him. His history, both literary
and political, is too recent and too well known to require any formal
notice. It will be enough for our purpose to transcribe from his life
an extremely interesting letter from his father, which bears upon the
particular subject of the present inquiry. It is dated December, 1807,
when Niebuhr was little more than thirty years of age. “My son has
gone to Memel,” writes the elder Niebuhr, “with the commissariat of the
army. When he found he should probably have to go to Riga, he began
forthwith to learn Russian. Let us just reckon how many languages he
knows already. He was only two years old when we came to Meldorf, so
that we must consider, 1st, German, as his mother tongue. He learned at
school, 2nd, Latin; 3rd, Greek; 4th, Hebrew; and, besides in Meldorf he
learned, 5th, Danish; 6th, English; 7th, French; 8th, Italian; but only
so far as to be able to read a book in these languages; some books from a
vessel wrecked on the coast induced him to learn, 9th, Portuguese; 10th,
Spanish; of Arabic he did not know much at home, because I had lost my
lexicon and could not quickly replace it; in Kiel and Copenhagen he had
opportunities of practice in speaking and writing French, English, and
Danish; in Copenhagen he learned, 11th, Persian, of Count Ludolph, the
Austrian minister, who was born at Constantinople, and whose father was
an acquaintance of mine; and 12th, Arabic, he taught himself; in Holland
he learned, 13th, Dutch; and again, in Copenhagen, 14th, Swedish, and a
little Icelandic; at Memel, 15th, Russian; 16th, Slavonic; 17th, Polish;
18th, Bohemian; and, 19th, Illyrian. With the addition of Low German,
this makes in all twenty languages.”[152]

As this letter does not enter into the history of Niebuhr’s later
studies, I inquired of his friend, the Chevalier Bunsen, whether he had
continued to cultivate the faculty thus early developed. I received from
him the following interesting statement:—“Niebuhr,” he says, “ought not
to be ranked among _Linguists_, in contradistinction with _Philologers_.
Language had no special interest for him, beyond what it affords in
connection with history and literature. His proficiency in languages
was, however, very great, in consequence of his early and constant
application to history, and his _matchless memory_. I have spoken of
both in my _Memoir on Niebuhr_, in the German and English edition of
Niebuhr’s Letters and Life; it is appended to the 2nd volume of both
editions. I think it is somewhere stated how many languages he knew
at an early age. What I know is, that besides _Greek_ and _Latin_, he
learned early to read and write _Arabic_; _Hebrew_ he had also learned,
but neglected afterwards; _Russian_ and _Slavonic_ he learned (to read
only,) in the years 1808, 1810. He wrote well _English_, _French_, and
_Italian_; and read _Spanish_, and _Portuguese_. _Danish_ he wrote as
well as his mother tongue, _German_, and he understood _Swedish_. In
short, he would learn with the greatest ease _any language_ which led him
to the knowledge of historical truth, when occupied with the subject; but
language, as such, had no charm for him.”

Among the scholars who assisted Adelung and Vater in the compilation of
the _Mithridates_, by far the most distinguished was the illustrious
Charles William von Humboldt. He was born at Potsdam, in 1767, and
received his preliminary education at Berlin. His university studies
were made partly at Göttingen, partly at Jena, where he formed the
acquaintance and friendship of Goethe, Schiller, Wieland, and, above
all, of Herder, from whose well-known tastes it is highly probable that
Humboldt’s mind received the strong philological bias which it exhibited
during his life. Unlike most of the scholars who preceded him in this
career, however, Humboldt’s life was spent amid the bustle and intrigue
of diplomatical pursuits. He was sent to Rome as Prussian Minister in
1802, and, from that period until 1819, he was almost uniformly employed
in this and similar public services. From his return to Berlin, in 1819,
he lived almost entirely for science, till his death, which occurred
at Tegel, near Berlin, in 1835. Humboldt is, in truth, the author of
that portion of the third volume of the _Mithridates_ which treats of
the languages of the two continents of America; and, although a great
part of its materials were derived from the labours of others—from the
memoirs, published and unpublished, of the missionaries, from the works
and MSS. of Padre Hervaz, and other similar sources—yet no one can read
any single article in the volume without perceiving that Humboldt had
made himself thoroughly master of the subject; and that, especially in
its bearings upon the general science of philology, or the great question
of the unity of languages and its kindred ethnological problems, he
had not only exhausted all the learning of his predecessors, but had
successfully applied to it all the powers of his own comprehensive and
original genius. To the consideration, too, of this numerous family of
languages he brought a mind stored with the knowledge of all the other
great families both of the East and of the West; and although it is not
easy to say what his success in speaking languages may have been, it is
impossible to doubt either the variety or the solidity of his attainments
both as a scientific and as a practical linguist. But Humboldt’s place
with posterity must be that of a philologer rather than of a linguist.
His Essay on the “Diversity of the Formation of Human Language, and
its Influence on the Intellectual Development of Mankind,” published
posthumously in 1836, as an Introduction to his Analysis of the Kawi
Language, is a work of extraordinary learning and research, as well as of
profound and original thought; analysing all the successive varieties of
grammatical structure which characterize the several classes of language
in their various stages of structural development, from the naked
simplicity of Chinese up to the minute and elaborate inflexional variety
of the Sanscritic family. M. Bunsen describes this wonderful work as “the
_Calculus Sublimis_ of linguistic theory,” and declares that “it places
William von Humboldt’s name by the side of that of Leibnitz in universal
comparative ethnological philology.”[153]

The school of Humboldt in Germany has supplied a long series of
distinguished names to philological literature, beginning with Frederic
von Schlegel, (whose Essay “On the Language and Literature of the
Hindoos, 1808,” opened an entirely new view of the science of comparative
philology), and continued, through Schlegel’s brother Augustus, Rask,
Bopp, Grimm, Lepsius, Pott, Pfizmaier, Hammer-Purgstall (the so-called
“Lily of Ten Tongues”), Sauerwein, Diez, Boehtlingk, and the lamented
Castrén, down to Bunsen, and his learned fellow-labourers, Max Müller,
Paul Boetticher, Aufrecht, and others.[154] For most of those, as for
Schlegel, the Sanscrit family of languages has been the great centre
of exploration, or at least the chief standard of comparison; and
Bopp, in his wonderful work, the “Comparative Grammar of the Sanscrit,
Zend, Greek, Latin, Lithuanian, old Slavonic, Gothic, and German
Languages,”[155] has almost exhausted this part of the inquiry. Others
(still, however, with the same general view) have devoted themselves
to other families, as Lepsius to the Egyptian, Rask to the Scythian,
Boehtlingk to the Tartar,[156] Grimm to the Teutonic, Diez to the
Romanic, and Castrén to the Finnic. Others, in fine, as Bunsen in
his most comprehensive work, “Outlines of the Philosophy of Universal
History applied to Language,” (the third volume of his “Christianity and
Mankind”) have digested the entire subject, and applied the researches
of all to the solution of the great problem of the science. Some of
those whom I have named rather resembled the ancient heroes of romance
and adventure, than the common race of quiet everyday scholars. The
journeys of Rask, Klaproth, and Lepsius, were not only full of danger,
but often attended with exceeding privation; and Alexander Castrén of
Helsingfors was literally a martyr of the science. This enthusiastic
student,[157] although a man of extremely delicate constitution, “left
his study, travelled for years alone in his sledge through the snowy
deserts of Siberia; coasted along the borders of the Polar Sea; lived for
whole winters in caves of ice, or in the smoky huts of greasy Samoiedes;
then braved the sand-clouds of Mongolia; passed the Baikal; and returned
from the frontiers of China to his duties as Professor at Helsingfors,
to die after he had given to the world but a few specimens of his
treasures.”[158]

Rask and M. Bunsen, even as linguists, deserve to be more specially
commemorated.

The former, who was born in 1787 at Brennekilde, in the island of Funen,
traversed, in the course of the adventurous journey already alluded
to, the Eastern provinces of Russia, Persia, India, Malacca, and the
island of Ceylon, and penetrated into the interior of Africa. In all
the countries which he visited he made himself acquainted with the
various languages which prevailed; so that besides the many languages
of his native Teutonic family, those of the Scandinavian, Finnic, and
Sclavonic stock, the principal cultivated European languages, and the
learned languages (including those of the Bible), he was also familiar
with Sanscrit in all its branches; and is justly described as the first
who opened the way to “a real grammatical knowledge of Zend.”[159] M.
Bunsen’s great work exhibits a knowledge of the structural analysis of
a prodigious number of languages, from almost every family. As a master
of the learned languages, Hebrew, Greek, Syriac, and (though he has
cultivated these less), Arabic and Persian, he has few superiors. He
speaks and writes with equal facility Latin, German, English, French,
and Italian, all with singular elegance and purify; he speaks besides
Dutch and Danish; he reads Swedish, Icelandic, and the other old German
languages, Spanish, Portuguese, and Romaic; and he has also studied many
of the less known languages, as Chinese, Basque, Finnic, and Welsh,
together with several of the African and North American languages, but
chiefly with a view to their grammatical structure, and without any idea
of learning to read them.

Nevertheless, with all the linguistic learning which they undoubtedly
possess, neither Humboldt nor the other members of his distinguished
school fall properly within the scope of this Memoir. With all of them,
even those who were themselves accomplished linguists, the knowledge
of languages, (and especially of their vocabularies), is a subordinate
object. They have never proposed the study to themselves, for its own
sake, but only as an instrument of philosophical inquiry. It might almost
be said, indeed, that by the reaction which this school has created
against the old system of etymological, and in favour of the structural,
comparison of languages, a positive discouragement has been given to the
exact or extensive study of their vocabularies. Philologers, as a class,
have a decided disposition to look down upon, and even to depreciate, the
pursuit of linguists. With the former, the knowledge of the words of a
language is a very minor consideration in comparison with its inflexions,
and still more its laws of transposition (Lautverschiebung); Professor
Schott of Berlin plainly avows that “a limited knowledge of languages
is sufficient for settling the general questions as to their common
origin;”[160] and beyond a catalogue of a certain number of words for the
purpose of a comparative vocabulary, there is a manifest tendency on the
part of many, to regard all further concern about the words of a language
as old-fashioned and puerile. It it some consolation to the admirers of
the old school to know, that, from time to time, learned philologers
have been roughly taken to task for the presumption with which they have
theorized about languages of whose vocabulary they are ignorant; and it
is difficult not to regard the unsparing and often very amusing exposures
of Professor Schott’s blunders which occur in the long controversy that
he has had with Boehtlingk, Mr. Caldwell’s recent strictures[161] upon
the Indian learning of Professor Max Müller, or Stanislaus Julien’s
still fiercer onslaught on M. Panthier, in the _Journal Asiatique_,[162]
as a sort of retributive offering to the offended Genius of neglected
Etymology.

       *       *       *       *       *

I shall not delay upon the Biblical linguists of Germany as Hug, Jahn,
Schott, Windischmann, Vullers, &c., among Catholics, or the rival
schools of Rosenmüller, Tholuck, Ewald, Gesenius, Fürst, Beer, De
Lagarde, &c. Extensive[163] as is the range of the attainments of these
distinguished men in the languages of the Bible, and their literature,
this accomplishment has now become so universal among German Biblical
scholars, that it has almost ceased to be regarded as a title to
distinction. Its very masters are lost in the crowd of eminent men who
have grown up on all sides around him.

       *       *       *       *       *

Among the scholars of modern Hungary there are a few names which deserve
to be mentioned. Sajnovitz’s work on the common origin of the Magyar
and Lapp languages, though written in 1770, long before the science
of Comparative Philology had been reduced to its present form, has
obtained the praise of much learning and ingenuity. Gyarmathi, who wrote
somewhat later on the affinity of the Magyar and Finnic languages (1799)
is admitted by M. Bunsen[164] to “deserve a very high rank among the
founders of that science.” But neither of these authors can be considered
as a linguist. Father Dubrowsky, of whom I shall speak elsewhere,
although born in Hungary, cannot properly be considered as a Hungarian.
Kazinczy, Kisfaludy, and their followers, have confined themselves almost
entirely to the cultivation of their own native language, or at least to
the ethnological affinities which it involves.

I have only discovered one linguist of modern Hungary whom I can consider
entitled to a special notice, but the singular and almost mysterious
interest which attaches to his name may in some measure compensate for
the comparative solitude in which it is found.

I allude to the celebrated Magyar pilgrim and philologer, Csoma de Körös.
His name is written in his own language, Körösi Csoma Sandor; but in the
works which he has published (all of which are in English), it is given
in the above form. He was born of a poor, but noble family, about 1790,
at Körös, in Transylvania; and, received a gratuitous education at the
College of Nagy-Enyed. The leading idea which engrossed this enthusiastic
scholar during life, was the discovery of the original of the Magyar
race; in search of which (after preparing himself for about five years,
at Göttingen, by the study of medicine and of the Oriental languages,)
he set out in 1820, on a pilgrimage to the East, “lightly clad, with a
little stick in his hand, as if meditating a country walk, and with but
a hundred florins, (about £10), in his pocket.” The only report of his
progress which was received for years afterwards, informed his friends
that he had crossed the Balkan, visited Constantinople, Alexandria, and
the Arabic libraries at Cairo; and, after traversing Egypt and Syria,
had arrived at Teheran. Here, on hearing a few words of the Tibetan
language, he was struck by their resemblance to Magyar; and, in the hope
of thus resolving his cherished problem, he crossed Little Bucharia
to the desert of Gobi; traversed many of the valleys of the Himalaya;
and finally buried himself for four years (1827-1830), in the Buddhist
Monastery of Kanam, deeply engaged in the study of Tibetan; four months
of which time he spent in a room nine feet square, (without once quitting
it), and in a temperature below zero! He quickly discovered his mistake
as to the affinity of Tibetan with Magyar; but he pursued his Tibetan
studies in the hope of obtaining in the sacred books of Tibet some light
upon the origin of his nation; and before his arrival at Calcutta, in
1830, he had written down no less than 40,000 words in that language. He
had hardly reached Calcutta when he was struck down by the mortifying
discovery that the Tibetan books to which he had devoted so many precious
years were but translations from the Sanscrit! From 1830 he resided for
several years chiefly at Calcutta, engaged in the study of Sanscrit
and other languages, and employed in various literary services by the
Asiatic Society of Bengal. He published in 1834 a Tibetan and English
Dictionary, and contributed many interesting papers to the Asiatic
Journal, and the Journal of the Bengal Asiatic Society. In 1842, he set
out afresh upon the great pilgrimage which he had made the object of his
life; and, having reached Dharjeeling on his way to Sikam in Tibet, he
was seized by a sudden illness, which, as he refused to take medicine,
rapidly carried him off. This strange, though highly gifted man, had
studied in the course of his adventurous life, seventeen or eighteen
languages, in several of which he was a proficient.[165]

The career of this enthusiastic Magyar resembles in many respects that
of Castrén, the Danish philologer; and in nothing more than in the
devotedness with which each of them applied himself to the investigation
of the origin of his native language and to the discovery of the
ethnological affinities of his race.


§ VI. LINGUISTS OF GREAT BRITAIN AND IRELAND.

The names with which the catalogue of Italian and that of Spanish
linguists open, find a worthy companion in the first name among the
linguists of Britain.

       *       *       *       *       *

With others the study of languages, or of kindred sciences, formed almost
the business of life. But it was not so with the wonder of his own and of
all succeeding generations—the “Admirable Crichton”; who, notwithstanding
the universality of his reputation, became almost equally eminent in each
particular study, as any of those who devoted all their powers to that
single pursuit.

James Crichton was born in 1561, in Scotland. The precise place of his
birth is uncertain, but he was the son of Robert Crichton of Eliock,
Lord Advocate of James VI. He was educated at St. Andrew’s. The chief
theatres of his attainments, however, were France and Italy. There
is not an accomplishment which he did not possess in its greatest
perfection—from the most abstruse departments of scholarship, philosophy,
and divinity, down to the mere physical gifts and graces of the musician,
the athlete, the swordsman, and the cavalier. His memory was a prodigy
both of quickness and of tenacity. He could repeat verbatim, after a
single hearing, the longest and most involved discourse.[166] Many
of the details which are told of him are doubtless exaggerated and
perhaps legendary; but Mr. Patrick Frazer Tytler[167] has shown that the
substance of his history, prodigious as it seems, is perfectly reliable.
As regards the particular subject of our present inquiry, one account
states that, when he was but sixteen years old, he spoke ten languages.
Another informs us that, at the age of twenty, the number of languages
of which he was master exactly equalled the number of his years. But the
most tangible data which we possess are drawn from his celebrated thesis
in the University of Paris, in which he undertook to dispute in any of
twelve languages—Hebrew, Syriac, Arabic, Greek, Latin, Spanish, Italian,
French, English, German, Flemish, and Slavonic. I am inclined to believe
that Crichton’s acquirements extended at least so far as this. It might
seem that a vague challenge to dispute in any one of a number of foreign
tongues was an empty and unsubstantial boast, and a mere exhibition of
vanity, perfectly safe from the danger of exposure. But it is clear
that Crichton’s challenge was not so unpractical as this. He not only
specified the languages of his challenge, but there is hardly one of
those that he selected which was not represented in the University of
Paris at the time, not only sufficiently to test the proficiency of the
daring disputant, but to secure his ignominious exposure, if there were
grounds to suspect him of charlatanism or imposture. Unhappily, however,
the promise of a youth so brilliant was cut short by an early death, in
1583, at the age of twenty-two years. Nor did Crichton leave behind him
any work by which posterity might test the reality of his acquirements,
except a few Latin verses printed by his friend, Aldus Manutius, on whose
generous patronage, with all his accomplishments, he had been dependent
for the means of subsistence during one of the most brilliant periods of
his career.

A few years Crichton’s senior in point of time, although, from the
precociousness of Crichton’s genius, his junior in reputation, was
Lancelot Andrews, Bishop of Winchester. He was born in London in 1555,
and, after a distinguished career in the university, rose, through a long
course of ecclesiastical preferments, to the see of Winchester. Beyond
the general praises of his scholarship in which all his biographers
indulge, few particulars are preserved respecting his attainments. Among
his contemporaries he was regarded as a prodigy. Wanley says[168] that
“some thought he might almost have served as interpreter-general at the
confusion of tongues;” and even the more prosaic Chalmers attributes to
him a profound knowledge of the “chief Oriental tongues, Greek, Latin,
and many modern languages.”[169]

John Gregory, who was born at Agmondesham in Buckinghamshire, in the year
1607, would probably have far surpassed Andrews as a linguist, had he
not been cut off prematurely before he had completed his thirtieth year.
He was a youth of unexampled industry and perseverance, devoting sixteen
hours of the twenty-four to his favourite studies. Even at the early age
at which he died he had mastered not only the Oriental and classical
languages, but also French, Italian, and Spanish, and, what was far more
remarkable in his day, his ancestral Anglo-Saxon. But he died in the very
blossom of his promise, in 1646.

These, however, must be regarded as exceptional cases. The study of
languages, it must be confessed, occupied at this period but little
of public attention in England. It holds a very subordinate place in
the great scheme of Bacon’s “Advancement of Learning.” In the model
Republic of his “New Atlantis” only four languages appear, “ancient
Hebrew, ancient Greek, good Latin of the School, and Spanish.”[170]
Gregory’s contemporaries, the brothers John and Thomas Greaves, though
both distinguished Persian and Arabic scholars, never made a name in
other languages. Notwithstanding the praise which Clarendon bestows on
Selden’s “stupendous learning in all kinds and _in all languages_,”[171]
it is certain that the range of his languages was very limited. So,
also, what Hallam says of Hugh Broughton as a man “deep in Jewish
erudition,”[172] must be understood rather of the literature than of the
languages of the East; and although Hugh Broughton’s namesake, Richard,
(one of the missionary priests in England in the beginning of the
seventeenth century, and an antiquarian of considerable merit, mentioned
by Dodd[173]) was a learned Hebraist, there is no evidence of his having
gone farther in these studies.

Indeed, strange as it may at first sight appear, the first epoch in
English history really prolific in eminent scholars is the stormy period
of the great Civil War. It is not a little remarkable that the most
creditable fruit of English scholarship, Walton’s Polyglot Bible, was
matured, if not brought to light, under the Republic.

The men who were engaged in this work, however, were, for the most part,
merely book-scholars. Edmund Castell, born at Halley, in Cambridgeshire,
in 1606, author of the Heptaglot Lexicon, which formed the companion or
supplement of Walton’s Bible, is admitted to have been one of the most
profound Orientalists of his day. This Lexicon comprises seven Oriental
languages, Hebrew, Chaldee, Samaritan, Syriac, Ethiopic, Arabic, and
Persian; and, if we add to these the classical languages, we shall
find Castell’s attainments to have been little inferior to those of
any linguist before his time; even without reckoning whatever modern
languages he may be supposed to have known. Castell, nevertheless, is one
of the most painful examples of neglected scholarship in all literary
history. Disraeli truly says that he more than devoted his life to his
Lexicon Heptaglotton.[174] His own Appeal to Charles the Second, if less
noble and dignified than Johnson’s celebrated preface to the Dictionary,
is yet one of the most touching documents on record. He laments the
“seventeen years during which he devoted sixteen or eighteen hours a day
to his labour. He declares that he had expended his whole inheritance
(above twelve thousand pounds), upon the work; and that he spent his
health and eyesight as well as his fortune, upon a thankless task.” The
copies of his Lexicon remained unsold upon his hands; and, out of the
whole five hundred copies which he left at his death, hardly one complete
copy escaped destruction by damp and vermin. “The whole load of learned
rags sold for seven pounds!”[175]

I cannot find that either Castell or his friend (though by no means his
equal as a linguist), Brian Walton possessed any remarkable faculty in
speaking even the languages with which they were most familiar.

Another of Walton’s associates in the compilation of the Polyglot, as
well as in other learned undertakings, Edward Pocock (born at Oxford in
1604,) appears to have given more attention to the accomplishment of
speaking foreign languages. In addition to Latin, Greek, French, and
probably Italian, he was well versed in Hebrew, Syriac, Ethiopic, and
Arabic. During a residence of six years at Aleppo, as British chaplain,
(1600-6), he had the advantage of receiving instructions from a native
doctor, in the language and literature of Arabia; and he engaged an Arab
servant for the sole purpose of enjoying the opportunity of speaking the
language.[176] In a second journey to the East, undertaken a few years
later, under the patronage of Laud, he extended his acquaintance with
these languages. Two of Pocock’s sons, Edward and Thomas, attained a
certain eminence in the same pursuit; but neither of them can be said to
have approached the fame of their father.

The mention of Arabian literature suggests the distinguished names of
Simon Ockley, the earliest English historian of Mahometanism, and of
George Sale, the first English translator of its sacred book. Both were
in their time Orientalists of high character; but both of them appear
to have applied chiefly to Arabic, Persian, and Turkish, rather than
to the Biblical languages. Both, too, may be cited among the examples
of unsuccessful scholarship. It was in a debtor’s prison at Cambridge
that Ockley found leisure for the completion of his great History of the
Saracens; and it is told of the learned translator of the Koran, that
too often, when he quitted his studies, he wanted a change of linen, and
frequently wandered in the streets in search of some compassionate friend
who might supply him with the meal of the day![177]

Another scholar of high repute at the same period, is Samuel Clarke. He
was born at Brackley, in Northamptonshire, in 1623, and was a student at
Merton College, Oxford, when the parliamentary commission undertook the
reform of the University. The general report of the period represents
him as a very profound and accomplished linguist; but the only direct
evidence which remains of the extent of his powers, is the fact that
he assisted Walton in the preparation of his Polyglot Bible, and also
Castell in the composition of his Heptaglot Lexicon. He died in 1669.

Early in the same century was born John Wilkins, another linguist of some
pretensions. Perhaps, however, he is better known by the efforts which
he made to recommend that ideal project for a Universal Language which
has occupied the thoughts of so many learned enthusiasts since his time,
than by his own positive and practical attainments; although he published
a Collection of Pater Nosters which possesses no inconsiderable
philological merit. He was born in 1614, at Fawsley, in Northamptonshire;
and at the early age of thirteen, he was admitted a scholar of Magdalen
College, Oxford, where he took his degree in 1634. In the contest
between the Crown and the Parliament, Wilkins became a warm partisan
of the latter. He was named Warden of Wadham College, Oxford, by the
parliamentary commission in 1648. Some years later, in 1656, he married
Robina, sister of the Protector, and widow of Peter French; the Protector
having granted him a dispensation from the statute which requires
celibacy, as one of the conditions of the tenure of his Wardenship. In
1659, Richard Cromwell promoted him to the Mastership of Trinity College,
Cambridge; from which, however, he was dispossessed at the Restoration.
But his reputation for scholarship, seemingly through the influence of
Buckingham,[178] outweighed his political demerits; and he was named
successively Dean of Ripon and Bishop of Chester, in which latter dignity
he died in 1670.

The unhappy deistical writer, John Toland, born in the County Donegal,
in Ireland, in 1669, was one of the most skilful linguists of his day.
His birth was probably illegitimate, and he was baptized by the strange
name of James Junius,[179] which the ridicule of his schoolfellows caused
him to change for that by which he is now known. During his early youth,
he was a member of the Catholic religion; but his daring and sceptical
mind early threw off the salutary restraints which that creed imposes,
although, like Gibbon, only to abandon Christianity itself in abandoning
Catholicity. His eventful and erratic career does not fall within the
scope of this notice, and I will only mention that in the singular
epitaph, which he composed for his own tomb, he speaks of himself as
“_linguarum plus decem sciens_.” In several of these ten languages, as
he states in his memorial to the Earl of Oxford,[180] he spoke and wrote
with as much fluency as in English. Toland died at Putney, in 1722.

From this period the same great blank occurs in the history of English
scholarship, which we have observed in almost all the contemporary
literatures of Europe. Still a few names may be gleaned from the general
obscurity.[181] It is true that what many persons may deem the most
notable publication of the time, Chamberlayne’s Collection of Pater
Nosters, (1715), was rather a literary curiosity than a work of genuine
scholarship. But there are other higher, though less known, names.

The once notorious “Orator Henley,” whom the Dunciad has immortalized as
the

    “Preacher at once, and Zany of his age,”

was unquestionably a linguist of great acquirements. His “Complete
Linguist,” consisting of grammars of ten languages, was published when
he was but twenty-five years old; and throughout his entire career,
eccentric as it was, he appears to have persevered in the same studies.
John Henley was born at Melton Mowbray, in 1692, and graduated in the
University of Cambridge. He took orders, and obtained some notoriety as a
preacher; but his great theatre of display was his so-called “Oratory,”
where he delivered orations or lectures on a variety of topics,
religious, political, humorous, and even profane. It was on one of these
occasions that he drew together a large congregation of shoemakers, by
the promise of showing them “the best, newest, and most expeditious way
of making shoes,” which he proceeded to illustrate by holding out a boot
and _cutting off the leg part_! Henley died in 1756.[182]

What Henley was in the learned languages, the distinguished statesman
Lord Carteret, afterwards Earl of Granville, was in the modern. With all
his brilliant qualities as a debater, and all his great capacity for
public affairs, Carteret combined the learning and the accomplishments of
a finished scholar. Swift said of him that “he carried away from Oxford
more Greek, Latin, and philosophy, than became a person of his rank.” He
spoke and wrote French, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese, German, and even
Swedish; and one of the first causes of the jealousy with which Walpole
regarded him, was the volubility with which he was able to hold converse
in German with their common master, George the First.

But Henley and Carteret stand almost alone among the English scholars of
the early half of the seventeenth century; and the first steady impulse
which the study of languages received in England, may be chiefly traced
to the attractions of the honourable and emolumentary service of the
East India Company. What the diplomatic ambition of France in the Levant
effected among the scholars of that country, the commercial enterprise
of the merchant princess of England achieved in her Indian territory;
and the splendid rewards held out to practical Oriental scholarship,
gave an impulse to the study of Eastern languages on a more liberal
and comprehensive scale.[183] It is in great part to this, that we are
indebted for the splendid successes of Sir William Jones, of Marsden, of
Colebrooke, of Craufurd, of Lumsden, of Leyden, and still more recently,
of Colonel Vans Kennedy.

The first of these, William Jones, was the son of a school-master,
and was born in London, in 1741. He was educated at Harrow, where
he exhibited an early taste for languages,[184] and was especially
distinguished in Greek and Latin metrical composition. In 1764, he
entered the University of Oxford, where he learned Arabic from a Syrian
whose acquaintance he chanced to form. To this he soon after added
Persian; and in 1770, he performed the very unusual feat of translating
the history of Nadir Shah into French. In the following year he
published his Persian Grammar, which took the general public as much by
surprise, by the beauty and eloquence of the poetical translations which
accompanied the copious examples that illustrated it, as it excited the
admiration of scholars by the simplicity and practical good sense of its
technical details. He soon afterwards applied himself to the language
and literature of China; which, however, he never made a profound study,
as about this time (1770), feeling the precariousness of a purely
literary profession, he took steps to have himself called to the English
bar, and for the following twelve years devoted himself with all his
characteristic energy, and with marked success, to its laborious and
engrossing duties. During the same period he endeavoured unsuccessfully
to obtain a seat in Parliament; but in 1783, he accepted the appointment
of Judge in the supreme court at Calcutta, and repaired to India in
the same year. His attention to the duties of his office, is said to
have been most earnest and exemplary. But, in the intervals of duty, he
travelled over a great part of India; mixed eagerly in native society;
and had acquired a familiarity with the history, antiquities, religions,
science, and laws of India, such as had never before been attained by
any European scholar, when, unhappily for the science to which he was
so thoroughly devoted, he was cut off prematurely in the year 1794, at
the early age of forty-seven. During a life thus laborious, and in great
part spent in pursuits utterly uncongenial with linguistic studies, Sir
William Jones had nevertheless amassed a store of languages which had
seldom, perhaps never, been equalled before his time. Fortunately too,
unlike most of the linguists whom we have been enumerating, he himself
left an autograph record of these studies, which Lord Teignmouth has
preserved in his interesting Biography. In this paper, he describes the
total number of languages with which he was in any degree acquainted to
have been twenty-eight; but he further distributes these into classes
according to the degree of his familiarity with each. From this curious
memorandum, it appears that he had studied critically _eight_ languages,
viz:—English, Latin, French, Italian, Greek, Arabic, Persian, Sanscrit;
_eight_ others he had studied less perfectly, but all were intelligible
to him with the aid of a Dictionary, viz:—Spanish, Portuguese, German,
Runick, Hebrew, Bengali, Hindi, Turkish; _twelve_ others, in fine, he
had studied least perfectly; but he considered all these attainable;
namely Tibetan, Pali, Palavi, Deri, Russian, Syriac, Ethiopic, Coptic,
Welsh, Swedish, Dutch, and Chinese.[185]

Now, as Lord Teignmouth[186] describes him as perfectly familiar
with Spanish, Portuguese, and German, three languages which he has
himself placed on the list of languages, “less critically studied, but
intelligible with the aid of a dictionary,” it may fairly be believed
that this estimate is, to say the least, a sufficiently modest one; and
that his acquaintance even with the languages of the third class was by
no means superficial, we may infer from another memorandum preserved by
Lord Teignmouth from which we find that he had studied the grammars of
two at least of the number, namely: Russian and Welsh. His biographer,
however, unfortunately enters into no details as to his power of speaking
languages; but he is said by the writer of the notice in the _Biographie
Universelle_ to have spoken eight languages as perfectly as his native
English.

In contrast with successes so brilliant as these, the comparatively
humble career of the other British Orientalists named in conjunction with
Sir William Jones, will appear tame and uninteresting. William Marsden
was born in Dublin, 1754; and, after having completed the ordinary
classical studies, was sent out to Bencoolen in the island of Sumatra, at
the early age of sixteen. The extraordinary facility which he exhibited
for acquiring the Malay languages led to his rapid advancement. He was
named first under-secretary, and afterwards chief secretary of the
Island; and, before his return in 1779, he had accumulated the materials
for the exceedingly valuable work on Sumatra which he published in 1782.
Marsden held several important appointments after his return,[187] and
he employed every interval of his official duties in literary pursuits.
He was a thorough master of Sanscrit, and all its kindred languages;
but he must be described, nevertheless, rather as a book-learned, than
a practical linguist. His Essay on the Polynesian or East Insular
languages, tracing their connexion with each other, and their common
relations with Sanscrit, is still a standard source of information on
this interesting ethnological question.

Henry Thomas Colebrooke,[188] well known by his numerous contributions
to Oriental literature, especially in the Asiatic Journal, was also an
official of the East India Company, whose employment he entered, while
still very young, as a civil servant. Colebrooke was well versed, not
only in the Indian languages, but also in those of the Hebrew and cognate
races; and his early education in France gave him a greater familiarity
with French and other modern tongues than is often found to accompany the
more profound linguistic studies.

Matthew Lumsden was born in Aberdeenshire in 1777, and went as a mere
boy to India, where his brother had an appointment in the service of the
Company. Lumsden’s knowledge of Hindostani and of Persian led to his
being employed first as translator in the criminal court, and afterwards
as professor in Fortwilliam College, where he remained till 1820. His
skill in Persian and Arabic is attested by several publications upon
both, chiefly elementary; but he can hardly be classed with the higher
Orientalists, much less with linguists of more universal pretensions.

Lord Cockburn, in the lively section of his amusing “Memorials of his
Own Time” which he devotes to the singular and unsteady career of John
Leyden, says that M’Intosh, to whom “his wild friend” was clearly a
source of great amusement, used to laugh at the affected modesty with
which Leyden “professed to know _but seventy_ languages.”[189] It is
plain that M’Intosh considered this an extreme exaggeration; but there
can be no doubt, nevertheless, that Leyden was a very extraordinary
linguist. This strange man, whose name will perhaps be remembered by
the frequent allusions to it in the early correspondence of Sir Walter
Scott, was born of a very humble family at Denholm in 1775. Though his
education was of the very lowest order, yet Scott relates that “before he
had attained his nineteenth year, he confounded the doctors of Edinburgh
by the portentous mass of his acquisitions in almost every department of
knowledge.”[190] Having failed very signally in the clerical profession,
to which he was brought up by his parents, he embraced that of medicine;
and, after undergoing a more than ordinary share of the privations
and vicissitudes of literary life such as it then existed, he went to
Madras in 1803 in the capacity of assistant surgeon in the East India
Company’s service. The adoption of this career decided the course of his
after studies. He had learned, while yet a mere youth, preparing for the
university, Hebrew and Arabic. He afterwards extended his researches
into all the chief languages of the East, Sanscrit, Hindustani, and
many other minor varieties of the Indian tongues. He was also thorough
master of Persian. His career as Professor of Hindustani at Calcutta
was more successful than that of any European scholar since Sir William
Jones. Having also studied the Malay language, from which he made
several translations, he was induced to accompany Lord Minto on the Java
expedition in 1811, where he was cut off after a short illness in the
same year, too soon, unhappily, to allow of his turning to full account
the important materials which he had collected for the comparative study
of the Indo-Chinese languages.

The well-known evangelical commentator, Dr. Adam Clarke, born in 1760,
of very humble parentage, at Magherafelt, in the County of Londonderry,
in the north of Ireland, and for a long course of years the most
distinguished preacher of the Methodist communion, enjoyed a high
reputation among his followers as a linguist; but his studies had been
confined almost entirely to the Biblical languages. The same may be said
of the Rev. Dr. Barrett, vice-provost of Trinity College, Dublin, who is
known to Biblical students as the editor of the Palimpsest MS. of the
Gospels, and of the celebrated Codex Montfortianus.

But there is more of curious interest in the career of a very
extraordinary individual, Richard Roberts Jones, of Aberdarvan, in
Carnarvonshire, who, if not for the extent of his attainments, at least
for the exceedingly unfavourable circumstances under which they were
acquired, deserves a place among examples of the “pursuit of knowledge
under difficulties.” A privately printed memoir of this singular
character, by Mr. Roscoe, who took much interest in him, and exerted
himself warmly in his behalf, contains several most curious particulars
regarding his studies and acquirements, as well as his personal habits
and appearance. Mr. Roscoe first met him in 1806, and described him to
Dr. Parr as “a poor Welsh fisher-lad, as ragged as a colt, and as uncouth
as any being that has a semblance of humanity. But beneath such an
exterior,” he adds, “is a mind cultivated, not only beyond all reasonable
expectation, but beyond all probable conception. In his fishing boat on
the coast of Wales, at an age little more than twenty, he has acquired
Greek, Hebrew, and Latin; has read the Iliad, Hesiod, Theocritus,
&c.; studied the refinements of Greek pronunciation; and examined the
connection of that language with Hebrew.” An attempt was made to raise
him to a position more befitting his acquirements. But his habits were
of the rudest and most uncleanly. “He loved to lie on his back in the
bottom of a ditch. His uncouth appearance, solitary habits, and perhaps
weak intellect, made him an object of ridicule and persecution to the
children of the district; and, he often _carried an iron pot on his
head_ to screen him from the stones and clods which they threw at him.
He wore a large filthy wrapper, in the pockets and folds of which he
stowed his library; and his face, covered with hair, gave him a strangely
uncouth appearance; although the mild and abstracted expression of his
features took from it much of its otherwise repulsive character.” Mr.
Roscoe gives a very curious account of an interview between Dr. Parr and
this strange genius, in 1815, in the course of which Jones “exhibited a
familiarity with French, Italian, Latin, Greek, Hebrew, and Chaldee.”
He described too, for Dr. Parr, his mode of acquiring a new language,
which consisted in carefully examining its vocabulary, ascertaining
what words in it corresponded with those of any language which he had
previously learned, and _having struck such words out of the vocabulary_,
proceeding to impress the _remaining_ words upon his memory, as being
the only ones which were peculiar to the new language which he sought to
acquire. It may easily be believed that Jones’s irreclaimably uncouth and
eccentric habits defeated the efforts made by his friends to place him
in a condition more befitting his acquirements. Clothes with which their
thoughtfulness might replace his habitual rags, in a few days were sure
to present the same filthy and dilapidated appearance. When a bed was
provided for him, he chose to sleep not _upon_, but _under_ it; and all
his habits bespoke at once weakness of mind and indisposition, or perhaps
incapacity, to accommodate himself to the ordinary usages of other men.

Dr. Thomas Young, although his fame must rest chiefly upon his brilliant
philosophical discoveries, (especially in the Theory of Light), and on
his success in deciphering and systematizing the hieroglyphical writing
of the Egyptians, as exhibited in the inscriptions of the Rosetta Stone
and in the funereal papyri, cannot be passed over in a history of
eminent British linguists. Young was born at Milverton in Somersetshire,
in 1773. His mind was remarkably precocious. He had read the whole
Bible twice through, besides other books, before he was four years
old. In his seventh year he learnt Latin; and before he left school
in his thirteenth year, he added to this Greek, French, and Italian.
Soon after his return from school, he mastered Hebrew, Chaldee, Syriac,
and Persian; and, in all those languages, as well as in his own, his
reading (of which his journals have preserved a most minute and accurate
record), was so various and so vast, as almost to exceed belief. Having
embraced the medical profession, he passed two years in different German
Universities, during which time he not only extended his knowledge of
learned languages, but also became perfect master of German;—not to speak
of various other acquisitions, some of them of a class which are seldom
found to accompany scholastic eminence, such as riding two horses at
the same time, walking or dancing on the tight rope, and various other
feats of harlequinade! Of his skill in the ancient Egyptian language, as
well as its more modern forms, in which he rivalled, and as his English
biographer, Dr. Peacock, seeks to show,[191] surpassed, Champollion and
Lepsius, it is unnecessary to speak: and it is highly probable that,
having learned Italian while a mere youth,[192] he also made himself
acquainted with Spanish, and perhaps Portuguese.

Dr. Pritchard, who may be regarded as the founder of the English
school of ethnography, can hardly, notwithstanding, be strictly called
a linguist. If we except the Celtic languages, and Greek, Latin, and
German, most of his learning regarding the rest is taken at second-hand
from Adelung and others. Nevertheless, the linguistic section of his
“Researches into the Physical History of Mankind,” is a work of very
great value. M. Bunsen pronounces it “the best of its kind; infinitely
superior, as a whole, to Adelung’s _Mithridates_”;[193] and Cardinal
Wiseman, in his masterly lecture “On the Natural History of the Human
race,” not only gives Pritchard the credit of being “almost the first who
attempted to connect ethnography with philology,” but even goes so far
as to say that it will henceforth “be difficult for any one to treat of
this theme without being indebted to Dr. Pritchard for a great portion of
his materials.”[194]

Of the school of living British linguists I shall not be expected to
speak at much length; but there are a few names so familiar to the
scholars of every country that it would be unpardonable to pass them over
entirely without notice.

The work just quoted, from the very time of its publication in 1836,
established the reputation of Dr. (now Cardinal) Wiseman, still a very
young writer, as a philologist of the first rank. His latest writings
show that, through all the engrossing duties in which he has since been
engaged, he has continued to cultivate the science of philology.[195]
The Cardinal is, moreover, a most accomplished linguist. Besides the
ordinary learned languages, he is master not only of Hebrew and Chaldee,
but also of Syriac (of his scholarship in which his _Horæ Syriacæ_ is
a most honourable testimony), Arabic, Persian, and Sanscrit. In modern
languages he has few superiors. He speaks with fluency and elegance
French, Italian, German, Spanish, and Portuguese; and in most of these
languages he has frequently preached or lectured extempore, or with
little preparation.

The interesting discoveries of Colonel Rawlinson and of Dr. Hincks, and
Dr. Cureton’s very important Syriac publications, have associated their
names with the linguistic as well as the antiquarian memories of this
age. Nor are there many English Orientalists whose foreign reputation is
so high as that of Mr. Lane. But I am unable to speak of the attainments
of any of these gentlemen in the other families of language.

By far the most noticeable names in the list of living linguists of
British race are those of Sir John Bowring, now Governor at Hong-Kong,
Professor Lee of Cambridge, and the American ex-blacksmith, Elihu
Burritt. All three, beyond their several degrees of personal merit,
possess a common claim to admiration, as being almost entirely
self-educated. John (now Sir John) Bowring, as I learn from a Memoir
published about three years since,[196] before he had attained his
eighteenth year, had learned Latin, French, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese,
German, and Dutch. He is said to have since added to his store almost
every language of Europe;—Russian, Servian, Bohemian, Polish, Hungarian,
Slovakian, Swedish, Danish, Icelandic, Lettish, Finnish, and even Basque;
and he is further described as familiar with all the provincial varieties
of each; for instance, of the various offshoots of German, and of the
several dialects of Spanish which prevail in Catalonia, Valencia and
Galicia. Dr. Bowring’s later career brought him into familiarity with
Arabic and Turkish; and his still more recent successes in China and in
Siam and its dependencies are equally remarkable. It is not so easy to
offer an opinion as to the degree of Sir John Bowring’s acquaintance with
each of the languages which are ascribed to him. His interesting poetical
translations from Russian, Servian, Bohemian, and other languages of
Europe, are rather a test of elegant literary tastes than of exact
linguistic attainments; nor am I aware to what more direct ordeal his
various attainments have been subjected. It were to be wished that the
Memoir from which these particulars are derived had entered more into
detail upon this part of the subject. But, even making every allowance
for possible exaggeration, it seems impossible to doubt the claim of Sir
John Bowring to a place in the very highest rank of modern linguists.

Dr. Samuel Lee is perhaps even a still more extraordinary example of
self-education. He was born in the very humblest rank in the village
of Longnor in Shropshire, and, after having spent a short time in the
poor-school of his native village, commenced life as a carpenter’s
apprentice, when he was but twelve years old. In the few intervals of
leisure which this laborious occupation permitted, Mr. Jerdan states[197]
that, without the least assistance from masters, he taught himself Latin,
Greek, Hebrew, and Chaldee; having contrived, from the hoardings of
his scanty wages, to procure a few elementary books in these and other
languages. On his marriage, however, he was forced to sell the little
library which he had accumulated, in order to provide for the new wants
with which he found himself encompassed: and for a time his struggle
after learning was suspended; but his extraordinary attainments having
begun to attract notice, he was relieved from the uncongenial occupation
which he had hitherto followed, and appointed master of a school at
Shrewsbury. In the more favourable position which he had thus obtained,
he soon extended his reading to Arabic, Persian, and Hindustani. In 1813
he entered Trinity College, Cambridge, where it is worthy of note that
he distinguished himself no less in science than in languages, and took
his degree with much credit. He was afterwards appointed superintendent
of the Oriental press of the British and Foreign Bible Society, for which
body he has not only edited the Arabic, Persian, Coptic, Hindustani,
Malay, and other versions of the Bible, but has also translated, or
superintended the translation, of many tracts in these various languages.
When Mr. Wheaton, an American traveller, (brother of the well-known
American jurist of that name) visited Professor Lee, he found him
acquainted with no less than “sixteen languages, in most of which he
was able to write.”[198] Neither this writer, however, nor Mr. Jerdan,
informs us as to the extent of Dr. Lee’s attainments in speaking foreign
languages.

The list of linguists of the British race may be closed not unworthily
with the still more remarkable name of Elihu Burritt, who, though born
in America (in 1811,) is descended of an English family, settled in
Connecticut for the last two centuries. The circumstances of Burritt’s
father, who was a shoemaker, were so narrow, that the education of
Elihu, the youngest of five sons, was entirely neglected. When his
father died, Elihu, then above fifteen years old, had spent but three
months at school; and, being altogether dependent on his own exertions
for support, he was obliged to bind himself as an apprentice to the
trade of blacksmith. Fortunately, however, an elder brother who was
a schoolmaster, settled in the same town before the term of Elihu’s
apprenticeship expired; and as the latter had carefully devoted each
spare moment of his laborious life to reading every book that came within
his reach, he gladly availed himself, as soon as he became his own
master, of his brother’s offer to take him as a pupil for half a year,
which was all the time he could hope to spare from his craft. During that
time, brief as it was, Elihu “became well versed in mathematics, went
through Virgil in the original, and read several French books.” Having
thus laid the foundation, he returned to his trade, resolved to labour
till he should have acquired the means of completing the work; and, in
the strong passion for knowledge which devoured him, he actually engaged
himself to do the work of two men, in order that, by receiving double
wages, he might more quickly realize the desired independence. Yet, even
while he was thus doubly tasked, and while his daily hours of labour were
no less than fourteen, he contrived to give some time in the mornings and
evenings to Latin, French, and Spanish; and he actually procured a small
“Greek grammar, which would just _lie in the crown of his hat_, and used
to carry it with him to read during his work—the casting of brass cow
bells, a task which required no small amount of attention!”

With the little store which he thus toilfully accumulated, he betook
himself to New Haven, the seat of Yale College, although without a hope
of being able to avail himself of its literary advantages. Here too he
worked almost unaided. He took lodgings at an inn frequented by the
students, though too poor to enter the university; and in the course of
a few months, by unremitting study, he read through the whole Iliad in
Greek, and had made considerable progress in Italian and German, besides
extending his knowledge of Spanish and French. Having obtained, soon
afterwards, a commercial appointment, he was partially released, for a
space, from the mechanical drudgery in which he was so long engaged; and,
as he was thus enabled to devote a little more time to his favourite
studies, he contrived to learn Hebrew, and made his first advance towards
a regular course of Oriental reading. But this interval of rest was a
brief one; after a very mortifying failure, he was at last compelled to
return once more to the anvil, as his only sure resource against poverty.
Still, nevertheless, he toiled on in his enthusiastic struggle for
knowledge. Even while engaged in this painful drudgery, “every moment,”
says Mrs. Howitt,[199] “which he could steal out of the four-and-twenty
hours was devoted to study; he rose early in the winter mornings, and,
while the mistress of the house was preparing breakfast by lamplight,
he would stand by the mantel-piece, with his Hebrew Bible on the shelf,
and his lexicon in his hand, thus studying while he ate; the same method
was pursued at the other meals; mental and bodily food being taken in
together. This severe labour of mind, as might be expected, produced
serious effects on his health; he suffered much from headaches, the
characteristic remedy for which were two or three additional hours of
hard forging, and a little less study.”

An extract from his own weekly Diary, which Mrs. Howitt has preserved,
tells the story of his struggle still more touchingly:—“_Monday_, June
18, headache; forty pages Cuvier’s Theory of the Earth, sixty-four pages
French, eleven hours forging. _Tuesday_, sixty-five lines of Hebrew,
thirty pages of French, ten pages Cuvier’s Theory, eight lines Syriac,
ten ditto Danish, ten ditto Bohemian, nine ditto Polish, fifteen names of
stars, ten hours forging. _Wednesday_, twenty-five lines Hebrew, fifty
pages of astronomy, eleven hours forging. _Thursday_, fifty-five lines
Hebrew, eight ditto Syriac, eleven hours forging. _Friday_, unwell;
twelve hours forging. _Saturday_, unwell; fifty pages Natural Philosophy,
ten hours forging. _Sunday_, lesson for Bible class.”

Through these and many similar difficulties, has this extraordinary man
found his way to eminence. Without attempting to chronicle the stages
of his progress, it will be enough to state that a writer of last year
describes him as at present acquainted with eighteen languages, besides
his native English, viz:—Latin, Greek, Hebrew, Syriac, Samaritan, Arabic,
Turkish, Persian, Ethiopic, Italian, French, Spanish, German, Danish,
Irelandic, Esthonian, Bohemian, and Polish.[200] He is author of several
works, and was for some time Editor of a Journal entitled “The Christian
Citizen.”

As in the case of Dr. Lee, no attempt is made, in either of the
biographies of Burritt which I have consulted, to define with exactness
the degree of his knowledge of each among the various languages which he
has learned; but if his proficiency in them be at all considerable, his
position among linguists must be admitted to be of the very highest; and
as he is still only in his forty-sixth year, it would be difficult to
predict what may be the limit of his future successes.


§ VII. LINGUISTS OF THE SLAVONIC RACE.

The extraordinary capacity of the Slavonic races for the acquisition of
foreign languages, has long been a subject of observation and of wonder.
In every educated foreign circle Russians and Poles may be met, whom it
is impossible to distinguish, by their language, or even by their accent,
from the natives of the country: and this accomplishment is frequently
found to embrace the entire range of the polite languages of Europe. In
the higher native Russian society, it is rare to meet one who does not
speak several languages, besides his own. Every candidate for public
office in Russia, especially in connexion with foreign affairs, must be
master of at least four languages, French, German, English, and Italian;
and in the Eastern governments of the empire, are constantly to be found
employés, who, to the ordinary stock of European languages, add an equal
number of the dialects of the Asiatic races subject to the Czar.

In most cases, however, this facility in the use of foreign languages
enjoyed by the natives of Russia and Poland, is chiefly conversational,
and acquired rather by practice than by study; and, among the numbers
who, during the last three centuries, must be presumed to have possessed
this gift in an eminent degree, very few appear to have acquired a
permanent reputation as scholars in the higher sense of the name.

Unfortunately, too, even were it otherwise, the materials for a history
of Russian linguists are extremely scanty. Not one of those who have
written upon Slavonic Literature, appears to have adverted to this
as a distinct branch of scholarship; Slavonic scholars, too, have
met but imperfect justice from the writers on general biography; and
thus, especially for one to whom the native sources of information are
inaccessible, the rare allusions which can be gleaned from the general
history of Slavonic literature supply but an uncertain and imperfect
guide,[201] even did opportunities present themselves for pursuing the
inquiry.

It would be unpardonable, nevertheless, to pass the subject over in
silence; and I can only renew in especial reference to this part of the
memoir, the claim for indulgence with which I entered upon this Essay.

       *       *       *       *       *

Christianity, and with it the first seeds of civilization, reached
Russia from Constantinople; and it is not unlikely that the friendly and
frequent intercourse which subsisted between the two courts under the
first Christian Dukes of Muscovy, Vladimir and Jaroslav, may have led to
a considerable interchange of language between the members of the two
nations. The many foreign alliances, too, with Constantinople, Germany,
Hungary, France, England, Norway, and Poland, which were formed by
the children of Jaroslav, may, perhaps, have tended to familiarize his
subjects, or at least his court, with some of the languages of Southern
and Western Europe. But no record of this—the one bright period in early
Russian history—has been preserved, from which any particulars can be
gleaned.

The division of Jaroslav’s dominions between his sons at his death, (in
1054,) plunged the Russian nation into a series of civil wars and into
the barbarism to which such wars lead, from which it did not begin to
emerge till the sixteenth century; and, although a few translations
(chiefly theological), from Greek and Latin, were made during this
period, yet, from the interruption of all intercourse with foreign
countries, it may be presumed that (with the exception, perhaps, of a
few enterprising individuals, like the merchant Nikitin,[202] who, in
the fifteenth century, traversed the entire East, and penetrated as far
as Tibet,) the natives of an empire so completely isolated concerned
themselves little about any language beyond their own.

Macarius, who was Metropolitan of Moscow in the middle of the sixteenth
century, did something to promote the introduction of foreign letters
into Russia,[203] and many translations, not only from the Greek and
Latin fathers, but also from the classical writers, were made under
his direction. A still greater impulse must have been given to this
particular branch of study by the new policy introduced by the Czar Boris
Feodorowitsch Godounoff, who not only invited learned foreigners to his
court, but sent eighteen young nobles of Russia to foreign countries to
study their arts, their literature and their languages.[204]

The results of this more liberal policy, however, had hardly begun to
be felt, when the troubles which followed the well-known revolution of
Demetrius the Impostor, revived for a time the worst forms of barbarism
in the Empire.

The elevation (in 1613,) of the family of Romanoff to the throne, in
the person of the Czar Michael, by restoring a more settled government,
contributed to advance the cause of letters. The monk Beründa Pameva,
published about this time a Slavo-Russian Lexicon, which exhibits in its
etymologies an acquaintance with Latin, Greek, and Hebrew.[205]

A school was founded at Moscow by the priest-monk Arsenius, for the
study of Greek and Latin, in 1643, one of the scholars of which,
Theodore Rtischtscheff, founded a society for translating works from
foreign languages in 1649; and another school of still more wide-spread
influence was opened in the Monastery of Saikonosspassk, in 1682. It is
worthy of remark, nevertheless, that the first Russian grammar, that of
Ludolf,[206] was printed, not at any native press, but in the University
of Oxford.

One of the members of the Translation Society alluded to above, the
monk Epiphanius Slawinezki, appears to have been regarded by his
contemporaries as a linguist of notable attainments. He published
a Greek, Latin, and Slavonic Dictionary, and commenced a Slavonic
translation of the Bible from the original Greek, which was cut short
by his death in 1676; but there is no reason to believe that he was
acquainted with any of the Oriental languages; and the inference to be
drawn from the reputation which he enjoyed on so slight a foundation, is
far from creditable to the linguistic attainments of his time.

It is only from the reign of Peter the Great that the history of
this, as of all other branches of Russian enlightenment, may be
properly said to commence. Independently of the encouragement which
Peter held out to foreign talent to devote itself to his service, the
grand and comprehensive scheme of the academy which he planned under
the direction of Leibnitz, contained a special provision for the
department of languages.[207] And although it was not formally opened
until after Peter’s death, by the Empress Catherine I. (1725), the
influence of the policy in which it originated, had made itself felt
long before. The Czar’s favourite, Mentschikoff, who from an obscure
origin (1674-1729) built up the fortunes of what is now one of the
greatest houses of Russia, was master of eight languages, most of which
he spoke with perfect fluency. Demetrius Kantemir, (1673-1723), father
of the celebrated poet of that name, deserves also to be noticed. He
was descended of a Turkish family, and held the office of Hospodar of
Moldavia; but he prized his literary reputation more than his rank. He
appears to have been a scholar in the highest sense of the name, and
was familiarly acquainted, not only with the living languages which
are so easily acquired by his countrymen, but with several of the
learned languages, both of the East and the West.[208] The poet, his
son Antiochus Demetrjewitsch, is also described as “master of several
languages, ancient and modern.”[209] The same may be inferred regarding
the great traveller, Basilius Gregorowitsch Barskj, who was born at
Kiew, in 1702. He must necessarily have acquired, during his long and
adventurous wanderings in Europe and the East, a familiarity with many
of the languages of the various countries through which he journeyed,
although he was prevented from turning it to account upon his return to
Russia by his premature death in 1747.[210]

Basilius Nikititsch Tatisscheff, one of the youths sent abroad by Peter
the Great, for the purpose of studying in the foreign universities,
enjoyed a considerable reputation as a linguist.[211] The History of
Russia which he compiled, supposes a familiarity with several Asiatic,
as well as European languages; but, as it is not improbable that part
of the materials which he employed in this history were translated
for his use by assistants engaged for the purpose, it may be doubted
whether this can be assumed as a fair test of his own capabilities. The
linguistic attainments of the celebrated poet Lemonossoff,[212] although
considerable, form his least solid title to fame. His history is so
full of interest, that its incidents, almost utterly unvarnished, have
supplied the narrative of one of the most popular of modern Russian
novels. Born (1711) in a rude fisher’s hut in the wretched village
of Denissowka on the shore of the Frozen Ocean, he rose by his own
unassisted genius not only to high eminence in science, but to the
very first rank in the literature of his native country, of which he
may truly be described as the founder; and, although he does not seem
to have made languages a special study, he deserves to be noticed even
in this department. He was perfect master of Greek, Latin, French,
and German; and possessed with other ancient and modern languages, an
acquaintance sufficient for all the purposes of study. The attainments
of his contemporary, Basilius Petrowitsch Petroff, (1736) were
perhaps more profound. He was a scholar of the celebrated convent of
Saikonosspassk; and having attracted notice by an ode which he composed
for the coronation of the Empress Catherine, he was employed, through the
influence of Potemkin, at the English and several other European courts.
Through the opportunities which he thus enjoyed, he became one of the
best linguists of his day, and we may form an estimate of his zeal and
perseverance from the circumstance of his having learned Romaic after his
sixtieth year.[213] Gabriel, Archbishop of St. Petersburg, (1775-1801)
and one of the most distinguished pulpit orators of Russia, is also
mentioned as a very remarkable linguist.[214] His success, however, lay
chiefly in modern languages.

The most eminent scholars engaged in the philological and ethnological
investigations undertaken by the Empress Catherine II. were foreigners;
as, for example, Pallas, and Bakmeister. Some, however, were native
Russians, but few details are preserved regarding them. Of Sujeff, who
accompanied Pallas in the expedition to Tartary and China, and who
translated the journals of the expedition into Russian,[215] I have not
been able to obtain any particulars. I have been equally unsuccessful
as to the history of Theodore Mirievo de Jankiewitsch, the compiler of
the alphabetical Digest of Pallas’s Comparative Vocabulary, described in
a former page; but it can scarcely be doubted, from the very nature of
his task, that he must have been a man of no ordinary acquirements as a
linguist, at least as regards the vocabularies of language.

During the present century a good deal has been done in Russia for
the cultivation of particular families of languages. The “Lazareff
Institute,” founded at Moscow in 1813,[216] by an Armenian family from
which it takes its name, comprehends in its truly munificent scheme
of education not only the Armenian, Georgian, and Tartar languages,
but also the several members of the Caucasian family.[217] An Oriental
Institute[218] on a somewhat similar plan was established at St.
Petersburg in 1823. Another was opened at the still more favourable
centre of languages, Odessa, in 1829; and a fourth, yet more recently,
at Kazan, the meeting point of the two great classes of languages
which practically divide between them the entire Russian Empire.[219]
Individual scholars, too, have taken to themselves particular branches
of the study, some of them with very remarkable success. Timkoffsky, the
well-known missionary in China,[220] and Hyacinth Bitchourin, who was
head of the Pekin Russian Mission from 1808 to 1812, have contributed to
popularize the study of Chinese.[221] Igumnoff of Irkutsch published a
useful dictionary of the Mongol: Giganoff, and more recently Volkoff, a
dictionary of the Tartar languages; of which Mirza Kazem-Beg, professor
of the Turkish and Tartar languages at St. Petersburg, has compiled an
excellent grammar. The same service has been rendered to the language
of Georgia and its several dialects by David Tchubinoff.[222] The
numerous philological writings of Goulianoff, too, and, more lately,
Prince Alexander Handjeri’s _Dictionnaire Français, Arabe, Persan, et
Turc_,[223] have established a European reputation.

The present Prefect Apostolic of the Arctic Missions, who is a convert
from the Russian Church, is said to be a very extraordinary linguist.
Even before he entered upon his missionary charge, in which, of course,
the circle of his languages is much enlarged, he habitually heard
confessions, at Paris, in six languages.

Perhaps also it may be permitted to enumerate among Russian linguists
three eminent literary men who have long been resident at St. Petersburg,
and who, although not natives of Russia, may now be regarded as
naturalised subjects of the Empire—Senkowsky, Gretsch and Mirza Kazem-Beg.

The first is by birth a Pole;[224] but having early attained to much
eminence as an Orientalist, and having travelled with some reputation as
an explorer in Syria and Egypt, he obtained the Professorship of Oriental
languages in the university of St. Petersburg, in which he has since
distinguished himself by an important controversy with the celebrated
Von Hammer. Senkowsky, since his residence in St. Petersburg, has made
the Russian language his own, and is one of the most prolific writers
in the entire range of modern Russian literature. His grammar of that
language is among the most intelligible to foreigners that has ever been
issued. With most of the languages of Europe, he is said to be perfectly
familiar, and his attainments as an Orientalist are of the very highest
rank. He is a corresponding member of the Asiatic Societies of most of
the capitals of Europe, and publishes indifferently in Polish, Russian,
German, and French.

Gretsch, the editor of the well-known St. Petersburg Journal, “The
Northern Bee,” is perhaps less profound, but equally varied in his
attainments. Although a German by birth, he writes exclusively in
Russian, and is the author of the best and most popular extant history
of Russian literature; of which Otto’s _Lehrbuch der Russischen
Literatur_, although apparently an independent work, is almost a literal
translation.[225]

Mirza Kazem-Beg is of the Tartar race, but a native of Astracan, where
his father, a man of much reputation for learning, had settled about
the commencement of the century. Soon after the establishment of the
professorship of the Turkish and Tartar languages at Kazan, Kazem-Beg was
selected to fill it; and, after some time, he was removed to the same
chair in the University of Petersburg, which he still holds. Besides the
ordinary learned languages, he is acquainted with the Hebrew, Chaldee,
Arabic, Syrian, Persian, and Turkish, as well as those of the Tartar
stock; and he is described as perfect master of the modern European
languages, especially French, Italian, German, and English. The last
named language he speaks and writes with great ease and elegance, and
has even published some translations into it, as, for example, the
“Derbend-Nâmeh.”[226]

       *       *       *       *       *

The reputation of the Poles as linguists is equally high. So far back
as the election of Henry de Valois, Choisnin, who accompanied Henry
to Poland, says that of the two hundred Polish nobles who were then
assembled, there were hardly two who did not speak, in addition to their
native Polish, German, Italian, and Latin.[227] So universal was the
knowledge of the last named language that, with perhaps a pardonable
exaggeration, Martin Kromer alleges that there were fewer in Poland than
in Latium itself who did not speak it.[228]

Nevertheless, few names present themselves in this department which have
left any permanent trace in history. Francis Meninski, the learned author
of the _Thesaurus Linguarum Orientalium_,[229] was not only a profound
scholar in most of the ancient and modern languages, but, from his long
residence in the East, and from the office of Oriental Interpreter which
he held, first in the Polish and afterwards in the Imperial service, must
be presumed to have spoken them freely and familiarly. But Meninski was a
native of Lorraine, and by some is believed to have been originally named
_Menin_, and only to have adopted the Polish affix, _ski_, on receiving
from the Diet his patent of naturalization and nobility.

Among the early Polish Jesuits were many accomplished classical and
Oriental linguists, but in the absence of any particulars of their
attainments, it would be uninteresting to enumerate them. In later times
the names of Groddek and Bobrowski may be mentioned as philologers,
if not as linguists. The learned Jesuit historian, John Christopher
Albertrandy, also, possesses this among many other lilies to fame. He
was a most laborious and successful collector of materials for Polish
history, in search of which he explored the libraries of Italy, from
whence he carried home, after three years of patient research, a hundred
and ten folio volumes of extracts copied with his own hand! From Italy
he proceeded to Stockholm and Upsala, where many important documents
connected with the time of John III. and Sigismond III. are preserved:
and here, being, from some unworthy jealousy, only permitted to inspect
the desired documents on the condition of not making notes or copies in
the library, his prodigious memory enabled him on his return each evening
to his apartments, to commit to writing what he had read during the day,
and the collection thus formed amounted to no fewer than ninety folio
volumes![230] Albertrandy’s historical works are very numerous; and when
his labours in this department are remembered, his success as a linguist
will appear almost prodigious. Besides Latin, Greek, and Hebrew, he knew
most of the modern languages, French, English, Italian, German, and
Russian, and spoke the majority of them with ease and propriety.

The well-known Polish General, Wenceslaus Rzewuski, devoted the later
years of his busy and chequered career to literary, and especially to
linguistic, pursuits. He is said to have spoken the learned tongues
as well and as freely as his native Polish, and to have been master,
moreover, of all the leading modern languages of Europe. The great
Oriental Journal published at Vienna, _Fundgruben des Orients_, which is
really what its title implies, a _mine_ of Oriental learning, was for
many years under his superintendence.

The Russo-Polish diplomatist, Count Andrew Italinski, is another example
of the union of profound scholarship with great talents for public
affairs. Born in Poland about the middle of the eighteenth century,
Italinski visited in the successive stages of his education, Kiew,
Leyden, Edinburgh, London, Paris, and Berlin, and acquired the languages
of all those various countries. Being eventually appointed to the Russian
embassy in the Kingdom of the Two Sicilies, he became even more perfect
in Italian. In addition to all these languages, he was so thoroughly
master of those of the East, Turkish, Arabic, Persian, &c., as to
challenge the admiration even of the Easterns themselves.[231]

It is perhaps right to add that the eminent Orientalist of St.
Petersburg, Senkowsky, although a Russian by residence and by
association, is not only, as I have already stated, of Polish birth, but
is, moreover, one of the most popular writers in his native language.

       *       *       *       *       *

Our notice of Bohemian linguists must be even more meagre.

The early period of Bohemian letters presents no distinguished name. From
the extraordinary activity which the Bohemians exhibited in translating
the Bible in the fifteenth century, it might be supposed that the study
of Greek and Hebrew had already taken root in the schools of Prague. But
out of the “thirty-three copies in Bohemian of the entire Bible, and
twenty-two of the New Testament,”[232] which are still extant, translated
during that period, not one was rendered from the original languages.
Blakoslav, the first translator of the Bible from Greek (in 1563) is
said to have been a man of “profound erudition.” The same is said of
George Strye a few years later; and the Jesuits Konstanj, Steyer, and
Drachovsky, are also entitled to notice.

John Amos Komnensky, also, better known by his Latinized name, Comenius,
a native of Komna in Moravia, (1592-1671) deserved well of linguistic
science, not only by his own acquirements, but by his well-known work,
the _Janua Linguarum Reserata_, which has had the rare fortune of being
translated not only into twelve European languages, but into those of
several Oriental nations besides. The _Janua Linguarum_, however, though
it attracted much attention at the time, has long been forgotten.

It would be still more unpardonable to overlook the celebrated
philologer, Father Joseph Dobrowsky, who, although born in Raab, in
Hungary, was of a Bohemian family, and devoted himself especially to
the literature and language of his nation. He had just entered the
Jesuit society at Brunn at the moment of the suppression of the order.
Repairing to Prague, he applied himself for a time to the study of the
Oriental languages, but eventually concentrated all his energies on the
history and language of Bohemia. His works upon Bohemian history and
antiquities fill many volumes; and his Slavonic Grammar may be regarded
as a classical work, not only in reference to his native language, but
to the whole Slavonian family. Father Dobrowsky survived till the year
1829, engaged until the very time of his death in active projects for the
cultivation of the language and literature of the country of his adoption.

But probably the most remarkable name among Bohemian linguists is
that of Father Dobrowsky’s friend, the poet Wenceslaus Hanka, born at
Horeneyes in 1791. Hanka’s love of languages was first stirred while he
was tending sheep near his native village, by the opportunity which he
had of learning Polish and Servian from some soldiers of these races
being quartered upon his father’s farm. When he grew somewhat older, his
parents, in order to save him from the chances of military conscription,
(from which, in Bohemia, scholars are exempted) sent him to school;
and he afterwards entered the University of Prague, and subsequently
that of Vienna. On the foundation of the Bohemian Museum at Prague,
he was appointed its librarian, through the recommendation of Father
Dobrowsky; and from that time he devoted himself almost entirely to the
antiquities, literature, and language of his native country. Besides
his own original compositions, Hanka’s name has obtained considerable
celebrity in connexion with the controversy about the genuineness of the
early Bohemian poems known under the title of “Kralodvor,”—a controversy
which, although it has ended differently, was for a time hardly less
animated than those regarding the Ossian and Rowley MSS. in England.
Notwithstanding the variety of Hanka’s pursuits, and his especial
devotion to his own language, his acquisitions in languages have been
most various and extensive. He is described in the “Oesterreichische
National Encyclopædie” as “master of eighteen languages.”[233]

       *       *       *       *       *

With the Slavonic race our Catalogue of Linguists closes. Many
particulars regarding the eminent names which it comprises are, of
necessity, left vague and undetermined. I should have especially
desired to distinguish, in all cases, between mere book knowledge of
languages and the power of writing, or still more of speaking, them. But
unfortunately the accounts which are preserved regarding these scholars
hardly ever enter into this distinction. Even Sir William Jones, though
he carefully classified the languages which he knew, did not specify
this particular; and in most other instances, the narrative, far from
particularizing, like that of Jones, the extent of the individual’s
acquaintance with each language, even leaves in uncertainty the number of
languages with which he was acquainted in any degree.

The very distribution, too, which I have found it expedient to
follow—according to nations—has had many disadvantages. But it seemed
to be upon the whole the most convenient that could be devised. A
distribution into periods, besides that it would have been difficult to
follow out upon any clear and intelligible principle, would have been
attended with the same disadvantages which characterize that according
to nations; while the more strictly philosophical distribution according
to ethnographical or philological schools, would have in great measure
failed to illustrate the object which I have chiefly had in view.
Several of the most eminent of the modern ethnographical writers, and
particularly Pritchard, disavow all claim to the character of linguists;
and the qualifications of many even of those whose pretensions seem the
highest, have, when submitted to a rigid examination, proved far more
than problematical.

       *       *       *       *       *

There are many curious details, however, into which, if space permitted,
it would be interesting to pursue this inquiry.

It might seem natural, for instance, to investigate the nature and
extent of the Miraculous Gift of Languages—the γένη γλωσσῶν of St.
Paul—whether that possessed by the Apostles and other early teachers of
Christianity, or that ascribed in later times to the missionaries among
the Heathen, and especially to the great Apostle of India, St. Francis
Xavier. Materials are not wanting for such an investigation;[234] but as
it can hardly be said to bear upon the subject of this Biography, I have
reluctantly passed it by.

The history of Royal Linguists, too, might afford much amusing material
for speculation. Mithridates, King of Pontus, as we have seen, spoke
twenty-two languages. Cleopatra was mistress, not only of seven
languages enumerated by Plutarch, but, if we may believe his testimony,
of most other known languages of the time. The accomplished, but
ill-fated, Queen of Palmyra, Zenobia, was familiar with Greek, Latin,
Syriac, and Egyptian; and it may be presumed from the notion which
prevailed among some Christian writers of her being a Jewess, that she
was also acquainted with Hebrew or its kindred tongues.[235] Most of the
Roman Emperors were able indifferently to speak Greek or Latin.

The mediæval sovereigns, with the exception of Frederic II., referred
to in a former page,[236] and the great and learned Pope Sylvester II.,
better known by his family name Gerbert,[237] share, as linguists, the
common mediocrity of the age. The learned Princess Anna Comnena does not
appear at all distinguished in this particular; Charlemagne’s reputation
rests on his acquaintance with Latin, and perhaps also Greek; and our own
Alfred was regarded as a notable example of success, although there is no
evidence that his linguistic attainments extended beyond a knowledge of
Latin.

Very early, however, after the revival of letters, Matthias Corvinus, the
learned and munificent King of Hungary, attained a rank as a linguist
not unworthy of a later day. Besides the learned languages, he was also
acquainted with most of the living tongues of Europe. Charles V. knew and
spoke five languages.[238] Henry VIII. spoke four. Several of the Roman
Pontiffs, particularly Paul IV., in other respects also a most remarkable
scholar,[239] and the great Benedict XIV., were learned Orientalists,
as well as good general linguists. The house of Stuart was eminent for
the gift of tongues. The ill-fated Mary of Scotland spoke most of the
European languages. James I., her son, with all his silly pedantry, was
by no means a contemptible linguist. His grandson, Charles II., spoke
French and Spanish fluently; and his brilliant grand-daughter, Elizabeth
of Bavaria, who alone, according to Descartes, of all her contemporaries,
was able to understand the Cartesian philosophy, was mistress, besides
many scientific and literary accomplishments, of no fewer than six
languages.[240] Christina of Sweden surpassed her in one particular.
She knew as many as eight languages, the major part of which she spoke
fluently.

Nor are the courts of our own day without examples of the same
acquirement. The late Emperor of Russia spoke five languages. Several of
the reigning sovereigns of Europe, Queen Victoria, Alexander of Russia,
and Napoleon III. among the number, enjoy the reputation of excellent
linguists. The young Emperor of Austria is an accomplished classical
scholar, and a perfect master of French, and of all the languages of
his own vast empire—German, Italian, Hungarian, Czechish, and Servian!
Prince Lewis Lucian Bonaparte is a distinguished philologer, as well as a
skilful linguist. His “Polyglot Parable of the Sower” is an interesting
contribution to the former science. Even the remote kingdom of Siam
furnishes, in its two Royal brothers, the First and the Second King,
an example more deserving of praise than would be a far higher success
in a more favoured land. The First King, Somdetch Phra Paramendt Maha
Mongkut,[241] has evinced a degree of intellectual activity, rare
indeed among the potentates of the East. Besides the ancient language
and literature of his own kingdom, and all its modern dialects and
sub-divisions, he knows Sanscrit, Cingalese, and Peguan. From the
Catholic missionaries, especially Bishop Pallegoix, he has learned Latin
and also Greek, and from the American Baptists, English. His letters,
though sometimes unidiomatical, are highly characteristic, and display
much intelligence and ability. He is also well versed in European
sciences, especially astronomy and mechanics. He has formed, moreover, a
very considerable collection of astronomical and philosophical apparatus;
has established printing and lithographic presses in the palace; and has
imported steam machinery of various kinds from America. It is gratifying
to add that his brother, the Second King, shares all his tastes, and is
treading worthily in his footsteps.

       *       *       *       *       *

A still more attractive topic would be the long line of Lady-Linguists.

It is not a little remarkable that, among the sovereigns who have
distinguished themselves as linguists, the proportion of queens is very
considerable. The three names, Cleopatra, Zenobia, and Christina of
Sweden, unquestionably represent a larger aggregate of languages than any
three of the king-linguists, if we exclude Mithridates.

Nor are the humbler lady-linguists unworthy this companionship. The nun
Roswitha, of Gandesheim, still favourably known by her sacred Latin
poetry, was also acquainted with Greek—a rare accomplishment in the tenth
century. Tarquinia Molza, grand-daughter of the gifted, but licentious
poet of the same name, knew Latin, Greek, and Hebrew, as well as the
ordinary modern languages. Elena Cornaro Piscopia knew Italian, Spanish,
French, Latin, Greek, Hebrew, and even Arabic.[242] Nay, strange as it
may seem in modern eyes, the university of Bologna numbers several ladies
among the occupants of its pulpits. The beautiful Novella d’Andrea,
daughter of the great jurist, Giovanni d’Andrea, professor of law in the
University of Bologna in the 15th century, was wont to take her father’s
place as lecturer on law; observing, however, the precaution of using
a veil, lest her beauty should distract the attention of her pupils.
Her mother Milancia, scarcely less learned, was habitually consulted by
Giovanni on all questions of special difficulty which arose.[243] Laura
Bassi held the chair of philosophy in more modern times.[244] Clotilda
Tambroni, the last and not the least distinguished of the lady professors
of Bologna, has, besides her literary glories, the honour of having
suffered in the cause of loyalty and religion. Like her friend and fellow
professor, Mezzofanti, she refused, on the occupation of Bologna by the
French, to take the oaths of the new government, and was deprived of the
professorship of Greek in consequence.

The learned ladies of Bologna are not alone among their countrywomen.
The celebrated Dominican nun, Cassandra Fedele of Venice; Alessandra
Scala of Florence; and Olympia Fulvia Morata of Ferrara, are all equally
distinguished as proficients in at least two learned languages, Latin and
Greek. Margherita Gaetana Agnesi, of Milan, was familiar with Latin at
nine years of age; and, while still extremely young, mastered Greek and
Hebrew, together with French, Spanish, and German. In the very meridian
of her fame, nevertheless, she renounced the brilliant career which lay
open to her, in order to devote herself to God as a Sister of Charity.
Another fair Italian, Modesta Pozzo, born at Venice in 1555, deserves to
be mentioned, although she is better known for her extraordinary powers
of memory, than her skill in languages.[245] She was able to repeat the
longest sermon after hearing it but once.

Nor are we without examples, although perhaps not so numerous, in other
countries. Many Spanish and Portuguese ladies learned in languages, are
enumerated by Nicholas de Antonio.[246] Dona Anna de Villegas, and D.
Cecilia di Arellano, besides being excellent Latinists, were mistresses
of French, Italian, and Portuguese.[247] To these languages D. Cecilia
de Morellas added Greek as one of her accomplishments,[248] and D.
Juliana de Morell, a nun of the Dominican order in the middle of the
seventeenth century, in addition to these languages, was not only a
learned Hebraist, but an acute and skilful disputant in the philosophy of
the schools.[249]

The accomplished Anna Maria Schurmann, of whom Cologne is still justly
proud, in addition to her numerous gifts in painting, sculpture, music,
and poetry, was mistress of eight languages, among which were Latin,
Greek, Hebrew, and Ethiopic.

The brilliant, but eccentric Russian Princess Dashkoff, holds a still
more prominent place in the world of letters. The early friend and
confidant of the Empress Catherine, and (with a few alternations
of disfavour,) the sharer of most of the literary projects of that
extraordinary woman, the Princess Dashkoff had the (for a lady rare)
honour of holding the place of President of the Russian Academy. When
the Dictionary of the Academy was projected, she actually undertook, in
her own person, three letters of the work, together with the general
superintendence of the entire! The princess was not unfamiliar with the
learned languages, some of which she not only spoke but wrote: but her
chief attainments were in those of modern Europe. Her autobiographical
Memoirs appear to have been written in French; and the English letters
embodied in the work prove her to have possessed a thorough knowledge of
that language also.

Some of our own countrywomen, if less showy, may perhaps advance a more
solid title to distinction. The beautiful Mrs. Carter, translator of
Epictetus, well deserves to be mentioned; and the amiable and singularly
gifted Elizabeth Smith, is a not unmeet consort for the most eminent
linguists of any age. “With scarcely any assistance,” writes her
biographer, Mrs. Bowdler, to Dr. Mummsen,[250] “she taught herself the
French, Italian, Greek, Latin, Spanish, German, and Hebrew languages. She
had no inconsiderable knowledge of Arabic and Persian.” Her translation
of the Book of Job is a permanent evidence that her knowledge of Hebrew
was of no ordinary kind.

Even the New World has supplied some names to this interesting catalogue.
The Mexican poetess, Juana Inez de la Cruz, better known as the “Nun of
Mexico,” (1651-95), a marvel of precocious knowledge, learned Latin in
twenty lessons, when a mere girl; and quickly became such a proficient
as to speak it with ease and fluency. Her acquisitions in general
learning were most various and extensive; and when on one occasion, in
her seventeenth year, forty learned men of Mexico were invited to dispute
with her, she proved a match for each in his own particular department.
All these accomplishments, notwithstanding, she had the humility to bury
in the obscurity of a convent in Mexico, where she silently devoted
herself for twenty-seven years to literature and religion. She died
in 1695, leaving behind many works still regarded as classics in the
language, which fill no less than three 4to. volumes, and have passed
through twelve successive editions in Spain. All, with the exception of
two, are on sacred subjects.[251]

“Infant Phenomena” of language would supply another curious and fertile
topic for inquiry—an inquiry too in a psychological point of view
eminently interesting.

Many of the great linguists enumerated in this Memoir, Pico of Mirandola,
Crichton, Martin del Rio, and several others, owed part of their
celebrity to the marvellous precociousness of their gifts. A far larger
proportion, however, of those who prematurely displayed this talent, were
cut off before it had attained any mature or healthy development.

Cancellieri[252] mentions a child named Jacopo Martino,[253] born at
Racuno, in the Venetian territory, in 1639, who not only acquired a
knowledge of Greek and Hebrew, between the age of three and seven, but
made such progress in philosophical science as successfully to maintain
a public thesis in philosophy at Rome, when no more than eight years of
age.[254] This extraordinary child, however, died of exhaustion in 1649,
before he had completed his ninth year.

It was the same for Claudio del Valle y Hernandez, a Spanish prodigy,
mentioned by the same author.

But probably the most extraordinary examples of this psychological
phenomenon upon record, occur, by a curious coincidence, almost at the
very same date in the commencement of the eighteenth century. Within
the three years, from 1719 to 1721, were born in different countries,
three children of a precociousness (even though we accept the traditions
regarding them with great deductions,) entirely without parallel in
history.

The first of these, John Lewis Candiac, was born at Nismes, in 1719.
This strangely gifted child, we are told, was able, in his third
year, to speak not only his native French but also Latin. Before he
was six years old he spoke also Greek and Hebrew. He was well versed,
besides, in arithmetic, geography, ancient and modern history, and even
heraldry.[255] But, as might be expected, these premature efforts quickly
exhausted his overtaxed powers, and he died of water on the brain in
1726, at seven years of age.

Christian Henry Heinecken, a child of equal promise, was cut off even
more prematurely. He was born at Lubeck in 1721. He is said to have been
able to speak at ten months old. By the time he attained his twelfth
month, he had learned, if his biographers can be credited, all the facts
in the history of the Pentateuch.[256] In another month he added to this
all the rest of the history of the old Testament; and, when he was but
fourteen months old, he was master of all the leading facts of the Bible!
At two and a half years of age, he spoke fluently, besides his native
German, the French and Latin languages. In this year he was presented at
the Danish court, where he excited universal astonishment. But, on his
return home, he fell sick and died in his fourth year.

The third of these marvels of precocity, John Philip Baratier, who is
probably known to many readers by Johnson’s interesting memoir,[257]
was born at Anspach in the same year with Heinecken, 1721. His career,
however, was not so brief, nor were its fruits so ephemeral, as those
of the ill-fated children just named. When Baratier was only four years
old, he was able to speak Latin, French, and German. At six he spoke
Greek; and at nine Hebrew; in which latter language the soundness of his
attainments is attested by a lexicon which he published in his eleventh
year. Nor was Baratier a mere linguist. He is said to have mastered
elementary mathematics in three months, and to have qualified himself by
thirteen month’s study for the ordinary thesis maintained at taking out
the degree of Doctor of Laws. He was also well versed in architecture,
in ancient and modern literature, in antiquities, and even the uncommon
science of numismatics. He translated from the Hebrew Benjamin of
Tudela’s “Itinerary.” He published a detailed and critical account of the
Rabbinical Bible; and communicated to several societies elaborate papers
on astronomical and mathematical subjects. This extraordinary youth died
at the age of nineteen in 1760.

Later[258] in the same century was born at Rome a child named
Giovanni Cristoforo Amaduzzi,[259] if not quite so precocious as this
extraordinary trio, at least of riper intellect, and destined to survive
for greater distinction and for a more useful career. The precise dates
of his various attainments do not appear to be chronicled; but, when he
was only twelve years old, he published a poetical translation of the
Hecuba of Euripides, which excited universal surprise; and a few years
later, on the visit of the Emperor Joseph II. and his brother Leopold to
Rome, he addressed to the Emperor a polyglot ode of welcome in Greek,
Latin, Italian, and French. His after studies, however, were more serious
and more practical. He is well-known, not only as a linguist, but also
as a philologer of some merit; and in his capacity of corrector of the
Propaganda Oriental Press, a post which he filled till his death, in
1792, he rendered many important services to Oriental studies.[260]

       *       *       *       *       *

It would be interesting too, and not without its advantage in reference
to the history of the human mind, to collect examples of what may be
called Uneducated Linguists; of Dragomans, Couriers, “Lohnbedienter,”
and others[261], who, ignorant of all else besides, have acquired a
facility almost marvellous of speaking several languages fluently, and in
many cases with sufficient, seeming accuracy.

Perhaps this is the place to mention the once notorious (to use his own
favourite designation) “Odcombian Leg-stretcher,” Tom Coryat, a native
of Odcombe in Somersetshire (1577-1617), and author of the now rare
volume, “Coryat’s Crudities.”[262] Coryat may fairly be described as
“an uneducated linguist;” for, although he passed through Westminster
School, and afterwards entered Gloucester Hall, Oxford, the languages
which he learned were all picked up, without regular study, during his
long pedestrian wanderings in every part of the world; one of which, of
nearly two thousand miles, he accomplished in a single pair of shoes,
(which he hung up in the church of Odcombe as a votive offering on his
return), and another, of no less than two thousand seven hundred, at a
cost of about three pounds sterling! This strange genius acquired, in a
sufficient degree for all the wants of conversation, Italian, Turkish,
Arabic, Persian, and Hindustani!

Another singularity of the same kind was Robert Hill, the Jewish tailor,
whom Spence has made the subject of an exceedingly curious parallel with
Magliabecchi.[263] And many similar examples might doubtless be collected
among the couriers, interpreters, and valets-de-place of most of the
European capitals. Baron von Zach mentions an ordinary valet-de-place who
could speak nearly all the European languages with the greatest ease and
correctness, although he was utterly ignorant not only of the grammar of
every one of them, but even of that of his own language. I have already
said that the same species of talent is hereditary in several families in
different ports and cities of the Levant.

The history of such cases as these, if it were possible to investigate
it accurately, might throw light on the operations of the mind in the
acquisition of languages. These, however, and many similar topics,
interesting and curious as they are for their own sake, have but little
bearing on the present inquiry; the purpose of which is simply to prepare
the way for a fitting estimate of the attainments of the illustrious
subject of the following Biography, by placing in contrast with them the
gifts of others who, at various times, have risen to eminence in the same
department. Cardinal Mezzofanti will be found to stand so immeasurably
above even the highest of these names, in the department of language,
that, at least for the purposes of comparison with him, its minor
celebrities can possess little claim for consideration.




THE LIFE OF CARDINAL MEZZOFANTI.




CHAPTER I.

[1774-1798.]


A Memoir of Cardinal Mezzofanti can be little more than a philological
essay. Quiet and uneventful as was his career, its history possesses few
of the ordinary attractions of Biography. The main interest of such a
narrative must consist in the light which it may tend to throw on the
curious problem;—what degree of perfection the human mind, concentrating
its powers upon one department of knowledge, is capable of attaining
therein; and the highest hope of the author is to escape the reproach
which Warburton directed against Boileau’s biographer, Desmaiseaux, of
having “written a book without a life.”

       *       *       *       *       *

Joseph Caspar Mezzofanti,[264] was born at Bologna,[265] on the 17th
of September, 1774.[266] His father, Francis Mezzofanti, a native
of the same city, was of very humble extraction, and by trade a
carpenter. Though almost entirely uneducated,[267] Francis Mezzofanti
is described by the few who remember him, as a man of much shrewdness
and intelligence, a skilful mechanic, and universally respected for his
integrity, piety, and honourable principles. For Mezzofanti’s mother,
Gesualda Dall’ Olmo, a higher lineage has been claimed;—the name of Dall’
Olmo[268] being extremely ancient and not undistinguished in the annals
of Bologna; but the fortunes of the immediate branch of that family from
which Gesualda Dall’ Olmo sprung, were no less humble than those of her
husband. Her education, however, was somewhat superior; and with much
simplicity and sweetness of disposition, she united excellent talents,
great prudence and good sense, and a profoundly religious mind.

Of this marriage were born several children; but they all died at an
early age, except a daughter named Teresa, and Joseph Caspar, the
subject of the present biography. Teresa was the senior by ten years,
and, while her brother was yet a boy, married a young man named Joseph
Lewis Minarelli,[269] by trade a hair dresser, to whom she bore a very
numerous family,[270] several of whom still survive. To the kind courtesy
of one of these, the Cavaliere Pietro Minarelli, I am indebted for a
few particulars of the family history, and of the early years of his
venerated uncle.[271]

It may be supposed that in the case of Mezzofanti, as in those of most
men who attain to eminence in life, there are not wanting marvellous
tales of his youthful studies, and anecdotes of the first indications of
the extraordinary gift by which his later years were distinguished.

According to one of these accounts, his first years were entirely
neglected, and he was placed, while yet a mere child, in the workshop of
his father, to learn the trade of a carpenter. As is usual in the towns
of Italy, the elder Mezzofanti, for the most part, plied his craft not
within doors, but in the open street: and it chanced that the bench at
which the boy was wont to work was situated directly opposite the window
of a school kept by an old priest, who instructed a number of pupils in
Latin and Greek. Although utterly unacquainted, not only with the Greek
alphabet, but even with that of his own language, young Mezzofanti,
overhearing the lessons which were taught in the school, caught up every
Greek and Latin word that was explained in the several classes, without
once having seen a Greek or Latin book! By some lucky accident the fact
came to the knowledge of his unwitting instructor: it led of course to
the withdrawal of the youth from the mechanical craft to which his father
had destined him, and rescued him for the more congenial pursuit of
literature.[272]

A still more marvellous tale is told by a popular American writer, Mr.
Headley, whom his transatlantic admirers have styled the “Addison of
America;” that while Mezzofanti “was still an obscure priest in the north
of Italy, he was called one day to confess two foreigners condemned for
piracy, who were to be executed next day. On entering their cell, he
found them unable to understand a word he uttered. Overwhelmed with the
thought that the criminals should leave the world without the benefits
of religion, he returned to his room, resolved to acquire the language
before morning. He accomplished his task, and next day confessed them in
their own tongue! From that time on, he had no trouble in mastering the
most difficult language. The purity of his motive in the first instance,
he thought, influenced the Deity to assist him miraculously.”[273] This
strange tale Mr. Headley relates, on the authority of a priest, a friend
of Mezzofanti; and he goes so far as to say, that “Mezzofanti himself
attributed his power of acquiring languages to the divine influence.”[274]

The imagination might dwell with pleasure upon these and similar tales
of wonder; but, happily for the moral lesson which it is the best
privilege of biography to convey, the true history of the early studies
of Mezzofanti, (although while falling far short of these marvels, it is
too wonderful to be held out as a model even for the most aspiring) is,
nevertheless, such as to show that the most gifted themselves can only
hope to attain to true eminence by patient and systematic industry.

Far from being entirely neglected, as these tales would imply,
Mezzofanti’s education commenced at an unusually early period. His
parents—

    A virtuous household, but exceeding poor,

conscious of their own want of learning, appear, from the very first, to
have bestowed upon the education of their son all the care which their
narrow circumstances permitted. According to an account obtained from
the Cavaliere Minarelli, he was sent, while a mere child, not yet three
years old, to a dame’s school, more, it would seem, for security, than
for actual instruction. Being deemed too young to be regularly taught,
he was here left for a time to sit in quiet and amuse himself as best
he could, while the other children were receiving instruction; but the
mistress soon discovered that the child, although excluded from the
lessons of his elders, had learned without any effort, all that had been
communicated to them, and was able to repeat promptly and accurately
the tasks which she had dictated. He was accordingly admitted to the
regular classes; and, child as he was, passed rapidly through the various
elementary branches of instruction, to which alone her humble school
extended.

From this dame’s school he was removed to the more advanced, but still
elementary, school of the Abate Filippo Cicotti, in which he learned
grammar, geography, writing, arithmetic, algebra, and the elements
of Latin. But, after some time, the excellent priest who conducted
this school, honestly advised the parents, young as was their boy, to
remove him to another institution, and to permit him to apply himself
unrestrainedly to the higher studies for which he was already fully
qualified.

His father appears to have demurred for a while to this suggestion.
Limiting his views in reference to the boy to the lowly sphere in which
he himself had been born, he had only contemplated bestowing upon him a
solid elementary education in the branches of knowledge suited to its
humble requirements; and, with the old-fashioned prejudices not uncommon
in his rank, he was unwilling to sanction his son’s entering upon what
appeared to him an unnatural and unprofitable career, for one who was
destined to earn his bread by a mechanical art. Fortunately, however, his
wife entertained higher and more enlightened views for their child, and
understood better his character and capabilities.

It was mainly, however, through the counsel and influence of a benevolent
priest of the Oratory, Father John Baptist Respighi, that the career
of the young Mezzofanti was decided. This excellent clergyman, to whom
many deserving youths of his native city were indebted for assistance
and patronage in their entrance into life, observed the rare talents of
Mezzofanti, and, by his earnest advice, promptly overruled the hesitation
of his father. At his recommendation, the boy was transferred from the
school of the Abate Cicotti, to one of the so-called “Scuole Pie,” of
Bologna;—schools conducted by a religious congregation, which had been
founded in the beginning of the seventeenth century, by Joseph Cazalana;
and which, though originally intended chiefly for the more elementary
branches of education, had also been directed with great success,
(especially in the larger cities,) to the cultivation of the higher
studies.

Among the clergymen who at this period devoted themselves to the service
of the Scuole Pie, at Bologna, were several members of the recently
suppressed society of the Jesuits, not only of the Roman, but also of
the Spanish and Spanish American provinces. The expulsion of the society
from Spain had preceded by more than three years the general suppression
of the order; and the Spanish members of the brotherhood, when exiled
from their native country, had found a cordial welcome in the Papal
states. Among these were several who were either foreigners by birth, or
had long resided in the foreign missions of the society. To them all the
Scuole Pie seemed to open a field of labour almost identical with that
of their own institute. Many of them gladly embraced the opportunity;
and it can hardly be doubted that the facility of learning a variety
of languages, which this accidental union of instructors from so many
different countries afforded, was, after his own natural bias, among
the chief circumstances which determined the direction of the youthful
studies of Mezzofanti.

One of these ex-Jesuits, Father Emanuel Aponte, a native of Spain, had
been for many years a member of the mission of the Philippine Islands.
Another, Father Mark Escobar, was a native of Guatemala, and had been
employed in several of the Mexican and South American missions of the
society. A third, Father Laurence Ignatius Thiulen, had passed through a
still more remarkable career. He was a native of Gottenburg, in Sweden,
where his father held the office of superintendent of the Swedish East
India Company, and had been born (1746,) a Lutheran. Leaving home in
early youth with the design of improving himself by foreign travel, he
spent some time in Lisbon, and afterwards in Cadiz, in 1768; whence,
with the intention of proceeding to Italy, he embarked for the island of
Corsica, in the same ship in which he had reached Lisbon from his native
country. In the meantime, however, this ship had been chartered by the
government as one of the fleet in which the Jesuit Fathers, on their
sudden and mysterious suppression in Spain, were to be transported to
Italy. By this unexpected accident, Thiulen became the fellow passenger
of several of the exiled fathers. Trained from early youth to regard
with suspicion and fear every member of that dreaded order, he at first
avoided all intercourse with his Jesuit fellow passengers. By degrees,
however, their unobtrusive, but ready courtesy, disarmed his suspicions.
He became interested in their conversation, even when it occasionally
turned upon religious topics. Serious inquiry succeeded; and in the end,
before the voyage was concluded, his prejudices had been so far overcome,
that he began to entertain the design of becoming a Catholic. After his
landing in the Island of Corsica, many obstacles were thrown in his
way by the Swedish consul at Bastia, himself a Lutheran; but Thiulen
persevered, and was enabled eventually to carry his design into execution
at Ferrara, in 1769. In the following year, 1770, he entered the Jesuit
society at Bologna. He was here admitted to the simple vow in 1772. But
he had hardly completed this important step, when the final suppression
of the Order was proclaimed; and, although both as a foreigner, and as
being unprofessed, he had no claim to the slender pittance which was
assigned for the support of the members, the peculiar circumstances of
his case created an interest in his behalf. He was placed upon the same
footing with the professed Fathers; and two years later, in 1776, he was
promoted to the holy order of priesthood, and continued to reside in
Bologna, engaged in teaching and in the duties of the ministry.[275]

These good Fathers, with that traditionary instinct which in their order
has been the secret of their long admitted success in the education of
youth, were not slow to discover the rare talents of their young scholar
in the Scuole Pie. In a short time he appears to have become to them more
a friend than a pupil. Two, at least, of the members, Fathers Aponte, and
Thiulen, lived to witness the distinction of his later life, and with
them, as well as with his first and kindest patron, Father Respighi,
he ever continued to maintain the most friendly and affectionate
relations.[276]

It would be interesting to be able to trace the exact history of this
period of the studies of Mezzofanti, and to fix the dates and the
order of his successive acquisitions in what afterwards became the
engrossing pursuit of his life. But, unfortunately, so few details
can now be ascertained that it is difficult to distinguish his school
life from that of an ordinary student. His chief teachers in the Scuole
Pie appear to have been the ex-Jesuit Fathers already named; of whom
Father Thiulen was his instructor in history, geography, arithmetic, and
mathematics;[277] Father Aponte in Greek; and probably Father Escobar
in Latin. As he certainly learned Spanish at an early period, it is not
unlikely that he was indebted for it, too, to the instructions of one of
these ecclesiastics, as also perhaps for some knowledge of the Mexican or
Central American languages.

But although barren in details, all the accounts of his school-days
concur in describing his uniform success in all his classes, and the
extraordinary quickness of his memory. One of his feats of memory is
recorded by M. Manavit.[278] A folio volume of the works of St. John
Chrysostom being put into his hand, he was desired to read a page of
the treatise “_De Sacerdotio_” in the original Greek. After a single
reading, the volume was closed, and he repeated the entire page, without
mistaking or displacing a single word! His manners and dispositions as
a boy were exceedingly engaging; and the friendships which he formed at
school continued uninterrupted during life. Among his school companions
there is one who deserves to be especially recorded—the well-known
naturalist, Abate Camillo Ranzani, for many years afterwards Mezzofanti’s
fellow-professor in the university. Ranzani, like his friend, was of
very humble origin, and like him owed his withdrawal from obscurity to
the enlightened benevolence of the good Oratorian, F. Respighi.[279]
Young Ranzani was about the same age with Mezzofanti; and as their homes
immediately adjoined each other,[280] they had been daily companions
almost from infancy, and particularly from the time when they began to
frequent the Scuole Pie in company. The constant allusions to Ranzani
which occur in Mezzofanti’s letters, will show how close and affectionate
their intimacy continued to be.

Joseph Mezzofanti early manifested a desire to embrace the ecclesiastical
profession; and although this wish seems to have caused some
dissatisfaction to his father, who had intended him for some secular
pursuit,[281] yet the deeply religious disposition of the child and his
singular innocence of life, in the end overcame his father’s reluctance.
Having completed his elementary studies unusually early, he was enabled
to become a scholar of the archiepiscopal seminary of Bologna, while
still a mere boy, probably in the year 1786.[282] He continued, however,
to reside in his father’s house, while he attended the schools of the
seminary.

Of his collegiate career little is recorded, except an incident which
occurred at the taking of his degree in philosophy. His master in
this study was Joseph Voglio, a professor of considerable reputation,
and author of several works on the philosophical controversies of the
period.[283] It is usual in the Italian universities for the candidate
for a philosophical degree, to defend publicly a series of propositions
selected from the whole body of philosophy. Mezzofanti, at the time that
he maintained his theses, was still little more than a child; and it
would seem that, his self-possession having given way under the public
ordeal, he had a narrow escape from the mortification of a complete
failure. One of the witnesses of his “Disputation,” Dr. Santagata,
in the Discourse already referred to, delivered at the Institute of
Bologna, gives an interesting account of the occurrence. “For a time,”
says Dr. Santagata, “the boy’s success was most marked. Each new
objection, among the many subtle ones that were proposed, only afforded
him a fresh opportunity of exhibiting the acuteness of his intellect,
and the ease, fluency, and elegance of his Latinity; and the admiring
murmurs of assent, and other unequivocal tokens of applause which it
elicited from the audience, of which I myself was one, seemed to promise
a triumphant conclusion of the exercise. But all at once the young
candidate was observed to grow pale, to become suddenly silent, and at
length to fall back upon his seat and almost faint away. The auditors
were deeply grieved at this untoward interruption of a performance
hitherto so successful; but they were soon relieved to see him, as if by
one powerful effort, shake off his emotion, recover his self-possession,
and resume his answering with even greater acuteness and solidity than
before. He was greeted with the loud and repeated plaudits of the crowded
assembly.”[284]

About this period, soon after Mezzofanti had completed his fifteenth
year, his health gave way under this long and intense application;
and his constitution for a time was so debilitated, that, at the
termination of his course of philosophy, he was compelled to interrupt
his studies;[285] nor was it until about 1793, that he entered upon the
theological course, under the direction of the Canon Joachim Ambrosi.
One of his class-fellows, the Abate Monti, the venerable arch-priest of
Bagni di Poreta, in the archdiocese of Bologna, still survives and speaks
in high terms of the ability which he exhibited. He describes him as a
youth of most engaging manners and amiable dispositions—one who, from
his habitually serious and recollected air, might perhaps be noted by
strangers

    For his grave looks, too thoughtful for his years,

but who, to his friends, was all gaiety and innocent mirthfulness. Mgr.
Monti adds that he was at this time a most laborious student, frequently
remaining up whole nights in the library for the purpose of study. His
master in moral theology was the Canonico Baccialli, author of a _Corpus
Theologiæ Moralis_, of some local reputation.

Having completed the course of theology, and also that of canon law,
he attended the lectures of the celebrated Jurist, Bonini, on Roman
Law. The great body of the students of the school of Roman Law being
laymen, the young ecclesiastic remained a considerable time unobserved
and undistinguished in the class; until, having accidentally attracted
the notice of the professor on one occasion, he replied with such
promptness and learning to a question which he addressed to him, as
at once to establish a reputation; and Dr. Santagata, who records the
circumstance,[286] observes that his proficiency in each of his many
different studies was almost as great as though he had devoted his
undivided attention to that particular pursuit.

Meanwhile, however, he continued without interruption, what, even thus
early in his career, was his chosen study of languages. Under the
direction of Father Aponte, now rather his friend and associate than
instructor in the study, he pursued his Greek reading; and as this had
been from the first one of his favourite languages, there were few Greek
authors within his reach that he did not eagerly read. Fortunately, too,
Aponte was himself an enthusiast in the study of Greek, and possessed a
solid and critical knowledge of the language, of which he had written
an excellent and practical grammar for the schools of the university,
frequently republished since his time;[287] and it was probably to the
habit of close and critical examination which he acquired under Aponte’s
instruction, that Mezzofanti owed the exact knowledge of the niceties of
the language, and the power of discriminating between all the varieties
of Greek style, for which, as we shall see later, he was eminently
distinguished.

One of his fellow pupils in Greek under Aponte was the celebrated
Clotilda Tambroni, whom I have already mentioned in the list of
lady-linguists, and whose name is the last in the catalogue of
lady-professors at Bologna. A community of tastes as well as of studies
formed a close bond of intimacy between her and Mezzofanti, and led to an
affectionate and lasting friendship in after life. To Aponte she was as
a daughter.[288]

His master in Hebrew was the Dominican Father Ceruti, a learned
Orientalist and professor of that language in the university. About the
same time also, he must have become acquainted with Arabic, a language
for the study of which Bologna had early acquired a reputation. And, what
is a still more unequivocal exhibition of his early enthusiasm, although
Coptic formed no part of the circle of university studies, Görres
states that he learned this language also under the Canon John Lewis
Mingarelli.[289] If this account be true, as Mingarelli died in March
1793, Mezzofanti must have acquired Coptic before he had completed his
nineteenth year.

Nor did he meanwhile neglect the modern languages. About the year 1792, a
French ecclesiastic a native of Blois, one of those whom the successive
decrees of the Constituent Assembly had driven into exile, came to
reside in Bologna. From him Mezzofanti speedily acquired French.[290] He
received his first lessons in German from F. Thiulen,[291] who had been
one of his masters in the Scuole Pie; and who, although a Swede by birth,
was acquainted with the cognate language of Germany. From him, too,
most probably, Mezzofanti would also have learned his native Swedish,
but, on the occupation of northern Italy by the French, F. Thiulen, who
had made himself obnoxious to the revolutionary party in Bologna, by
his writings in favour of the Papal authority, had been arrested and
sent into exile.[292] Perhaps Thiulen’s absence from Bologna was the
occasion of calling into exercise that marvellous quickness in mastering
the structure of a new language, which often, during Mezzofanti’s later
career, excited the amazement even of his most familiar friends. At
all events, the first occasion of his exhibiting this singular faculty
of which I have been able to discover any authentic record, is the
following:—

A Bolognese musician, named Uttini, had settled at Stockholm, where
he married a Swedish lady. Uttini, it would seem, died early; but his
brother, Caspar Uttini, a physician of Bologna, undertook the education
of his son, who was sent to Bologna for the purpose. The boy, at his
arrival, was not only entirely ignorant of Italian, but could not speak
a word of any language except his native Swedish. In this emergency
Mezzofanti, who, although still a student, had already acquired the
reputation of a linguist, was sent for, to act as interpreter between the
boy and his newly found relatives: but it turned out that the language
of the boy was, as yet, no less a mystery to Mezzofanti than it had
already proved to themselves. This discovery, so embarrassing to the
family, served but to stimulate the zeal of Mezzofanti. Having made a
few ineffectual attempts to establish an understanding, he asked to see
the books which the boy had brought with him from his native country. A
short examination of these books was sufficient for his rapid mind; he
speedily discovered the German affinities of the Swedish language, and
mastered almost at a glance the leading peculiarities of form, structure,
and inflexion, by which it is distinguished from the other members of the
Teutonic family; a few short trials with the boy enabled him to acquire
the more prominent principles of pronunciation; and in the space of a
few days, he was able, not only to act as the boy’s interpreter with his
family, but to converse with the most perfect freedom and fluency in the
language![293]

Mezzofanti received the clerical tonsure in the year 1795. In 1796 he
was admitted to the minor orders; and, on the 24th of September in the
same year, to the order of sub-deacon. On the first of April, 1797, he
was promoted to deaconship; and a few months later he was advanced, on
September 24th, 1797, to the holy order of priesthood.[294] At this time
he had only just completed his twenty-third year.

This anticipation of the age at which priesthood is usually conferred,
was probably owing to an appointment which he had just received (on the
15th of September,)[295] in the university—that of professor of Arabic.
Such an appointment at this unprecedented age, is the highest testimony
which could be rendered to his capacity as a general scholar, as well as
to his eminence as a linguist.

He commenced his lectures on the 15th of the following December. Dr.
Santagata, who was a student of the university at the time, speaks
very favourably of his opening lecture, not only for its learning and
solidity, but also for the beauty of its style, and its lucid and
pleasing arrangement.[296]

Unhappily his tenure of the Arabic professorship was a very brief
duration. The political relations of Bologna had just undergone a
complete revolution. Early in 1796, very soon after the advance of the
French army into Italy, Bonaparte had been invited by a discontented
party in Bologna to take possession of their city, and, in conjunction
with Saliceti, had occupied the fortresses on the 19th of January. At
first after the French occupation, the Bolognese were flattered by a
revival of their old municipal institutions; but before the close of
1796, the name of Bologna was merged in the common designation of the
Cisalpine Republic, by which all the French conquests in Northern Italy
were described. By the treaty of Tolentino, concluded in February, 1797,
the Pope was compelled formally to cede to this new Cisalpine Republic,
the three Legations of Bologna, Ferrara, and Romagna; and, in the
subsequent organization of the new territory, Bologna became the capital
of the Dipartimento del Reno.

One of the first steps of the new rulers was to require of all employés
an oath of fidelity to the Republic. The demand was enforced with great
strictness; and especially in the case of ecclesiastics, who in Italy,
as in France, were naturally regarded with still greater suspicion
by the Republican authorities, than even those civil servants of the
old government who had been most distinguished for their loyalty.
Nevertheless the republican authorities themselves consented that an
exception should be made in favour of a scholar of such promise as the
Abate Mezzofanti. The oath was proposed to him, as to the rest of the
professors. He firmly refused to take it. In other cases deprivation had
been the immediate consequence of such refusal; but an effort was made to
shake the firmness of Mezzofanti, and even to induce him without formally
accepting the oath, to signify his compliance by some seeming act of
adhesion to the established order of things. An intimation accordingly
was conveyed to him, that in his case the oath would be dispensed with,
and that he would be allowed to retain his chair, if he would only
consent to make known by any overt act whatsoever, (even by a mere
interchange of courtesies with some of the officials of the Republic,)
his acceptance of its authority as now established.[297] But Mezzofanti
was at once too conscientious to compromise what he conceived to be his
duty towards his natural sovereign, and too honourable to affect, by such
unworthy temporizing, a disposition which he did not, and could not,
honestly entertain. He declined even to appear as a visitor in the salons
of the new governor. He was accordingly deprived of his professorship in
the year 1798.

He was not alone in this generous fidelity. His friend Signora
Tambroni displayed equal firmness. It is less generally known that the
distinguished experimentalist, Ludovico Galvani,[298] was a martyr in the
same cause. Like Mezzofanti, on refusing the oath, he was stripped of all
his offices and emoluments. Less fortunate than Mezzofanti, he sunk under
the stroke. He was plunged into the deepest distress and debility; and,
although his Republican rulers were at length driven by shame to decree
his restoration to his chair, the reparation came too late. He died in
1798.




CHAPTER II.

[1798-1802.]


The years which followed this forfeiture of his professorship were a
period of much care, as well as of severe personal privation, for the
Abate Mezzofanti.

Both his parents were still living;—his father no longer able to maintain
himself by his handicraft; his mother for some years afflicted with
partial blindness, and in broken or failing health. The family of his
sister, Teresa Minarelli, had already become very numerous, and the
scanty earnings of her husband’s occupation hardly sufficed for their
maintenance, much less for the expenses of their education. In addition,
therefore, to his own necessities, Joseph Mezzofanti was now in great
measure burdened with this twofold responsibility—a responsibility to
which so affectionate a brother, and so dutiful a son could not be
indifferent. To meet these demands, he had hitherto relied mainly upon
the income arising from his professorship, although this was miserably
inadequate, the salaries attached to the professorships in Bologna, at
the time when Lalande visited Italy, (1765-6,) not exceeding a hundred
Roman crowns, (little more than £25). Small, however, as it was, this
salary was Mezzofanti’s main source of income. As a title to ordination,
the archbishop of Bologna, Cardinal Giovanetti, had conferred upon him
two small benefices, the united revenues of which, strange as it may
sound in English ears, did not exceed eight pounds sterling;[299] and
an excellent ecclesiastic, F. Anthony Magnani, who had long known and
appreciated the virtues of the family, and had taken a warm interest in
Joseph from his boyhood, settled upon him from his own private resources
about the same amount. Now, as Mezzofanti had devoted himself to
literature, and lived as a simple priest at Bologna, declining to accept
any preferment to which the care of souls was annexed, this wretched
pittance constituted his entire income. It is true that he was about
this period chaplain of the Collegio Albornoz,[300] an ancient Spanish
foundation of the great Cardinal of that name;[301] but his services
appear either to have been entirely gratuitous, or the emolument, if any,
was little more than nominal.

And thus, when the Abate Mezzofanti, relying upon Providence, had the
courage to throw up, for conscience sake, the salary which constituted
nearly two-thirds of his entire revenue, he found himself burdened with
the responsibilities already described, while his entire certain income
was considerably less than twenty pounds sterling! Nevertheless, gloomy
and disheartening as was this prospect, far from suffering himself to
be cast down by it, he was even courageous enough to venture, about
this time, on the further responsibility of receiving his sister and
her family into his own house. The renewal of hostilities in Italy, in
1799, filled him with alarm for her security; and his nephew, Cavaliere
Minarelli, who has been good enough to communicate to me a short MS.
Memoir of the events of this period of his uncle’s life, still remembers
the day on which, while the French and Austrian troops were actually
engaged before the walls, and the shot and shells had already begun to
fall within the city, his uncle came to their house, at considerable
personal risk, and insisted that his sister and her children should
remove to his own house which was in a less exposed position. From that
date (1799) they continued to reside with him.

To meet this increased expenditure, the Abate’s only resource lay in
that wearisome and ill-requited drudgery in which the best years of
struggling genius are so often frittered away—private instruction. He
undertook the humble, but responsible, duties of private tutor, and
turned industriously, if not very profitably, to account, the numerous
acquisitions of his early years. There are few of the distinguished
families of Bologna, some of whose members were not among his pupils—the
Marescalchi, Pallavicini, Ercolani, Martinetti, Bentivoglio, Marsigli,
Sampieri, Angelelli, Marchetti, and others. To these, as well as to
several foreigners, he gave instructions in ancient and modern languages,
to some in his own apartments, but more generally in their houses.

As regarded his own personal improvement in learning, these engagements,
of course, were, for the most part, a wasteful expenditure of time
and opportunities for study; but there was one of them—that with the
Marescalchi family[302]—which supplied in the end an occasion for
extending and improving his knowledge of languages. The library of the
Marescalchi palace is especially rich in that department; and, as the
modest and engaging manners of Mezzofanti quickly established him on the
footing of a valued friend, rather than of an instructor, in the family,
he enjoyed unrestricted use of the opportunities for his own peculiar
studies which it afforded. In this family, too, one of the most ancient
and distinguished in Bologna, he had frequent opportunities of meeting
and conversing with foreigners, each in the language of his own country.

       *       *       *       *       *

At all events, whatever may have been his actual opportunities of study
during the years which succeeded his deprivation, it is certain that,
upon the whole, his progress during that time was not less wonderful than
at the most favoured periods of his life. Northern Italy, during this
troubled time, was the principal seat of the struggle between Austria
and the French Republic; and from the first advance of the French in
1796, till the decisive field of Marengo in 1800, Bologna found itself
alternately in the occupation of one or other of the contending powers.
For nearly twelve months, however, after the battle of Trebbia, in July,
1799, the Austrians remained in undisturbed possession. The army of
Austria at that day comprised in its motley ranks, representatives of
most of the leading European languages—Teutonic, Slavonic, Czechish,
Magyar, Romanic, &c. The intercourse with the officers and soldiery thus
opened for Mezzofanti, in itself supplied a school of languages, which,
taken in conjunction with the university, and its other resources, it
would have been difficult to find in any other single European city,
except Rome.

And these advantages presented themselves to the Abate Mezzofanti, since
his advancement to the priesthood, in a way which enlisted still higher
feelings than that desire for knowledge which had hitherto formed his
main incentive to study.

All the accounts which have been preserved of the early years of his
ministry, concur in extolling his remarkable piety, his devotedness
to the duties of the confessional,[303] and above all his active and
tender charity. He had a share in every work of benevolence. He loved
to organize little plans for the education of the poor. Notwithstanding
his numerous and pressing occupations, he was a constant visitant of
the numerous charitable institutions for which Bologna, even among the
munificent cities of Italy, has long been celebrated. He was particularly
devoted to the sick;—not only to the class who are called in Italy “the
bashful poor,” whom he loved to seek out and visit at their own houses,
and to whom, poor as he was in worldly wealth, his active benevolence
enabled him to render services which money could not have procured;—but
also in the public hospitals, both civil and military. Now the terrible
campaign of 1796-’97, and again of 1799, had filled the camps of both
armies with sick and wounded soldiers; and thus in the public hospitals
of Bologna were constantly to be found invalids of almost every European
race. M. Manavit[304] states that, even before Mezzofanti was ordained
priest, he had begun to act as interpreter to the wounded or dying in the
hospitals, whether of their temporal or their spiritual wants and wishes.
From the date of his ordination, of course, he was moved to the same
service by a zeal still higher and more holy.

“I was at Bologna,” he himself told M. Manavit,[305] “during the time
of the war. I was then young in the sacred ministry; it was my practice
to visit the military hospitals. I constantly met there Hungarians,
Slavonians, Germans, and Bohemians, who had been wounded in battle, or
invalided during the campaign; and it pained me to the heart that from
want of the means of communicating with them, I was unable to confess
those among them who were Catholics, or to bring back to the Church those
who were separated from her communion. In such cases, accordingly, I
used to apply myself, with all my energy, to the study of the language
of the patients, until I knew enough of them to make myself understood;
I required no more. With these first rudiments I presented myself among
the sick wards. Such of the invalids as desired it, I managed to confess;
with others I held occasional conversations; and thus in a short time
I acquired a considerable vocabulary. At length, through the grace of
God, assisted by my private studies, and by a retentive memory, I came
to know, not merely the generic languages of the nations to which the
several invalids belonged, but even the peculiar dialects of their
various provinces.”

In this way, being already well acquainted with German, he became master
successively of Magyar, Bohemian, or Czechish, Polish, and even of the
Gipsy dialect, which he learned from one of that strange race, who was
a soldier in a Hungarian regiment quartered at Bologna during this
period.[306] It is probable, too, that it was in the same manner he also
learned Russian. It is at least certain that he was able to speak that
language fluently, at the date of his acquaintance with the celebrated
Suwarrow. Mezzofanti’s report of the acquirements of this “remarkable
barbarian” differs widely from the notion then popularly entertained
regarding him. He described him as a most accomplished linguist, and
a well-read scholar. This report, it may be added, is fully confirmed
by the most recent authorities, and Alison describes him as “highly
educated, polished in his manners, speaking and writing seven languages
with facility, and extensively read, especially upon the art of war.”[307]

It was about this time also that Mezzofanti learned Flemish. He acquired
that language from a youth of Brussels, who came as a student to the
University of Bologna.[308]

The reputation which he was thus gradually establishing, of itself served
to extend his opportunities of exercise in languages. Every foreigner who
visited Bologna sought his society for the purpose of testing personally
the truth of the marvellous reports which had been circulation. In these
days Bologna was the high road to Rome, and few visitors to that capital
failed to tarry for a short time at Bologna, to examine the many objects
of interest which it contains. To all of these Mezzofanti found a ready
and welcome access. There were few with whom his fertile vocabulary did
not supply some medium of communication; but, even when the stranger
could not speak any except the unknown tongue, Mezzofanti’s ready
ingenuity soon enabled him, as with the patients in the hospital, to
establish a system for the interchange of thought. A very small number
of leading words sufficed as a foundation; and the almost instinctive
facility with which, by a single effort, he grasped all the principal
peculiarities of the structure of each new language, speedily enabled
him to acquire enough of the essential inflections of each to enter
on the preliminaries of conversation. For his marvellous instinct of
acquisitiveness this was enough. The iron tenacity of his memory never
let go a word, a phrase, an idiom, or even a sound, which it once had
mastered.

In his zeal for the extension of the circle of his knowledge of
languages, too, he pushed to the utmost the valuable opportunities
derivable from the converse of foreigners. “The hotel-keepers,” he told
M. Manavit,[309] “were in the habit of apprising me of the arrival of
all strangers at Bologna. I made no difficulty when anything was to be
learned, about calling on them, interrogating them, making notes of their
communications, and taking instructions from them in the pronunciation
of their respective languages. A few learned Jesuits, and several
Spaniards, Portuguese, and Mexicans, who resided at Bologna, afforded
me valuable aid in learning both the ancient languages, and those of
their own countries. I made it a rule to learn every new grammar, and
to apply myself to every strange dictionary that came within my reach.
I was constantly filling my head with new words; and, whenever any new
strangers, whether of high or low degree, passed through Bologna, I
endeavoured to turn them to account, using the one for the purpose of
perfecting my pronunciation, and the other for that of learning the
familiar words and turns of expression. I must confess, too, that it cost
me but little trouble; for, in addition to an excellent memory, God had
blessed me with an incredible flexibility of the organs of speech.”

Occasionally, too, he received applications from merchants, bankers, and
even private individuals, to translate for them portions of their foreign
correspondence which chanced to be written in some of the languages of
less ordinary occurrence. In all such cases, Dr. Santagata[310] says,
Mezzofanti was the unfailing resource; and his good nature was as ready
as his knowledge was universal. He cheerfully rendered to every applicant
every such assistance; and it was his invariable rule never to accept any
remuneration whatsoever for this or any similar service.[311]

Even his regular priestly duties as a confessor now contributed, as his
extraordinary duties in the hospitals had done before, to enlarge his
stock of languages. He was soon marked out as the “foreigners’ confessor”
(_confessario dei forestieri_) of Bologna, an office which, in Rome and
other Catholic cities, is generally entrusted to a staff consisting
of many individuals. Almost every foreigner was sure to find a ready
resource in Mezzofanti; though it more than once happened that, as a
preliminary step towards receiving the confession of the party applying
for this office of his ministry, he had to place himself as a pupil in
the hands of the intending penitent, and to acquire from him or her the
rudiments of the language in which they were to communicate with each
other. The process to him was simple enough. If the stranger was able to
repeat for him the Commandments, the Lord’s Prayer, the Apostles’ Creed,
or any one of those familiar prayers which are the common property of all
Christian countries, or even to supply the names of a few of the leading
ideas of Christian theology, as God, sin, virtue, earth, heaven, hell,
&c., it was sufficient for Mezzofanti. In many cases he proceeded to
build, upon a foundation not a whit more substantial than this, the whole
fabric of the grammar, and to a great extent even of the vocabulary, of
a language. A remarkable instance of this faculty I shall have to relate
in the later years of his life. Another, which belongs to the present
period, has been communicated to me by Cardinal Wiseman. “Mezzofanti
told me,” says his Eminence, “that a lady from the island of Sardinia
once came to Bologna, bringing with her a maid who could speak nothing
but the Sardinian dialect, a soft patois composed of Latin, Italian, and
Spanish (e.g., Mezzofanti told me that _columba mia_ is Sardinian for “my
wife.”) As Easter approached the girl became anxious and unhappy about
confession, despairing of finding a confessor to whom she should be able
to make herself understood. The lady sent for Mezzofanti; but at that
time he had never thought of learning the language. He told the lady,
nevertheless, that, in a fortnight, he would be prepared to hear her
maid’s confession. She laughed at the idea; but Mezzofanti persisted, and
came to the house every evening for about an hour. When Easter arrived,
he was able to speak Sardinian fluently, and heard the girl’s confession!”

       *       *       *       *       *

It might be instructive to trace the order in which the several
languages which he mastered in this earlier part of his career were
successively acquired. But unfortunately neither the papers and letters
which have been preserved, nor the recollections of the few friends who
have survived, have thrown much light upon this interesting inquiry.
All accounts, however, agree in representing his life during these
years as laborious almost beyond belief. The weary hours occupied in
the drudgery of tuition; the time given to the manifold self-imposed
occupations described in this chapter; the time spent in the ordinary
devotional exercises of a priest, and in the performance of those duties
of the ministry in the hospitals and elsewhere which he had undertaken;
above all, the time regularly and perseveringly given to his great
and all-engrossing study of languages;—may well be thought to form an
aggregate of laborious application hardly surpassed in the whole range of
literary history. It fully confirms the well-known assurance of the noble
Prologue of Bacon’s “Advancement of Learning:” “Let no man doubt that
learning will expulse business, but rather it will keep and defend the
possession of the mind against idleness and pleasure, which otherwise may
enter at unawares to the prejudice of both.” Other students may perhaps
have devoted a longer time to continuous application. The celebrated
Jesuit theologian, Father Suarez, is said to have spent seventeen hours
out of the twenty-four between his studies and his devotions. Castell,
the author of the Heptaglot Lexicon, declares, in the feeling address
which accompanied its publication, that his thankless and unrequited
task had occupied him for sixteen or eighteen hours every day during
twenty years.[312] Theophilus Raynaud, during his long life of eighty
years, only allowed himself a quarter of an hour daily from his studies
for dinner;[313] and the Puritan divine, Prynne, seldom would spare
time to dine at all.[314] It may be doubted whether the actual labour
of Mezzofanti, broken up and divided over so many almost incompatible
occupations, did not equal and perhaps exceed them all in amount, if not
in intensity. According to the account of Guido Görres,[315] his time for
sleep, during this period of his life, was limited to three hours.[316]
His self-denial in all other respects was almost equally wonderful.
He was singularly abstemious both in eating and in drinking; and his
power of enduring the intense cold which prevails in the winter months
throughout the whole of Northern Italy, especially in the vicinity of the
Apennines, was a source of wonder even to his own family. During the long
nights which he devoted to study he never, even in the coldest weather,
permitted himself the indulgence of a fire.

I may here mention that he continued the same practice to the end of his
life. Even after his elevation to the cardinalate, he could hardly ever
be induced to have recourse to a fire, or even to the little portable
brazier, called _scaldino_, which students in Italy commonly employ, as a
resource against the numbness of the feet and hands produced by the dry
but piercing cold which characterizes the Italian winter.




CHAPTER III.

[1803-1806.]


From the commencement of 1803, those difficulties of the Abate
Mezzofanti’s position, which merely arose from the straitness of his
income, began gradually to diminish. On the 29th of January in that year
he was appointed assistant librarian of the _Istituto_ of Bologna; one of
those munificent literary institutions of which Italy is so justly proud,
founded in the end of the seventeenth century by the celebrated General
Count Marsigli, and enriched by the munificence of many successive
scholars and citizens of Bologna; especially of the great Bolognese Pope,
Benedict XIV. Its collections and museums are among the finest in Italy;
and the library contains above a hundred and fifty thousand volumes.

But whatever of pecuniary advantage he derived from this appointment, was
perhaps more than counterbalanced by the constant demand upon his time
from the charge of so extensive a library: especially as he confesses
that, up to that period, he had seldom bestowed a thought on the study
of bibliography. To add to the ordinary engagements of librarian, too,
it was determined, sometime after Mezzofanti’s appointment, to prepare
a Catalogue Raisonné, in which the Oriental and Greek department
naturally fell to his share. For the Oriental department of the library
there seems, up to this time, to have been no catalogue, or at least an
exceedingly imperfect and inaccurate one; and as a definite time was
fixed for the completion of the task, it became for Mezzofanti a source
of serious and protracted embarrassment, to which he alludes more than
once in his correspondence.

A more congenial occupation, however, was offered to him soon afterwards.
In the end of the same year, he was restored to his former position in
the university. On the 4th of November in that year, he was appointed
Professor of Oriental Languages;—a place which he was enabled to hold in
conjunction with his office in the Library of the Institute.

A few months after his installation, he read at the university, June
23rd, 1804, on the occasion of conferring degrees, the first public
dissertation of which I have been able to discover any record. The
subject was “The Egyptian Obelisks.” The dissertation itself has been
lost; but Count Simone Stratico, of Pavia, to whom we owe the notice of
its delivery, speaks of it as “most judicious and learned,” and replete
with antiquarian erudition.[317]

The Oriental Professorship in the neighbouring University of Parma, was
at this time held by the celebrated John Bernard de Rossi. Mezzofanti had
long desired to form the acquaintance of this distinguished Orientalist;
and more than once projected a visit to Parma, for the purpose of placing
himself in communication with him on the subject of his favourite
study. His duties as assistant Librarian at length afforded the desired
opportunity. Having occasion to order some of De Rossi’s works from
Parma, he addressed to De Rossi himself a letter which soon led to a warm
and intimate friendship, and was the commencement of an interesting,
although not very frequent, correspondence, which continued, at irregular
intervals, up to the time of De Rossi’s death. Some of Mezzofanti’s
letters to De Rossi, which are preserved in the Library of Parma, have
been kindly placed at my disposal. They are chiefly interesting as
throwing some light on the progress of his studies.

The first is dated September 15th, 1804—

    _To the Abate John Bernard de Rossi, Professor of Oriental
    Languages._

                                      _Bologna, September 15, 1804._

    Most illustrious Signor Abate.—I have long admired and
    profited by your rare acquirements, which your learned works
    have made known all over Europe; and I have, for some time,
    been projecting a visit to Parma, for the double purpose of
    tendering to you a personal assurance of my esteem, and of
    examining your far-famed library. Finding my hope disappointed
    for the present, I take advantage of a favourable opportunity
    to offer you, at least in writing, some expression of the
    profound respect which I feel for one so distinguished in the
    same studies which I myself pursue with great ardour, although
    with very inferior success. I am desirous also to procure those
    of your works marked nos. 22, 24, 25, and 26, in the catalogue
    kindly forwarded by you through Professor Ranzani. Pray give to
    the bearer of this letter any of the above numbers which may be
    in readiness: he will immediately settle for them.

    May I venture to hope that, for the future, you will allow
    me, when any difficulty occurs to me in my Oriental reading,
    to have recourse to your profound knowledge of Oriental
    literature, and also that you will accept the sincere assurance
    of the esteem with which I declare myself

                  Your most humble and devoted servant

                                    D. Joseph Mezzofanti,
                                    Professor of Oriental Languages.

De Rossi replied by an exceedingly courteous letter, accompanied
by a present of several books connected with Oriental literature,
and manifesting so friendly an interest in the studies of his young
correspondent, that Mezzofanti never afterwards hesitated to consult him
when occasion arose. Their letters, in accordance with the ceremonious
etiquette which characterizes all the correspondence of that period, are
somewhat stiff and formal; but their intercourse was marked throughout by
an active and almost tender interest upon the one side, and a respectful
but yet affectionate admiration upon the other.

Meanwhile, however, Mezzofanti’s own increasing reputation led to his
being frequently consulted upon difficulties of the same kind. On one
of these—a book in some unknown character which had been sent for his
examination by Monsignor Bevilacqua, a learned prelate at Ferrara—he,
in his turn, consults De Rossi. His letter is chiefly curious as showing
(what will appear strange to our modern philologers) that up to this
date Mezzofanti was entirely unacquainted with Sanscrit. The importance
of that language and the wide range of its relations, which Frederic
Schlegel was almost the first to estimate aright, were not at this time
fully appreciated.

    _To Professor Ab. John Bernard De Rossi._

                                        _Bologna, February 4, 1805._

    The works which I lately received from you have only served
    to confirm the estimate of your powers which I had formed
    from those with which I was previously acquainted; while the
    obliging letter and valuable present which accompanied them,
    equally convinced me of the kindness of your heart. May I
    hope that this kindness, as well as your profound erudition,
    may establish for me a title to claim the permission which I
    solicited in my last letter? I venture, therefore, to enclose
    to you a printed page in unknown characters, which the owner
    of the original, Mgr. Alessandro Bevilacqua of Ferrara, tells
    me has been already examined by several savants, but to no
    purpose. The book comes originally from Congo;[318] having
    been brought thence to Ferrara by a Capuchin of the same
    respectable family. Being full of the idea of Sanscrit, to
    which I earnestly long to apply myself as soon as I shall find
    means for the study, I was at first inclined to suspect that
    this might be the Sanscrit character; but this is a mere fancy
    of mine, or at best a guess. I look, therefore, to your more
    extensive knowledge for a satisfactory solution of the doubt;
    and meanwhile pray you to accept the assurance of my sincere
    gratitude and esteem.

This correspondence with De Rossi, also, shows very remarkably that,
however, at a later period of his career, Mezzofanti’s wonderful faculty
of language may have been sharpened by practice into what appears almost
an instinct, his method of study at this time was exact, laborious, and
perhaps even plodding. He appears, from the very first, to have pursued
as a means of study that system of written composition which was the
amusement of his later years; and he occasionally availed himself of
De Rossi’s superior knowledge and experience so far as to submit these
compositions for his judgment and correction.

It is to one of these he alludes in the following letter:—

                                          _Bologna, April 15, 1805._

    I send you a translation in twelve languages of a short Latin
    sentence, in the hope that you will kindly correct any mistakes
    into which I may have fallen. I have been obliged to write it
    almost impromptu (_su due piedi_). I mention this, however,
    not to excuse my own blunders, but to throw the blame of
    them on those who have forced me to the task. Not having a
    single individual within reach with whom to take counsel, I
    have been obliged to impose this trouble upon one whose kind
    courtesy will make it seem light to him. Accept my thanks in
    anticipation of your compliance.

    P. S. I should feel obliged if you could let me have your
    observations by return of post. Pray attribute this, perhaps
    excessive, liberty to the peculiar circumstances in which I am
    placed.

I have in vain endeavoured to ascertain what were the twelve languages
of this curious essay. As no trace of the copy is now to be found among
De Rossi’s papers, it seems probable that De Rossi, in complying with
the request contained in the letter, returned the paper to the writer
with his own corrections. But whatever these “twelve languages” may have
been, it is certain that, even at the date of this letter, Mezzofanti’s
attainments were by no means confined to that limit. My attention
has been called to a notice of him contained in a curious, though
little-known work, published at Milan in 1806,[319] which describes his
range of languages as far more extensive.

The work to which I refer is the narrative of an occurrence, which,
although not uncommon even down to a later date, it is difficult
now-a-days,—since Islam has ceased to

    ——————————wield, as of old, her thirsty lance,
    And shake her crimson plumage to the skies,—

to realize as an actual incident of the nineteenth century;[320]—the
adventures of an amateur antiquarian, who was made captive by Corsairs
and carried into Barbary. The hero of this adventure was a Milanese
ecclesiastic, Father Felix Caronni. He embarked at Palermo for Naples, in
a small merchant vessel laden with oranges, but had scarcely quitted the
shore when a pirate-ship hove in sight. The crew, as commonly happened
in such cases, took to the boat and escaped, leaving Father Caronni and
eighteen other passengers to the mercy of the Corsairs, who speedily
overpowered the defenceless little vessel. Caronni, as a subject of the
Italian Republic and a French citizen,[321] would have been secured
against capture; but his passport was in the hands of the captain who had
escaped; and thus, notwithstanding his protestations, he was seized along
with the rest, and, under circumstances of great cruelty and indignity,
they were all carried into Tunis. Here, however, at the reclamation of
the French, supported by the Austrian Consul, Father Caronni was saved
from the fate which awaited the rest of the captives—of being sold into
slavery,—and at the end of three months, (part of which he devoted to the
exploration of the antiquities of Tunis and the surrounding district,)
he was set at liberty and permitted to return to Italy.

Being at a loss, while preparing the narrative of his captivity for
publication, for a translation of the papers which he received at Tunis
when he was set at liberty, he had recourse to the assistance of the
Abate Mezzofanti, as he explains in the following passage.

“No sooner,” says he, “had I obtained the _Tiscara_[322] [passport,] than
I made an exact copy of it (with the exception of the Bey’s seal,) in
the precise dimensions of the original. It was not so easy, however, to
obtain a translation of this document in Italy, both because it had been
hastily written with a reed—the instrument which the Moors employ for
that purpose—and because there were introduced into it certain ciphers
which are peculiar to the Arabs of Barbary. These difficulties, however,
were happily overcome, thanks to the exceeding courtesy, as well as the
distinguished learning of the Abate Mezzofanti, Professor of Oriental
Languages in the Institute of Bologna, who is commonly reputed to be
master of more than twenty-four languages, the greater number of which he
speaks with fluency and purity. He has favoured me (in four long letters
which contain as much information as might supply a whole course of
lectures) with a literal and critically exact version of it, accompanied
by copious explanations, as also by a free translation in the following
terms:—

          “‘THERE IS BUT ONE GOD, AND MAHOMET IS HIS PROPHET.’

    “‘We have liberated Father Felix Caronni. He is hereby
    permitted to embark from Goletta for the country of the
    Christians, at the intervention of the French Consul, through
    the medium of his Dragoman, in consideration of the payment of
    ninety-nine sequins mahbub, and by the privilege of the mighty
    and generous Hamudah[323] Basha Bey, Ben-Dani, whom may God
    prosper!

                                 “Second Giomada, in the year 1219.’

“_Giomada_[324] is the name of the sixth month of the Arabs, and the
year indicated is the year of their Hegira.[325] And, as the Oriental
writing runs in the reverse order to ours, (that is, from right to
left,) it is necessary, in order that the words of the translation may
correspond with those of the original, to take the precaution of reading
it backwards, or, what will answer the same purpose, in a mirror. What
will strike the reader, however, as most strange, (as it did myself when
first the Tiscara was translated for me) is its particularizing the
‘payment of ninety-nine gold mahbubs,’ which, at the rate of nine _lire_
to each, would make eight hundred and ninety-one Milanese _lire_: whereas
this is utterly false as far as I am personally concerned, and the French
commissary did not give me the least intimation of any payment whatever.
The Abate Mezzofanti suggests with much probability, that it may be a
part of the _stylus curiæ_ of these greedy barbarians to boast in their
piratical diplomacy that no Christian, and still more no ecclesiastic,
has ever been made captive by them without being, even though a Frank,
supposed to be a lawful prize, and consequently without being made ‘to
bleed’ a little.”[326]

This is the first published notice of Mezzofanti which has come under my
observation; and it is particularly interesting as an early example of
his habit of cultivating not only the principal languages, but the minor
varieties of each. The knowledge that, when he had barely completed his
thirtieth year, he was reputed to be master of _more than twenty-four
languages_, may perhaps prepare us to regard with less incredulity the
marvels which we shall find related of his more advanced career.

In the autumn of the same year the Abate Mezzofanti paid his
long-intended visit to Parma and De Rossi. The Italians, and especially
the literary men of Italy, are proverbially bad travellers. Magliabecchi
never was outside of the gates of Florence in his life, except on two
occasions;—once as far as Fiesole, which may almost be called a suburb
of the city, and once again to a distance of ten miles. Many an Italian
Professor has passed an entire life without any longer excursion than
the daily walk from his lodgings to the lecture-room. Even the great
geographer, D’Anville, who lived to the age of eighty-five, is said never
to have left his native city, Paris;[327] and yet he was able to point
out many errors in the plan of the Troad made upon the spot by the Comte
de Choiseul. It has been frequently alleged of Mezzofanti, also, as
enhancing still more the marvel of his acquirements in languages, that,
until his fortieth year, he had never quitted his native city. That this
statement is not literally true appears from a letter which he wrote to
the Abate de Rossi, on his return to Bologna, after the visit to which I
have alluded.

    “Pressed as I am, by my many occupations,” he says, November
    11, 1805, “I cannot delay writing at least a few lines, in
    grateful acknowledgment of the kindnesses which I received from
    you during my happy sojourn in your city.

    “I had been prepared for this, as well by the reports of others
    regarding your amiable disposition, as by the courtesy which
    I had myself experienced; but all my anticipations had fallen
    far short of the reality. Feeling that it is impossible for me
    to offer you a suitable acknowledgment, I beg that, although
    I have neither words to express it, nor means of giving it
    effect, you will believe me to be deeply sensible of my
    obligation to you. I shall preserve all your valued presents
    with most jealous care. The ‘Persian Anthology’[328] has been
    greatly relished by all here who apply to the study of that
    language.

    “I shall often have to claim your indulgence for the trouble
    which I shall not fail to give you. After the many proofs I
    have had of your kindness, I feel that I should be offending
    you, were I to ask you to let me hope to reckon myself
    henceforward among your friends.”

The friendly courtesy of the Abate De Rossi rendered Mezzofanti’s stay at
Parma exceedingly agreeable. One of the friends whom he made during this
visit, the learned and venerable Librarian of the Ducal Library of that
city, Cavaliere Angelo Pezzana, still survives, and still speaks with an
affection which borders upon tenderness of the friendship which resulted
from their first meeting, and which was the pride of his later life.
Among the subjects of their conversation, Cavaliere Pezzana particularly
remembers some observations of Mezzofanti on certain affinities between
the Russian and Latin languages, which struck him by their acuteness and
originality.

A commission which M. Pezzana gave him at his departure led to the
following letter:—

                                       _Bologna, November 11, 1805._

    In the hope of being able to execute the little commission you
    gave me regarding the Aldine edition of Aristotle, I have put
    off writing until I should have searched in our Library.—On
    doing so, I find that I have been mistaken, as there is no
    copy of that edition here. I avail myself, however, of this
    opportunity to renew the assurance of my gratitude for the
    numberless kindnesses which you shewed me during the time it
    was my good fortune to be in your society;—kindnesses which I
    never can forget, and for which it is my most anxious desire
    to find some opportunity of making you a return. I beg you
    to present my respects to Dr. Tommasini, and to offer to
    Signor Bodoni and his lady my acknowledgments for their great
    courtesy. Should any occasion arise in which my humble services
    can be of use, I shall consider myself happy, if you will
    always put aside every idea of my occupations, and will honour
    me with your valued commands. Meanwhile accept the assurance of
    my sincere esteem and attachment.

Mezzofanti’s intimacy with the two gentlemen named in this letter,
Tommasini and Bodoni, was lasting and sincere. Tommasini, although an
eminent physician of Parma and an active member of most of the scientific
societies of his day, is little known outside of Italy: but Bodoni, the
celebrated printer and publisher of Parma, whose magnificent editions of
the classics are still among the treasures of every great library, was
a man of rare merit, and a not unworthy representative of the learned
fathers of his craft, the Stephens, the Manuzi, and Plantins of the
palmy days of typography. He was a native of Saluzzo in the kingdom of
Sardinia. His early taste for wood-engraving induced him to visit Rome
for the purpose of study: and he set out in company with a school-fellow,
whose uncle held some office in the Roman court. Bodoni supported himself
and his companion upon the way by the sale of his little engravings,
which are now prized as curiosities in the art. On their arrival,
however, being coldly received by the friend on whom they had mainly
relied, they resolved to return home; but before leaving Rome, Bodoni
paid a visit to the printing-office of the Propaganda, where he had the
good fortune to attract the notice of the Abate Ruggieri, then director
of that great press. He thus obtained employment in the establishment,
and at the same time was permitted to attend the Oriental Schools of the
Sapienza; and thus having learned Hebrew and Arabic, he was employed
exclusively upon the Oriental works printed by the Propaganda. The
excellence and accuracy of the editions of the _Missale Arabico-Coptum_,
and the _Alphabetum Tibetanum_ of Padre Giorgi which Bodoni printed,
excited universal admiration; and when, on occasion of the tragical death
of his friend and patron Ruggieri, he resolved to leave Rome, he was
earnestly invited to settle in England: but he accepted in preference an
invitation to Parma, where he was appointed Director of the Ducal Press,
and where all the well-known master-pieces of his art were successively
produced. Himself a man of much learning, and of a highly cultivated
mind, he enjoyed the friendship of most of the literati of Italy.

    Blest with a taste exact, yet unconfined,
    A knowledge both of books and human kind—

his conversation was in the highest degree entertaining and instructive;
and his correspondence, which has been published, is full of interest.
With the Abate De Rossi, who employed his press in all his Oriental
publications,[329] he was for years on terms of the closest intimacy;
and during Mezzofanti’s visit to Parma, he treated De Rossi’s young
disciple with a courtesy which Mezzofanti long and gratefully remembered.
Bodoni’s wife, who, upon his death in 1813, succeeded to his vast
establishment, was, like her husband, highly cultivated, and a most
amiable and excellent woman.

Among the languages which occupied Mezzofanti at this time, Persian
appears to have received the principal share of his attention. One of the
first presents which he received from De Rossi was, as we have seen, a
“Persian Anthology;” and in a letter to De Rossi, written early in 1806
(which Cavaliere Pezzana has published in the Modena Journal, _Memorie
di Religione_,) he expresses much anxiety to obtain a copy of the great
Persian classic, Kemal Eddin.

The same letter, however, contains another request from which it may be
inferred that much of his time was still drawn away from these studies by
his duties as librarian. Speaking of the catalogue then in preparation,
he complains of the miserably defective condition of the library in the
department of Bibliography; and begs of his correspondent to send him the
titles of the _Bibliotheca_ of Hottinger, (perhaps his _Promptuarium, seu
Bibliotheca Orientalis_, Heidelberg, 1658) and that of Wolff, in order
that he may provide himself with these works, as a guide in his task.

On this subject he speaks more explicitly in a letter of the 3rd of
March, in the same year. After alluding to a commission of De Rossi’s
which he had failed in executing, he proceeds:—

    The preparation of the Catalogue keeps me in constant
    occupation, because these Oriental books are for the most part
    without the name of the author or the title of the work. Their
    value, that is to say their scientific importance, bears no
    proportion to the labour they cost; inasmuch as they are all
    Grammatical Treatises, books of Law, and such like. However,
    should I meet any work of interest, I shall not fail to
    communicate it to you; although, I fancy, it will be difficult
    to meet with anything that you do not know already.

    I received from Vienna immediately on its publication, the
    Grammar of the learned Dombay,[330] who is well known for other
    works, particularly upon the language and history of Morocco.
    It happens that I have got two copies of it; and I have set one
    of them apart for you, for which you may perhaps give me in
    exchange one of your own duplicates. It contains the Grammar
    arranged after the manner of the Latin Grammarians; the rules
    of Persian according to Meninski,[331] with this advantage,
    that here they are given in consecutive order, whereas in
    Meninski they are found mixed up with those of the Arabic and
    Turkish. Your friend, M. Silvestre de Sacy, reviewed it in
    the _Magazin Encyclopedique_, and took exception to Dombay’s
    reducing the Persian to the system of the Latin Grammar. I hope
    shortly to receive the other from Leipsic, as also the tales of
    Nizami, in Persian and Latin, printed by Wolff, and published
    by L. Hill, who promised for the same year, 1802, an edition of
    the _Divan_ of Hafiz.[332]

    I am only waiting for a safe opportunity to forward your books.
    We cannot fail of one in the coming spring. As to the “Oriental
    Anthology,” I have given it in charge to the courier as far as
    Milan, but have not yet heard intelligence of it.

    Book-buying is undoubtedly very troublesome, and the least
    disagreeable part of it is the money the books cost, although
    in Oriental works I always find this excessive. I beg you not
    to spare me whenever any occasion offers in which my services
    may be useful.

The Abate de Rossi had requested to be furnished with a note of the
principal Oriental MSS. of the Bologna collection; but Mezzofanti’s
labour in preparing the general Catalogue was so great, and the time
fixed for its completion was so entirely inadequate, that, for a
considerable time, he was unable to comply with his friend’s request.
It is to this he alludes in the following letter, dated May 11, 1806.
After apologizing for the delay in forwarding the book referred to in the
letter of March 3rd, he proceeds:—

    My labour at the Catalogue still continues, nor can I hope at
    the period appointed for its close, to have done more than
    merely sketch it out;—that is, we shall have nothing entered
    but the bare titles of the works. This, however, in itself,
    is a task so difficult in our Oriental MSS., that, up to the
    present time, it has never been satisfactorily done. Besides
    the Oriental books, I have also to deal with the Greek; and all
    must be in readiness within the coming month. The truth is that
    I should require a year at least to give a proper shape to my
    labour, and in the beginning my impression was that it would
    require two. And in my present difficulty, what gives me most
    pain is that I am not able to send you, as early as I could
    wish, the note which you have often expressed a wish to obtain;
    but I shall send it the very first moment in my power.

    I have received your new work,[333] for which I beg you to
    accept my best thanks. I did not write at the moment, knowing
    you do not like very frequent letters; I have besides too much
    respect for time devoted like yours to the honour of Italy, on
    which your works in Oriental literature have shed a lustre. I
    long nevertheless for a fitting opportunity to prove to you the
    sincerity of my gratitude.

Under this constant and protracted labour Mezzofanti’s health began
to give way. His chest was seriously threatened during the summer of
1806, and had it not been that he fortunately obtained an extension of
the time allotted for the completion of his task at the Catalogue, it
is not unlikely that his constitution, naturally weak, might have been
permanently enfeebled. Family cares, too, formed no inconsiderable part
of his burden. The health of his mother, which had for a long time been
very uncertain, was completely broken down. She was now entirely blind.
For many weeks of this season he was in daily apprehension of her death;
and, in the pressure of his engagements, his hours of attendance on her
sick bed were subtracted from the time hitherto devoted to rest, already
sufficiently curtailed.

In the midst of these cares and occupations, Mezzofanti was surprised
by a flattering invitation to transfer his residence to Paris, with a
promise of patronage and distinction from the Emperor Napoleon, who was
at this time eagerly engaged in plans for the development of the literary
and artistic glories of his capital. More than one of Mezzofanti’s
countrymen were already in the enjoyment of high honours at Paris. First
among them may be named Volta, for many years Professor of Natural
Philosophy in the University of Pavia. More pliant than his great
fellow-discoverer, Galvani, or perhaps more favourably circumstanced as
not being, like him, a member of a Papal University, he had escaped the
proscription which brought Galvani to his grave—one of those victims of
loyalty whom Petrarch declares

          ————assai più belli
    Con la lor povertà, che Mida o Crasso
    Con l’oro, ond’ a virtù furon ribelli;—

Volta was called from Pavia to Paris, where he was rewarded with
distinctions, emoluments, titles, and, more flattering than all, with the
personal notice and patronage of the great conqueror himself, who was
often present at his experiments, and displayed a warm interest in the
results to which they led.[334]

Such were at this period the tempting rewards of scientific or literary
eminence in France. Moreover, Count Marescalchi, in whose family
Mezzofanti had acted as tutor and librarian during the years of his
deprivation, was now Resident Minister of the Kingdom of Italy at Paris.
The Count’s intercourse with Mezzofanti was but little interrupted by
their separation; and, even during his residence in Paris, the latter
continued to correspond with him; chiefly on matters connected with the
education of his children, or with the completion or extension of his
noble library. The extent of their intimacy indeed may be inferred from
one of Mezzofanti’s letters to the Count, dated September 16, 1806,
in which we find him freely employing the services of the minister in
procuring books at Paris, not only for himself but for his literary
friends in Bologna.[335]

It was through this Count Marescalchi that the invitation to Paris was
conveyed to Mezzofanti, and it cannot be doubted that it was accompanied
by a warm recommendation from the Count himself. No trace of this formal
correspondence is now discoverable; but probably far more interesting,
as it is certainly far more characteristic, than the official letter or
reply, is the following playful letter to one of Count Marescalchi’s
sons, Carlino (Charlie), Mezzofanti’s former pupil—now the representative
of the house—who had written a special letter, to add the expression of
his own wishes to those of his father, that his old instructor should
join them once again at Paris.

                                      _Bologna, September 16, 1806._

    But three letters, dearest Charlie, in an entire year—two
    from Lyons, and one from Paris—to cheer my regrets in being
    separated from you! If I were to take this as the measure of
    your love for me, I should indeed have reason to be sad. But I
    have abundant other proofs of your feelings in my regard; and
    at all events, I am not one who can afford to be too rigid in
    insisting upon the frequency of correspondence, unless I wish
    to furnish grave grounds of complaint against myself.

    Few, however, as your letters have been, I am deeply grateful
    for their warm and affectionate sentiments, which carry with
    them such an evidence of sincerity as to leave me, even when
    you do not write, no ground for doubting what your feelings
    still are towards me. I am not sure whether in your regard I
    shall be equally fortunate; for I am fully sensible that I have
    not the power of infusing into what I write all the warmth and
    sincerity that I really feel. However, you are not dependent
    on my words, in order to be satisfied of the truth of my
    affection; and, knowing it as you do, even a lesser token of it
    than this will suffice to convince you.

    I am still here at Bologna following the same old round of
    occupations. Nor am I dissatisfied with my lot, for I am quite
    sensible of my inability to take a loftier flight. I feel that
    the shade suits me best. Were I to go to Paris, I should be
    obliged to set myself up upon some candlestick, where I should
    only give out a faint and flickering gleam, which would soon
    die utterly away. Nevertheless I am not the less grateful for
    your advice; though I perceive that you are dissatisfied with
    me because I am such a little fellow.

    A thousand, thousand greetings to your dear little sisters.
    Renew my remembrance to your father, and when you have an
    occasional moment of leisure from your tasks, pray bestow it
    upon

                          Your sincere friend,

                                               D. JOSEPH MEZZOFANTI.

Besides the unaffected modesty and the distrust of his own fitness for
a prominent position (even with such advantages as those offered to him
at Paris,) which are expressed in this letter, the Abate Mezzofanti
was also moved to decline the invitation, both by affection for his
native city and love of its university life (to which we shall find him
looking back with fondness even after his elevation to the cardinalate,)
and by unwillingness to part from his family, to whom he was tenderly
attached. To the latter he had always felt himself bound by duty as well
as by affection. The expense of the education of his sister’s children,
who at this time, (as appears from a little Memoir in the archives of
the University drawn up in 1815,) were seven in number, amounted to a
considerable sum. They, as well as their parents, still continued to
reside in his house; and the same Memoir alludes to another near relative
who was at least partially dependent upon him for support.

To these children, indeed, he was as a father. Cavaliere Minarelli, in
the interesting note already cited, describes him as “most affectionately
devoted to them, and uniting in his manners the loving familiarity of
a friend with the graver authority of an instructor.” In his brief
intervals of leisure from business or study, he often joined them in
their little amusements. Without the slightest trace of austerity,
he generally managed to give their amusements, as far as possible, a
religious character. He usually made the festivals memorable to them by
some extra indulgence or entertainment. He encouraged and directed their
childish tastes in the embellishment of their little oratories, or in
those well-known Christmas devices of Catholic children, the preparation
of the “Crib of the Infant Jesus,” or the decoration of the “Christmas
Tree.” He hoarded his little resources in order to procure for them
improving and instructive books. He composed simple odes and sonnets for
the several festivals, which it was his greatest enjoyment to hear them
recite. The simplicity of his disposition, and a natural fondness for
children which was one of the characteristics even of his later life,
made all this easy to him. He was always ready, if not to take a part, at
least to manifest an interest, in the pleasures of his young friends. In
the carnival especially, when amusement seems, for a time, to form the
serious business of every Italian household, he was never wanting; and,
on one memorable occasion, he actually composed a little comedy, to be
acted by his nephews and nieces for the humble family circle.

During the whole winter of 1806-7 his time was still occupied in the
uncongenial labour of compiling the Catalogue.

On the 25th of September, he writes to the Abate De Rossi, apologizing
for delay in replying to a letter received from him.

    “A complication of unfortunate accidents has, up to this
    moment, prevented me from answering your kind letter of last
    July. My poor mother has frequently, during the summer, been
    in extreme danger of death. My own chest, too, has more than
    once been threatened, and is still far from strong. All this,
    however, does not save me from a feeling of remorse at having
    been so tardy towards one whose scientific reputation, as well
    as his courteous manners, entitle him to so much consideration.
    My labour, as you say, is not yet over. The task, as I
    had indeed anticipated from the beginning, has proved an
    exceedingly difficult one. As an evidence of the difficulty I
    need only mention that the celebrated Giuseppe Assemani, in
    the similar work which he undertook,[336] has made numerous
    mistakes, having in one instance given no less than six
    different titles to seven copies of the same work. This great
    orientalist, with all his learning, could not command the time
    necessary for so troublesome a task as that of ascertaining the
    titles and authors of books which are quite unknown and often
    imperfect. For my part, I resolved from the beginning that I
    would not, willingly at least, add to the other deficiencies of
    which I am conscious, that of haste and insufficient time. _Nam
    quo minus ingenio possum, subsidio mihi diligentiam comparavi_;
    and the condescension of his Serene Highness has in the end
    relieved me, by extending until April the time allowed for the
    completion of the task. The grammarians, rhetoricians, poets,
    prosodians, logicians, and theologians, have taken up all my
    time hitherto; in the course of the next two months, I hope to
    complete the enumeration of the other authors; and then I shall
    at last fulfil my promise of sending you, when occasion serves,
    whatever I think may interest you.”

De Rossi, in his letter, to which this is a reply, had put some
questions regarding the contents of the octavo edition of D’Herbelot’s
_Bibliothèque Orientale_, the preface of which had contained a promise
of many important improvements. Mezzofanti, referring to these promised
additions, goes on to say, “In the articles which I have compared, I
have only found a few verbal corrections. But in the preface, we are
promised additional articles, drawn from the narratives of travellers
subsequent to D’Herbelot. From this promise you will be able to infer
what information you may expect to derive from the edition, and whether
it is likely to be useful for your purpose. I have not yet received
the supplement, which was to contain certain articles which have been
postponed for reasons explained in the preface. Perhaps the reason of its
not having been printed, may be, that the articles in question, being of
use to orientalists alone, may be found by them in the former editions.

“As it would be no small distinction for the collection of Oriental MSS.
belonging to this Royal Library of ours, if among them there should be
found any deserving of a place amongst the MSS. cited in your dictionary,
I shall endeavour, in the hope that it may prove so, to complete my task
as speedily as possible, so as to send you at least an index, out of
which you may yourself choose the name of any author whom you shall judge
deserving of notice.

“I believe Dombay’s work has been published. I have the title,
‘_Geschichte der Mauritan. Könige; aus dem Arabischen übersetzt_’;[337]
but without date or place. I shall write to Vienna as soon as I can, to
order it, if it should be published. I have made a good many interesting
acquisitions lately; as for instance, _Albucasis ‘De Chirurgia.’_[338]
Oxonii, 1778. ‘_Maured Allatafet Jemaleddini filii Togri Bardii; seu
Rerum Aegyptiacarum Annales ab Anno C. 971 ad 1453_’;[339] several
‘_Anthologias_’ and ‘_Chrestomathias_;’ one of which, that of Rink and
Vater, has at the end a _Bibliotheca Arabica_ continued up to 1802; and
some other books.”

       *       *       *       *       *

At this date, Mezzofanti’s correspondence with De Rossi is interrupted;
and, although there appears to have been a pretty regular interchange of
correspondence between them for some years longer,[340] no further letter
has been found among those of De Rossi’s papers which are deposited in
the library of Parma, except one written in the year 1812.

Scanty as are the details supplied by those which are preserved, they,
at least, afford some insight into the process by which the writer’s
extraordinary faculty was developed and perfected. However acute and
almost instinctive this faculty may have been, it is plain from these
letters, that it was at this time most systematically and laboriously
cultivated. However much Mezzofanti may have owed to nature, it is
certain, that for all the practical results of his great natural gifts
he was indebted to his own patient and almost plodding industry; and
it may cheer the humble student in the long and painful course through
which alone he can aspire to success, to find that even this prodigy of
language was forced to tread the same laborious path;—to see the anxious
care with which he collected and consulted grammars, dictionaries,
manuals, reading books, and other similar commonplace appliances of the
study; and to learn, that, with all his unquestioned and unquestionable
genius, he did not consider himself above the drudgery at which even less
gifted students are but too apt to murmur or repine.

It may be added that the toilsome practice of writing out translations
from one language into another which these letters disclose, was
continued by Mezzofanti through his entire career of study, although in
his latter years he pursued it more as an amusement than as a serious
task.

It is hard, in ordinary cases, to infer from such performances the exact
degree of proficiency in the language which they should be presumed
to indicate. Some translations are only the fruit of long and careful
study.[341] On the contrary, there are instances on record in which
excellent translations have been produced by persons possessing a very
slight knowledge of the original. Thus Monte, the author of the best
Italian translation of Homer, was utterly unacquainted with Greek;[342]
Halley, without knowing a word of Arabic, was able to guess his way,
(partly by mathematical reasoning, partly by the aid of a Latin version,
which, however, only contained about one-tenth of the entire work,)
through an Arabic translation of Apollonius _De Sectione Rationis_;[343]
and M. Arnaud, the first French translator of Lalla Rookh, did not know a
word of the English language.[344]

But on all these points Mezzofanti’s fame is beyond suspicion. His
translations, at least in his later life, were at once produced with
the utmost freedom and rapidity, and are universally acknowledged to
have been models of verbal correctness; and in most instances where the
same passage is translated into many languages, the versions display a
remarkable mastery over the peculiar forms and idioms of each.

This wonderful success must be ascribed, no doubt, to his early and
systematic exercise in translation, of which the specimen submitted to De
Rossi is but one example.




CHAPTER IV.

[1807-1814.]


The _Catalogue Raisonné_ of the Oriental and Greek manuscripts was not
completed until 1807, having thus absorbed the greater part of Abate
Mezzofanti’s time during two years.

A large proportion of the Oriental MSS. had never even been entered upon
the ordinary library catalogue, and no attempt at all had been made
to describe them accurately, much less to register their character or
contents. Very many of them too, as we learn from Mezzofanti’s letters,
were imperfect; and a still more considerable number wanted at least the
title and the name of the author. It was no trivial labour, therefore,
to examine the entire collection; to decide on the name, the age, and
the authorship of each; to describe their contents; and to reduce them
all into their respective classes. For most of these particulars the
compiler of the catalogue was utterly without a guide. It is true that
Joseph Assemani’s catalogue of the Oriental MSS. of the Vatican, and
the catalogue of those of the Medicean Library at Florence by his
nephew Stephen Evodius, were in some cases available. But many of the
Bologna MSS. are not to be found in either catalogue; and for all these
Mezzofanti was of course compelled to rely altogether on his own lights.

The catalogue, as drawn up by him, is still preserved, and,
notwithstanding these disadvantages, is described as a highly creditable
performance, and “a valuable supplement to the labours of Talmar and
the Assemanis;”[345] and at all events it was to his long and laborious
researches while engaged in its preparation, that he owed that minute
familiarity with the whole literature of the East, ancient and modern,
which, as we shall see, was a subject of wonder even to learned orientals
themselves.

During the year 1807, an opportunity occurred for testing practically
how far the reputation which he had acquired corresponded with his real
attainments. On the outbreak of hostilities between the Porte and Russia
in that year, the Russian ambassador, Italinski, withdrew (not without
some risk and difficulty)[346] from Constantinople, and, being conveyed
on board the British ship of war, Canopus, to Malta, afterwards made his
way to Ancona. While the ambassador remained at Ancona, the chancellor of
the embassy, Angelo Timoni, who was of Bolognese origin, came to visit
his native city; accompanied by Matteo Pisani, the official interpreter,
who was one of the best linguists of his time, and especially a perfect
master of all the modern languages of the East. As they resided, during
their stay at Bologna, in the house of his friend, Dr. Santagata, their
visit was a severe ordeal for Mezzofanti, who was constantly in their
society; but he withstood it triumphantly; and Santagata records their
wonder and delight to find that, without ever having visited the East,
or mixed in Oriental society, the Bolognese professor had nevertheless
attained a “mastery over the many and various languages, especially
Oriental ones, in which they tried him, and that the marvellous and all
but inconceivable accounts which they had received regarding him, proved
to be not only credible but actually true.”[347]

A great and lasting mortification nevertheless soon afterwards befel
Mezzofanti, in the unexpected deprivation of his beloved professorship.
The circumstances which accompanied his removal have not been fully
detailed, but there is enough in the history of the period to supply an
intelligible explanation. The conflict of Napoleon with the Holy See
was just then approaching its crisis. From the beginning of this year
the French troops had occupied Rome. Two cardinal secretaries of state
had been forcibly ejected from office. The Pope was a prisoner in his
own palace and his authority was completely superseded. Now upon these
and the many similar outrages to which the venerable Pontiff was daily
subjected, the opinions of Mezzofanti were no secret; and there can be
no doubt that the determination of the Government to remove him from
the university was mainly influenced by this knowledge; although in
deference to public opinion, and to the universal feeling of respect
with which he was regarded, they abstained from formally depriving him
of his professorship. His removal was effected indirectly by a decree,
dated November 15, 1808, by which the Oriental professorship itself was
suppressed.

Although a pension, and as it would seem, not a very illiberal one,
was assigned to him, he felt very deeply this exclusion from a career
so congenial to his tastes. He continued nevertheless, as before, to
instruct pupils privately in these and other languages; and although, as
to details, the history of his own studies at this time is a complete
blank, yet from his known habits it may reasonably be presumed that when
the first feeling of mortification had subsided, the ultimate result of
his release from the duties of his chair, was to direct his untiring
energies into new fields of research; and it seems to have been during
this interval that he first gave his attention to the Sanscrit and other
Indian languages;—a family which had till then been but little cultivated
except in England, but to whose vast importance, as well as widely
extended philological relations, Frederic Schlegel[348] had just awakened
the attention of the learned throughout continental Europe.

       *       *       *       *       *

From the date of this second deprivation, till the year 1812, his quiet
and uniform course of life presents hardly a single interesting incident.

In June, 1810, his mother died. But her advanced age and infirm health
had long prepared him for this bereavement. She died on the feast of St.
Aloysius (June 21,) in her seventy-third year.

The only detail regarding his personal occupations, which I have been
able to discover, is derived from a letter, dated November 30th,
1811,[349] to his friend Pezzana, at Parma, which exhibits him again
engaged in the drudgery of compiling a catalogue—that of the library
of Count Marescalchi. Pezzana had published, some time before, a short
bibliographical essay on two very rare editions of Petrarch, which are
still preserved in the Parma Collection. Mezzofanti, while engaged in
cataloguing the Marescalchi library, discovered a copy of one of these
editions, and at once wrote to communicate the fact to Pezzana.

I may also mention, what, in a life so uneventful, must claim to be
regarded as an event—a short journey which he made to Modena and Mantua.
Joseph Minarelli, the eldest of his sister’s sons, was summoned to
Modena in 1813, to ballot in the conscription which followed the terrible
campaign of 1812, so fatal to the armies of France. Signora Minarelli
was naturally much alarmed at the chance of her son’s being drawn in the
conscription, and in consideration for her anxiety, his uncle accompanied
him to Modena upon the occasion.

It becomes especially difficult henceforward to follow the history of his
studies. The literary friends of this part of his career;—his colleagues
in the University; Ranzani; Caturegli, the astronomer; the eminent
botanist, Felippo Re; his fellow-pupil and fellow-teacher, Clotilda
Tambroni; Schiassi; Magistrini; and others of less note, who could have
supplied information, not only as to his habits and pursuits, but as to
the actual stages of his progress, are long since dead. The letters of
Pietro Giordani,[350] however, recently published, may, in some measure,
fill up the blank; not, it is true, as to the details of his biography,
but at least in so far as regards the opinion entertained in Bologna of
his character and acquirements. Indeed the testimony of Giordani is less
open to exception than any which could have emanated from the personal
friends of Mezzofanti. Giordani had entered the Benedictine congregation,
and had even received the order of sub-deaconship; but on the outbreak
of the Revolution, he had renounced the monastic life, cast aside the
Benedictine habit, and thrown himself into the arms of the revolutionary
party in Italy. Under the French rule at Bologna, he obtained as the
reward of his principles, the place of Assistant Librarian, and also that
of Deputy Professor of Latin and Italian Eloquence. Hence it will easily
be believed that his relations with the Papal party in the University
were by no means friendly; and, as he had had with the Abate Mezzofanti
himself (as I learn from an interesting letter of M. Libri which shall be
inserted hereafter,) some personal misunderstandings, he may be presumed
to have been but little disposed to over-rate the qualifications of an
antagonist. It is no mean evidence of Mezzofanti’s merit, therefore, that
Giordani has specially excepted him from the very disparaging estimate
which he expresses regarding the literary men of Italy at this time.
“I have held but little intercourse with literary men,” he writes to
his friend Lazzaro Papi, “finding them commonly possessed of but little
learning and a great deal of passion. Here, however, I have met an
exception to the rule—the Abate Mezzofanti—a man not only of the utmost
piety, but of attainments truly wonderful and all but beyond belief. You
must, of course, have heard of him; but indeed he well deserves a wider
fame than he enjoys, for the number of languages which he knows most
perfectly, although this is the least part of his learning. Nevertheless,
such is his excessive modesty, that he lives here in obscurity, and I
must add, to the disgrace of the age, in poverty.”[351]

Nor is Giordani’s report to be regarded as one of those vague panegyrics,
which, when Mezzofanti’s fame was established, each new visitor was
wont to re-echo. Giordani is not only well-known as one of the purest
Italian writers of the century, but enjoyed the highest reputation as a
critical scholar; and the subject on which, in another of his letters,
he defers to the judgment of Mezzofanti—a delicate question of Greek
criticism—was precisely that on which he himself was best qualified to
pronounce. In a letter to the Abate Canova (Feb 3, 1812,) he mentions a
conjecture that had recently interested him very much; viz., that the
great Roman architect, Vitruvius, was a Greek, although he wrote in
Latin. His chief argument is based upon Vitruvius’s Latinity, in which
he detects traces of foreign idiom. But, lest he should yield too much
to fancy, he had appealed to the judgment of some of his colleagues, and
he communicates the result to his correspondent. One of the persons thus
consulted was Mezzofanti. “I should not rely on my own judgment,” says
Giordani, “had I not convinced Cicognara and Mezzofanti that it is right.
The authority of the latter is the more important, because my argument
rests chiefly on the style, in every line of which I find impressed, even
where the subject is not technical, traces of halting [_storpiato_] and
ill-translated Greek; and you know what a judge Mezzofanti is of this
point.”[352]

In a letter to another friend, Count Leopoldo Cicognara, (since known
as the biographer of Canova)[353] Giordani reports the sequel of this
discussion, which confirms in a very remarkable manner, Giordani’s
judgment of Mezzofanti’s critical sagacity. Mezzofanti had at first
assented to Giordani’s conjecture; but on a closer examination he
discovered, that what Giordani had considered the Grecisms of Vitruvius’s
style, were, in reality, but _translations from various Greek authors_,
from whom Vitruvius largely borrows, and whom he actually enumerates in
the preface of the seventh book. Mezzofanti further pointed out a phrase
in the same preface which at once put an end to the discussion, and the
discovery of which, as Giordani justly observes, in itself “indicated an
inquiring and critical mind.” Vitruvius, in speaking of the Latin writers
upon his art, as contradistinguished from the Greek, calls them “antiqui
_nostri_.”[354]

To the same friend, Count Cicognara, Giordani in a previous letter,
dated January 30th, 1812, had written of Mezzofanti’s own peculiar
faculty of languages, in terms of almost rapturous admiration. “You
know Mezzofanti,” he says;—“Mezzofanti—the rarest, most unheard of,
most inconceivable of living men. I call him, and he is, the man of all
nations and all ages. By Jove! he appears as though he had been born in
the beginning of the world, and, like St. Anthony, had lived in every
age and in every country!”[355]

In connexion with this very remarkable testimony to the accuracy of
Mezzofanti’s knowledge of Greek, I may mention (although it more properly
belongs to a later period of his life) an amusing anecdote illustrative
of his accomplishments as a Latinist, which is recorded by Dr. Santagata,
and the hero of which was M. Bucheron, Professor of Latin Literature
in the University of Turin, and one of the most celebrated classical
philologists of modern Italy. M. Bucheron came to Bologna, from some
cause strongly prepossessed against Mezzofanti, and disposed to regard
him in the light of a mere literary charlatan, of showy but superficial
acquirements. Of his Latinity—especially in all that bears upon the
critical niceties of the language, and the numberless philological
questions regarding it which have arisen among modern scholars, M.
Bucheron entertained the lowest possible estimate;—considering it, in
truth, impossible, that one whose attention had been divided over so many
languages as fame ascribed to Mezzofanti, _could be_ solidly grounded
in any of them. He resolved, therefore, to put the Abate’s Latinity
to a rigorous test; and came to the library prepared with a number of
questions, bearing upon the niceties of the Latin language, which he
proposed to introduce, as it were casually, in his expected conversation.
He was presented to Mezzofanti by his friend, Michele Ferrucci, Librarian
of the University of Pisa, from whom, I may add, Dr. Santagata received
the account of their interview. The conversation, as Bucheron had
pre-determined, began upon some common-place subject: but in a short time
he artfully contrived to turn it upon those topics on which he desired
to probe his companion. The trial was a most animated one. From a series
of obscure and difficult questions of Latin philology, they passed to a
variety of oriental, historical, and archæological topics. At the moment
when the interest of the conversation was at its very height, Ferrucci
was unfortunately called away by business; but the result may be judged
from the sequel. On his return, after a somewhat lengthened absence, he
met Bucheron coming from the Library.

“Well,” said he, “what do you think of Mezzofanti?”

“_Per Bacco!_” replied the astounded Piedmontese. “_Per Bacco! é il
Diavolo!_”[356]

His celebrity, indeed, was by this time universally established. With all
his unaffected humility; with the full consciousness (which he expressed
in all simplicity and truth to his young friend, Carlino Marescalchi)
that he was “best fitted for the shade”—he had insensibly grown into
one of the notabilities of Bologna. He was constantly visited and
consulted, especially by Oriental students, from foreign countries. What
is more remarkable, more than one Jewish scholar appears in the record
of his visitors. Among the papers of the Abate De Rossi is a letter
of this period (March 18th, 1812,) in which Mezzofanti introduces to
him a certain “Signor Moise Ber;” and, notwithstanding the variety of
orthography, (a variety quite natural in an Italian letter,) there can be
no doubt that this Signor Moise Ber was no other than Rabbi Moses Beer
of the Israelite University of Rome, whose Orations and Discourses have
since been published.[357]

       *       *       *       *       *

Mezzofanti’s opportunities of conversing with foreigners were much
increased by his becoming permanently attached to the Library of the
University (with which the Library of the Institute had been incorporated
by the French) as Deputy-Librarian. This appointment he received on the
28th of March, in 1812. As the chief librarian at this time was the
Abate Pozzetti, who, like Mezzofanti, was an honorary professor of the
University, and one of his most valued friends, the appointment was
especially agreeable to him: and, independently of its other advantages,
it became for him, as I said, from the constant passing and re-passing of
strangers from every country, a school in which he was able to exercise
himself, almost hourly, in every department of his multilingual studies.

The late Lord Guilford, who was Chancellor of the University of Corfu,
made his acquaintance during one of his visits to Bologna; and on every
subsequent occasion on which he passed through that city, Mezzofanti was
invariably his guest, accompanied by all the Greeks who chanced to be at
the time students of the University.

As his reputation extended, the literary societies of the various cities
of Italy were naturally desirous to number him among their members. He
was already an associate of the _Societá Colombina_ at Florence, and of
the “Society of Letters, Sciences, and Arts,” at Leghorn; and he received
about this time, the decoration of the Royal Order of the Two Sicilies.
The only literary society, however, in whose proceedings he took an
active part, was the Scientific Academy of the Institute of his native
city. It has been commonly supposed that he rarely, if at all, appeared
in the literary arena, and it is true that he has not left behind him
anything at all commensurate with his reputation; but he frequently read
papers, chiefly on philological subjects, in the Bolognese Academy. The
first of these which is noticed by Dr. Santagata was read on the 22nd of
July, 1813; and another, “On the Symbolic Paintings of the Mexicans,” was
delivered in the following session, on the 23rd of March, 1814. Owing
to his early association with several ex-Jesuit American Missionaries
who had settled in Bologna, he had long felt an interest in the curious
subject of Mexican Antiquities. Among his MSS., which still remain in the
possession of the Cavaliere Minarelli at Bologna, is a Mexican Calendar,
drawn up by Mezzofanti’s own hand, and illustrated with fac-similes of
the original pictures and symbolical representations from the pencil of
his niece, Signora Anna Minarelli; but of the paper read in the Academy,
no trace has been found.




CHAPTER V.

[1814-1817.]


The year 1814, so memorable in general history, was also an important one
in the humble fortunes of the Abate Mezzofanti.

The success of the papal cause in Italy naturally opened a new career to
the men against whom fidelity to the papal interest had long closed the
ordinary avenues to distinction.

In the close of 1813, the reverses, which, from the disastrous Russian
expedition, had succeeded each other with startling rapidity, at length
forced upon Napoleon the conviction that he had overcalculated the
endurance of the people of France. He now learned, when too late, that
the reckless expenditure of human blood with which his splendid successes
were purchased, had brought sorrow and suffering to every fireside in
every hamlet through his wide empire, and that the enormous levies which
he still continued to demand, and which were called out only to perish
in the fruitless contest with his destiny, consummated the popular
discontent. No longer, therefore, in a position to brave the public
reprobation with which his treatment of Pius VII. had been visited,
he found it necessary to restore the semblance of those more friendly
relations which he had maintained with him in the less openly ambitious
stage of his career. Accordingly, although among the provisions of the
extorted Concordat of Fontainebleau, there was none to which Napoleon,
in his secret heart, clung more tenaciously than the renunciation which
it implied on the part of the Pontiff of the sovereignty of Rome, he
found it necessary, notwithstanding, to yield so far to public sympathy
as to issue an order for the Pope’s immediate return to Italy, dated the
22nd of January, 1814. This measure, nevertheless, had evidently been
extorted from his fears; and, as he desired nothing from it beyond the
effect which he expected it to produce on the public mind, he contrived
that upon various pretences the Pope’s progress should be interrupted
and delayed. For a short time, too, the varying success with which the
memorable campaign of 1814 commenced; the opening of the Congress of
Chatillon; the conclusion of the armistice of Lusigny;—all served to
re-animate his sinking hopes. Thus the Pope was detained day after day,
week after week, in the south of France, until the close of the Emperor’s
death struggle, by the capitulation of Paris; when Pius VII. was at
length set free to return to his capital, by an order of the provisional
government, dated the 2nd of April, 1814.

Within a few days after the communication of this order, Pius VII.
reached Bologna. Among the ecclesiastics who there hastened to offer
homage to their restored sovereign, there were few who could approach
his throne with a fuller consciousness of unsullied loyalty, or who could
present more unequivocal evidences of the truth and sincerity of the
allegiance which they tendered, than the ex-Professor Mezzofanti, driven
from his chair because he refused to compromise his loyalty even by an
indirect recognition of the Anti-Papal government, and only restored,
when, after the concordat of 1801, the occupation of the Legations had
been acquiesced in by the Pontificial government itself, he had a second
time suffered the penalty of loyalty in a similar deprivation. It will
easily be believed, therefore, that, in the more than gracious reception
accorded to him by the Pontiff, a feeling of grateful recognition of
his fidelity and of sympathy with the sacrifices which he had made, was
mingled with undisguised admiration of his talents and acquirements.

Hence the first impulse of this munificent pope was to attach to his
own immediate service a scholar who was at once eminent for learning,
distinguished by piety, by priestly zeal, and by loyalty in the hour of
trial, unstained even by the slightest compromise. The re-construction of
the various Roman tribunals and congregations which, during the captivity
of the Pope and Cardinals, had been, for the most part, suspended,
suggested an opportunity of employing, with marked advantage for the
public service, the peculiar talents which seemed almost idly wasted in
the obscurity of a provincial capital. The halls and public offices of
Rome had been the school or the arena of all the celebrated linguists of
the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries; and the very constitution of
the congregation and college, “De Propaganda Fide,” appeared specially to
invite the services of one so eminent in that department. Accordingly,
Pius VII. surprised the modest Abate by an invitation to accompany him
to Rome, and proposed for his acceptance the important office of the
secretaryship of the Propaganda[358]—one of those so called _poste
cardinalizie_, which constitute the first step in the career towards the
cardinalate.

Mezzofanti was deeply affected by this mark of the favour and confidence
of his sovereign. Independently, too, of these flattering considerations,
and of the advantages of rank and fortune which it involved, the mere
residence in Rome, and especially in the Propaganda—the great polyglot
centre of the ancient and modern world—had many attractions for a
student of language so enthusiastic and indefatigable. It was a proud
thought, moreover, to follow in the track of Ubicini, and Giorgi, and
Piromalli, and the Assemani’s. But his modesty was proof against all
these temptations. He shrank from the responsibility which this great
office involved;—and, with the every expression of gratitude for so
distinguished an honour, he declined to exchange the quiet and seclusion
of his life at Bologna, for the more brilliant, but far more anxious
position held out for his acceptance at Rome.

Not content, however, with personal solicitations, the Pope employed
Cardinal Consalvi to use his influence with Mezzofanti. But it was to no
purpose. The humble Abate could not be induced to leave his native city.
The only mark of favour, therefore, which remained at the disposal of
the pontiff, was one which Mezzofanti prized infinitely beyond the more
solid, as well as more brilliant, offer which awaited him at Rome,—his
re-establishment in the Professorship of Oriental Languages. He was
formally restored on the 28th of April, 1814,[359] a few days after the
departure of the Pope from Bologna.

There is no doubt that on this occasion, as on that of his declining
the invitation to Paris several years earlier, he was much influenced
by those considerations, arising from his relations to the children of
his sister, to which I already alluded, his presence in Bologna being
now more than ever necessary for the completion of their education.
Indeed this was now the chief family duty which bound him to Bologna; for
his father, who had survived his mother by several years, died, at the
advanced age of eighty-one, in April, 1814, during the visit of Pius VII.
to that city.

       *       *       *       *       *

The few notices of the Abate Mezzofanti which we have met up to
this period, are derived almost exclusively from Bolognese, or at
least Italian sources. During the long continental war, the ordinary
intercourse with Italy was, in great part, suspended, and few tourists,
especially of the literary class, visited the north of Italy. But the
cessation of hostilities in the spring of 1814, re-opened the long
interrupted communication, and the annual stream of visitors to Rome
and Naples again began to flow, with its wonted regularity, through the
cities of the north. Few of the tourists who published an account of
their travels at this date failed to devote some of their pages to one
who had now become one of the chief “sights” of his native city. It is
hardly necessary to say, that, in some instances, these accounts are but
the echoes of popular fame, and exhibit the usual amount of ignorance,
credulity, and superficial information, which characterise “travellers’
tales.” But very many, also, will be found to contain the judgment of
acute, learned, and impartial observers; many of them are the result
of a careful and jealous scrutiny of Mezzofanti’s attainments, made by
critics of indisputable capacity; most of them will be admitted to be of
unquestionable value, as to one point at least—Mezzofanti’s familiarity
with the native language of each particular traveller; and all, even the
least solid among them, are interesting, as presenting to us, with the
freshness of contemporary narrative, the actual impressions received by
the writer from his opportunities of personal intercourse with the great
linguist.

I have collected from many sources, published[360] and unpublished,
a variety of these travellers’ notices, which I shall use freely in
illustrating the narrative of the remaining years of the life of
Mezzofanti. I shall be careful, however, in all that regards the critical
portion of the biography, and especially in estimating the actual
extent of Mezzofanti’s linguistic attainments, only to rely, for each
language, on the authority of one who, either as a native, or at least an
unquestioned proficient in that particular language, will be admitted to
be a perfectly competent judge in its regard.

The autumn of the year 1814 supplies one such notice, which is
remarkable, as the first direct testimony to Mezzofanti’s proficiency
in speaking German. He had learned this language in boyhood; and it is
clear from his letters to De Rossi, and from the books to which he freely
refers in that correspondence, that he was intimately acquainted with it
as a language of books. But in this year we are able for the first time
to test his power of speaking German by the judgment of a native.

The writer in question is a German tourist, named Kephalides, professor
in the University of Breslau,[361] who (as may be inferred from his
alluding to the Congress of Vienna, as just opened) visited Bologna
in the October or November of 1814. “The Professor Abate Mezzofanti,”
writes this traveller, who met him in the Library, “speaks German with
extraordinary fluency, although he has never been out of Bologna. He is a
warm admirer, too, of the literature of Germany, especially its poetry;
and he has stirred up the same enthusiasm among the educated classes in
Bologna, both gentlemen and ladies.”[362] We learn incidentally, too,
from this writer’s narrative, that German was among the languages which
Mezzofanti taught to his private pupils. In a rather interesting account
of an interview which he had with old Father Emmanuel Aponte, (one of
Mezzofanti’s first instructors,) and with the celebrated lady-professor
of Greek, so often referred to, Clotilda Tambroni, Kephalides mentions
that the youth whom Mezzofanti sent to conduct him to Aponte was one of
his own pupils, who had just begun to “lisp German.” Strangely enough,
nevertheless, Kephalides does not allude to any other of Mezzofanti’s
languages, nor even to his general reputation as a linguist of more than
ordinary attainments.

In the commencement of the year 1815, the chief Librarianship of the
University became vacant by the death of Father Pompilio Pozzetti.
Pozzetti was one of the congregation of the _Scuole Pie_, and in earlier
life had been Librarian of that Ducal Library at Modena, which Tiraboschi
has made familiar to every student of Italian literature. From the time
of his appointment as Prefect of the Bologna Library, a close intimacy
had subsisted between him and Mezzofanti; and on the latter’s being
named his assistant, this intimacy ripened into a warm friendship.
Mezzofanti was at once appointed as his successor, on the 25th of April,
1815.[363] In the letter in which (May 15th,) he communicated his
appointment to his friend, Pezzana, who held the kindred office at Parma,
he speaks in terms of the highest praise of his predecessor and of the
services which he had rendered during his tenure of office, and deplores
his death as a serious loss to the institution.

The revenue of this office, which he held conjointly with his
professorship, (although both salaries united amounted to a very
moderate sum)[364] placed the Abate Mezzofanti in comparatively easy
circumstances, and for the first time above the actual struggle for
daily bread. That he still continued, nevertheless, to instruct pupils
in private, need hardly be matter of surprise, when it is remembered
that, as we have seen, the support of no less than ten individuals was
dependent upon his exertions.[365]

Indeed, once released from the sordid cares and excessive drudgery of
tuition to which his earlier years had been condemned,—

    The starving meal, and all the thousand aches
      Which patient merit of the unworthy takes—

the exercise of teaching was to him rather an enjoyment than a labour.
After his removal to the Vatican Library, and even after his elevation to
the Cardinalate, we shall find it his chief, if not his only, relaxation.
Few men have possessed in a higher degree the power of winning at
once the confidence and the love of a pupil. The perfect simplicity
of his character—his exceeding gentleness—the cheerful playfulness of
his manner—the total absence of any seeming consciousness of superior
attainments—his evident enjoyment of the society of the young, and
above all the unaffected goodness and kindness of his disposition,
attracted the love of his youthful friends, as much as his marvellous
accomplishments challenged their admiration. It is only just to add that
he repaid the affection which he thus invariably won from them by the
liveliest interest in all that regarded their progress, and a sincere
concern for their happiness which followed them in every stage of their
after life.

By degrees, too, he was beginning, in the natural advance of years, to
enjoy the best fruit of the labour of instruction, in the success, and
even distinction, attained by his quondam pupils. One of these to whom he
was especially attached, the young Marchese Angelelli, had passed through
the University with much honour; and, in the beginning of 1815, published
anonymously a metrical translation of the Electra of Sophocles, which met
with very marked favour. Mezzofanti who was much gratified by the success
of this first essay, communicated to his friend Pezzana the secret of
the authorship. “I send you,” he writes, May 8, 1815, “a first essay in
translation from the Greek, published by an able pupil of mine, whose
modesty has not permitted him to put his name to his work. From you,
however, I make no secret of it. The author is one of our young nobles,
the Marchese Maximilian Francis Angelelli, an indefatigable cultivator
of every liberal study. I may add, as there is no danger of its reaching
the ears of the modest translator, that this first effort is only the
beginning of greater things. You will accept a copy for yourself, and
place the other in your library, which I am happy to know grows daily,
both in extent and reputation, through the care of its librarian, no less
than by his distinguished name.”

This first essay of the young poet was followed in the next year by
a further publication, containing the Electra, the Antigone, and the
Trachiniæ; and, a few years later, his master had the gratification of
witnessing the successful completion of his favourite pupil’s task,
by the publication of the entire seven tragedies of Sophocles, in
1823-4.[366]

One effect of Mezzofanti’s appointment as librarian was to separate him
somewhat from his sister and her family. He occupied thenceforward the
apartments of the librarian in the Palace of the University. But he still
continued towards them the same affectionate protection and support.
Hitherto he had himself in part superintended or directed the education
of his nephews, and especially of his namesake Joseph, a youth of much
promise, whose diligence and success fully requited his uncle’s care.
Joseph had made choice of the ecclesiastical profession; and, although
falling far short of his uncle’s extraordinary gift, he became an
excellent linguist, and was especially distinguished as a Greek and Latin
scholar; so that his uncle had the satisfaction, when his own increasing
occupations compelled him to diminish the number of his pupils, of
finding the young Minarelli fully competent to undertake a portion of the
charge.

His first public appearance at the Academy after he entered upon his new
office, was for the purpose of reading, (July 11th, 1815,) a paper “On
the Wallachian Language and its Analogies with Latin;”—a subject which
has engaged the attention of philologers and historians from the days
of Chalcocondylas, and which involves many interesting ethnological, as
well as philological considerations.[367] As we shall find him, a few
years later, astonishing a German visitor by his familiarity with this
out-of-the-way language, it is worth while to note this essay, as an
evidence that here, too, his knowledge was the result of careful study,
and not of casual opportunity, or of sudden inspiration.

For a considerable time after he took charge of the Library, he seems
to have been much occupied by his duties in connexion with it. The only
letter which I have been able to obtain about this period, one addressed
to Pezzana, March 5th, 1816, is entirely occupied with details regarding
the library; and M. Manavit mentions that he not only obtained from the
authorities a considerable addition to the funds appropriated to the
purchase of books, but, moreover, devoted no trifling share of his own
humble resources to the same purpose.[368] In the course of a few months,
too, he was quite at ease in his new pursuit; and the familiarity with
the contents of the library, and even of the position of particular books
upon its shelves which he soon possessed, would, in a person of less
prodigious memory, have been a subject of wonder. His nephew, Cavaliere
Minarelli of Bologna, was present on one occasion when Professor Ranzani,
while passing an evening in the librarian’s apartments, happened to
require some rare volume from the library; and, though it was dark at the
time, Mezzofanti left the room without a light, proceeded to the library,
and in a few moments returned with the volume required.

In July, 1816, Mezzofanti read at the Academy an essay “on the Language
of the Sette Communi at Vicenza,” which has been spoken of with much
praise. This singular community—descended from those stragglers of the
invading army of Cimbri and Teutones which crossed the Alps in the
year of Rome, 640, who escaped amid the almost complete extermination
of their companions under Marius, and took refuge in the neighbouring
mountains—presents, (like the similar Roman colony on the Transylvanian
border,) the strange phenomenon of a foreign race and language preserved
unmixed in the midst of another people and another tongue for a space of
nearly two thousand years. They occupy seven parishes in the vicinity
of Vicenza,[369] whence their name is derived; and they still retain
not only the tradition of their origin, but the substance, and even the
leading forms of the Teutonic language; insomuch that Frederic IV.,
of Denmark, who visited them in the beginning of the last century,
(1708,) discoursed with them in Danish, and found their idiom perfectly
intelligible.[370]

This was a theme peculiarly suited to Mezzofanti’s powers. His essay
excited considerable interest at the time, but unfortunately was never
printed.




CHAPTER VI.

[1817-1820.]


Southey, in one of his pleasant gossiping letters to Bedford, tells that
when M. de Sagrie was going to publish a French translation of Southey’s
“Roderick,” his publisher, Le Bel, insisted upon having a life of the
poet prefixed. M. de Sagrie objected; and at last, in order to get rid of
the printer’s importunities, said that he knew nothing whatever of the
life of Mr. Southey. “N’importe!” was the printer’s cool reply, “Ecrivez
toujours, brodez! Brodez-la un peu; que ce soit vrai ou non, ce ne fait
rien.”[371]

We have come to a part of Mezzofanti’s quiet and uniform life in which
there are so few incidents to break the monotony of the uneventful
narrative, that, at least in so far as its interest is concerned, his
biographer is almost in the same condition with M. de Sagrie. The true
purpose of this narrative, however—to exhibit the faculty rather than the
man—seems to me to depend less on the accumulation of piquant anecdotes
and striking adventures, than upon a calm and truthful survey of his
intellectual attainments in the successive stages of his career. Instead,
therefore, of having recourse to the device suggested by De Sagrie’s
enterprising publisher, and supplying, by a little ingenious “broderie,”
the deficiency of exciting incident, I shall content myself with weaving
together, in the order of time, the several notices of Mezzofanti, by
travellers and others, which have come within my reach; interspersing
such explanations, incidents, illustrations, and anecdotes, as I have
been able to glean, among the scanty memorials of this period which
have survived. Fortunately, from the year which we have now reached,
there exists a tolerably connected series of such sketches. They are, of
course, from the most various hands—from authors

          of all tongues and creeds;—
    Some were those who counted beads,
    Some of mosque, and some of church,
    And some, or I mis-say, of neither;—

but their value, it need hardly be said, is enhanced by this very
variety. Proceeding from so many independent sources, produced for the
most part, too, upon the spot, and in the order of time in which they
appear in the narrative;—these unconnected sketches may be believed to
present, if a less minute and circumstantial, certainly a more vivid as
well as more reliable, portraiture of Mezzofanti, than could be hoped
even from the daily scrutiny of familiar friends, intimately conversant
with his every day life, but always viewing his character from the same
unvarying point, and rather submitting the result of their own matured
observations of what Mezzofanti seemed to them to be, than affording
materials for a calm and dispassionate estimate of what he really was.
Nor must it be forgotten that no single chronicler, even had he the
circumstantiality of a Boswell, could be capable of keeping a record
of Mezzofanti’s life, which could be available as the foundation of a
satisfactory judgment as to the real extent and nature of his linguistic
accomplishment. It is only another Mezzofanti who would be a competent
witness on such a question; and, in default of a single Polyglot critic
of his attainments in all the languages which he is supposed to have
known, we shall best consult the interests of truth and science, by
considering severally, in reference to each of these languages, the
judgment formed regarding his performance therein by those whose native
language it was.

I have already said that the office of librarian brought him into contact
with most of the strangers, especially of the literary class, who visited
Bologna. In Bolognese society, too, he was more courted and sought after
than his modest and retiring disposition would have desired. In the house
of the Cardinal-Archbishop Opizzoni, and of the Cardinal Legates, Lanti,
and Spina, he was always an honoured guest. With several of the noble
families of the city, especially the Marescalchi, the Angelelli, the
Amerini, and the Zambeccari, he lived on terms of the closest intimacy.
The Cavaliere Pezzana mentions that when, on a visit to Bologna in 1817,
he was dining at the first named palace, Mezzofanti came in uninvited,
and almost as one of the family. At all these houses his opportunities of
meeting foreigners of every race and language may easily be believed to
have been frequent, and of the most various character.

The earliest English visitor of the Abate Mezzofanti whom I have been
able to discover is Mr. Harford, author of the recent “Life of Michael
Angelo Buonarroti,”[372] and proprietor of the valuable gallery of
Blaise Castle, which Dr. Waagen describes in his “Treasures of Art in
England.”[373]

Mr. Harford visited Bologna in the autumn of 1817, at which time he first
made Mezzofanti’s acquaintance. He renewed the acquaintance subsequently
at Rome, and on both occasions had a full opportunity of observing and
of testing his extraordinary gift of language. Mr. Harford has kindly
communicated to me his recollections of Mezzofanti at both these periods
of life, which, (although the latter part anticipates the order of time
by nearly thirty years,) may most naturally be inserted together.

    “I first made the acquaintance of the Abbé Mezzofanti,” writes
    Mr. Harford, “at the table of Cardinal Lanti, brother of the
    Duke of Lanti, then Legate of Bologna. This was in the year
    1817. The Cardinal was then living at the public palace at
    Bologna, but I had previously known him in Rome. He was a man
    of highly cultivated mind, and of gentlemanly and agreeable
    manners. He made his guests perfectly at their ease, and I
    well recollect, after dinner, forming one of a group around
    Abbé Mezzofanti, and listening with deep interest to his
    animated conversation, which had reference, in consequence
    of questions put to him, to various topics, illustrating
    his wonderful acquaintance with the principal languages of
    the world. Report, at this time, gave him credit for being
    master of upwards of forty languages; and I recollect, among
    other things, his giving proof of his familiar acquaintance
    with the Welsh. I had some particular conversation with him
    upon the origin of what is called Saxon, Norman, and Lombard
    architecture, and I remember his entire accordance with the
    opinion I threw out, that it resolved itself in each case into
    a corruption of Roman architecture.

    “My next interview with him was after a long lapse of time,
    for I did not meet him again till the year 1846, the winter
    of which I passed in Rome. The Abbé was then changed into the
    Cardinal Mezzofanti. I found him occupying a handsome suite
    of apartments in a palazzo in the Piazza Santi Apostoli. He
    assured me he well remembered meeting Mrs. H. and myself at
    Cardinal Lanti’s, on the occasion above referred to; and
    in the course of several visits which I paid him during
    the winter and ensuing spring, his conversation was always
    animated and agreeable. He conversed with me in English, which
    he spoke with the utmost fluency and correctness, and only
    with a slight foreign accent. His familiar knowledge of our
    provincial dialects quite surprised me. ‘Do you know much of
    the Yorkshire dialect?’ he said to me: and then, with much
    humour, gave me various specimens of its peculiarities; ‘and
    your _Zummersetshire_ dialect,’ he went on to say, laughing as
    he spoke, and imitating it.

    “On another occasion he spoke to me with high admiration of the
    style of Addison, preferring it to that of any English author
    with whom he was acquainted. He commended its ease, elegance,
    and grace; and then contrasted it with the grandiloquence of
    Johnson, whose powerful mind and copious fancy he also greatly
    admired, though he deemed him much inferior in real wit and
    taste to Addison. In all this I fully agreed with him; and then
    inquired whether he had ever read Boswell’s Life of Johnson,
    and, finding he had not, I told him he must allow me to send
    it to him, as I felt assured, from the interest he displayed
    in our English literature, it would much amuse and delight him.
    This promise I subsequently fulfilled.[374]

    “Speaking to me about an English lady with whom I was well
    acquainted, he eagerly inquired, ‘_Is she a blue-stocking?_’

    “He one day talked to me about the Chinese language and its
    difficulties, and told me that some time back a gentleman
    who had resided in China visited him. ‘I concluded,’ he
    added, ‘that I might address him in Chinese, and did so;—but,
    after exchanging a few sentences with me, he begged that we
    might pursue our conversation in French. We talked, however,
    long enough for me to discover that he spoke in _the Canton
    dialect_.’

    “That one who had never set his foot out of Italy should be
    thus able in an instant to detect the little peculiarities of
    dialect in a man who had lived in China, did, I acknowledge,
    strike me with astonishment.

    “This sort of critical sagacity in languages enabled the
    Cardinal to render important services to the Propaganda College
    at Rome, in which he held a high office. I was not only struck
    with the fluency, but with the rapidity with which he spoke
    the English language, and, I might also add, the idiomatic
    correctness of his expressions.

    “So much of celebrity attached itself to his name that
    foreigners of distinction gladly sought occasions of making
    his acquaintance. On being ushered into his presence on one of
    my visits I found him surrounded by a large party of admirers,
    including several ladies, who all appeared highly delighted
    with his animated conversation.”

We shall have other opportunities of adverting to his curiously minute
acquaintance, not only with English literature, but even with the
provincial dialects of English, by which Mr. Harford was so much struck.
But, as some difference of opinion has been expressed with regard to his
acquaintance with Welsh, I think it right to note the circumstance that
Mr. Harford distinctly remembers him, as early as 1817, to have given
“proofs of familiar acquaintance” with that language.[375]

Somewhat later in the same year, November, 1817, Mr. Stewart Rose visited
Mezzofanti. The ordeal to which his linguistic powers were submitted in
Mr. Rose’s presence was more severe and more varied than that witnessed
by Mr. Harford; the former having heard him tried in German, Greek, and
Turkish, as well as in English. But as we shall have abundant independent
testimony for each of these, Mr. Rose’s testimony is specially important,
as recording the exceeding accuracy of Mezzofanti’s English, which he
tested by “long and repeated conversations.”

“As this country,” he writes, “has been fertile in every variety of
genius, from that which handles the pencil to that which sweeps the
skies with the telescope; so even in this, her least favourite beat,
she has produced men who, in early life, have embraced such a circle of
languages, as one should hardly imagine their ages would have enabled
them to obtain. Thus the wonders which are related of one of these, Pico
di Mirandola, I always considered fabulous, till I was myself the witness
of acquisitions which can scarcely be considered less extraordinary.

“The living lion to whom I allude is Signor Mezzofanti of Bologna, who
when I saw him, though he was only thirty-six years old, read twenty
and wrote eighteen languages. This is the least marvellous part of the
story. He spoke all these fluently, and those of which I could judge
with the most extraordinary precision. I had the pleasure of dining with
him formerly in the house of a Bolognese lady, at whose table a German
officer declared he could not have distinguished him from a German. He
passed the whole of the next day with G—— and myself, and G— told me he
should have taken him for an Englishman, who had been some time out of
England. A Smyrniote servant who was with me, bore equal testimony to
his skill in other languages, and declared he might pass for a Greek or
a Turk in the dominions of the Grand Seignior. But what most surprised
me was his accuracy; for, during long and repeated conversations in
English, he never once misapplied the _sign_ of a tense, that fearful
stumblingblock to Scotch and Irish, in whose writings there is always to
be found some abuse of these undefinable niceties. The marvel was, if
possible, rendered more marvellous by this gentleman’s accomplishments
and information, things rare in linguists, who generally mistake
the means for the end. It ought also to be stated that his various
acquisitions had all been made in Bologna, from which, when I saw him, he
had never wandered above thirty miles.”[376]

Mr. Rose was mistaken in supposing that Mezzofanti at this time was but
thirty-six years old. He was in reality forty-three; but the testimony
which he bears to his “general accomplishments and information” will be
found to be confirmed by very many succeeding travellers.

It was earlier in the same year, probably in June, on his return from
Rome to Venice,[377] that Lord Byron first saw Mezzofanti. The extract
given by Moore from his Journal, in which he describes the impressions
made upon him by their intercourse has no date attached; but as he
also alludes to Mezzofanti as among “the great names of Italy” in the
Dedication of the Fourth Canto of Childe Harold, which is dated January,
2nd, 1818, it would seem likely that he had met him at least before
that date.[378] Of the particulars of their intercourse no record is
preserved; but Mezzofanti always spoke with profound interest of his
noble visitor. He was perfectly familiar with his poetry. The late Dr.
Cox of Southampton assured me that his criticism of the several poems,
and especially of Childe Harold, would do credit to our best reviews. And
he often expressed the deepest regret for the early and unhappy fate, by
which this gifted man was called away while he still lay in the shadow
of that cold and gloomy scepticism which so often marred his better
impulses, and—

    Flung o’er all that’s warm and bright,
    The winter of an icy creed.

“Alas!” he one day said to M. Manavit, “that desolating scepticism which
had long oppressed his soul, was not natural to such a mind. Sooner or
later he would have awakened from it. And then it only remained for
him to open the most glorious page in his Childe Harold’s adventurous
Pilgrimage—that in which, reviewing all his doubts, his struggles, and
his sorrows, and laying bare the deep wounds of his haughty soul, he
should have sought rest from them all in the peaceful bosom of the faith
of his fathers.”[379]

Such a feeling as this on the part of Mezzofanti gives a melancholy
interest to the well-known passage, half laughing, half admiring, in
which Byron records his recollections of the great linguist.

“In general,” he says, “I do not draw well with literary men;—not that
I dislike them; but I never knew what to say to them, after I have
praised their last publication. There are several exceptions, to be
sure; but then they have either been men of the world, such as Scott and
Moore, &c., or visionaries out of it, such as Shelley, &c.; but your
literary every-day man and I never met well in company;—especially your
foreigners, whom I never could abide, except Giordani, &c., &c., &c., (I
really can’t name any other.) I don’t remember a man amongst them whom I
ever wished to see twice, except perhaps Mezzophanti, who is a monster
of languages, the Briareus of parts of speech, a walking polyglot, and
more;—who ought to have existed at the time of the Tower of Babel, as
universal interpreter.[380] He is, indeed, a marvel—unassuming also. I
tried him in all the tongues in which I knew a single oath or adjuration
to the gods, against post-boys, savages, Tartars, boatmen, sailors,
pilots, gondoliers, muleteers, camel-drivers, vetturini, post-masters,
post-houses, post, everything; and egad! he astounded me—even to my
English.”

The Abbé Gaume adds, in reference to the last of these languages, an
anecdote still current in Rome, though doubtless a mere exaggeration[381]
of the real story; viz., that, “when Byron had exhausted his vocabulary
of English slang, Mezzofanti quietly asked: ‘And is that all?’

‘I can go no further.’ replied the noble poet, ‘unless I coin words for
the purpose.’

‘Pardon me, my Lord,’ rejoined Mezzofanti; and proceeded to repeat for
him a variety of the refinements of London slang, till then unknown to
his visitor’s rich vocabulary!”[382]

During the winter of 1817-8, a literary society was formed in Bologna for
the cultivation of poetry and the publication of literary and scientific
essays, of which Mezzofanti was appointed president.

The original members of this body were twenty-one in number, and
included Ranzani, Angelelli, Mezzofanti’s nephew, Giuseppe Minarelli,
several professors, both of the University, and of the Academia delle
Belle Arti, and some literary noblemen and gentlemen of the city.
They met occasionally for readings and recitations; and printed a
serial collection, called _Opuscoli Letterarj di Bologna_. I had hopes
of learning something from the records of this society, or from the
recollections of its members, which might tend to illustrate the history
of Mezzofanti’s studies at this period: but, unhappily, not a single
original member of the society is now living; and their only publication
available for the purposes of this biography is Mezzofanti’s own
_Discorso in Lode del P. Aponte_;—his solitary publication, which was
printed in the _Opuscoli Letterarj_, in 1820.

Mezzofanti continued, even after the formation of this society, to
frequent the meetings of the Academy of the Institute. On the 3rd of
December, 1818, he read a paper in this Academy, “on a remarkable
Mexican MS., preserved in the Library of the Institute.” This paper
was most probably the basis of the Essay upon the Mexican Calendar
already alluded to. As it entered minutely into the whole subject of the
hieroglyphical writings of the Mexicans, and discussed at some length
the opinions of all the various writers on Mexican antiquities down to
Humboldt, the paper created very considerable interest in the Academy,
and was spoken of with praise by the literary journals of the day.[383]

The visit of the Emperor Francis I. of Austria to Bologna in 1819,
contributed still more to establish the reputation of Mezzofanti. Having
appointed an interview with him, the Emperor took the precaution of
securing during the audience the presence of a number of members of his
suite, carefully selected so as to represent the chief languages of the
Austrian Empire. Each in turn, German, Magyar, Bohemian, Wallachian,
Illyrian, and Pole, took occasion to address the astonished professor;
but although naturally somewhat startled by the novelty of the scene, and
perhaps abashed by the presence of royalty, he replied with such perfect
fluency and correctness to each, “as to extort not merely approval but
admiration and applause.”[384]

The year 1819 is further notable as the date of Mezzofanti’s only
published composition, the above-named panegyric of his early friend and
instructor Emanuel Aponte. The death of this excellent and venerable
man had occurred more than three years earlier, (November 22, 1815),
and his funeral oration had been pronounced by Filippo Schiassi, the
professor of numismatics, as also by Pacifico Deani, whose discourse
was translated into Spanish by Don Camillo Salina. Aponte’s grateful
pupil, nevertheless, took advantage of the opportunity afforded by
the opening of the public studies of the university, to offer his own
especial tribute to the piety and learning of the good old father, and
particularly to the excellence of his method of teaching the Greek
language and the merits of a Grammar which he had published for the use
of the higher schools.

The Discourse is chiefly occupied (after a sketch of Aponte’s life and
character) with a criticism of the method pursued in this Grammar,—a
criticism chiefly noticeable as embodying the method, (which we know from
other sources to have been the speaker’s own,) of studying a language
rather by rhythm than by rule; “by ascertaining its normal structure,
the principle which governs its inflexions, and especially the dominant
principle which regulates the changes of letters according to the
different organs of speech.”

As a specimen of this general manner of the Discourse, I shall translate
the concluding paragraphs,—the exhortation to the study of Greek
literature with which the professor takes leave of his audience.

    “And still shall these studies flourish, my dear young friends,
    perpetuated by you under the guidance of the instructions
    which Father Emanuel bequeathed to us. His method, which,
    in the acquisition of the language, rather exercises the
    reason than burdens the memory, and which makes good sense
    the chief basis for the right interpretation of an author,
    will assuredly conduct to the desired end that ardour which,
    on this solemn occasion, you feel renewed within you: an
    ardour so great that, had I to-day spoken solely of the
    difficulties and obstacles in the path of learning, it would,
    nevertheless, give you strength and courage to encounter and
    overcome them. Well, therefore, may we have confidence in
    you, and believe that you will preserve to your native land
    the fame achieved by your forefathers in Grecian studies.
    These studies are the special inheritance of our countrymen.
    In Italy the muses of Greece sought an asylum, when they fled
    before the invader from their ancient glorious abode. Learned
    Greeks were at that period dispersed through our principal
    cities, where, establishing schools, they found munificent
    patrons and zealous pupils. In Rome Grecian literature enjoyed
    the generous patronage of Nicholas V.; and around Cardinal
    Bessarion were gathered men of vast erudition, who renewed
    the lustre of the old Athenian schools, cultivating a wiser
    philosophy, however, than the ancients employed; and, thanks
    to the precious volumes accumulated by those two illustrious
    Mæcenases and by the princes of Italy; thanks to the skill of
    the masters and the aptitude and excellence of Italian genius,
    Grecian literature, conjointly with Latin, quickly attained
    the highest pitch of cultivation amongst us, ushering in the
    golden age of Italian letters. A countless series of names
    distinguished in this branch of learning presents itself before
    me: but I delight rather to consider in prospect the future
    series which begins in you. Be not disturbed by any fear
    that the pursuit to which I am exhorting you will hinder the
    profounder study of the sciences. Alas, very different are the
    thoughts, very different, indeed, the cares which distract the
    mind of youth and turn its generous fervour aside, miserably
    disappointing the bright hopes that were formed of it. No:
    theologians, lawyers, philosophers, physicians, mathematicians,
    all men of science and learning, have ever found in the Greek
    literature their most agreeable solace. Many of the sciences
    had, in Greece, early reached a high degree of perfection;
    others made a noble beginning in that country; most of them
    are embellished with titles borrowed from its language;
    and all of them have recourse to Greek when they wish, with
    precision and dignity, to denominate, and thereby to define,
    the objects of their consideration. ‘These studies,’ says one
    who owed much of his eloquence to the industry with which he
    cultivated them, ‘furnish youth with profitable and delightful
    knowledge; they amuse maturer years; they adorn prosperity,
    and in adversity afford an asylum from care; they delight us
    in the quiet of home, and are no hindrance in affairs of the
    gravest moment; they discover for us many a useful thing; for
    the traveller they procure the regard of strangers, and, in
    the solitude of the country, they solace the mind with the
    purest of pleasures.’ Let your main study, then, be the sterner
    sciences; Greek shall follow as a faithful companion, affording
    you useful assistance therein as well as delightful recreation.
    And thus, thinking of nothing else, having nothing else at
    heart, than religion and learning, let the expectations of your
    friends and of your country be fulfilled in you. Thus shall you
    correspond with the paternal designs of our best of princes,
    His Holiness, the Sovereign Pontiff, who, in his munificence
    and splendour, daily enlarges the dignity of this illustrious
    University, promoting, by wise provisions, your education and
    your glory. And, whilst you vigorously prosecute the career
    so well begun, while your love for Greek increases with the
    increasing profit you derive from it, I, too, will exult in
    your brilliant, progress. To this I will look for a monument,
    truly durable and immortal, of my dear Father Emanuel, to whom
    I feel myself bound by eternal gratitude; since gratitude,
    reverence, and devotion are surely due to them who, by example
    and by precept, point out to us the road to virtue and to
    learning, inviting and exhorting us, with loving solicitude,
    to direct our lives to praiseworthy pursuits and to true
    happiness.”[385] (pp. 22-26.)

Soon after the death of Father Aponte, Mezzofanti had the further grief
of losing his friend, the celebrated Signora Clotilda Tambroni, who,
although considerably older than he, had been, as we have seen, his
fellow pupil under Father Aponte, and with whom he had ever afterwards
continued upon terms of most intimate friendship. Like Mezzofanti, the
Signora Tambroni was, after the publication of the concordat, reinstated
in the Greek professorship from which she had been dispossessed at the
occupation of Bologna by the French. She was an excellent linguist,
being familiar with Greek, Latin, Spanish, French, and English,[386]
and a poetess of some reputation, not only in her own, but also in the
learned languages.[387] The Breslau professor, already referred to,
Herr Kephalides, was much interested by her conversation; and that
the interest which she created did not arise merely from the unusual
circumstance of a lady’s devoting herself to such studies, but from her
own unquestioned learning and ability, is attested by all who knew her.
“It was a pleasant thing,” says Lady Morgan,[388] “to hear her learned
coadjutor [Mezzofanti] in describing to us the good qualities of her
heart, do ample justice to the profound learning which had raised her
to an equality of collegiate rank with himself, without an innuendo at
that erudition, which, in England, is a greater female stigma than vice
itself.”

The lively but caustic authoress just named, visited Italy in 1819-20. In
her account of Bologna she devotes a note to the Abate Mezzofanti, under
whose escort, (which she recognises as a peculiar advantage,) she visited
the library and museum of the University.

“The well-known Abate Mezzofanti, librarian to the Institute,” she
writes, “was of our party. Conversing with this very learned person on
the subject of his ‘forty languages,’ he smiled at the exaggeration, and
said, that although he had gone over the outline of forty languages, he
was not master of them, as he had dropped such as had not books worth
reading. His Greek master, being a Spaniard, taught him Spanish. The
German, Polish, Bohemian, and Hungarian tongues he originally acquired
during the occupation of Bologna by the Austrian power; and afterwards
he had learned French from the French, and English by reading and
by conversing with English travellers. With all this superfluity of
languages, he spoke nothing but Bolognese in his own family. With us, he
always spoke English, and with scarcely any accent, though I believe he
has never been out of Bologna. His tone of phrase and peculiar selection
of words were those of the ‘Spectator;’ and it is probable that he was
most conversant with the English works of that day. The Abate Mezzofanti
was professor of the Greek and Oriental languages under the French: when
Buonaparte abolished the Greek professorship, Mezzofanti was pensioned
off. He was again made Greek professor by the Austrians, again set aside
by the French, and again restored by the Pope.”[389]

Like most of Lady Morgan’s sketches, this account of Mezzofanti, although
interesting, is not free from inaccuracies. Thus she falls into the
common error already noticed, that Mezzofanti up to this time “had never
been out of Bologna,” and a still more important mistake as to the cause
of his first deprivation of his professorship. He was dispossessed of
this professorship, (which, it may be added, was not of Greek but of
Arabic,) not because the professorship was suppressed, but because he
declined to take the oaths to the new government. The account of his
second deprivation is also inaccurate; and the assertion that he never
cultivated any languages except those which “had books worth reading,” we
shall see hereafter, to be entirely without foundation.

The statement too, that “he spoke only Bolognese in his own family” is
an exaggeration. With the elder members of the family—his father, his
mother, and his sister, Signora Minarelli—it was so; and there was a
cousin of his, named Antonia Mezzofanti, a lively and agreeable old dame,
and a frequent guest at the house of his sister, to whom he was much
attached, and with whom he delighted to converse in the pleasant dialect
of Bologna. But the children of his sister were all well educated,
and, like the educated classes throughout all the provincial cities of
Italy, habitually spoke the common and classical Italian language. Even
after Mezzofanti came to Rome, when questioned as to the number of
languages that he spoke, he often used jestingly to reply: “fifty, and
Bolognese.”[390]

Very nearly at the same time with Lady Morgan’s interview, Mezzofanti was
visited by a tourist far more competent to form a just opinion of the
extent of his attainments—M. Molbech, a Danish scholar, author of a Tour
in Germany, France, England, and Italy. I shall close the chapter with
his testimony. It is chiefly valuable, in reference to his own language,
the Danish, in which he had an opportunity of fully testing Mezzofanti’s
knowledge, in an interview of nearly two hours’ duration. It is clear,
too, from the very tone of his narrative, that, while he carried away the
highest admiration for the extraordinary man whom he had seen, he was
by no means disposed to fall into that blind and indiscriminate eulogy
of which other less instructed and more imaginative visitors have been
accused.

    “At last, in the afternoon,” he writes, “I succeeded in meeting
    one of the living wonders of Italy, the librarian Mezzofanti,
    with whom I had only spoken for a few moments in the gallery,
    when I passed through Bologna before: I now spent a couple of
    hours with him, at his lodgings in the university building,
    and at the library, and would willingly, for his sake alone,
    have prolonged my stay at Bologna for a couple of days, if I
    had not been bound by contract with the vetturino as far as
    Venice. His celebrity must be an inconvenience to him; for
    scarcely any educated traveller leaves Bologna without having
    paid him a visit, and the hired guides never omit to mention
    his name among the first curiosities of the town. This learned
    Italian, who has never been so far from his birthplace,
    Bologna, as to Florence or Rome, is certainly one of the
    world’s greatest geniuses in point of languages. I do not know
    the number he understands, but there is scarcely any European
    dialect, whether Romanic, Scandinavian, or Slavonic, that this
    miraculous polyglottist does not speak. It is said the total
    amounts to more than thirty languages; and among them is that
    of the gipsies, which he learned to speak from a gipsy who was
    quartered with an Hungarian regiment at Bologna.

    “I found a German with him, with whom he was conversing in
    fluent and well sounding German; when we were alone, and I
    began to speak to him in the same language, he interrupted
    me with a question in Danish, ‘Hvorledes har det behaget dem
    i Italien?’ (‘How have you been pleased with Italy?’) After
    this, he pursued the conversation in Danish, by his own desire,
    almost all the time I continued with him, as this, according
    to his own polite expression, was a pleasure he did not often
    enjoy; and he spoke the language, from want of exercise,
    certainly not with the same fluency and ease as English or
    German, but with almost entire correctness. Imagine my delight
    at such a conversation! Of Danish books, however, I found in
    his rich and excellent philological collection no more than
    Baden’s Grammar, and Hallage’s Norwegian Vocabulary; and in
    the library Haldorson’s Icelandic Dictionary, in which he made
    me read him a couple of pages of the preface as a lesson in
    pronunciation. Our conversation turned mostly on Northern and
    German literature. The last he is pretty minutely acquainted
    with; and he is very fond of German poetry, which he has
    succeeded in bringing into fashion with the ladies of Bologna,
    so that Schiller and Goethe, whom the Romans hardly know by
    name, are here read in the original, and their works are to be
    had in the library. This collection occupies a finely-built
    saloon, in which it is arranged in dark presses with wire
    gratings, and is said to contain about 120,000 volumes. Besides
    Mezzofanti, there are an under librarian, two assistants, and
    three other servants. Books are bought to the amount of about
    1000 scudi, or more than 200_l._ sterling, a year. Mezzofanti
    is not merely a linguist, but is well acquainted with literary
    history and biography, and also with the library under his
    charge. As an author he is not known, so far as I am aware; and
    he seems at present to be no older than about forty. I must
    add, what perhaps would be least expected from a learned man
    who has been unceasingly occupied with linguistic studies, and
    has hardly been out of his native town, that he has the finest
    and most polished manners, and, at the same time, the most
    engaging good nature.”[391]

Herr Molbech is still the chief secretary of the Royal Library in
Copenhagen. He is one of the most distinguished writers on Danish
philology; his great Danish Dictionary[392] is the classical authority on
the language; and, in recognition of his great literary merits, he has
been created a privy councillor and a commander of the Danebrog order.




CHAPTER VII.

[1820-1828.]


Mezzofanti’s regular studies suffered some interruption in the early
part of 1820. Debilitated by the excessive and protracted application
which has been described, his health had for some time been gradually
giving way, and at last he was peremptorily ordered to suspend his
lectures, and to discontinue his private studies for six months.[393]
During this interval he employed himself chiefly in botanizing, a study
in which he is said to have made considerable progress. He also made a
short excursion to the beautiful district of Mantua, and afterwards to
Modena, Pisa, and Leghorn.[394] In the course of this journey he found
an opportunity of making himself acquainted with the Hebrew Psalmody
as followed in the modern synagogues, and with the practical system of
accentuation of the ancient Hebrew Language now in use among the Jews
of Italy. The object of his visit to Leghorn was, that, from the Greek
sailors of that port, he might acquire the pronunciation of modern
Romaic.[395]

After a short time his health was perfectly restored, with the exception
of a certain debility of sight from which he never afterwards completely
recovered; and he resumed his ordinary duties in the university about the
middle of the year 1820.

The solar eclipse of the 20th of September in that year attracted many
scientific visitors to Bologna and the neighbouring cities. Being annular
in that region, the eclipse was watched with especial interest by all the
astronomers of Northern Italy, by Plana at Turin, by Santini at Padua,
by Padre Inghirami at Florence, and by Padre Tinari at Siena. At Bologna
the director of the observatory at this time was Pietro Caturegli, editor
of the Bolognese _Efemeridi Astronomiche_, and one of Mezzofanti’s most
valued friends.

Caturegli’s reputation and the excellent condition of his observatory,
induced the celebrated Hungarian Astronomer, Baron Von Zach, who, after
a career of much and varied adventure, was at that time engaged in
editing at Genoa the Correspondance Astronomique, (a French continuation
of his former German Journal _Monatliche Correspondenz für Erz- und
Himmels-Kunde_,) to select Bologna as the place from which to observe
this interesting phenomenon. He was accompanied by a Russian nobleman,
Prince Volkonski, a man of highly cultivated literary and scientific
tastes, and by Captain Smyth of H. M. Ship, _Aid_, who had just completed
his survey of the Ionian Islands. Notwithstanding numerous and urgent
applications from other quarters, these three distinguished foreigners,
together with his friend Mezzofanti, were the only persons whom Caturegli
admitted to the observatory during his observations of the eclipse.

The Baron published in his Journal[396] a very full account of the
phenomena of the eclipse, to which he appended as a note the following
sketch of his companion on the occasion.

    “The annular eclipse of the sun,” he writes, “was one curiosity
    for us, and Signor Mezzofanti was another. This extraordinary
    man is really a rival of Mithridates; he speaks thirty-two
    languages, living and dead, in the manner I am going to
    describe. He accosted me in Hungarian, and with a compliment
    so well turned, and in such excellent Magyar, that I was
    quite taken by surprise and stupefied. He afterwards spoke
    to me in German, at first in good Saxon (the _Crusca_ of the
    Germans,) and then in the Austrian and Swabian dialects, with
    a correctness of accent that amazed me to the last degree,
    and made me burst into a fit of laughter at the thought of
    the contrast between the language and the appearance of this
    astonishing professor. He spoke English to Captain Smyth,
    Russian and Polish to Prince Volkonski, not stuttering and
    stammering, but with the same volubility as if he had been
    speaking his mother tongue, the dialect of Bologna. I was
    quite unable to tear myself away from him. At a dinner at the
    cardinal legate’s, Della Spina, his eminence placed me at table
    next him; after having chatted with him in several languages,
    all of which he spoke much better than I did, it came into my
    head to address to him on a sudden some words of Wallachian.
    Without hesitation, and without appearing to remark what an
    out-of-the-way dialect I had branched off to, off went my
    polyglot in the same language, and so fast, that I was obliged
    to say to him; ‘Gently, gently, Mr. Abbé; I really can’t follow
    you; I am at the end of my Latin-Wallachian.’ It was more than
    forty years since I had spoken the language, or even thought of
    it, though I knew it very well in my youth, when I served in an
    Hungarian regiment, and was in garrison at Transylvania. The
    professor was not only more ready in the language than I, but
    he informed me on this occasion, that he knew another tongue
    that I had never been able to get hold of, though I had enjoyed
    better opportunities of doing so than he, as I formerly had men
    that spoke it in my regiment.

    “This was the language of the Zigans, or Gipsies, whom the
    French so improperly call Bohemians, at which the good and
    genuine Bohemians, that is to say, the inhabitants of the
    kingdom of Bohemia, are not a little indignant. But how could
    an Italian abbé, who had never been out of his native town,
    find means to learn a language that is neither written nor
    printed? In the Italian wars an Hungarian regiment was in
    garrison at Bologna: the language-loving professor discovered a
    gipsy in it, and made him his teacher; and, with the facility
    and happy memory that nature has gifted him with, he was soon
    master of the language, which, it is believed, is nothing but a
    dialect, and a corrupted one into the bargain, of some tribes
    of Parias of Hindostan.”[397]

The wide and peculiar circulation of the journal in which this
interesting sketch appeared, contributed more than any previous notice to
extend the fame of Mezzofanti. As might naturally be expected, however,
details so marvellous, were received with considerable incredulity by
some, and were explained away by others as mere embellishments of a
traveller’s tale. In consequence, Von Zach, in a subsequent number of
his journal, not only reiterated the statement, but added fuller and more
interesting particulars regarding it.

    “Many persons have doubted,” he writes, “what we said of
    this astonishing professor of Bologna in our fourth volume;
    as there have also been persons who doubted what Valerius
    Maximus relates of the analogous talents of Cyrus and
    Mithridates. Although all historians have the character of
    being a little given to lying, Valerius, notwithstanding,
    passes for a sufficiently veracious author. He says in the
    eighth book and 9th chapter of his History, or rather of his
    Compendium of History: _Cyrus ommium militum suorum nomina,
    Mithridates duarum et viginti gentium quæ sub regno ejus
    erant linguas, ediscendo_. People who came several centuries
    after, and who probably did not know more than one language,
    and possibly not even that one correctly, have pretended that
    the twenty-two languages of Mithridates were only different
    dialects, and that Cyrus only knew the names of his generals.
    It may be so; we know nothing of the reality, and consequently
    shall not contradict those critics; but what we do know is,
    that Signor Mezzofanti speaks very good German, Hungarian,
    Slavonic, Wallachian, Russian, Polish, French and English. I
    have mentioned my authorities. It has been said that Prince
    Volkonski and Captain Smyth gave their testimony in favour
    of this wonderful professor, out of politeness only. But I
    asked the prince alone, how the professor spoke Russian, and
    he told me he should be very glad if his own son spoke it as
    well. The child spoke English and French better than Russian,
    having always been in foreign countries with his father. The
    captain said, ‘the professor speaks English better than I do;
    we sailors knock the language to pieces on board our vessels,
    where we have Scotch and Irish, and foreigners of all sorts;
    there is often an odd sort of jargon spoken in a ship; the
    professor speaks with correctness, and even with elegance; it
    is easy to see that he has studied the language.’

    “M. Mezzofanti came one day to see me at the hotel where I
    was staying: I happened not to be in my own rooms, but on a
    visit to another traveller who lodged in the same hotel, Baron
    Ulmenstein, a colonel in the King of Hanover’s service, who was
    travelling with his lady. M. Mezzofanti was brought to me; and,
    as I was the only person who knew him, I introduced him to the
    company as a professor and librarian of the university. He took
    part in the conversation, which was carried on in German; and,
    after this had gone on for a considerable time, the baroness
    took an opportunity of asking me aside, how it came to pass
    that a German was a professor and librarian in an Italian
    university. I replied, that M. Mezzofanti was no German,
    that he was a very good Italian, of that city of Bologna,
    and had never been out of it. Judge of the astonishment of
    all the company, and of the explanations that followed! My
    readers, I am sure, will not think such a testimony as the
    Baroness Ulmenstein’s open to any suspicion. She is a thorough
    German, highly cultivated, and speaks four languages in great
    perfection.”[398]

One result of the doubts thus expressed as to the credibility of Von
Zach’s report was to draw out a testimony to Mezzofanti’s familiarity
with a language for which he had not before publicly gotten credit, the
Czechish or Bohemian. A correspondent of the Baron at Vienna, having
read his statement in the _Correspondance_, expressed his satisfaction
at the confirmation which it supplied of what he had before regarded as
incredible.

    “I was very glad,” he writes, “to see confirmed by you what the
    Chevalier d’Odelga, colonel and commandant of Prince Leopold
    of Naples’ regiment, told me of that marvellous man. Chevalier
    d’Odelga, who is a Bohemian, conversed in that language with
    M. Mezzofanti, and assured me that he would have taken him for
    a countryman had he not known him to be an Italian. I frankly
    confess that until now, I only half believed the tale, for I
    regard the Bohemian language as the very rack of an Italian
    tongue.”[399]

Captain (afterwards admiral) Smyth, who accompanied Baron von Zach on
this occasion, still survives, after a career of high professional
as well as literary and scientific distinction. As a reply to the
incredulity to which Von Zach alludes, I may add not only that Admiral
Smyth in his “Cycle of Celestial Objects for the Use of Astronomers,”
adopts the Baron’s narrative and reprints it at length,[400] but that
his present recollections of the interview, which he has been so good as
to communicate to me, fully confirm all the Baron’s statements.[401] The
admiral adds that, although Mezzofanti made no claim to the character of
a practical astronomer, he understood well and was much interested in the
phenomena of the eclipse, and especially in its predicted annularity at
Bologna. “It was at Mezzofanti’s instance also,” he says, “that Caturegli
undertook to compute in advance the elements for an almanac for the use
of certain distant convents of the Levant, to aid them in celebrating
Easter contemporaneously.”[402]

Startling, therefore, as Von Zach’s account appeared at the time of its
publication, we can no longer hesitate to receive it literally and in its
integrity.

In reference to one part of it, that which regards the manner in which
Mezzofanti acquired the gipsy language—viz., “that he learned it from a
gipsy soldier in one of the Hungarian regiments quartered at Bologna,”
it is proper to observe, that he appears also, towards the end of his
life, to have studied this dialect from books. The catalogue of his
library contains two Gipsy Grammars, one in German, and one in Italian.
The peculiar idiom of this strange language in which he himself was
initiated, is that which prevails among the gipsies of Bohemia and
Hungary, or rather Transylvania, which is the purest of all the European
gipsy dialects, and differs considerably from that of the Spanish
gipsies. Borrow has given a short comparative vocabulary[403] of both,
and has also printed the Pater Noster in the Spanish gipsy form.

The notoriety which this and other similar narratives procured for
the modest professor, speedily rendered him an object of curiosity to
every stranger visiting Bologna; and as there was no want of critics
not unwilling to question, or at least to scrutinize, the truth of the
marvels recounted by their predecessors, it may easily be believed that
his life became in some sort a perpetual ordeal. Thus Blume, the author
of the _Iter Italicum_, who visited Bologna some time after Von Zach,
does not hesitate to take the Baron to task, and to declare his account
very much exaggerated.

    “Bianconi and Mezzofanti,” says Blume, “are the librarians.
    The latter, as is well known, is considered throughout all
    Europe as a linguistic prodigy, a second Mithridates; and is
    said to speak and write with fluency two-and-thirty dead and
    living languages. Willingly as I join in this admiration,
    especially as his countrymen usually display little talent
    for the acquisition of foreign tongues, I cannot but remark
    that the account recently given in the fourth and fifth
    volumes of Von Zach’s ‘Correspondance Astronomique,’ is very
    much exaggerated. Readiness in speaking a language should
    not be confounded with philological knowledge. I have heard
    few Italians speak German as well as Mezzofanti; but I have
    also heard him maintain that between Platt-Deutsch, or the
    Low German, and the Dutch language, there was no difference
    whatever.”[404]

It will be remarked here, however, that these condemnatory observations
of Herr Blume do not regard Mezzofanti’s attainments as a linguist, but
only his skill as a philologist. On the contrary, to his linguistic
talents Blume bears testimony hardly less unreserved than that which he
criticises in the Baron; and as regards the rest of Blume’s criticism,
the mistake in philology, (as to the identity of Platt-Deutsch with
Dutch,) which he alleges, and which appears to be the sole foundation
of his depreciatory judgment of Mezzofanti’s philological knowledge, is
certainly a very minor one, and one which may be very readily excused
in any other than a German; especially as Adelung (II. 261), distinctly
states of at least one dialect of Platt-Deutsch, that spoken in Hamburg
and Altona, that it contains a large admixture of Dutch words—so large
that a cursory observer, if we may judge from the specimens which
Adelung gives (II. 268), might very readily consider the two dialects
almost identical. As to another statement of Blume’s, which imputes to
Mezzofanti a want of courtesy to strangers visiting or studying in the
library, it is contradicted by the unanimous testimony of all who ever
saw him whether at Bologna or at Rome. He was politeness and good nature
itself.

But it must not be supposed that all the visits which Mezzofanti received
were of the character hitherto described, and were attended with no fruit
beyond a passing display of his wonderful faculty. Visitors occasionally
appeared, whose knowledge he was enabled to turn to profitable account
in extending his own store of languages. From an Armenian traveller
who came to Bologna in 1818, he received his first initiation in that
difficult and peculiar language, which he afterwards extended in a
visit to the celebrated convent of San Lazzaro, at Venice. He studied
Georgian with the assistance of a young man from Teflis, who graduated
in medicine at Bologna. And even from natives of those countries with
the general language of which he was most familiar, he seldom failed to
learn some of the peculiarities of local or provincial dialects by which
the several branches of each are distinguished. In this way he learned
Flemish from some Belgian students of the university. On the other hand,
select pupils from various parts came to attend his Greek or Oriental
lectures, or to pursue their linguistic studies privately under his
direction. One of these, the Abate Celestino Cavedoni, now librarian of
the Este Library at Modena, and one of the most eminent antiquarians
of Italy, was his pupil from 1816 till 1821. With this excellent youth
Mezzofanti formed a cordial friendship; and after Cavedoni’s return to
Modena, they maintained a steady and affectionate, although not very
frequent, correspondance until Mezzofanti’s final removal from Bologna.
Another was Dr. Liborio Veggetti, the present occupant of Mezzofanti’s
ancient office in the university library, an office which he owes to the
warm recommendation of his former master. A third was the still more
distinguished scholar, Ippolito Rosellini, the associate and successor
of Champollion in his great work on Egyptian antiquities. Rosellini,
who was a native of Pisa, had distinguished himself so much during his
early studies in that university, that, on the death of Malanima, the
professor of oriental languages, in 1819, Rosellini, then only in his
nineteenth year, was provisionally selected to succeed him. It was
ordered, nevertheless, that he should first prepare himself by a regular
course of study; and with this view he was sent, at the charge of his
government, to attend in Bologna the lectures of the great master of
oriental studies. Mezzofanti entered with all his characteristic kindness
and ardour into the young man’s project. He sent him with a warm letter
of recommendation, May 17, 1823, to his friend De Rossi, at Parma; later
in the same year, by the representation which he made of his industry
and progress, he obtained for him an increase of the pension which had
been assigned for his probationary studies; and in the work on the Hebrew
Vowel-points,’ which Rosellini published in Bologna,[405] he owed much to
the kind criticism and advice of his master. He remained at Bologna till
1824, when his appointment was made absolute, and he returned to Pisa to
enter upon its duties. The distinguished after career of Rosellini is
well-known. I shall only add, that through life he entertained the most
grateful recollection of his old master, and that, on his return from the
Egyptian expedition, he made a special visit to Rome for the purpose of
seeing him.[406]

The Abate Cavedoni, who, on his return to Modena, as we have seen,
continued to correspond for many years with Mezzofanti, has kindly
communicated to me those of Mezzofanti’s letters which he has preserved.
They contain some interesting particulars of a portion of his life
regarding which few other notices have been published.

In addition to his public lectures in the university and his occupation
as librarian, he still continued to give private instructions in
languages. Mr. Francis Hare, elder brother of the late Archdeacon Julius
Hare, learned Italian under his direction. The Countess of Granville,
then residing in the family of her aunt, the Countess Marescalchi,
remembers to have received her first lessons in English from him. A
young Franciscan of the principality of Bosnia prepared himself for his
mission by studying Turkish under his tuition. Many other foreigners
were among his pupils. Indeed, the ordinary routine of his day, as
detailed by one of his surviving friends in Bologna and confirmed by
his own letters to Cavedoni, may well excite a feeling of wonder at the
extraordinary energy, which enabled him, from the midst of occupations so
continuous and so varied, to steal time for the purpose of increasing,
or even of maintaining, the stores which he had already acquired. He
rose soon after four o’clock, both in winter and in summer; and, after
his morning prayer and meditation, celebrated mass—in winter at the
earliest light; after which he took a cup of chocolate or coffee. At
eight o’clock he gave his daily lecture in the university; thence he
passed to the library, where, as is plain from many circumstances, he
was generally actively engaged in the duties of his office, although
constantly interrupted by the visits of strangers. As his apartments were
in the library building, his occupations can hardly be said to have been
suspended by his frugal dinner, which, according to the national usage,
was at twelve o’clock, and from which he returned to the library. The
afternoon was occupied with his private pupils. As his habits of eating
and drinking were temperate in the extreme, his supper, (sometimes in his
own apartments, sometimes at the house of his sister or of some other
friend,) was of the very simplest kind. He continued his studies to a
late hour; and, even after retiring to bed, he invariably read for a
short time, till the symptoms of approaching sleep satisfied him that,
without fear of loss of time, he might abandon all further thought of
study.

Such were his ordinary every day occupations; and, amply as they may seem
to fill up the circle of twenty-four hours, he contrived, amidst them
all, to find time for many offices of voluntary charity. He was assiduous
in the confessional, and especially in receiving the confessions of
foreigners of every degree. For the spiritual care of all Catholic
foreigners, indeed, he seems to have been regarded as invested with
a particular commission. In cases of sickness, especially, he was a
constant and most cheerful visitor; and there are not a few still living,
of those that visited Bologna during these years, who retain a lively
and grateful recollection of the kindly attentions, and the still more
consolatory ministrations, for which they were indebted to his ready
charity.

Another extra-official occupation which absorbed a considerable portion
of his time, was the examination of books submitted to him for revision,
particularly of those connected with his favourite studies. It sometimes
happened that he received such commissions from Rome. “I cannot reckon,”
he writes, apologetically, to his friend the abate Cavedoni, “upon a
single free moment. The library, my professorship, my private lectures,
the revision of books, foreigners, well, sick, or dying, do not leave me
time to breathe. I am fast losing, nay I have already lost, the habit of
applying myself to study; and when, from time to time, I am called on to
do anything, I find myself reduced to the necessity of improvising.”

The most interesting record of this portion of his life will be the
series of his letters to his friend and pupil Cavedoni, already alluded
to. Unfortunately they are not numerous, and they occur at rather distant
intervals; but they are at least valuable as being perfectly simple and
unstudied, and free, to an extent very unusual in Italian correspondence,
from that artificial and ceremonious character which so often destroys in
our eyes the charm of the cleverest foreign correspondence. Cavedoni,
during his studies at Bologna, had lived on terms of the most cordial
intimacy with his professor and with his family. Mezzofanti’s nephews,
especially the young abate Joseph Mezzofanti, (whom we shall find
commemorated in some of these letters under the pet name _Giuseppino_,
_Joe_,) had been his constant companion and friend.

The first of these letters was written in reply to one of the ordinary
new-year’s complimentary letters, which the abate Cavedoni, soon after
his return to Modena, had addressed to his old professor.

                                        _Bologna, January 18, 1822._

    My most esteemed Don Celestino,

    I did not fail, on the first day of the new year, to pray with
    all my heart that God may ever bestow abundantly upon you His
    best and sweetest graces. May He deign to hear a prayer, which
    I shall never cease to offer! I commend myself in turn to your
    fervent prayers.

    I am delighted to hear that the abate Baraldi is about to
    employ his various learning and his great zeal so worthily in
    the cause of our holy religion. I shall be most happy to take
    a copy of the “_Memorie_,” which, as I am informed, are about
    to appear under his editorship. May I beg of you to arrange
    that the numbers shall reach me as early as possible after
    publication? They may be sent through the post; but it will be
    necessary to fold the packet in such a way as to let it be seen
    that it is a periodical, in order that it may not be charged
    the full postage. My great object is to receive the numbers at
    the earliest moment, in order that a work which is intended to
    counteract the irreligious principles now unhappily so current,
    may be read as extensively as possible.

    I shall examine your medal to-morrow, and, should I succeed in
    making anything out of it, I will write to you. Let me know how
    I shall send it back to you.

    Recollect that we are looking forward here to a visit from
    you with the utmost anxiety. It was a great surprise and
    disappointment to us, not to see you during the late holy
    festivals. Do not forget me, and believe me,

                  Ever your most affectionate servant,

                                               D. Joseph Mezzofanti.

The journal referred to in this letter is the now voluminous periodical,
“_Memorie di Religione, di Morale, e di Letteratura_,” founded at Modena
in 1822, and continued, with one or two short interruptions, up to the
present time. The “Abate Baraldi” was a learned ecclesiastic, afterwards
arch-priest of Modena.

Cavedoni, since his return to Modena, had been chiefly engaged in
archæological studies, and especially in that of numismatics. He
often consulted Mezzofanti on these subjects, to which, without being
a professed antiquarian, the latter had given some attention. In
acknowledgment of this obligation, Cavedoni, several years afterwards,
dedicated to him his Spiecilegio Numismatico.[407]

The following letter throws some light on the time and the manner in
which his attention was first turned to the Georgian language. The youth
to whom it refers was in Bologna in the year 1820 or 1821.

Cavedoni had apologised for occupying his time by his letters.

                                           _Bologna, April 5, 1823._

    My Dear Don Celestino,

    It will always be a most grateful and pleasing distraction
    for me in the midst of my endless occupations, to receive
    even a line from you. It is true that occasionally I may not
    be able to enjoy this gratification without the drawback
    arising from regret at not having it in my power to reply to
    you immediately; but I trust that you will be able to make
    allowance for me, and that such delays on my part will never
    cause you to suspect that I have ceased to remember you with
    special affection.

    Of the two works which you mention, that of Father Giorgi
    still maintains the reputation which its author commanded
    during life by his prodigious learning. Will you let me know
    whether the little work in Georgian that you refer to is
    printed or manuscript? You are quite right in supposing that I
    have not thought of that language since the departure of the
    young physician of Teflis, who took his medical degree in our
    university. Alas! what a large proportion of my life is spent
    in teaching! If I but did that well, I might be content; but
    when one does too much, he does nothing as it ought to be done.

    I had not heard a word of Signor Baraldi’s affliction, for
    which I am much concerned. I trust that, when you write again,
    you will have better news for me. Pray present my special
    compliments to the Librarian.

    Do not forget me; and, in order that I may know you do not,
    write often to assure me that it is so. Don Giuseppino sends
    you a thousand greetings, and I myself more than a thousand.

               Ever your most devoted servant and friend,

                                               D. Joseph Mezzofanti.

In this year, Mezzofanti made the acquaintance of the celebrated Duchess
of Devonshire, during one of her visits to the north of Italy. The
success of her magnificent edition of Horace’s Fifth Satire—his journey
to Brundusium—had suggested to her the idea of a similar edition of the
Eneid. The first volume, with a series of illustrations, scenical, as
well as historical, (of Troy, Ithaca, Gaeta, Gabii, &c.,) had appeared in
Rome in 1819;[408] and the object of the duchess in this visit, was to
procure sketches in the locality of Mantua, and especially a sketch of
Pietole, the supposed site of the ancient Andes, the place of the poet’s
birth, upon that plain,

    ————tardis ingens ubi flexibus errat
    Mincius.

One of Mezzofanti’s letters, addressed to his friend Pezzana, shews
the lengths to which this eccentric lady carried her zeal for the
illustration of this really magnificent work. Although the second volume
had been already published, and many of the copies had been distributed,
she continued to add to the number of the illustrations.

    “Her Grace, the duchess of Devonshire,” he writes, July 6th,
    1823, “on leaving Bologna, commissioned me to forward to you
    the second volume of the Eneid, translated by Caro. In order
    to secure its safe and punctual delivery, I begged the good
    offices of the Abate Crescini, who had just then arrived; and
    he at once undertook it with his usual courtesy. This edition
    has won the admiration of all our artists; and the duchess, not
    content with its present illustrations, has gone to Mantua,
    taking with her another excellent landscape-painter, our
    fellow-citizen, Signor Fantuzzi, to make a sketch of Pietole,
    to be added to the other plates, which already adorn this
    splendid work of art.”

In August, 1823, died the venerable Pope Pius VII. The desire, which, on
his return from captivity, he expressed to secure Mezzofanti’s services
in his own capital, had been repeated subsequently on more than one
occasion. The new Pope, Leo XII., regarded him with equal favour; but his
attachment to home still remained unchanged; and the Pope named him, in
1824, a member of the Collegio dei consultori at Bologna.

Of his correspondence during this year no portion has come into my hands;
but there is one of his letters of 1825, (dated April 8th,) which,
although it is but an answer to a commonplace letter written to him by
Cavedoni, with the catalogue of an expected sale of books, seems worthy
to be preserved, at least as an indication of the direction and progress
of his studies.

    “It is always difficult,” he writes, “to fix the fair price of
    a class of books which either are not in the market at all, or
    which appear but seldom for sale, chiefly because there are
    but few who seek for such publications. In my case, it becomes
    almost impossible to determine it, as I have no opportunity of
    seeing the books, and very little leisure even to examine the
    catalogue, being obliged to return it in so short a time.

    “I only venture, therefore, to select a few, which I should be
    disposed to take, provided the price of all together shall not
    exceed forty Roman crowns. Try to make a bargain for me, or at
    all events, endeavour to prevent the books from being either
    scattered or buried in some inaccessible corner.

    “I should wish then to take the following:—

    The ‘nine MSS., either extracted from printed books, or of
    uncertain value.’

    The ‘Grammatica Japonica,’ Romæ No. 22, in the Catalogue.

    The ‘Grammatica Marasta,’[409] number 32.

    The ‘Grammatica Linguæ Amharicæ,’[410] number 43.

    The ‘Osservazioni sulla Lingua albanese,’ number 44.

    The ‘Grammatica Damulica,’[411] number 46.

    Benjamin Schulz’s, ‘Grammatica Hindostanica,’ number 50.

    ‘Chilidugu; sive ses Chilenses,’[412] number 67.

    And the ‘Catecismo en Lengua Española y Moxa,’[413] No 71.

    I shall await your reply.”

Only one of these works, the “Observations on the Albanese Language,”
(by Francis Maria da Lecce,) appears in the catalogue of Mezzofanti’s
Library. Benjamin Schulz’s Tamul Bible and New Testament, are both in
that catalogue, but not his Hindostani Grammar. Probably the price of
the books exceeded the very modest limit which Mezzofanti’s humble means
compelled him to fix.

In the August of 1825, he had a visit from the veteran philologist and
_literateur_, Frederic Jacobs, of Gotha. The report of Jacobs may be
considered of special importance, as he had been prepared, by the doubts
expressed as to the credibility of Baron Von Zach’s report, to scrutinize
with some jealousy the real extent of the attainments thus glowingly
described. It is important, therefore, to note that after quoting all the
most material portions of Von Zach’s narrative, he fully confirms it from
his own observations—

    “I was most kindly received by him,” says Dr. Jacobs: “we spoke
    in German for above an hour, so that I had full opportunity for
    observing the facility with which he spoke; his conversation
    was animated, his vocabulary select and appropriate, his
    pronunciation by no means foreign, and I could detect nothing
    but here and there a little of the North German accent. He was
    not unacquainted with German literature, spoke among other
    things of Voss’s services in the theory of metre, and made
    some observations on the imitation of the metrical system of
    the ancients. His opinions were precise and expressed without
    dogmatism. This fault, so common among persons of talent,
    appears quite foreign to him, and there is not a trace of
    charlatanism about him.”

As a somewhat different opinion has been expressed by others, the reader
will observe the testimony borne by Jacobs, not only to Mezzofanti’s
scholarship and philological attainments in a department but little
cultivated, but also to the “selectness and appropriateness” of his
German vocabulary, the “facility with which he spoke,” and the general
purity and correctness of his conversational style.

He proceeds to describe another peculiarity of Mezzofanti’s extraordinary
faculty which is equally deserving of notice, but which no other visitor
whom we have hitherto seen, has brought out so strongly.

    “Not less remarkable are the ease and readiness with which
    he passes in conversation from one language to another, from
    the north to the south, from the east to the west, and the
    dexterity with which he speaks several of the most difficult
    together, without the least seeming effort; and whereas,
    in cognate languages, the slightest difference creates
    confusion;—so that, for instance the German in Holland or the
    Dutchman in Germany, often mixes the sister and mother tongues
    so as to become unintelligible;—Mezzofanti ever draws the
    line most sharply, and his path in each realm of languages is
    uniformly firm and secure.”

We may also add Professor Jacobs’ description of the personal appearance
of the great linguist at this period of his life.

    “Mezzofanti,” he says, “is of the middle size, or rather below
    it; he is thin and pale, and his whole appearance indicates
    delicacy. He appears to be between fifty and sixty years old
    [he was really, in 1825, fifty-one]; his movements are easy and
    unembarrassed; his whole bearing is that of a man who has mixed
    much in society. He is active and zealous in the discharge of
    his duties, and never fails to celebrate mass every day.”[414]

I have thought it necessary to draw the reader’s attention to these
points, in reference to Mezzofanti’s German, in order that he may compare
them with the observations of Dr. Tholuck, Chevalier Bunsen, Guido
Görres, and other distinguished Germans, who visited him at a later
period.

All his later letters to the Abate Cavedoni, which are filled with
apologies for his tardiness as a correspondent, tell the same story of
ceaseless occupation.

    “A Franciscan friar of the Bosnian province,” he writes,
    November 23rd, 1825, “who has been learning Turkish with me
    for the purposes of his mission in Bosnia, being on his way
    to Modena, has called to inquire whether I have any occasion
    to write to that city. The remorse which I feel at not having
    written to you for so long a time, makes it impossible for me
    to give a denial; and I write this letter, into which I wish
    I could crowd all the expressions of gratitude which I owe to
    you for your constant and faithful remembrance of one, who,
    although he certainly never forgets you, yet rarely gives you,
    at least in writing, the smallest evidence of his remembrance.

    The truth is that I should only be too happy to do so, and that
    it would seem to me but a renewal of the pleasant literary
    discussions which we used to hold with one another here. But
    unfortunately, I am too much occupied to indulge myself with
    this relaxation. I say this, however, only to excuse myself;
    for I assure you that I look eagerly for letters from you, and
    that it is a great comfort to me to receive one.

    As regards those words terminating in _ite_ which are now
    commonly used by medical writers, although their formation is
    not grammatically exact, and although they do not precisely
    correspond with those which were employed by the ancients,
    yet as they have now obtained general currency, it would be
    hyper-critical and useless to seek to reform them. You may
    satisfy grammarians by a brief annotation to show that you do
    not overlook what is due to their art—I mean of course Greek
    grammarians; for I suppose our own grammarians will perhaps
    prefer the termination which has been sanctioned by use, and
    which may possibly appear to them less disagreeable. You see
    that I am but repeating your own opinion, and if I did not
    write sooner to you on the subject, it was because my own
    judgment fully agreed with what you had expressed in your
    letter.

    I congratulate you on the success of your brother’s studies. I
    have been much gratified by the learning, the industry, and the
    zeal for religion, which he has displayed. Offer him my best
    thanks.

    Remember me in your prayers: write to me, and believe me
    unchangingly yours.”

The same regrets are still more strikingly expressed in the following
letter.

    “I have been wishing, for several days past, to write and thank
    you heartily for your kindness towards me, but it is only this
    day that I have been able to steal a moment for the purpose.
    Be assured that I do not forget how patiently you bore with
    me, while, in the midst of the thousand distractions to which
    I was liable, we were reading together the Greek and Oriental
    languages. If I recall to your recollection the manner of my
    life at that time, and the ever recurring interruptions of my
    studies, it is only for the purpose of letting you see that, as
    the same state of things still continues, or rather has been
    changed for the worse, I have not time to show my gratitude
    for your constant remembrance of me. Still I thank you from my
    heart for it.

    I have not been able to read much of your Tasso, but I have
    observed some readings which appear to me very happy. I told
    Count Valdrighi, that I intended to write to you about the
    volume which Monsignor Mai has just published, to request
    that you, or some others of your friends in Modena, would
    take copies of it, as I have some to dispose of. I have since
    learned that you are already supplied. I beg, nevertheless,
    that you will take some public occasion to recommend it. I
    would do so willingly myself, but I cannot find a single free
    moment. The library, my professorship, my private lectures, the
    examination of books, the visits of strangers, the attendance
    on sick or dying foreigners, do not leave me time to breathe.
    In all this I possess one singular advantage—the excellent
    health with which I am blessed. But on the other hand, I am
    losing, or indeed I have already lost, my habit of application;
    and now, if I am called from time to time to do anything, I
    find myself reduced to the necessity of improvising.

    Forgive me, my dear Don Celestino, for entering thus minutely
    into my own affairs. Set it down to the account of our
    friendship, in the name of which I beg of you to remember me
    in your prayers. Continue to write to me as of old; for, in
    the midst of my heaviest occupations, I receive your letters
    with the greatest pleasure, and find a real enjoyment in them,
    and in the reminiscences which they bring with them of the
    happiness that I formerly enjoyed in your dear society.

    My sister and my nephews present their most cordial greetings.

                                        _Bologna, March, 27, 1826._”

It is about this time that we may date the commencement of that intimacy
between Mezzofanti and Cardinal Cappellari, afterwards Pope Gregory
XVI., which eventually led to Mezzofanti’s removal from Bologna to Rome.
Cappellari, a distinguished monk of the Camaldolese order, was named to
the cardinalate early in 1826; and soon afterwards was placed at the
head of the congregation of the Propaganda. Being himself an orientalist
of considerable eminence, he had long admired the wonderful gifts of
Mezzofanti, and a circumstance occurred soon after his nomination as
prefect of the Propaganda, which led to a correspondence between them,
in reference to an oriental liturgical manuscript on which the opinion
of the great linguist was desired. Cardinal Cappellari forwarded the
MS. to Mezzofanti, who in a short time returned it, not merely with an
explanation, but with a complete Latin translation. The Cardinal was
so grateful for this service, that he wrote to thank the translator,
accompanying his letter with a draft for a hundred doubloons. Mezzofanti,
with a disinterestedness which his notoriously straitened means made
still more honourable, at once wrote to return the draft, with a request
that it should be applied to the purposes of the missions of the
Propaganda.[415]

This appeal from Cardinal Cappellari was not a solitary one. Mezzofanti
was not unfrequently consulted in the same way, sometimes on critical
or bibliographical questions, sometimes as to the character or contents
of a book or MS. in some unknown language. One of his letters to the
abate Cavedoni is a long account of an early Latin version of two of St.
Gregory Nazianzen’s minor spiritual poems, the “Tetrasticha” and the
“Monosticha.” As this letter (although not without interest as being the
only specimen of his critical writings which I have been able to obtain)
would have little attraction for the general reader, and throws but
little light upon the narrative, it is unnecessary to translate it.[416]
There is another letter, however, of nearly the same period, addressed
to his friend count Valdrighi of Modena, on the subject of a MS. in the
Birman language submitted by the count for his examination, which will be
read with more curiosity.

    _To Count Mario Valdrighi._

    “I have to reproach myself for not being more prompt in my
    acknowledgement of your polite letter; or rather I regret the
    resolution which I formed of delaying my answer in the hope
    of being able to make it more satisfactory; since thus it
    has turned out, that while I was only waiting in the hope of
    being able to reply with greater accuracy, I have incurred the
    suspicion of discourtesy, by delaying to send you the little
    information regarding your oriental MS. which I possessed at
    the time, and which I regret to say is all that even still I am
    possessed of.

    Although your MS. is the first in these characters that I
    have ever seen, yet I recognized it at once as a MS. written,
    or, I should more correctly say, _graven_, in Burmese, the
    native language of the kingdom of Ava, and the language also
    which is used by all persons of cultivation in the dependent
    provinces of that kingdom. I was enabled to recognize the form
    of the characters from having once seen the alphabet, which
    was printed by the Propaganda, first in 1776, and again in
    1787.[417]

    As my knowledge in reference to the language when I received
    your letter, did not extend any farther, I was unable to give
    you any other information regarding your MS. except that it
    is composed of that species of palm leaves which they use in
    that country, for the purpose of inscribing or engraving their
    written characters thereon. The tree, which does not differ
    much in appearance from the other species of palm, is said
    to live for a hundred years, and then to die as soon as it
    has produced its fruit; but perhaps it may be said to live on
    by preserving on its leaves the writings which they wish to
    transmit to posterity. It is called in Burmese (or Birmese) by
    the name of _Ole_.

    You will ask what is the character of their writings. The
    people are said to be ignorant in the extreme, and even the
    class called _Talapuini_, who live together in community in a
    sort of Pythagorean college, possess but very little learning.
    Their studies are confined to two books, written in a peculiar
    character, one entitled _Kammua_, the other _Padinot_.[418]
    The Barnabite Fathers also, who founded several churches in
    Ava, and preached the gospel with incredible zeal all over
    those vast regions, have written in the native language,
    several useful books calculated to maintain and increase the
    fruit of their apostolic labours. The most remarkable of
    them was Mgr. Peristo, who wrote and spoke the language with
    great perfection, and whose life has been written by the late
    distinguished Father Michael Angelo Griffini.

    I was about to write all this to you as soon as I first
    received your MS., but I was anxious to be able to tell you
    something more; and with this view, I waited for a long time
    in the hope of obtaining from Paris, Carey’s Birmese Grammar,
    published at Serampore in 1814, and some other books besides;
    as such books must necessarily be in existence, now that the
    English have added to their Indian possessions a large tract of
    the Birmese Empire. But unfortunately, these books either are
    not to be had at Paris, or have not been carefully sought for.

    Accordingly, after all these months of delay, I return you your
    Birmese MS. written on the leaves of the Ole palm. It has most
    probably found its way to Italy through some missionary, and
    perhaps was written by a missionary. This, however, will likely
    be discoverable from the facts which are known as to the place
    whence it came.

    The information which I am able to give is, you see, very
    little compared with what you might have expected, and bears a
    still smaller proportion to my desire to oblige you. I should
    have wished to translate it all for you, had it been in my
    power, if it were only as a means of expressing my gratitude
    and my homage to one from whom I receive so many kindnesses,
    and to whom I am indebted for so many charming books, either
    composed or illustrated by himself. For all these favours it
    only remains for me to offer you my most unbounded thanks. I
    trust that, if you should chance to honour me again with any
    commission, I shall be able to execute it more successfully,
    or at all events more satisfactorily. I will at least promise
    not to delay as I have now done, in the hope of obtaining more
    information; but, relying that your kindness will lead you to
    accept what little explanation I shall be able to afford from
    myself, I will at least endeavour to show my anxious wish to
    oblige by the promptness of my reply.”

Neither Carey’s Birman Grammar, nor any other modern book on the subject,
appears in the catalogue of Mezzofanti’s library. It comprises, however,
a few Birman books, amongst which are the two alphabets referred to in
the above letter, a translation of Bellarmine’s “Doctrina Christiana,”
and an “Explanation of the Catechism for the use of the Birmese.” These
books (all printed at the Propaganda press) appear to have been procured
after his removal to Rome, where by private study and by intercourse with
a few Birmese students in the Propaganda, he acquired the language, as we
shall see, sufficiently for the purposes of conversation.




CHAPTER VIII.

[1828-1830.]


In the year 1828, the Crown Prince of Prussia, (now King Frederic
William,) while passing through Bologna, on his way to Rome, sought
an interview with Mezzofanti. In common with all other visitors, he
was struck with wonder at the marvellous variety and accuracy of his
knowledge of languages. On his arrival at Rome, he spoke admiringly of
this interview to Dr. Tholuck, the present distinguished professor of
Theology at Halle, (at that time chaplain of the Prussian Embassy in
Rome,) who has kindly communicated the particulars to me. “The prince
urged me,” says Dr. Tholuck, in an exceedingly interesting letter which
shall be inserted later, “not to leave Italy without having seen him. ‘He
is truly a miracle,’ exclaimed the prince; ‘he spoke German with me, like
a German; with my Privy-Councillor Ancillon, he spoke the purest French;
with Bunsen, English; with General Gröben, Swedish.’ ‘And what is still
more wonderful,’ subjoined M. Bunsen, then minister resident in Rome,
‘all these languages he has learnt by books alone, without any teacher.’”
This opinion of M. Bunsen’s, Dr. Tholuck afterwards ascertained to be a
mistake, or at least an exaggeration.

It was doubtless to the lessons of his early master, Father Thiulen,
that he owed the knowledge of Swedish which enabled him to converse with
General Gröben. A still more distinct evidence of his familiarity with it
occurred on occasion of the visit of the Crown Prince (now King) Oscar of
Sweden to Bologna. M. Braunerhjelm, now Hof-Stallmastäre at Stockholm,
who was present at the prince’s interview with Mezzofanti, assured Mr.
Wackerbarth, who was good enough to make the inquiry for me last year,
that “the abate spoke the language quite perfectly.” According to another
account which I have received, the prince, having suddenly changed the
conversation into a dialect peculiar to one of the provinces of Sweden,
Mezzofanti was obliged to confess his inability to understand him. What
was his amazement, in a subsequent interview, to hear Mezzofanti address
him in this very dialect!

“From whom, in the name of all that is wonderful, have you learnt it?”
exclaimed the prince.

“From your Royal Highness,” replied Mezzofanti. “Your conversation
yesterday supplied me with a key to all that is peculiar in its forms,
and I am merely translating the common words into this form.”

The Countess of Blessington, in the third volume of her “Idler in
Italy,” has given an account of her intercourse with Mezzofanti during
this year. She adds but little to the facts already known as to
Mezzofanti’s linguistic attainments; but it may not be uninteresting
to contrast with the ponderous and matter of fact sketches of the
professional scholars whom we have hitherto been considering, the
lighter, but in many respects more striking portraiture of a lady
visitor, less capable of estimating the solidity of his learning, but
more alive to the minor peculiarities of his manner, to the more delicate
shades of his character and disposition, and to the thousand minuter
specialities, which, after all, go to form our idea of the man.

Lady Blessington had been present at the solemn mass in the church of St.
Petronius at Bologna on the morning of the Festival of the Assumption. An
adventure which befel her at the close of the ceremony led to her first
meeting with the great linguist, which she thus pleasantly describes.

    “While viewing the procession beneath the arcades, I was
    inadvertently separated from my party, and found myself
    hurried along by the crowd, hemmed in at all sides by a moving
    mass of strangers who seemed to eye me with much curiosity.
    To disentangle myself from the multitude would have been
    a difficult, if not an impossible task; and I confess I
    experienced a certain degree of trepidation, inseparable from
    a woman’s feelings, at finding myself alone in the midst of
    a vast throng not one face of which I had ever previously
    seen. Great then was my satisfaction at hearing the simple
    remark of ‘We have had a very fine day for the fête,’ uttered
    in English, and with as good a pronunciation as possible, by
    a person having the air and dress of a clergyman, to another
    who answered: ‘Yes, nothing could be more propitious than the
    weather.’

    Though it is always embarrassing to address a stranger, the
    sound of my own language, and the position in which I was
    placed, gave me courage to touch the arm of the first speaker,
    and to state, that being separated from my party, I must
    request the protection of my countryman. He turned round,
    saluted me graciously, said that, though not a countryman, he
    would gladly assist me to rejoin my party, and immediately
    placed me between him and his companion.

    ‘You speak English perfectly, yet are not an Englishman!’ said
    I. ‘Then you can be no other than professor Mezzofanti?’

    Both he and his companion smiled, and he answered; ‘My name
    _is_ Mezzofanti.’

    I had a letter of introduction from a mutual friend, and,
    intending to leave it for him in the course of the day, I had
    put it into my reticule, whence I immediately drew it and gave
    it to him. He knew the hand-writing at a single glance, and,
    with great good breeding, put it unopened into his pocket,
    saying something too flattering for me to repeat, in which the
    remark, that a good countenance was the best recommendation,
    was neatly turned. He presented his companion to me, who
    happened to be the Abbé Scandalaria, then staying on a visit to
    him, and who speaks English remarkably well.

    My party were not a little surprised to see me rejoin them,
    accompanied by and in conversation with two strangers. When
    I presented them to my new acquaintances, they were much
    amused at the recital of my unceremonious encounter and
    self-introduction to Mezzofanti, who not only devoted a
    considerable portion of the day to us, but promised to spend
    the evening at our hotel, and invited us to breakfast with him
    to-morrow.

    The countenance of the wonderful linguist is full of
    intelligence, his manner well-bred, unaffected and highly
    agreeable. His facility and felicity in speaking French,
    German, and English, is most extraordinary, and I am told it
    is not less so in various other languages. He is a younger
    man than I expected to find him, and, with the vast erudition
    he has acquired, is totally exempt from pretension or
    pedantry.”[419]

An adventure with Mezzofanti, quite similar to Lady Blessington’s, befel
a party of Irish ecclesiastical students on their way to Rome in the very
same year. They arrived at Bologna late in the afternoon, and, as they
purposed proceeding on their journey early on the following morning, they
were unwilling to lose the opportunity of seeing and conversing with
the celebrated professor. Accordingly they repaired to the university
library; but, as might be expected at so late an hour, they found the
library closed and the galleries silent and deserted. After wandering
about for a considerable time, in search of some one to whom to address
an inquiry, they at last saw an abate of very humble and unpretending
appearance approach. The spokesman of the party begged of him, in the
best Latin he could summon up at the moment, to point out the way to the
library.

“Do you wish to see the library?” asked the abate without a moment’s
pause, in English, and with an excellent accent.

The student was thunderstruck. “By Jove, boys,” he exclaimed turning to
his companions, “this is Mezzofanti himself!”

It _was_ Mezzofanti; and, on learning that they were Irish, he addressed
them a few words in their native language, to which they were obliged
to confess their inability to reply. One of the number, however, having
learned the language from books, Mezzofanti entered into a conversation
with him on its supposed analogies with Welsh.

Of this party, five in number, four are now no more. The sole survivor,
Reverend Philip Meyler of Wexford, still retains a lively recollection
not only of the fluency and precision of Mezzofanti’s English, but of the
friendly warmth with which he received them, of the interest which he
manifested in the object of their journey, and of the cordiality of the
“_Iter bonum faustumque!_” with which he took his leave.

The clergyman alluded to by Lady Blessington, as the “Abbé Scandalaria,”
was, in reality, Padre Scandellari,[420] a learned priest of the
congregation of the Scuole Pie, and one of Mezzofanti’s especial friends.
I was assured by the late Lady Bellew, who knew Padre Scandellari at this
period, that he spoke English quite as well as Mezzofanti. Her ladyship,
(at that time Mademoiselle de Mendoza y Rios) was presented to Mezzofanti
by this father, a few weeks after the visit of Lady Blessington. She was
accompanied by the late Bishop Gradwell, ex-rector of the English College
at Rome, and by her governess, Madame de Chaussegros,[421] a native of
Marseilles. Mezzofanti conversed fluently with Dr. Gradwell in English,
and with Mdlle. de Mendoza, who was a linguist of no common attainments,
in English, French, and Spanish; and when he learned that her companion
was a Marseillaise, he at once addressed her in the Provençal dialect,
which, as the delighted Marseillaise declared, he spoke almost with the
grace and propriety of a native of Provence.

It will be remembered that the Crown Prince of Prussia, on his arrival at
Rome, counselled Dr. Tholuck not to return to Germany, without visiting
the Bolognese prodigy. Having heard of this interview, which took place
while Dr. Tholuck was returning to Germany, in 1829, I was naturally
anxious to learn what was the impression made upon this distinguished
orientalist, by a visit which may be said to have been undertaken with
the professed design of testing by a critical examination the reality of
the accomplishment of which fame had spoken so unreservedly. Dr. Tholuck,
with a courtesy which I gratefully acknowledge, at once forwarded to
me a most interesting account of his interview, a portion of which has
been already inserted. Dr. Tholuck is known as one of the most eminent
linguists of modern Germany. From the clear and idiomatic English of his
letter, the reader may infer what are his capabilities, as a critical
judge of the same faculty in another. After mentioning M. Bunsen’s
statement, that Mezzofanti had learned his languages entirely from books,
Dr. Tholuck continues:—

    “This seemed the more incredible to me, having just made the
    experience as to Italian, how impossible it is to acquire the
    niceties of conversational language only from books. On my
    return from Rome, having arrived at Bologna, I considered it my
    first duty to call on that eminent linguist, accompanied by a
    young Dane who was conversant also with the Frisian language,
    spoken only by a small remnant of that old nation in Sleswic
    or Friesland. Mezzofanti having commenced the conversation
    in German, I continued it a quarter of an hour in my native
    language. He spoke it fluently, but not without some slighter
    mistakes, of which, in that space of time, I noticed as many
    as four, which I took notes of immediately after; nor was the
    accent a pure German accent, but that of Poles and Bohemians
    when they speak German, which is to be accounted for from
    his having acquired that language from individuals of that
    nation, from Austrian soldiers. Upon this I suddenly turned my
    conversation into Arabic, having obtained an easy practice in
    this language by long intercourse with a family in which it
    was spoken. Mezzofanti made his reply in Arabic without any
    hesitation, quite correctly, but very slowly, composing one
    word with the other, from want of practice. I then turned upon
    Dutch, which he did not know then, but replied in Flemish, a
    kindred dialect. English and Spanish he spoke with the greatest
    fluency, but when addressed in Danish he replied in Swedish.
    The Frisian he had not yet heard of. When requested to write
    a line for me, he retired in his study, and, as we had been
    talking together on the Persian, which at that time had been
    my chief study, and which he was able to converse in, though
    very slowly, and composing only words, as was my own case
    likewise, he wrote for me a fine Persian distich of his own
    composition, though only after long meditation in his study.
    In the mean while he permitted me to examine his library.
    Turning up a Cornish (of the dialect of Cornwall) Grammar, I
    found in it some sheets containing a little vocabulary and
    grammatical paradigms, and he told me that his way of learning
    new languages was no other but that of our school-boys, by
    writing out paradigms and words, and committing to memory. As
    to the statement of M. Bunsen, mentioned before, it was not
    confirmed by Mezzofanti’s communication: he confessed to have
    acquired the conversational language chiefly from foreigners in
    the hospitals, in part from missionaries. The number he then
    professed to know _well_ was upwards of twenty; those which
    he knew imperfectly, almost the same number. Of the poetical
    productions of several nations he spoke as a man of taste, but
    what we call the philosophy of language he did not seem yet to
    have entered upon.”

Dr. Tholuck, it will be seen, did not suffer himself to be carried
away by the enthusiasm of those who had gone before him. He had eyes
for faults as well as for excellencies. Nevertheless, the reader will
probably agree with me in thinking the undisguised admiration which
pervades his calm and circumstantial statement, even with the drawbacks
which it contains, a more solid tribute to the fame of Mezzofanti than
the declamatory eulogies of a crowd of uninquiring enthusiasts. There
is an irresistible guarantee for his trustworthiness as a reporter upon
Mezzofanti’s German, in the fact that he did not fail to take “a note
of the four minor mistakes,” into which Mezzofanti fell in the course
of their conversation;[422] and one cannot hesitate to receive without
suspicion what he tells of his “speaking Arabic and Persian without any
hesitation, and quite correctly,” when we find him carefully distinguish
between these and the other languages on which he tried him, and note
that in these he proceeded “very slowly, composing one word with another
for want of practice.” It is proper, however, to add that the opportunity
of practice which he afterwards enjoyed at Rome, entirely removed this
difficulty: and the fluency and ease with which Mezzofanti there spoke
these most difficult languages, is the best confirmation of Dr. Tholuck’s
sagacity in ascribing the hesitation which was observable at the time of
his visit to want of practice alone.

Dr. Tholuck’s letter is specially important, also, as establishing the
fact that Mezzofanti’s acquisitions were by no means so easy, or so much
the result of a species of instinctive intuition as has been commonly
supposed. Many of the circumstances which Dr. Tholuck notes, indicate
labour; all point plainly to successive stages of advancement, to various
degrees of perfection, in a word, to all the ordinary accompaniments
of progress. The little vocabulary and grammatical paradigms of the
Cornish language, an extinct and almost forgotten dialect,[423]
which even our English philologists have come to disregard, tell of
themselves the character of the man. Of course the main attraction of
the Cornish dialect for him, was as one of the representatives of the
old British family; but it cannot be doubted that he took a pleasure in
the systematic pursuit of the structure of a language for the mere sake
of the mental exercise which it involved. I am assured by the Cavalier
Minarelli that the deceased Cardinal’s books and papers[424] contain many
such grammatical and phraseological skeletons, even in languages which
might be supposed to have less interest than that in the study of which
Dr. Tholuck found him engaged.[425]

In reply to further inquiries which I addressed to him, Dr. Tholuck added:

    “Among the twenty languages which he then professed to know
    accurately, he pointed out specially the English and the
    Albanese; among these he professed to know imperfectly, was
    also the Quichua, or old Peruvian, which he learned from some
    of the American missionaries. He mentioned that he was then
    engaged in learning the Bimbarra language, studying it from a
    catechism translated by a French missionary; an instance which
    shows that his _knowing_ a language was in _some_ instances
    nothing more than having got a smattering of it, as the
    Americans say.[426]

    As to the Persian distich, which it took him about half an
    hour to compose, it was an imitation of the distichs in Sadi’s
    _Gulistan_,[427] and contained, as is the case with these
    distichs, some elegant ἐνθύμησεις.”

Whether, at any subsequent time, he acquired the Frisian dialect, of
which “he had not yet heard” when Dr. Tholuck visited him, I am unable to
pronounce from any positive information. But I find in his catalogue[428]
several volumes in this language (to which it is highly probable that
this interview called his attention;) not merely elementary books, such
as Rasck’s _Friesche Spraakleer_, but historical works, as for instance,
Wissers’ History, and even such light literature as Japiek’s Collection
of Frisian Poetry.[429] From his known habits I can hardly doubt that,
once having acquired these books, he must at least have made some
progress towards mastering their contents.

The abate Ubaldo Fabiani, a young Modenese priest of much promise, who,
after completing his studies, had been appointed lecturer in sacred
Scripture and Hebrew in his native university, came to Bologna in 1829,
with letters from the abate Cavedoni to Mezzofanti, under whom he
proposed to perfect himself in Hebrew and other Oriental languages.
Mezzofanti received him with the utmost cordiality; and the great ability
and industry which he exhibited, as well as his exceeding amiableness and
unaffected piety, completely won the heart of his master. On his return
to Modena, after a residence of a few months, Mezzofanti wrote to his
friend Cavedoni.

                                        _Bologna, 17 October, 1829._

    “Don Ubaldo Fabiani is just about to return to Modena, after
    a sojourn of three months here, the entire of which he has
    passed in the midst of books. It would be impossible for me to
    describe to you the assiduity, avidity, and perseverance, with
    which I have seen him apply to his studies; but I can safely
    say that the fruit which he has derived from them has even
    exceeded the labour, as he unites with unwearied diligence a
    ready wit and a peculiar aptitude for this branch of learning.
    The principal object of his attention has been the sacred
    Hebrew text; but he has also applied himself to Chaldee, and in
    the end to the Rabbinical Hebrew—in all cases with most rapid
    progress. Had his time not been so limited, he had intended
    to devote himself also to Arabic—a language which has of late
    become so necessary an appliance of the polemics of sacred
    Scripture. But I have every confidence that he will do this
    also, when he shall return another year to Bologna; and I shall
    be more than willing to accompany him in this study also.

    I am much indebted to you for having given me an opportunity
    of forming the acquaintance of so worthy an ecclesiastic. I
    have to thank you also for your learned publications, which
    you were kind enough to send me, and which, in the midst of
    all my varied occupations, are a source of real pleasure to
    me. Forgive my irregularity and tardiness as a correspondent;
    or rather do you return good for evil, by writing to me the
    more frequently. You will thus do what is most grateful to your
    devoted friend.”

Fabiani had hardly reached Modena when he was seized with fever—the
terrible _perniciosa_ of the Italian summer and autumn—and was carried
off after an illness of a few days, at the early age of twenty-four. As
soon as the melancholy news reached Bologna, Mezzofanti wrote once more
to his friend Cavedoni.

                                       _Bologna, November 12, 1829._

    “Death has snatched Don Ubaldo from us! Alas, how much have we
    lost in him!—how miserably have we seen all the hopes which we
    placed in him, cut off in a single moment! What might we not
    have expected from a young ecclesiastic, so entirely devoted to
    piety and to letters!

    As for himself, his only aspirations were for heaven. His
    studies had no other end or aim, save God: and God has been
    pleased to take him to Himself, crowning with an early reward a
    virtue which, even in the first flower of years, had attained
    to its full maturity. Ah, let us hope that our dear Don Ubaldo,
    now close to the Divine Fountain, is there admitted to the
    hidden source of the divine oracles, to the study of which he
    addressed himself here with such indefatigable application. Now
    he will recall to memory, the affectionate care bestowed upon
    him here by his parents, by his dear Don Celestino, and even by
    his last master—last in merit as well as in time—and will feel
    the force of the words which I often repeated to him, never
    with more tenderness than at our last parting—‘Ah, Don Ubaldo,
    give thyself entirely to the Lord!’ He feels now, I confidently
    trust, what a thing it is to ‘belong entirely to the Lord.’

    Ah, my dear Don Celestino, I should not be acting worthily, if,
    on such an event, I gave room for a single moment to earthly
    thoughts. Our friend has flown to heaven:—let our hearts also
    turn thither, where we hope to meet him in everlasting joy.
    Assist me by your prayers to attain this end. When you see
    our deceased friend’s parents, comfort them with the true and
    blessed consolations which our holy religion bestows; and let
    us when, in the Adorable Sacrifice, we offer prayers for those
    who are in tribulation, never fail to pray for each other, and
    continually strive to disentangle ourselves more and more from
    the vanity of the world.”

The premature death of this excellent young clergyman was felt at Modena
as a real calamity. His friend, the abate Cavedoni, published these
simple but touching letters of Mezzofanti in the _Memorie_[430] of
Modena, as the best testimony which could be offered to the rare merit of
the deceased; but, although already known in Italy, they are well worthy
of being preserved, not merely as a tribute to the memory of the youth
whose death they record, but as representing most truthfully the piety,
the sensibility, the fervour, and above all, the amiable and affectionate
disposition, of the writer himself.

Soon after the date of these letters was founded at Bologna a literary
Academy, which has some interest in connexion with the history of
Mezzofanti. Like many of the older learned societies of Italy,[431]
it took to itself a somewhat fanciful designation, although one which
falls far short in oddity of those of many among its predecessors;—as
the _Oziosi_, or the _Inquieti_, of Bologna, the _Insensati_ of Perugia,
the _Assorditi_ of Urbino, or (strangest of all), the _Umidi_[432] of
Florence, who carried the fancy so far as to designate themselves by the
names of fish and water-fowls. Mezzofanti and his fellow Academicians
contented themselves with the less startling, though somewhat affected,
title of _Filopieri_, “Lovers of the Muses.” Their Society received the
formal approval of the Congregation of Studies, in the beginning of 1830,
and commenced to hold its meetings in the same year. But, in connexion
with the life of Mezzofanti, it is chiefly memorable for a curious volume
of verses, addressed to him by the members, on the occasion of his
elevation to the Cardinalate.[433]




CHAPTER IX.

[1831.]


Hitherto the Abate Mezzofanti has appeared chiefly, if not exclusively,
as a linguist; and the estimate of his attainments which has long been
current, assumes him to have cultivated that single accomplishment to
the exclusion of all other branches of study. The report, however, of a
visitor, who saw him about the time at which we have now arrived, will be
found to present him in a new character.

In introducing this notice of him, a brief preliminary explanation
will be necessary—perhaps, indeed, this explanation is indispensable
even in itself; for, although the political history of the period does
not properly fall within the scope of this biography, yet, as the most
important event in the life of Mezzofanti—the transfer of his residence
to Rome—arose directly out of his mission to that capital at the
termination of the Revolution of 1831, it is necessary to revert, at
least in outline, to the most notable occurrences of the preceding years.

The discontent and turbulence which marked the closing years of the
reign of Pius VII. had in great measure subsided under the impartial
but vigorous administration of Leo XII.; nor was the short pontificate
of his successor, Pius VIII. who succeeded on the 31st of March,
1829, interrupted by any overt expression of popular discontent. It
was well known, nevertheless, throughout this whole period, that an
active secret organization was in existence, not alone in the Papal
States, but in Naples, in the Lombardo-Venetian kingdom, in the minor
principalities of Parma, Piacenza, and Modena, and indeed throughout
the entire of Italy. Everywhere throughout Italy, too, in addition to
these secret associations, still subsisted a remnant of the old French
or Franco-Italian party, who, while they submitted to the existing
state of things, and offered no resistance to the established regime,
concealing their discontent, and cautiously repressing their aspirations
after the cherished vision of a “united and independent Italy,” yet were
notoriously dissatisfied with the domestic governments, and lost no
opportunity of embarrassing their administration. Of this, in the Papal
States, Bologna had long been the centre.

The Abate Mezzofanti had never taken any part in political affairs; but
his principles were well known, and his antecedents had long marked him
out as an ardent and devoted adherent of the Papal rule. Personally
inoffensive and amiable as he was, therefore, he was on these grounds,
distasteful to certain members of the anti-papal party. But by the great
body of his fellow-citizens he was regarded as a man of thoroughly
honourable principles; and we shall see that in a crisis of great
delicacy and importance he was selected as one of their delegates to the
court of Gregory XVI.

It is to these political animosities that allusion is made in the
following extremely interesting account of Mezzofanti. It is from the pen
of the distinguished historian of the mathematical sciences in Italy, M.
Libri; whose name is in itself sufficient to stamp with authority any
statement bearing upon a subject in which he has proved himself a master.

For this most interesting communication I am indebted to the good offices
of Mr. Watts, to whom it was addressed by M. Libri, in reply to an
inquiry kindly made on my behalf by that gentleman. M. Libri’s letter
is in English, and the purity of its language and elegance of its style
are in themselves no slight evidence of his competence to pronounce
upon Mezzofanti’s accomplishments as a linguist, no less than as a
mathematician.

M. Libri’s meeting with Mezzofanti occurred at Bologna early in 1830, in
the course of a literary tour in which M. Libri was then engaged.

    “Among all these eminent men, the one that interested me
    most was unquestionably the Abbé, (afterwards Cardinal)
    Mezzofanti, who was then librarian at Bologna, and respecting
    whose astonishing power in languages I had heard the most
    extraordinary anecdotes. During a short excursion which I had
    previously made to Bologna, I had already got a glimpse of
    that celebrated man; but it was not until 1830 that I could
    be said to have seen him. I was presented to him by one of
    my friends, Count Bianchetti, and I was received by him with
    great kindness. He made me promise to go and see him again,
    and offered to show me the library. I accepted his offer
    eagerly; but it was principally in the hope of having a long
    conversation with him that I repaired to the library next day.

    Before going farther, I ought to say that I approached him
    with mixed feelings. Personally, I have always been disposed
    to respect and admire every man who possesses an incontestible
    superiority in any branch of human knowledge; and in this point
    of view, M. Mezzofanti, whom every body acknowledges to be the
    man who knew and could speak more languages than any other
    living man, had certainly a right to boundless admiration on my
    part. It was popularly reported at Bologna, that M. Mezzofanti,
    then fifty years old, knew as many languages as he counted
    years; and I had heard related in respect to him, by men in
    whose veracity I have full confidence, so many extraordinary
    histories, that he became in my eyes a sort of hero of legend
    or romance; but a hero of flesh and blood, who realized or
    even surpassed all the wonders attributed to Mithridates as a
    linguist. On the other hand, the liberal party, who certainly
    had no sympathies with the Abbé Mezzofanti, spread reports
    against him, by no means flattering; among which the one
    that had most frequently reached my ears, consisted in its
    being ceaselessly repeated, that the celebrated librarian at
    Bologna was a sort of parrot, endowed with the faculty of
    articulating sounds which he had heard, that he was only a
    miracle of memory, understanding having nothing to do with
    it; and that, independently of this trick of getting words by
    heart, this extraordinary man possessed no solid information,
    and little philological erudition. Without blindly adopting
    this bare assertion, I must acknowledge that the judgment
    passed on Mezzofanti by persons of some consideration, had
    made an impression upon my mind, far from being favourable to
    him: but that impression was soon dissipated in the course of
    the interview I had with him. Before leaving Florence, I had
    just read and carefully studied the treatise on Indefinite
    Algebra, composed several ages before by Brahmegupta, and
    which, translated and enriched with an admirable introduction
    by Colebroke, had been published in London, in 1817.[434]
    Being still filled with admiration for the labours of the
    ancient Hindoos on indeterminate analysis, I mentioned the book
    casually to Mezzofanti, and merely to show him that even a man
    almost exclusively devoted to the study of mathematics, might
    take a lively interest in the labours of the Orientalists. I
    had no intention of introducing a scientific conversation on
    this subject with the celebrated librarian; and I must even
    add, that I thought him quite incapable of engaging in one. How
    great then was my surprise, when I saw him immediately seize
    the opportunity, and speak to me during half an hour on the
    astronomy and mathematics of the Indian races, in a way which
    would have done honour to a man whose chief occupation had been
    tracing the history of the sciences. Deeply astonished at so
    specific a knowledge, which had taken me quite unexpectedly, I
    eagerly sought explanation from him on points which had seemed
    to me the most difficult in the history of India; such, for
    instance, as the probable epoch when certain Indian astronomers
    had lived, before the Mahometan conquest, and how far those
    astronomers might have been able, directly or indirectly, to
    borrow from the Greeks. On all those points Mezzofanti answered
    on the spot, with great modesty, and as a man who knows how
    to doubt; but proving to me at the same time, that those were
    questions on which his mind had already paused, and which he
    had approached with all the necessary accomplishment of the
    accessory sciences. I cannot express how much that conversation
    interested me; and I did not delay to testify to Mezzofanti
    all the admiration which knowledge at once so varied and so
    profound, had excited in me. No more was said of visiting
    the library, or of seeing books. I had before me a most
    extraordinary living book, and one well calculated to confound
    the imagination. Encouraged by his courtesy and modesty, I
    could not resist my desire of putting questions to him on the
    mode which he had employed in making himself master of so many
    languages. He positively assured me, but without entering
    into any detail, that it was a thing less difficult than was
    generally thought; that there is in all languages a limited
    number of points to which it is necessary to pay particular
    attention; and that, when one is once master of those points,
    the remainder follows with great facility. He added, that,
    when one has learned ten or a dozen languages essentially
    different from one another, one may, with a little study and
    attention, learn any number of them. I strenuously urged him
    to publish his experience on the subject and on the result of
    his labours; but I observed in him a great aversion to the
    publication of his researches. He affirmed that the more we
    study, the more do we understand how difficult it is to avoid
    falling into errors; and, in speaking to me of several writings
    which he had composed, he told me that they were only essays
    which by no means deserved to see the light. In the midst of
    the conversation, as I was still urging him, he rose and went
    to look in a box for a manuscript with coloured designs, which
    he showed me, and which had for its object the explanation of
    the Mexican hieroglyphics. Having begged him to publish at
    least that work, he told me that it was only an essay, still
    imperfect, and that his intention was to recast it completely.

    This excursion to America suggested to me the idea of putting a
    new question to him. I had collected at Florence, particularly
    with relation to bibliography, several translations of the
    whole Bible, or certain portions of the sacred books, in
    different foreign languages. Some of these translations were
    into languages spoken by North American savages; and in
    looking through them I had been struck with the measureless
    length[435] of most of the words of these tongues. Since the
    opportunity presented itself naturally, I asked M. Mezzofanti
    what he thought of those words, and whether the men who spoke
    languages apparently so calculated to put one out of breath,
    did not seem to be endowed with peculiar organs. Immediately
    taking down a book written in one of those languages, the
    celebrated linguist showed me practically how, in his opinion,
    the savages managed to pronounce these interminable words,
    without too much trouble. For fear of making mistakes, I cannot
    venture, after twenty-five years, to reproduce this explanation
    from memory. According to my usual practice, I had written
    out, on my return home, the conversation which I had just had
    with the celebrated linguist, and if I still possessed that
    part of my journal you would find there almost the exact words
    of the Abbé Mezzofanti; but those papers having been taken
    away from me by people who, under a pretext as ridiculous as
    odious, despoiled me, after the revolution of 1848, of all that
    I possessed at Paris, I must confine myself to mentioning the
    fact of the explanation which was given to me, without being
    able to tell you in what that explanation consisted.

    After what I have just recounted to you, I could add nothing
    to express to you the opinion which that long conversation
    with M. Mezzofanti (which during the few days that I passed at
    Bologna was followed by some other interviews much shorter, and
    as it were fugitive,) left in my mind on the subject of the
    erudition, as profound as it was various, of that universal
    linguist. As, however, I express here an opinion which
    certainly was not that of everybody, permit me to corroborate
    that opinion by the testimony of Giordani, a man not only
    celebrated in Italy for the admirable purity of his style, but
    who also enjoyed deserved reputation as a profound Grecian, and
    a consummate Latin scholar. The testimony of Giordani on the
    subject of the Abbé Mezzofanti is the more remarkable, because,
    besides Giordani’s having (as is generally known) a marked
    antipathy for the ultra-catholic party to which Mezzofanti
    was thought to belong, he and the Abbé had had some little
    personal quarrels the remembrance of which was not effaced.
    Notwithstanding this, I read in the letters of Giordani lately
    published at Milan, that, in his opinion, Mezzofanti was quite
    a superior man.”

M. Libri[436] proceeds to cite several passages from Giordani’s letters,
which, as I have already quoted them in their proper place, it is
needless to repeat here. Indeed no additional testimony could add weight
to his own authority on any of the subjects to which he refers in this
most interesting letter.

Soon after this interview, the quiet of Mezzofanti’s life was interrupted
for a time. The Revolution of Paris in July, 1830, and the events in
Belgium and Poland by which it was rapidly followed, were not slow to
provoke a response in Italy. The long repressed hopes of the republican
party were thus suddenly realised, and the organization of the secret
societies became at once more active and more extended. For a time the
prudent and moderate policy adopted by Pius VIII. in reference to the
events in France, had the effect of defeating the measures of the Italian
revolutionists; but his death on the thirtieth of November in that year,
appeared to afford a favourable opportunity for their attempt. During the
conclave for the election of his successor, all the preparations were
made. The stroke was sudden and rapid. The very day after the election
of Gregory XVI., but before the news had been transmitted from Rome, an
outbreak took place at Modena. It was followed, on the next day, by a
similar proceeding at Bologna,—by the calling out of a national guard,
and the proclamation of a provisional government. The Papal delegate was
expelled from Bologna. The Duke of Modena fled to Mantua. Maria Louisa,
Duchess of Parma, took refuge in France. And on the 26th of the same
month, deputies from all the revolted states, by a joint instrument,
proclaimed the United Republic of Italy!

This success, however, was as short-lived as it had been rapid. The duke
of Modena was reinstated by the arms of Austria on the 9th of March.
Order was restored about the same date at Parma: and, before the end of
the month of March, all traces of the revolutionary movement had for the
time disappeared throughout the States of the Church.[437]

It has been customary for the cities and _communi_ of the Papal States on
the accession of each new Pontiff, to send a deputation of their most
notable citizens to offer their homage and present their congratulations
at the foot of the throne. Many of the chief cities had already complied
with the established usage.[438] Bologna, restored to a calmer mind,
now hastened to follow the example. Three delegates were deputed for
the purpose—the Marchese Zambeccari, Count Lewis Isolani, and the abate
Mezzofanti. They arrived in Rome in the beginning of May,[439] and on
the 9th of the same month, were admitted to an audience of the Pope,
who received them with great kindness, and inquired anxiously into the
condition of Bologna, and the grievances which had given occasion to the
recent discontents.

To Mezzofanti in particular the Pope showed marked attention. It had
been one of his requests to Cardinal Opizzoni, the archbishop, when
returning to Bologna on the suppression of the Revolution, that he
should send Professor Mezzofanti to visit him. He still remembered
the disinterestedness which the professor had shewn in their first
correspondence; and the time had now come when it was in his power to
make some acknowledgment. A few days after Mezzofanti’s arrival he was
named domestic prelate and proto-notary apostolic, and at his final
audience before returning to Bologna, the pope renewed in person the
invitation to settle permanently in Rome, which had formerly been made
to him by Cardinal Consalvi on the part of Pius VII. Mezzofanti was
still as happy in his humble position as he had been in 1815. He still
retained his early love for his native city and for the friends among
whom he had now begun to grow old. But to persist farther would be
ungracious. He could no longer be insensible to a wish so flattering and
so earnestly enforced. It was not, however, until, as the Pope himself
declared, “after a long siege,” (_veramente un assedio_) that he finally
acquiesced;—overpowered, as it would seem, by that genuine and unaffected
cordiality which was the great characteristic of the good Pope Gregory
XVI.

“Holy Father,” was his singularly graceful acknowledgment of the kind
interest which the Pope had manifested in his regard, “people say that I
can speak a great many languages. In no one of them, nor in them all, can
I find words to express how deeply I feel this mark of your Holiness’s
regard.”

It is hardly necessary to say that one of the very first visits which he
paid in Rome, was to the Propaganda. On the morning after his arrival,
the feast, as it would seem, of the Exaltation of the Holy Cross, he
went to the sacristy with the intention of saying mass; and having,
with his habitual retiringness, knelt down to say the usual preparatory
prayers without making himself known, he remained for a considerable
time unobserved and therefore neglected. He was at length recognised by
Dr. Cullen, the present archbishop of Dublin, (at that time professor of
Scripture in the Propaganda,) who at once procured for the distinguished
stranger the attention which he justly deserved in such an institution.
It is a pleasing illustration, at once of the retentiveness of his memory
and of the simple kindliness of his disposition, that in an interview
with Dr. Cullen not very long before his death, he reminded him of this
circumstance, and renewed his thanks even for so trifling a service.
After mass, he made his way, unattended, to one of the _camerate_, or
corridors. The first room which he chanced to meet was that of a Turkish
student, named Hassun, now archbishop of the United Greek Church at
Constantinople. He at once entered into conversation with Hassun in
Turkish. This he speedily changed to Romaic with a youth named Musabini,
who is now the Catholic Greek bishop at Smyrna. From Greek he turned to
English, on the approach of Dr. O’Connor, an Irish student, now bishop
of Pittsburgh in the United States. As the unwonted sounds began to
attract attention, the students poured in, one by one, each in succession
to find himself greeted in his native tongue; till at length, the bell
being rung, the entire community assembled, and gave full scope to the
wonderful quickness and variety of his accomplishment. Dr. O’Connor
describes it as the most extraordinary scene he has ever witnessed; and
he adds a further very remarkable circumstance that, during the many
new visits which Mezzofanti paid to the Propaganda afterwards, he never
once forgot the language of any student with whom he had spoken on this
occasion, nor once failed to address him in his native tongue.

The deputation returned to Bologna in the end of June. Mezzofanti
accompanied it, but only for the purpose of making arrangements for his
permanent change of residence.

He had accepted the commission with exceeding reluctance, and it is
painful to have to record that on this, the only occasion on which he
consented to leave his habitual retirement, he was not suffered to escape
his share of the rude shocks and buffets which seem to be inseparable
from public life.

All who were most familiar with Mezzofanti, to whatever party in
Italian politics they belonged, have borne testimony to the sincerity
of his convictions and the entire disinterestedness of his views—a
disinterestedness which had marked the entire tenor of his life, and had
been attested by long and painful sacrifices. Nevertheless, on the return
of the Bolognese deputation from Rome, he had the mortification to find
his conduct misrepresented and his motives maligned. The marked attention
which he had experienced at the hands of the Pope, was made a crime.
His simple and long-tried loyalty—the spontaneous homage which a mind
such as his renders almost by instinct—was denounced as the interested
subserviency of a courtier; and the favours which had been bestowed on
him in Rome, were represented as the price of his treason to Bologna.

Mezzofanti felt deeply these ungenerous and unfounded criticisms. His
health was seriously affected by the chagrin which they occasioned; and
these memories of his last days in Bologna often clouded in after years
the happier reminiscences of his native city on which his mind delighted
to dwell.

Owing to the unsettled condition of Italy during this year, but few
Englishmen visited Bologna. Among these were Dr. Christopher Wordsworth,
Canon of Westminster (who also saw Mezzofanti in the following year in
Rome,) and Mr. Milnes, of Frystone Hall, Yorkshire, father of the poet,
Mr. Richard Monckton Milnes. The latter was much amused by Mezzofanti’s
proposing, when he heard he was a Yorkshire man, to speak Welsh with him,
“_as Yorkshire lay so near Wales!_”

It would hardly be worth while to note this amusing blunder in English
topography, (a blunder more remarkable in Mezzofanti, as in all
geographical details he was ordinarily extremely accurate,) were it not
that it is another testimony on the disputed question of his acquaintance
with the Welsh language.

He left Bologna finally for Rome in October, 1831. The Pope afterwards
used jokingly to say, that “the acquisition of Mezzofanti for Rome was
the only good that came of the Revolution of Bologna in 1831.” By the
kind care of the Pope, he was provided with apartments in the Quirinal
Palace, nearly opposite the Church of Saint Andrew—the same apartments at
the window of which the lamented Monsignor Palma was shot during the late
Revolution.




CHAPTER X.

[1831-33.]


It is one of Rochefoucauld’s maxims, that “in order to establish a great
reputation, it is not enough for one to possess great qualities, he must
also economize them.” If Mezzofanti had desired to act upon this prudent
principle, he could not possibly have chosen a worse position than Rome.

From the very moment of his arrival there, his gift of language was
daily, and almost hourly, exposed to an ordeal at once more varied and
more severe than it would have encountered in any other city in the
world. Without taking into account the many eminent linguists, native
and foreign, for whom Rome has ever been celebrated; without reckoning
the varying periodical influx of sight-seers, from every country in
Europe, who are attracted to that city by the unrivalled splendour
of her sacred ceremonial, and the more constant, though less noisy,
stream of pilgrims from the remotest lands, who are drawn by duty, by
devotion, or by ecclesiastical affairs, to the great centre of Catholic
unity;—the permanent population of the Eternal City will be found to
comprise a variety of races and tongues, such as would be sought in
vain in any other region of the earth. From a very early period, the
pious liberality, sometimes of the popes, sometimes of the natives
of the various countries themselves, began to found colleges for the
education, under the very shadow of the chair of Peter, of at least a
select few among the clergy of each people; and, notwithstanding the
confiscations of later times, there are few among the more prominent
nationalities which do not even still possess in Rome, either a special
national establishment, or, at least, a special foundation for national
purposes in some of the many general establishments of the city. In
like manner, most of the great religious orders, both of the East and
of the West, possess separate houses for each of the countries in which
they are established; and few, even of the most superficial visitors of
Rome, can have failed to observe, among the animated groups which throng
the Pincian Hill or the Strada Pia, at the approach of the Ave Maria,
the striking variety of picturesque costumes by which these national
orders are distinguished. Each, again, of the several rites in communion
with the Holy See—the Greek, the Syrian, the Coptic, the Armenian—has,
for the most part, an archbishop or bishop resident at Rome, to afford
information or counsel on affairs connected with its national usages, and
to take a part in all the solemn ceremonials, as a living witness of the
universality of the Church.

But before all, and more than all, is the great Urban College—the college
of the Propaganda—which unites in itself all the nationalities already
described, together with many others of which no type is found elsewhere
in Europe. Every variety of language and dialect throughout the wide
range of western Christendom;—every eastern form of speech

    From silken Samarcand to cedared Lebanon;

many of the half explored languages of the northern and southern
continents of America; and more than one of the rude jargons of north
and north-eastern Africa, may be found habitually domiciled within its
walls. In the year 1837, when Dr. Wap, a Dutch traveller, who has written
well and learnedly on Rome, visited the establishment, the hundred and
fourteen students who appeared upon its register, comprised no less than
forty-one distinct nationalities.[440]

Amid the vast variety of speech with which he was thus brought habitually
into contact, Mezzofanti, even if he had desired to “economize” his
reputed gifts, could not possibly have done so without provoking a
suspicion of their questionableness, or at least of their superficial
character. Nor, on the other hand, would he have ventured to expose
the undeniable reputation which he had already established, although
upon a provincial theatre, to the ordeal which awaited him in the great
centre of languages, living or dead, had he not been supported by the
consciousness of the reality of his attainments, as well as attracted by
the very prospect of increased facilities for pursuing and extending the
researches which had been the business and the enjoyment of his life. At
all events, we shall see that from the first moment of his establishment
in Rome, so far from having “economized” his extraordinary faculty of
language, he was most assiduous, and in truth prodigal, in its exercise.

Immediately on his arrival he was appointed canon of the church of Santa
Maria Maggiore. This, however, was but an earnest of the intentions of
the Pope, who, from the first, destined him for the highest honours of
the Roman Church. It is clear, nevertheless, from his correspondence,
that his affections still clung to his beloved Bologna. On occasion of
his first new year in his new residence, he received many letters from
his old friends, conveying to him the ordinary new year’s greetings. From
his reply to one of these letters which was addressed to him by a friend,
Signor Michele Ferrucci, professor of Eloquence in the university, we may
gather how warm and cordial were the attachments which he had left behind.

                                            _Rome, January 4, 1852._

    “The new-year greetings which, for so many years, I used to
    receive from you in person, were always most grateful to me,
    because I knew them to be the genuine expression of your
    affection for me. In like manner the kind wishes conveyed in
    your letter are no less acceptable, since they show me that
    separation has not diminished your regard. I shall always
    retain a lively sense of it; and wherever I may be, it shall
    be my endeavour to give proofs by my conduct that I am not
    insensible to it. Let one of these be the assurance of my most
    zealous exertions to secure for you the change of position
    which you are seeking, from the chair of eloquence to that
    of assistant professor of archæology. I think it advisable
    that means should be taken to make known here the wishes
    of the professor himself, the Canonico Schiassi; and it is
    indispensable that the measure should not only originate with
    his eminence the arch-chancellor, but should have his most
    earnest support. So far as I am concerned, I shall leave
    nothing undone that may tend to further your wishes.

    I was deeply affected in reading your wife’s sonnets on the
    death of her sister and her father. May God grant that, this
    great affliction past, a heart so full of tenderness as hers,
    may meet nothing in life but joy and consolation in the
    continued prosperity of her dear family! Present my respects
    to her, and make my compliments to my old associates in the
    library. I never for a single day forget that happy spot, and I
    seldom cease to speak of it.

    If there be any matter in which I can be of use to you, I beg
    of you not to spare me.”

One of Mezzofanti’s first impulses on his being established in Rome,
was to turn to account, as a means of extending his store of languages,
the manifold advantages of his new position. On a careful survey of
the rich and varied resources supplied by the foreign ecclesiastical
establishments of Rome, and especially by the great treasure-house of the
Propaganda, he found that there was one language, and that a language to
which he had long and anxiously looked forward—the Chinese—which was, as
yet, entirely unrepresented; the native students destined for the mission
of China, being at that time exclusively educated in the Chinese College
at Naples. It happened most opportunely that at this time Monsignor de
Bossi, (afterwards administrator Apostolic of Nankin), was about to visit
that institution, and proposed to Mezzofanti to accompany him;—a proposal
which, as filling up agreeably the interval of rest which he enjoyed
before entering upon the routine of the duties which awaited him, he
gladly accepted.

The Chinese College of Naples was founded in 1725, by the celebrated
Father Matthew Ripa,[441] with the permission of the reigning Pope
Benedict XIII, and was formally approved by a bull of Clement XIII,
April 5, 1732.[442] In the earlier and more favoured days of the Chinese
mission, although it was chiefly supplied by European clergy, yet the
missionaries freely opened, not alone elementary schools, but seminaries
for the training of native catechists who assisted in the work of the
mission, even within the precincts of the Imperial City. But the unhappy
divisions among the missionaries upon the well-known question, as to
the lawfulness of the so-called “Chinese ceremonies;” and the severe
enactments which followed the final and decisive condemnation of these
ceremonies by Clement XI., not only cut off all hope of this domestic
supply of catechists, but effectually excluded all European missionaries
from the Chinese Empire. The only hope, therefore, of sustaining the
mission was to provide a supply of native clergy, who might pass
unnoticed among the population, or who would at least possess one chance
of security against detection, which the very appearance of a foreigner
would preclude. With this view, Father Ripa brought together at Pekin a
small number of youths, whom he hoped to train up under a native master,
engaged by him for the purpose. A short experience of this plan, however,
convinced him, not merely of its danger, but even of its absolute
impracticability; and he saw that the only hope of success for such an
institution would be, not only to place the establishment beyond the
reach of persecution from the Chinese authorities, but, (as the great
Pope Innocent III. had contemplated a college at Paris for native Greek
youths),[443] even to withdraw the candidates altogether for a time
from the contagion of domestic influences and domestic associations.
Himself a Neapolitan, (having been born at Eboli, in the kingdom of
Naples,) Ripa’s thoughts naturally turned to his own country for the
means of accomplishing his design; and, after numberless difficulties,
he succeeding in transferring to his native city, under the name of “the
Holy Family of Jesus Christ,” the institution which he had projected at
Pekin. It consists of two branches, the college, and the congregation.
The latter is an association of priests and lay brothers, (not bound,
however, by religious vows), very similar in its constitution to the
Oratory of St. Philip Neri. The object of their association is the care
and direction of the College.

The College, on the other hand, is designed for the purpose of
educating and preparing for the priesthood, or at least for the office
of catechist, natives of China, Cochin China, Pegu, Tonquin, and
the Indian Peninsula. They are maintained free of all cost, and are
conducted to Europe and back to their native country at the charge of the
congregation; merely binding themselves to devote their lives, either
as priests or as catechists, to the duties of their native mission,
under the direction and jurisdiction of the sacred congregation of the
Propaganda. Since the time of the withdrawal of the European missionaries
from China, the mission has relied mainly upon this admirable
institution; and even still its members continue to deserve well of the
Church. The priest, Francis Tien, whose cruel sufferings for the faith
are detailed by Mgr. Rizzolati in a letter published in the Annals of
the Propagation of the Faith, July 1846, was a pupil of this college. So
likewise is the excellent and zealous priest, Thomas Pian, who recently
volunteered his services to the Propaganda as a missionary to the Chinese
immigrants in California.

At the time of Mezzofanti’s visit, March 23, 1832, the superior of the
college of the Congregation was Father John Borgia, the last direct
representative of the noble family of that name. He received the great
linguist with the utmost cordiality; and during the entire time of
his sojourn, the students and superiors vied with each other in their
attentions to their distinguished guest. From the moment of his arrival
he had thrown himself with all his characteristic energy into the study
of the language; and notwithstanding its proverbial difficulty, and
its even to him entirely novel character, he succeeded in an incredibly
short time in mastering all the essential principles of its rudimental
structure. Most unfortunately, however, before he had time to pursue
his advantage, his strength gave way under this excessive application,
and he was seized with a violent fever,[444] by which his life was for
some time seriously endangered. The fever was attended by delirium,
the effect of which, according to several writers[445] who relate the
circumstance, was to confuse his recollection of the several languages
which he had acquired, and to convert his speech into a laughable jumble
of them all. This, however, although an amusing traveller’s story, is but
a traveller’s story after all. Mezzofanti himself told Cardinal Wiseman
that the effect of his illness was not merely to confuse, but to _suspend
his memory altogether_. He completely forgot all his languages. His mind
appeared to return to its first uneducated condition of thought, and
whatever he chanced to express in the course of his delirium was spoken
in simple Italian, as though he had never passed outside of its limits.

He was so debilitated by this illness, that immediately upon his
convalescence it became necessary for him to return to Rome without
attempting to resume his Chinese studies. Most opportunely, however,
for his wishes, the authorities of the Propaganda some years afterwards
transferred to Rome, as we shall see, a certain number of these Chinese
students, with the view of enabling them to complete with greater
advantage in the great missionary college the studies which they had
commenced in what might almost be called a domestic institution.
With their friendly assistance Mezzofanti completed what had been so
inauspiciously interrupted by his illness.[446]

The fatigues of the homeward journey brought on a renewal of the fever;
and for some weeks after his return to Rome, (from which he had been
absent about two months,) he suffered considerably from its effects.
Happily, however, it left no permanent trace in his constitution, and
the autumn of 1832 found him engaged once more with all his usual energy
in his favourite pursuit. The intention of the Pope in inviting him
to Rome, had been to place him at the head of the Vatican Library, as
successor of the celebrated Monsignor Angelo Mai, then First Keeper of
that collection, who was about to be transferred to the Secretaryship
of the Propaganda. The arrangements connected with this change of
offices, however, were not yet completed, and Mezzofanti availed
himself industriously of this interval of comparative leisure which the
delay placed at his disposal. His position at Rome brought him into
contact with several languages of which he had never before met any
living representative; and many of those which he had hitherto had but
rare and casual opportunities of speaking or hearing spoken were now
placed within his reach as languages of daily and habitual use. In the
Maronite convent of Sant’ Antonio he had ancient and modern Syriac, with
its various modifications, at his command. For Armenian, Persian, and
Turkish, the two learned Mechitarist communities of San Giuseppe and
Sant’ Antonio supplied abundant and willing masters. One of these, the
eminent linguist Padre Aucher, whose English-Armenian Grammar Lord Byron
more than once commemorates as their joint production,[447] was himself
master of no less than twelve languages. To the Ruthenian priests of S.
Maria in Navicella, he could refer for more than one of the Sclavonic
languages. The Greek college of St. Athanasius, owing to the late
troubles in Greece, was then untenanted, but there were several Greek
students in the Propaganda, awaiting its re-opening, which took place
in 1837. The celebrated Persian scholar, Sebastiani, had just recently
returned to Rome. Signor Drach, a learned Hebrew convert, was Librarian
of the Propaganda; and a venerable Egyptian priest, Don Georgio Alabada,
supplied an opportunity of practice in the ancient Coptic, as well as in
the Arabic dialect of modern Egypt.

In the German College were to be found not only all the principal tongues
of the Austrian Empire, German, Magyar, Czechish and Polish, but many
of its more obscure languages—Romanic, Wallachian, Servian, and many
minor varieties of German, Rhetian, (the dialect of the Graubünden, or
Grisons) Dutch, Flemish, and Frisian. In reference to some of these
languages, I have been able to avail myself of the recollections of more
than one student of this noble institution, as witness of Mezzofanti’s
extraordinary proficiency.

He was on terms of the closest intimacy with the Abbé Lacroix, of the
French church of St. Lewis, since known as the editor of the _Systema
Theologicum_ of Leibnitz. The Rector of the English College, Dr. (now
Cardinal) Wiseman, even then a distinguished orientalist, and professor
of oriental languages in the Roman university, and the Rector of the
Irish College, the present Archbishop of Dublin, were his especial
friends. In both these establishments, he was a welcome and not
unfrequent visitant.

The several embassies, also, afforded another, though of course less
familiar school. He often met M. Bunsen, the Minister Resident of
Prussia; he was frequently the guest of the Marquis de Lavradio, the
Portuguese ambassador, and Don Manuel de Barras, whose letter attesting
the purity and perfection of Mezzofanti’s Castilian, is now before me,
was an attaché of the Spanish Embassy.

The Propaganda, however, itself a perfect microcosm of language, was
his principal, as well as his favourite school. For his simple and
lively disposition, the society of the young had always possessed a
special charm; and to his very latest hour of health, he continued to
find his favourite relaxation among the youths of this most interesting
institution. In summer, he commonly spent an hour, in winter an hour
and a half, in the Propaganda, partly in the library, partly among the
students, among whom he held the place alternately of master and of
pupil;—and, what is still more curious, he occasionally appeared in both
capacities, first learning a language from the lips of a student, and
then in his turn instructing his teacher in the grammatical forms and
constitution of the very language he had taught him!

Independently, indeed, of study altogether, the Propaganda was for years
his favourite place of resort, and there was no place where his playful
and ingenuous character was more pleasingly displayed. He mixed among the
pupils as one of themselves, with all the ease of an equal, and without
a shade of that laborious condescension which often makes the affability
of superiors an actual penance to those whom they desire to render
happy. While the cheerfulness of his conversation was often tempered
by grave advice or tender exhortation, it was commonly lively and even
playful, and frequently ran into an amusing exhibition which those who
witnessed never could forget. In the free and familiar intercourse
which he encouraged and maintained, there sometimes arose sportive
trials of skill, in which the great amusement of his young friends
consisted in endeavouring to puzzle him by a confusion of languages,
and to provoke him into answering in a language different from that in
which he was addressed. The idea of these trials (which reminded one of
the old-fashioned game of “cross-question,”) appears to have originated
in a good-humoured surprise, which the Pope Gregory XVI. played off on
Mezzofanti soon after his arrival in Rome. The linguist, however, was
equal to the emergency. Like the good knight, Sir Tristram, he proved

    “Most master of himself, and least encumbered,
    When over-matched, entangled, and outnumbered.”

“One day,” says M. Manavit, “Gregory XVI. provided an agreeable surprise
for the polyglot prelate, and a rare treat for himself, in an improvised
conversation in various tongues—a regular linguistic tournament. Among
the mazy alleys of the Vatican gardens, behind one of the massive walls
of verdure which form its peculiar glory, the Pope placed a certain
number of the Propaganda students in ambuscade. When the time came for
his ordinary walk, he invited Mezzofanti to accompany him; and, as they
were proceeding gravely and solemnly, on a sudden, at a given signal,
these youths grouped themselves for a moment on their knees before his
Holiness, and then, quickly rising, addressed themselves to Mezzofanti,
each in his own tongue, with such an abundance of words and such a
volubility of tone, that, in the jargon of dialects, it was almost
impossible to hear, much less to understand them. But Mezzofanti did
not shrink from the conflict. With the promptness and address which were
peculiar to him, he took them up singly, and replied to each in his own
language, with such spirit and elegance as to amaze them all.”

In addition to these increased opportunities of exercise, he also derived
much assistance, in the more obscure and uncommon department of his
peculiar studies, from the libraries of Rome, and especially from that
of the Propaganda. The early elementary books, grammars, vocabularies,
catechisms, &c., prepared for the use of missionaries in the remote
missions, have for the most part been printed at the Propaganda press:
and the library of that institution contains in manuscript similar
elementary treatises in languages for the study of which no printed
materials existed at that time. To all these, of course, the great
linguist enjoyed the freest access; and it can hardly be doubted
that, during the first year of his residence in Rome, he did more to
enlarge his stock of words, and to perfect his facility and fluency in
conversation, than perhaps in any previous year of his life.

Immediately upon Mgr. Mai’s appointment to the Secretaryship of
the Propaganda, May 15th, 1833, Mezzofanti was installed as _Primo
Custode_, First Keeper of the Vatican Library; and about the same time
he was appointed to a Canonry in St. Peter’s. In the midst of the warm
congratulations which he received from all sides, it was not without
considerable distrust of his own powers, that he entered upon the office
of Librarian, as the successor of a scholar so eminent as Angelo Mai.

    “It is no ordinary distinction,” he wrote to his friend Cav.
    Pezzana, “to be called to succeed Mgr. Mai in the care of the
    Vatican Library,—a post which has derived new brilliancy from
    the brilliant qualities of its latest occupant: nor can I
    overcome my apprehension lest the honour which I may gain by my
    first few hours of office may decline, when it comes to be seen
    how great is the difference between this distinguished man and
    his successor. This fear, I confess, is a drawback upon my joy
    at this happy event; but at the same time, I trust it will also
    stimulate me to make every effort that the lustre of a position
    in itself so honourable, may not be tarnished in my person. I
    have only to wish that your congratulation, coming as it does
    from a kindly feeling, may be an earnest of the successful
    exercise of the diligence I am determined to use in my new
    career, which is all the more grateful and honourable to me, as
    it furnishes more frequent occasions of corresponding with you.”

There is another of his letters of the same period, which to many perhaps
will appear trivial, but which points in a still more amiable light, not
alone his unaffected piety and humility, but the homely simplicity of his
disposition, and the affection with which he cherished all the domestic
relations. It is addressed to his cousin, Antonia, who has already been
mentioned in a former part of this Memoir, but who, for some years before
Mezzofanti’s leaving Bologna, had been afflicted with blindness. On the
occasion of his appointment, this lady employed the pen of a common
friend, Signora Galli, of Bologna, to convey her congratulations to
Mezzofanti. It would seem, moreover, that she had intended on the same
occasion to make him a present, which Mezzofanti, out of consideration
for her limited means, had thought it expedient to decline.

                                      “_Bologna, December 14, 1833._

    My most esteemed cousin,

    Accept, in return for all your kind congratulations and good
    wishes, my most sincere prayer that God may bestow upon you
    all the choicest blessings of the approaching festival. There
    is _one_ present which it is in your power to make me, and one
    which is especially suitable to a person so entirely devoted
    to God as you are: it is to offer up the holy communion for me
    on one of the coming festivals. I, upon my part, will offer
    the Holy Sacrifice for you on the feast of St. John; and
    on the same day I will make a special memento of your good
    parish priest, the abate Landrino, who once, upon the same
    day, showed me a kindness which I shall never forget. Pray
    remember me to him, and also to dear Signora Galli, in whom, as
    your secretary, you have found an admirable exponent of your
    affectionate sentiments, for which I am deeply grateful to
    you both. My nephews unite in best wishes for your health and
    happiness. Make the best report from me at home, and believe me
    always, your most affectionate cousin,

                                                 JOSEPH MEZZOFANTI.”




CHAPTER XI.

[1834.]


It may perhaps be convenient to interrupt the narrative at this point,
for the purpose of bringing together a number of miscellaneous reports
regarding certain languages of minor note ascribed to Mezzofanti, which,
through the kindness of many friends, have come into my hands. I shall
select those languages especially, respecting his acquaintance with
which some controversy has arisen. As my principal object in collecting
these reports has simply been to obtain a body of trustworthy materials,
whereupon to found an estimate of the real extent of the great linguist’s
attainments, I shall not consider it necessary here to follow any exact
philological arrangement; but shall present the notices of the several
languages, as nearly as possible in the order of the years to which they
belong, reserving for a later time the general summary of the results.

I shall commence with a language to which some allusions have been made
already—the Welsh.

Mr. Watts, in his admirable paper so often cited, has recorded it, as the
opinion of Mr. Thomas Ellis of the British Museum—“a Welsh gentleman,
who saw Mezzofanti more than once in his later years—that he was
unable to keep up, or even understand, a conversation in the language
of the Cymry.”[448] It is difficult to reconcile this statement with
the positive assertion of Mr. Harford, which we have seen in a former
page;—that, even as early as 1817, he himself “heard Mezzofanti speak
Welsh.” It might perhaps be suggested, as a solution of the difficulty,
that in the long interval between Mr. Harford’s visit, and that of Mr.
Ellis, Mezzofanti’s memory, tenacious as it was, had failed in this one
particular; but, about the period to which we have now arrived, there are
other witnesses who are quite as explicit as Mr. Harford.

Early in the year 1834, Dr. Forster, an English gentleman who has resided
much abroad, and who (although, from the circumstance of his books being
privately printed, little known to the English public) is the author of
several curious and interesting works, visited Mezzofanti in the Vatican
Library.

    “To-day,” (May 14, 1834) he writes in a work entitled _Annales
    d’un Physicien Voyageur_, “I visited Signor Mezzofanti,
    celebrated for his knowledge of more than forty ancient and
    modern languages. He is secretary of the Vatican—a small man
    with an air of great intelligence, and with the organs of
    language highly developed in his face. We talked a great deal
    about philology, and he told me many interesting anecdotes of
    his manner of learning different languages. As I was myself
    acquainted with ten languages, I wished to test the ability of
    this eminent linguist; and therefore proposed that we should
    leave Italian for the moment, and amuse ourselves by speaking
    different other languages. Having spoken in French, English,
    Spanish, Portuguese, German, and Dutch, I said at last:—

    ‘My friend, I have almost run out my stock of modern languages,
    except some which you probably do not know.’

    ‘Well,’ said he, ‘the dead languages, Latin and Greek, are
    matters which every one learns, and which every educated man is
    familiar with. We shall not mind them. But pray tell me what
    others you speak.’

    ‘I speak a little Welsh,’ I replied.

    ‘Good,’ said he, ‘I also know Welsh.’ And he began to talk
    to me at once, like a Welsh peasant. He knew also the other
    varieties of Celtic, Gælic, Irish, and Bas-Breton.”[449]

Some time after the visit of Mr. Harford, too, but before Mezzofanti
had left Bologna, when Dr. Baines, then Vicar Apostolic of the Western
District of England, (in which Wales was included,) was passing through
that city, the abate, concluding (erroneously, as Dr. Baines had the
mortification to confess,) that the bishop of Wales must necessarily be
an authority upon its language, came to him with a Welsh Bible, to ask
his assistance on some points connected with the pronunciation, being
already acquainted with the language itself.[450]

Another of his visitors, while at Bologna, has put on record a testimony
to the same effect, which, although it does not expressly allude
to Mezzofanti’s speaking the language, yet evidently supposes his
acquaintance with it, and which moreover is interesting for its own sake.
I allude to Dr. W. F. Edwards, of Paris, author of an able and curious
essay addressed to the historian, Amedée Thierry, “On the Physiological
Characters of the Races of Man, in their Relation to History.” In this
essay, while combating the popular notion, that in England the ancient
British race has been completely displaced by the various northern
conquerors who have overrun the country, Dr. Edwards alleges in support
of his own work, which he heard expressed by Mezzofanti, and which,
although founded on purely philological principles,[451] he regards as a
singular confirmation of his own physiological deductions.

    “I owe,” he says, “to the celebrated Mezzofanti, whom I had
    the pleasure of meeting at Bologna, an example of what I have
    been urging; and I am glad to repeat it here for more reasons
    than one. You will see in it a further confirmation of the
    conclusion regarding the Britons of England, which I have
    deduced from sources of a very different kind. If there is
    any characteristic which distinguishes English from the other
    modern languages of Europe, it is the extreme irregularity
    of its pronunciation. In other languages, when you have once
    mastered the fundamental sounds, you are enabled, by the aid of
    certain general rules, to pronounce the words with a tolerable
    approach to accuracy, even without understanding the meaning.
    In English you can never pronounce until you have actually
    learned the language. Mezzofanti, in speaking to me of Welsh,
    traced to that language the origin of this peculiarity of the
    English. I had no necessity to ask him through what channel. I
    knew, as well as he, that the English could not have borrowed
    from the Welsh; and that, before the Saxon invasion, the
    Britons had spoken the same language which afterwards became
    peculiar to Wales. Thus of his own accord and without my
    seeking for it, he gave me a new proof, entirely independent of
    the reasons which had already led me to the conviction that,
    despite the Saxon conquest, the Britons had never ceased to
    exist in England. They had for centuries been deemed extinct;
    and yet he recognises their descendants, so to speak, by the
    sound of their voice, as I have recognised them by their
    features! What more is needed to establish the identity?”

In the marked conflict between these testimonies and the strong adverse
opinion expressed by Mr. Ellis, “that the Cardinal was unable to keep
up or even understand a conversation in the language of the Cymry,” nay
that “he could not even read an ordinary book with facility,” I have
had inquiries made through several Welsh friends, the result of which,
coupled with the authorities already cited, satisfies me that Mr. Ellis
was certainly mistaken in his judgment. The belief that Mezzofanti
knew and spoke Welsh appears to be universal. Mr. Rhys Powel, a Welsh
gentleman who was personally acquainted with him, often heard that he
understood Welsh, and I have received a similar assurance from a Welsh
clergyman of my acquaintance. Mr. Rhys Powel, mentions the name of the
late Mr. Williams of Aberpergwin, as having “actually conversed with
the Cardinal in Welsh,” during a visit to Rome some time before his
eminence’s death; and a short composition of his in that language, which
I submitted to two eminent Welsh scholars, is pronounced by them not only
correct, but idiomatic in its structure and phraseology.

With such a number of witnesses, entirely independent of each other,
and spread over so long a period, attesting Mezzofanti’s knowledge of
Welsh, I can hardly hesitate to conclude that Mr. Ellis’s impression to
the contrary must have arisen from some accidental misunderstanding,
or perhaps from one of those casual failures from which even the most
perfect are not altogether exempt. The concluding paragraph of Dr.
Edward’s notice is interesting, although upon a different ground.

    “It is to be regretted,” he adds, “that a man who surpasses all
    others by his prodigious knowledge of languages, should content
    himself with what is but an evidence of his own learning, and
    should conceal from the world the science upon which that
    learning is founded. It is not to his prodigious memory and
    the, so to say, inborn aptitude of his mind for retaining words
    and their combinations, that he owes the facility with which he
    masters all languages, but to his eminently analytical mind,
    which rapidly penetrates their genius and makes it its own. I
    collect from himself that he studies languages, rather through
    their spirit than through their letter. What do we know of the
    spirit of languages? Almost nothing. But if Mezzofanti would
    communicate to the world the fruit of his observations, we
    should see a new science arise amongst us.”[452]

It will be recollected that Flemish was one of the minor languages
which he acquired during his residence at Bologna. From the time of
his settling at Rome, his opportunities of practice in this and the
kindred dialect of Holland, were almost of daily occurrence. One of the
earliest appears to have been afforded by his intercourse with a young
student of the Germanic College, the abbé Malou, since one of the most
distinguished of the Catholic literatî of Belgium,[453] for several years
Professor of Scripture in the University of Louvain, and now Bishop of
Bruges. Monseigneur Malou has been good enough to note down for me his
recollections of his intercourse with Mezzofanti, in so far as they
relate to his native language.

    “During my stay in Rome (1831-35), I conversed several times
    in Flemish with Cardinal Mezzofanti, and I was thus enabled
    to ascertain that he understood our language thoroughly. He
    spoke to me of the works of Cats and Vondel, two distinguished
    Flemish poets, which he had read. Nevertheless, I fancied that
    I perceived his vocabulary to be rather limited. He often
    repeated the same words and phrases. He spoke with a Brabant
    accent, for he had learned Flemish from some young men of
    Brussels, who studied at the University of Bologna, in which
    his Eminence was at that time Librarian. Monsignor Mezzofanti,
    after I had spoken, remarked of himself, that I, being a
    Fleming, did not speak as they do in Brabant; and hence he
    had a difficulty in catching some of my expressions, which he
    requested me to repeat. It is, therefore, not quite correct to
    say, that he knew our different dialects; but, if he had had
    occasion to learn them, he could, without doubt, have done so
    with great ease.

    Some days before my departure from Rome, in May, 1835, I met
    this learned dignitary in the sacristy of S. Peter’s. He at
    once accosted me in Flemish; and, when I had replied, he
    upbraided me with having forgotten my mother tongue, for I
    mixed up with it, he said, some German words. The reproach
    was well founded: for I had passed about three years in the
    German College, where I had learned a little German, and had
    had meanwhile no occasion to speak Flemish. Such a reproof from
    an Italian, who thus gave lessons in Flemish to a Fleming,
    struck me as exceeding droll, and amused me not a little. This
    anecdote shows what minute attention the learned Cardinal paid
    to the boundary lines of kindred tongues.

    I have heard Mezzofanti, in the course of one evening, speaking
    Italian, English, German, Flemish, Russian, French, and the
    Sicilian and Neapolitan dialects of Italian.”[454]

This poverty of his Flemish vocabulary, however, disappeared with
practice. Another learned Belgian ecclesiastic, Monsignor Aerts, who
subsequently to the sojourn of M. Malou in Rome, resided there for
many years, as Rector of the Belgian College, reports as follows of
Mezzofanti’s Flemish, such as he found it in 1837 and the following year.

    “I was intimately acquainted with Cardinal Mezzofanti, during
    my sojourn in Rome; that is to say, from 1837 to the moment of
    his death. I saw him frequently. After the establishment in
    Rome of the Belgian Ecclesiastical College, of which I was the
    first President, and he the Patron, I had still more frequent
    relations with his eminence. I spoke to him several times in
    each month. Part of our conversation always took place in
    Flemish. I can assure you that he never had to look for a word,
    and that he spoke our language most freely, and with a purity
    of expression and pronunciation not always to be met with among
    our own countrymen. One day that I was admitted along with the
    Cardinal, to an audience of the Pope Gregory XVI., during his
    hour of recreation, His Holiness expressed a desire to hear
    him speaking Flemish with me. We then began a little discussion
    about the relative difficulty of German and Flemish. His
    Eminence thought Flemish the harder of the two. The Pope called
    him ‘a living Pentecost.’ He also wrote Flemish poetry: and
    one day he gave me several verses of his own composition, to
    send in token of remembrance to a young gentleman from Bruges
    whom he had confirmed at Rome. Mezzofanti not only knew the
    language itself thoroughly, but he was moreover acquainted with
    its history and with the principal Flemish and Dutch authors.
    I heard him speak of the works of Vondel, Cats, David, &c. He
    spoke and pronounced Dutch equally well. He said, however,
    that, the modern Hollanders had changed the language by
    approximating to the German. He knew, also, some of the local
    dialects of Flemish, especially that of Brussels. He could
    even distinguish the inhabitants of Brussels by their accent,
    of which I have more than once been witness. When he saw a
    Fleming, he always saluted him in his own tongue; as he indeed
    did with all foreigners.

    In 1838, Cardinal Sterckx, Archbishop of Malines, paid a
    visit to Rome, and I had the honour of being present during
    several conversations which he held in Flemish with Cardinal
    Mezzofanti. The latter once took a fancy to have a little
    Flemish conversation with his colleague, in a consistory which
    the Pope held at this time: and he himself playfully remarked
    that probably that was the first time, since the origin of
    the Church, that two cardinals had talked Flemish in a papal
    consistory. Cardinal Sterckx told me this anecdote the same
    day.”

The complete success with which he overcame the deficiency that M. Malou
had observed in 1831, and the curious mastery of the various dialects
which his singularly exquisite perception of the minutest peculiarities
of language enabled him to acquire, are attested by another witness of
the same period, Father Van Calven of the same city.

    “On the 6th February, 1841,” he writes, “the Cardinal, who was
    no less kind and affable than learned, administered the first
    communion to my cousin, Leo van Oockerout, who was then with
    his friends in Rome. Being a Belgian, a friend, and a relative,
    I was invited to be present at the ceremony, which took place
    in the Church of S. Peter, over the tomb of SS. Peter and
    Paul. Cardinal Mezzofanti celebrated the Holy Sacrifice; and
    after the Gospel, or perhaps immediately before the child’s
    communion, he made a little discourse in French, in reference
    to the beautiful occasion which had drawn us together. This
    little discourse, which was very simple, was in excellent
    French. After the ceremony was over, he called us all into
    the sacristy, and there we had a conversation in Flemish. His
    eminence distinguished the different dialects of our Belgian
    provinces perfectly. Thus I remember distinctly that he said to
    us: ‘I learned Flemish from a native of Brabant, and this is
    the way I pronounce the word; but, you from Flanders, pronounce
    it thus.’—I forget what was the word about which there was
    question; but at any rate, the Cardinal was quite correct in
    his observation.”

The same curiously delicate power of “discriminating the various dialects
of the language, and of distinguishing by their accents, the inhabitants
of the various provinces of Belgium,” are attested by another member
of the same society, Father Legrelle. On the eve of this gentleman’s
return to Belgium, he asked the Cardinal to be so good as to write his
name in his _Album de Voyage_. On the very instant, and in F. Legrelle’s
presence, his Eminence penned these Flemish verses, which he gave to M.
Legrelle as a souvenir:—

    God wept, en wyst den weg tot de volkomenheid;
    Hoort zyne stem, myn Vriend, de stemme der waerheid.[455]

One of M. Legrelle’s companions, M. Leon Wilde, a native of Holland, and
now a member of the Jesuit Society at Katwick, bears the same testimony
to the facility and elegance with which the Cardinal spoke Dutch. M.
Wilde also mentions his having written some verses in that language.
But a “Tour to Rome”[456] by a Dutch professor, Dr. Wap, published at
Breda, in 1839, contains so full and so interesting a notice of the great
linguist, in reference to this department of his accomplishment, that,
without referring further to M. Wilde’s letter, I shall content myself
with translating the most important passages of Dr. Wap’s account of his
visit. The author, then a professor in the military college of Breda, is
now resident at Utrecht.

    “Joseph Mezzofanti,” he writes, “is at present[457] in his
    sixty-fifth year. He is of a slight figure, pale complexion,
    black hair which is beginning to turn gray, a piercing eye,
    quick utterance, and an air full of good humour, but not very
    intellectual, so that one would hardly expect to discover
    faculties so extraordinary under such an exterior. The first
    time I saw him was in the Vatican library, in the large hall
    which is furnished with tables, for the accommodation of those
    who wish to read or to take notes. He was busy distributing
    books, and at the same time was talking to an English lady
    accompanied by some English gentlemen. I afterwards spent an
    hour or two with this family, and learned that Mezzofanti had
    written in the lady’s album four very graceful English lines,
    regarding America, whence she had come, and Vienna, where
    she was going to reside. As soon as the librarian noticed
    any foreigner, he at once began a conversation with him, and
    carried it on, no matter what might be the stranger’s idiom.
    Prince Michael of Russia was amazed at the ease and volubility
    with which Mezzofanti spoke the Polish language. He accosted
    me in English, which has in some measure become indigenous to
    Rome: but, finding I was from Holland, he at once continued
    the conversation in the _Brussels_ dialect (as he called it,)
    and told me how scanty the means were of which he had been
    able to avail himself in the study of Flemish. These were: a
    Flemish grammar; two authors, (Bolhuis and Ten Kate,) with
    whom he was acquainted; and finally, Vondel and Cats, whom
    he had carefully read. He had never seen any of Bilderdyk’s
    works, and he inquired whether this scholar had not introduced
    a dialect into the Dutch language. When I had given him the
    necessary information, and told him that Bilderdyk, besides
    a hundred other works, had written a book on the characters
    of the Alphabet, another on the Gender of Substantives, and
    three volumes on their roots, his delight was extreme, and he
    expressed a great desire to possess these works. I undertook
    to send them to him, and I took care to redeem my promise,
    as soon as I returned home.[458] After this interview, I did
    not presume to manifest my earnest desire for any further
    interviews with him: but Mezzofanti anticipated my wishes, and
    invited me to come and see him at the Propaganda, as often as
    I liked. There it is that he spends some hours, every evening,
    among the students, talking with each in his own tongue. I took
    advantage of his kind proposal, and had thus an opportunity of
    getting a nearer view of this college of the Propaganda....

    Nowhere will one find so many resources for amassing treasures
    of knowledge united together, as in the vast college of the
    Propaganda....

    Here are assembled a hundred and fourteen students from
    forty-one different countries. At my request, the Rector caused
    the Pater Noster to be written by sixteen foreign students in
    their respective languages. Here, in the evening, in the midst
    of these various nations, I met Mezzofanti, who seemed to
    belong to each of them. He spoke Chinese with Leang of Canton,
    as easily as he spoke Dutch with Mr. Steenhof[459] of Utrecht.
    I will never forget the instructive hours which I spent there.
    The natural frankness of Mezzofanti, his free and communicative
    conversation, his easy tone, his gay disposition, all rendered
    my farewell visit, which I twice repeated, very painful to me.

    Amidst so many grave employments, Mezzofanti goes twice each
    week to the house of the orphans, to teach them the catechism,
    and to the barracks of the Swiss soldiers to instruct them in
    the principles of religion. The library requires his care twice
    in the week, for several hours in the morning; in the afternoon
    he gives lessons to the pupils of the Propaganda, whose studies
    he superintends; to his care are confided the public discourses
    delivered on the Epiphany: almost all foreigners come to visit
    him; in fine, he pays his visits in his humble equipage, and
    attends at the Pope’s court when pressing affairs requires his
    presence; and, notwithstanding many duties and occupations, he
    still finds time to assist at the divine offices. Who will not
    feel profound respect and sincere admiration for such a man?

    I will here subjoin some lines which I wrote _extempore_ in
    Mezzofanti’s album, together with his immediate reply.

    ‘Wie ooit de Pinkstergaaf in twijfel durfde trekken.
      Sta hier beschaamd, verplet voor Mezzofanti’s geest,
    Hij eere in hem den man, die de aard ten tolk kan strekken.
      Wiens brien in ’t taalgeheim van alle volken leest.
    Aanvaard, ô Telg van’t Zuid, den eerbiedgroet van’t Noorden,
      Maar denk, terwijl nu oog mijn nietig schrift beziet,
    Al mist der Batten spraak Italjes zang akkoorden,
      Hun tongval of hun ziel leent zich tot vleijen niet.’

    My veritable impromptu instantly called forth this beautiful
    answer from Mezzofanti:—

    ‘Mynheer! als uw fraaj schrift kwam heden voor mijne oogen,
    Door Uw’ goedaardigheid was ikheel opgetogen,
    En zooveel in mijn geest zooveel in’t hart opklom,
    Dat mijne tong verbleef med vijftig taalen stom.
    Nu, opdat ik niet schijn U een ondankbaar wezen,
    Bid ik U in mijn hart alleen te willen lezen.[460]

                                                  Joseph Mezzofanti.

    _Rome, den 17 April, 1837._’

    After writing these lines, he asked me if there were any
    mistakes in them, and, if so, if I would be good enough to
    point them out to him. I then noticed the word _fraaj_ in the
    first line, knowing he would reply that the letter _i_ at
    the end of a word should be replaced by a _j_. The _aa_ in
    _taalen_, in the fourth line, he justified by a reference to
    the Flemish grammar which he used at the time. As for the _d_
    in the preposition _med_, which occurs in the same line, he
    contended that this was the proper orthography of the word, as
    it was an abbreviation of _mede_. I would have been greatly
    surprised at all this, if I had not previously had occasion
    to admire the delicate ear which this giant of linguistic
    learning possessed for the subtleties of pronunciation, and the
    wonderful perspicacity of his orthographical system: especially
    as he had expressed to me his just disapprobation of the
    foreign words which some of our countrymen are letting slip
    into their conversation. He had already given proof to another
    traveller from Holland that he was perfectly acquainted with
    the difference between the words _nimmer_ and _nooit_, so that
    he hardly ever used one for the other.”

Side by side with the Dutch traveller’s sketch, may be placed a still
more lively account of Mezzofanti by another visitor of the Vatican,
the poet Frankl, a Bohemian by birth, but chiefly known by his German
writings. This sketch, besides the allusion to Mezzofanti’s skill
in the poet’s native language, Bohemian, contains a slight, but not
uninteresting specimen of Mezzofanti’s German vocabulary, and, moreover,
illustrates very curiously the attention which he seems always to have
given to the general principles of harmony, and his acquaintance with
the metrical capabilities of more than one ancient and modern language.
The Signor Luzatto, to whose introductory letter Frankl refers, was a
friend of Mezzofanti—a distinguished Italian Jew—himself an accomplished
linguist, and well known to oriental scholars by his contributions to the
_Archives Israelites_, and by a work on the Babylonian Inscriptions.

    “Having furnished myself,” writes Herr Frankl, “with a letter
    of introduction from Luzatto of Padua, I went to the Vatican
    Library, of which Mezzofanti was the head. His arrival was
    looked for every moment; and I occupied the interval by
    examining the long, well lighted gallery of antiquities which
    is outside, and which also leads into the halls that contain
    the masterpieces of ancient art in marble. I was in the act of
    reading the inscription upon one of the many marble slabs which
    are inserted in the wall, when a stranger who, except myself,
    was the sole occupant of the gallery, said to me; ‘Here comes
    Monsignor Mezzofanti!’

    An undersized man, somewhat disposed towards corpulency, in a
    violet cassock falling to the ancle, and a white surplice which
    reached to the knee, came briskly, almost hurriedly, towards
    us. He carried his four-cornered violet cap in his hand, and
    thus I was better able to note his lively, though not striking
    features, and his grey hair still mingled with black. About his
    lips played a smile, which I afterwards observed to be their
    habitual expression. He appeared to be not far from sixty. When
    he came sufficiently near, I advanced to meet him with a silent
    bow, and he at once received me with the greeting in German,
    ‘_Seyn Sie mir willkommen!_’ (‘You are welcome.’)

    ‘I am surprised, Monsignor,’ I replied, ‘that you address me
    in German, although I have not spoken a word as yet.’ ‘Oh,’
    said he, ‘a great many foreigners of all countries come to
    visit me, and I have acquired a certain routine—pardon me, I
    should have said a certain ‘knack,’ (die Routine—verzeihen
    sie, ‘die gewandtheit’ sollte ich sagen,—) of discovering
    their nationality from their physiognomy, or rather from their
    features.’

    ‘I am sorry, Monsignor,’ I replied, ‘that it is my ill fortune
    to belie this knack of yours. I am a native of Bohemia,
    although not of Bohemian race, and Bohemian is my mother
    tongue.’

    ‘To what nationality, then, do you belong?’ asked Mezzofanti in
    Bohemian, without a moment’s hesitation.”

He afterwards changed the language to Hebrew.

Frankl adds, that on a second visit to the reading room of the Vatican,
he found the gay animated Monsignor in the ordinary black dress of a
priest; and took this opportunity to present him a copy of his “Colombo,”
in which he had written the inscription, “_Dem Sprachen-chamæleon
Mezzofanti._” (“To Mezzofanti, the Chameleon of language”.)

    “‘Ha,’ said Mezzofanti, with a smile, ‘I have had numberless
    compliments paid me; but this is a spick and span new one,’
    (funkelnagel-neu.)

    Upon this word he laid a special emphasis, as if to call my
    attention to his well known familiarity with unusual words.

    ‘I see,’ he continued, ‘you have adopted the Italian form of
    cantos and stanzas.’

    ‘Yes,’ I replied, ‘the Germans nowadays, for the most part, do
    homage to the Italian forms.’

    ‘At last!’ said he, with a smile not unmixed with triumph.

    ‘Schlegel, Bürger, and Platen,’ I said, ‘have written sonnets
    quite as harmonious as Petrarch’s, and Tasso’s stanza has found
    its rival among the Germans.’

    ‘Well, at all events,’ replied Mezzofanti, ‘the Germans have
    not succeeded in hexameters. Klopstock’s are incorrect and
    inharmonious. What harmony is there in the line:—

    ‘Sing, unsterbliche Seele, des sündigen Menschen Erlösung!’
    Where is the cæsura—speaking to you, I should say,
    _abschnitt_—in this line? Voss, it is true, wrote correctly;
    and yet an Italian will hang down his chin whenever Voss’s
    hexameters are read. As for Goethe, what sort of poetry is his?
    You know his elegies—for example, the hexameter which ends

    ——‘blaustrumpf und violet strumpf!’[461]

    Surely he must have taken the Germans for a hard-hearted
    nation!’

    I quoted for him the burlesque couplet which was composed in
    ridicule of Schiller’s and Goethe’s distichs.

    ‘In Weimar und Jenam acht man Hexameter wie den,
    Und die Pentameter sind noch erbärmlicher.’

    He repeated it at once after me, and seemed to wish to impress
    it on his mind.

    ‘Do you know,’ he pursued, ‘what language I place before all
    others, next to Greek and Italian, for constructive capability
    and rhythmical harmoniousness?—The Hungarian. I know some
    pieces of the later poets of Hungary, the melody of which
    took me completely by surprise. Mark its future history, and
    you will see in it a sudden outburst of poetic genius, which
    will fully confirm my prediction. The Hungarians themselves
    do not seem to be aware what a treasure they have in their
    language.’[462]

    ‘It would be in the highest degree interesting,’ said I,
    ‘if you would draw up a comparative sketch of the metrical
    capabilities of all the various languages that you speak. Who
    is there that could speak on the subject with more authority?’

    He received my suggestion with a smile, but made no reply.
    He seems, indeed, to content himself with the glory of being
    handed down to posterity as the Crœsus of languages, without
    leaving to them the slightest permanent fruit of his immense
    treasures of science.”[463]

Among these less commonly cultivated languages, I may also class Maltese.
In this Mezzofanti was equally at home. As Maltese can scarcely be said
to possess anything like a literature,[464] it may be presumed that he
acquired it chiefly by oral instruction, partly from occasional visitors
to Rome, partly from some Maltese servants who were in the Propaganda
at the time of his arrival. This much at least is certain, that, in the
year 1840, he spoke the language freely and familiarly. Father Andrew
Schembri, of La Valetta, during a residence in Rome in that year, having
conducted the preparatory spiritual exercises for a number of youths to
whom the Cardinal administered the first communion in the church of
San Vito, met his Eminence at breakfast in the convent attached to this
church. No sooner was Father Schembri presented to him as a Maltese, than
he entered into conversation with him in his own language.[465] Another
Maltese ecclesiastic, Canon Falzou of the cathedral, met the Cardinal in
Rome at a later date, in 1845-6. In the course of his sojourn he “had
frequent opportunities, for a period of eleven months, of conversing with
him in Maltese, which he spoke very well.”[466]

I need scarcely observe that, although in the capital and the principal
towns of Malta, the prevailing language is Italian, the dialect spoken
by the rural population contains a large admixture of foreign elements,
chiefly Arabic and Greek. To what a degree the former language enters
into the composition of Maltese, may be inferred from the well-known
literary imposture of Vella, who attempted to pass off a forgery of his
own as an Arabic history of Sicily under the Arabs.[467]

Before closing this chapter, I shall add a short note of the Count de
Lavradio, Portuguese ambassador in London, and brother of the Marquis de
Lavradio, who for many years held the same office in Rome. It regards
Mezzofanti’s acquaintance with Portuguese, another language which very
few foreigners take the trouble to acquire.

    “I have always heard,” writes his excellency, “both from my
    brother and from other learned Portuguese who knew Cardinal
    Mezzofanti, that he was perfectly conversant with the
    Portuguese language, and that he spoke it with facility and
    with elegance. I myself have read letters written by him in
    excellent Portuguese; particularly one very remarkable one,
    addressed by him to the learned M. de Souza, for the purpose of
    conveying his thanks for the offer which M. de Souza had made
    to him, of a copy of the magnificent edition of Camoens, which
    he had published in 1817.”

The Marquis de Lavradio here referred to, while ambassador at Rome,
expressed the same opinion to Cardinal Wiseman. The Marquis, in
Mezzofanti’s Portuguese, was particularly struck by the precision of
his language and the completeness of his mastery over even the delicate
forms of conversational phraseology. He instanced in particular one of
his letters. It was perfect, he said, not only in vocabulary but in form,
even down to the minutest phrases of conventional compliment and formal
courtesy.




CHAPTER XII.

[1834-1836.]


I resume the narrative.

The Librarian of the Vatican, or as he is more properly called the
“Librarian of the Roman Church,” (_Bibliotecario della Chiesa Romana_,)
is always a Cardinal, commonly the Cardinal Secretary of State. His
duties as such, however, are in great measure nominal; and the details
of the management practically rest with the _Primo Custode_, or chief
keeper of the Library, who is assisted by a second keeper, and seven
_scrittori_, or secretaries, among whom are distributed the seven
departments,—Hebrew, Syriac, Arabic, Greek, Latin, Italian, and modern
foreign languages—into which the books are classified.

The Cardinal Librarian at the time of Mezzofanti’s appointment was
Cardinal Della Somaglia, who had been Secretary of State under the Popes
Leo XII. and Pius VIII.; and who, although, owing to his great age, he
had retired from the more active office of Secretary, still retained that
of Librarian of the Vatican. Mezzofanti’s colleague as _Secondo Custode_,
was Monsignor Andrea Molza, an orientalist of high reputation, and
Professor of Hebrew in the Roman University.

Attached to the Basilica of St. Peter’s, and subject to the chapter of
that church, is a college for the education of ecclesiastics, (popularly
called _Pietrini_,) whose striking and picturesque costume seldom fails
to attract the notice of strangers. The Rector of this college is always
a member of the chapter, and is elected by the canons themselves from
among their number. Immediately upon his nomination by the Pope as member
of the chapter, Mezzofanti was appointed by his brother canons to the
office of Rector of this college, which he continued to hold till his
elevation to the Cardinalate. The office is in great part honorary;
and Mezzofanti, in addition to his gratuitous services, devoted a
considerable part of his income from other sources to the improvement
of the establishment, and especially to the support of many meritorious
students, whose limited means would have excluded them from its
advantages but for his disinterested generosity.

He was also named Consulter of the Sacred Congregation for the correction
of oriental books, and a censor of the academy.

It need hardly be said that, from the moment of his arrival in Rome,
he had been received with warm and ready welcome in every scientific
and literary circle. With Monsignor Mai, both during his residence at
the Vatican and after his removal to the Propaganda, he was on terms of
most friendly intercourse, and the confidant of many of his literary
undertakings. The most distinguished professors of the several schools
of Rome, Graziosi, Fornari, Modena, De Vico, Perrone, Palma, Manera, De
Luca, vied with each other in doing him honour. He was elected into all
the leading literary societies and academies of the city; and soon after
his appointment as Vatican Librarian, he read in the “Academy of the
Catholic Religion,” a paper which attracted much notice at the time: “On
the Services of the Church in promoting the Diffusion of True Knowledge,
and the Development of the Human Mind.”

The Pope, Gregory XVI., himself, a great lover of oriental studies,
received him into his most cordial intimacy. In the one brief hour of
recreation which this great and zealous pontiff, who retained even in the
Vatican the spirit and the observances of the cloister, allowed himself
after dinner, Mezzofanti was his frequent companion. The privilege of
entrée was open to him at all times; but it was specially understood that
at this more private and informal hour, when the Pope loved to see his
most cherished friends around him, Mezzofanti should present himself at
least once every week.

In like manner his early friend, Giustiniani, also an accomplished
oriental scholar, lost no time, on Mezzofanti’s coming to Rome, in
resuming with him the intimate friendship which they had contracted
during his Eminence’s residence at Bologna, as Cardinal Legate.
Mezzofanti used to spend every Wednesday evening with Cardinal
Giustiniani; and on one occasion, when Dr. Wiseman called at the
Cardinal’s, he found them reading Arabic together. He met with equal
kindness from the Cardinal Secretary, Bernetti, and from Cardinal
Albani, who had both known him at Bologna. The venerable old Cardinal
Pacca, too, took especial delight in his company. He was a constant
guest at the literary assemblies in the palace of Cardinal Zurla,
known to general readers as the historian of Marco Polo and the early
Venetian travellers.[468] On Pentecost Sunday, 1834, the anniversary
of the Feast of Tongues, the Cardinal gave a dinner in honour of the
great Polyglot, at which many foreigners (one of whom was the present
Cardinal Wiseman) speaking a great variety of languages, and all the most
distinguished linguists of Rome, were present. Each of the guests carried
away a feeling of wonder, almost as though his own language had been
the only subject of Mezzofanti’s extraordinary display. Signor Drach,
the learned Jew, named in a former page,[469] declared that he had not
thought it possible for any but a born Hebrew to speak both Scriptural
and Rabbinical Hebrew with the fluency and correctness which Mezzofanti
was able to command. A Polish priest named Ozarowski,[470] who sat next
to Mezzofanti, assured the late Dr. Cox, of Southampton, that, had he
not known Mezzofanti personally, he would, from his conversation, have
believed him to be a highly educated Pole; and he added that, “foreigner
as this great linguist was, his familiarity with Polish literature
and history completely threw his own into the shade.” Nor was this
extraordinary faculty confined to the literature and language alone. A
Polish lady was so astonished, not only at his knowledge of the language,
but at his “acquaintance with the country, and even with individuals,
(for many of whom he inquired by name, describing where they lived, what
was their occupation, &c.,”) that, as she assured Cardinal Wiseman, she
“could not believe that he had not resided, or at least travelled, in
Poland.”

       *       *       *       *       *

The exact number of languages to which this extraordinary facility
extended, had long been a matter of speculation. Mezzofanti
himself—averse to everything that bore the appearance of display—although
repeatedly questioned on the subject, generally evaded the inquiry, or
passed it off with a jesting answer. It is probable too, that he was
deterred from any enumeration by the difficulty of distinguishing between
languages properly so-called, and dialects. The first distinct statement
of his own, bearing directly upon the point, which I have been able to
trace on good authority to himself, was made soon after his appointment
as Vatican Librarian, in an interview with a gentleman of Italian family,
long resident in England, who was introduced to him by Dr. Cox, at that
time vice-rector of the English College. The particulars of the interview
were communicated to me by Dr. Cox himself, in a letter which I received
from him a very short time before his death. The gentleman referred
to was Count Mazzinghi, the well known composer, who, if not born in
England, had resided in London for so long a time, that in language,
habits, and associations, he was a thorough Englishman.

    “On one occasion,” says Dr. Cox, “when going to the Vatican
    Library to visit Mezzofanti, I took with me an English family,
    who were most desirous of being introduced to him. Mezzofanti
    remonstrated good-humouredly with me for bringing people to see
    him, as if he were worthy of being visited, but he received our
    party with his habitual politeness.

    The gentleman whom I introduced, begged as a favour that he
    would tell him how many languages he could speak. ‘I have
    heard many different accounts,’ he said, ‘but will you tell me
    yourself?’

    After some hesitation, Mezzofanti answered, ‘Well! if you must
    know, I speak forty-five languages.’

    ‘Forty-five!’ replied my friend. ‘How, sir, have you possibly
    contrived to acquire so many?’

    ‘I cannot explain it,’ said Mezzofanti. ‘Of course God has
    given me this peculiar power: but if you wish to know how I
    preserve these languages, I can only say, that, when once I
    hear the meaning of a word in any language, I never forget it.’

    He then begged us to excuse him, and called one of the
    librarians to show us the principal curiosities of the library.
    On our return, we found him seated with a young German artist,
    who, he told us, was going to Constantinople. ‘I am teaching
    him Turkish before he goes,’ he continued, ‘and as he speaks
    modern Greek very well, I use that language as the means of my
    instruction. I had the honour,’ he subjoined, ‘of giving some
    lessons on modern Greek to your poet, Lord Byron, when he was
    in Bologna.’

    “I should add,” said Dr. Cox “that I frequently heard him
    speak of Byron, and that his criticisms upon his works, and
    his reflections on the peculiar characteristics of his poetry,
    would have been worthy of a place in a Review.”

While he thus professed, however, to speak forty-five languages, he took
care, as in his similar conversation with Dr. Tholuck, to convey that his
knowledge of some of them was much less perfect than of others.

Nor did it remain stationary at this limit. Its progress, even while
he resided at Bologna, had been steady, and tolerably uniform. But the
increased facilities for the study which he enjoyed in Rome, enabled him
to add more rapidly to his store. Cardinal Wiseman assures me, that,
before he left Rome, Mezzofanti’s reply to the inquiry as to the number
of his languages, was that which has since become a sort of proverb,
“Fifty, and Bolognese.” Even as early as 1837, Mezzofanti himself, in his
extempore reply to Dr. Wap’s Dutch verses, as we have seen, used words to
the same effect:—

    Mijne tong verbleef med _vijftig taalen_ stom,

I have been anxious to obtain, on this interesting point, an authentic
report from persons who enjoyed almost daily opportunities of intercourse
with Mezzofanti at this period, for the purpose of testing more
satisfactorily, the accuracy of a contemporary sketch of him, which
appeared in a work of considerable pretensions, published in Germany,
in 1837—Fleck’s “Scientific Tour,”—which describes him, from popular
report, as speaking “some thirty languages and dialects, but of course,
not all with equal readiness.” As M. Fleck is in many things, an echo
of the supercilious criticisms of those who, while they admitted in
general terms the marvellous character of Mezzofanti’s talent, contrived,
nevertheless, to depreciate it in detail, it may be well to afford the
reader an opportunity of judging it for himself.[471]

    “Of middle size and somewhat stooping in his gait,” writes M.
    Fleck, “Mezzofanti’s appearance is nevertheless agreeable and
    benevolent. Since he has been Prefect of the Vatican in Mai’s
    stead, I have had occasion to see him daily. His talent is
    that of a linguist, not that of a philologist. One forenoon in
    the Vatican, he spoke modern Greek to a young man who came in,
    Hebrew with a rabbi or ‘scrittore’ of the library, Russian with
    a magnate who passed through to the manuscript rooms, Latin and
    German with me, Danish with a young Danish archæologist who was
    present, English with the English,—Italian with many. German he
    speaks well, but almost too softly, like a Hamburgher; Latin
    he does not speak particularly well, and his English is just
    as middling. There is something about him that reminds me of a
    parrot—he does not seem to abound in ideas; but his talent is
    the more deserving of admiration, that the Italians have great
    difficulties to cope with in learning a foreign language. He
    will always remain a wonderful phenomenon, if not a miracle in
    the dogmatic sense. It is said to have been observed, that he
    often repeats the same ideas in conversation. He was entirely
    dependant on Mai in his position in the Vatican, especially at
    the commencement of his tenure of office, and manifested some
    weakness in this respect. He told me he had learned Russian at
    Bologna from a Pole, and so had been in danger of introducing
    Polonicisms into his Russian. In the French wars, his visits
    to the hospitals gave him an excellent opportunity of seeing
    and conversing with men of different nations, and the march
    of the Austrians made him acquainted with the dialect of the
    gipsies. Thrice, he told me, he has been dangerously ill,
    and in a kind of ‘confusion of languages.’ He is altogether
    a man of a sensitive nervous system, and much more decidedly
    and more pusillanimously attached to Catholicism than Mai.
    He has never travelled, except to Rome and Naples; and to
    Naples he went to study Chinese at the institute for the
    education of natives of China as missionaries, and there he
    fell dangerously ill. He seeks the society of foreigners
    very eagerly, in order to converse with every one in his own
    language. As a special favourite of the Pope, he enlivens
    his holiness’s after-dinner hours (Verdaungs-stunden), and
    is often invited to him in the afternoon: by his manifold
    acquirements and the winning urbanity of his manners, he seems
    as if born for the society of a court. He has made himself
    popular among the learned foreigners who visit the Vatican,
    by permitting them to continue their labours in the library
    during certain days after the beginning of the holidays, on
    which the library had ordinarily been closed with a view to
    the adjustment and supervision of the MSS. His predilection
    for acquiring foreign idioms is so strong that he observes and
    imitates the provincial dialects and accents. He has carried
    this so far, that, for example, he can distinguish the Hamburgh
    and Hanoverian German very well. Even of Wendish he is not
    ignorant. This is, indeed, a gift of no very high order; but
    it is a gift nevertheless, and, when exercised in its more
    dazzling points of practice, sets one in amazement. Mezzofanti
    understands this well. The Italians admire this distinguished
    and unassuming man, as the eighth wonder of the world, and
    believe his reputation to be not only European, but Asiatic
    and African also. He is said to speak some thirty languages
    and dialects; but of course not all with equal readiness. The
    Persian missionary, Sebastiani, who, in Napoleon’s time, played
    an important political part in Persia, was eagerly sought after
    by Mezzofanti when in Rome, that he might learn modern Persian
    from him; Sebastiani, however, showed himself disinclined to
    his society, which pained Mezzofanti much. Mezzofanti has been
    called the modern Mithridates, and thought very highly of
    altogether. In an intellectual point of view, many learned men,
    even Italians, are certainly above him: his reading appears
    at times shallow, owing to its having been so scattered, and
    it has occurred that he has often repeated the same thing to
    strangers; but his great and peculiar linguistic talent, which
    seems as it were to spring from some innate sense, cannot be
    denied; his good nature and politeness to the students who
    frequent the Vatican are very great; and I am therefore unable
    to comprehend how Blume (Iter Italicum, 1. 153,) can speak
    of the opposite experience of learned travellers during his
    residence at Bologna.

    Mezzofanti is fond of perpetuating his memory in the albums of
    his friends. He wrote in mine:—

    Ἔρχεται ἀνθρώποις λαθραίως ἔσχατον ἦμαρ,
    Oἱ δὲ περὶ ζωῆς πολλὰ μονοῦσι μάτην.
    Χριστέ, σὺ μὲν πάντων ἀρχὴ, σù δὲ καί τέλος ἐσσί;
    Ἔν τε σὸι ἐιρήνη ἐστὶ καὶ ἡσυχίη.”[472]

I shall leave the greater part of these strictures, from their very
generality, to be judged by the facts and statements actually recorded
in these pages; merely observing that on all questions which involve the
depth and accuracy of Mezzofanti’s knowledge of particular subjects,
those only are entitled to speak with authority, who, like Bucheron,
Libri, and others elsewhere referred to, took the trouble to test it by
actual inquiry. It will be enough to say that, whenever M. Fleck has
ventured into details, his criticisms are palpably unjust.

For instance, even at Rome, with all its proverbial fastidiousness, the
singular beauty of Mezzofanti’s Latin conversation which Fleck describes
as “not particularly good,” was freely and universally admitted; and
Bucheron, the Piedmontese professor who came to Bologna prepossessed with
the idea that Mezzofanti’s Latin scholarship was meagre and superficial,
was obliged to confess, after a long and searching conversation, that his
acquaintance with the Latin language and literature was as exact as it
was comprehensive.

In like manner M. Fleck takes upon him to pronounce that Mezzofanti’s
English was “just as middling” as his Latin. Now I need hardly recall
the testimonies of Mr. Harford, Stewart Rose, Byron, Lady Morgan, Lady
Blessington, and every other English traveller who conversed with him,
as completely refuting this depreciatory estimate. The truth is, that
most of the English and Irish visitors with whom I have spoken, have
agreed with me in considering that, in his manner of speaking English,
the absence of all foreign peculiarities was so complete as to render it
difficult, in a short conversation, to detect that he was a foreigner.
“One day,” Cardinal Wiseman relates, “Mezzofanti then a prelate, visited
me, and shortly after an Irish gentleman called who had arrived that
moment in Rome. I was called out, and left them together for some time.
On my returning, Mezzofanti took leave. I asked the other who he thought
that gentleman was. He replied, looking surprised at the question, ‘_An
English Priest_, I suppose.’”

On another occasion, about the same period, the late Dr. Baines, Vicar
Apostolic of the Western district, having been present at one of the
polyglot exhibitions in the Propaganda, and having there witnessed the
extraordinary versatility of Mezzofanti’s powers, returned with him after
the exhibition. “We dined together,” said Dr. Baines, “and I entreated
him, having been in the tower of Babel all the morning, to let us stick
to English for the rest of the day. Accordingly, we did stick to English,
which he spoke as fluently as we do, and with the same accuracy, not
only of grammar but of idiom. His only trip was in saying, ‘That was
before the time when I remember,’ instead of ‘before my time.’ Once,
too, I thought him mistaken in the pronunciation of a word. But when
I returned to England, I found that my way was either provincial or
old-fashioned, and that I was wrong and he was right.”[473]

Nor was this fluency in speaking English confined to the ordinary topics
of conversation, or to the more common-place words of the language. His
vocabulary was as extensive and as various as it was select. A curious
example of this, not only as regards English but also in reference to
German, was told to me by Cardinal Wiseman.

One broiling day he and Mr. Monckton Milnes were walking in company with
Mezzofanti across the scorching pavement of the Piazza SS. Apostoli. They
were speaking German at the time.

“Well!” said Mr. Milnes, utterly overcome by the heat and glare, “this
is what you may call a—what is the German,” he added, turning to Dr.
Wiseman, “for ‘_sweltering_?’”

“‘_Schwülig_,’ of course,” suggested Mezzofanti, without a moment’s pause!

I have heard several similar anecdotes illustrating the minuteness of
his acquaintance with other languages; and when it is remembered, that
his stock of words was in great measure drawn from books, and those
generally the classics of their respective languages, it need hardly
be considered matter of surprise, that, as, in English, Lady Morgan
found “his turn of phrase and peculiar selection of words to be those
of the “Spectator,” so other foreigners have been struck by finding an
Italian model his conversational style upon the highest and most refined
standards in their respective literatures. One instance may suffice as
a specimen. Professor Carlson of the university of Upsala, who was for
a considerable time engaged in the Vatican Library, in examining the
papers of Queen Christina, and was thus thrown for weeks into constant
communication with Mezzofanti, assured my friend Mr. Wackerbarth of the
same university, that Mezzofanti spoke the language perfectly—“quite
like a native;” and that not only as regards the words, but also as
regards the accent and rhythm of the language, which is very difficult.
The Swedish and Danish languages are very much alike, though differing
widely in accent and musical character. The Professor declared, that
Mezzofanti was perfectly at home in both, as well as regards their
affinities as their differences. He added, that if there were any fault
to find with Mezzofanti’s speaking of Swedish, it was _perhaps a trifle
too grammatically accurate_: if that can be considered as a fault. This
may perhaps be better understood when explained, that in Swedish the
difference between the spoken and written language, is perhaps more
than in most languages, many words being inflected in the written,
but not in the spoken language. Thus the verb “kan,” (can,) is in the
plural, “kunna;” but in conversation the plural is “kan,” the same
as the singular. Now, from the anecdote already told regarding young
Uttini,[474] it appears that Mezzofanti was almost entirely self-taught
in Swedish; and I infer from the catalogue of his library that his course
of Swedish reading lay exclusively among the purest classics of that
language. I am informed by Mr. Wackerbarth, that Count Oxenstjerna, son
of the classical Swedish translator of Milton and Dante, who conversed
with him at Rome, found him thoroughly familiar with his father’s
works,[475] and in general critically acquainted with all the masters of
Swedish style.

Indeed there is hardly any circumstance connected with this extraordinary
gift more calculated to excite wonder than the extent and accuracy of his
acquaintance with the various literatures of the languages to which he
had applied himself. The fact is attested by so many witnesses that it is
impossible to doubt it. Numerous instances have been already cited; but
I cannot pass from this period of his life without adding a few others,
chiefly regarding oriental languages, taken almost at random from many
independent testimonies which have been communicated to me by persons who
enjoyed his intimacy during the early years of his residence at Rome.

In a commission for the revision of the liturgical books of the Armenian
rite appointed by Pope Gregory XVI., he was associated with a native
Armenian scholar, Father Arsenius Angiarakian, Abbot of the Monastery of
St. Gregory the Illuminator. This learned ecclesiastic, in a letter dated
August 15, 1855, assures me that during the frequent opportunities of
observation which a literary inquiry of such exceeding delicacy afforded,
he was astonished (_ho dovuto stupire_) at the profound knowledge of
the ancient language of Armenia, exhibited by his associate. He adds
that Mezzofanti “spoke the vulgar Armenian with perfect freedom, and in
all its dialects.” Mgr. Hurmuz, the Armenian Archbishop of Sirace, in a
letter of May 24th, in the same year, attests that Mezzofanti’s Armenian
scholarship “was not confined to the knowledge of the language, ancient
and modern; he also knew the history of the Armenian nation, and of
science and art among them, together with their periods of progress and
decay.”

Father Arsenius frequently introduced oriental visitors, especially Turks
and Persians, to Mezzofanti. Ahmed Fethi Pasha, with his Secretary,
Sami Effendi, was presented to him on his way to London in 1836. After
a long interview he declared to Father Arsenius, that “Mezzofanti was
not only perfectly at home in the vocabulary, the structure, and the
pronunciation, both of Turkish and of Persian, but thoroughly and
profoundly versed (_possedeva per eccellenza_) in both literatures—being
master of the great classic prose writers and poets of both, and their
literary history.” He received the same assurances as to both languages,
at various times, from Redschid Pasha, Ali Pasha, Fuad Effendi, and
Shekib Effendi.

A native Syrian whom M. Antoine d’Abbadie met in Rome in 1839, assured
him that “Mezzofanti’s knowledge of Arabic and fluency in speaking it
were both equally admirable.”[476]

Speaking of the literature of Greece, Monsignor Missir, the learned Greek
Archbishop of Irenopolis who has for many years resided at Rome, declares
(in a letter of May 21st, 1855,) his belief that “Mezzofanti was as fully
master of the ancient Greek, as he was of Latin or Italian, and that
there was scarce a Greek author, ancient or modern, sacred or profane,
whom he had not read.” The abate Pietro Matranga,[477] a Greek of Sicily,
and professor of Greek in the Greek College of St. Athanasius, confirms
this impression to a great extent. He states (August 17th, 1855) that “in
examining the students of the Greek College, (as was his custom for many
years) in the classical authors, both the orators and the tragedians,
Mezzofanti never had occasion to take a book into his hands; being able
on the passage being indicated by the professor, to repeat it from
memory.”

A Polish priest named Ozarowski, stated as much for Polish literature to
Dr. Cox.

Nay, even in such an out-of-the-way literature as that of Sicily,
the same abate Matranga assures me that he was equally versed. “He
delighted,” says the abate, “in repeating from memory the poetry of the
Sicilian poet, Giovanni Meli,”[478] a writer who although of the highest
fame among his countrymen, is hardly known even by name outside of his
native island.

I cannot close, however, without saying that I have not found any
evidence of his having being equally familiar with another exceedingly
important literature of the East—the ancient Syriac. Vague statements
I have heard in abundance; but no one to whom I have had access could
speak with certainty; and Signor Matteo Schiahuan, professor of that
language in the Propaganda, considered him but moderately versed therein,
(_una mediocre cognizione_.) This will appear the more difficult of
explanation, as the Syriac department of his catalogue is tolerably
extensive, and is abundantly supplied with at least the elementary books
of that language.




CHAPTER XIII.

[1836-1838.]


One evening about this time, Dr. Wiseman, meeting Mezzofanti in the
Piazza di Spagna, inquired where he was going.

“To the Propaganda,” he replied; “I have to give a lesson there.”

“In what language?” asked Dr. Wiseman.

“In Californian,” said Mezzofanti. “I am teaching it to the Californian
youths whom we have there.”

“Californian!” exclaimed his friend, “From whom can you possibly have
learned that out-of-the-way tongue?”

“_From themselves_,” replied Mezzofanti: “and now I am teaching it to
them grammatically.”

This interesting anecdote illustrates another curious phase of
Mezzofanti’s marvellous faculty—the manner in which he dealt with
a language, not only new to himself, but entirely unwritten,
unsystematized, and, in a word, destitute of all the ordinary aids and
appliances of study.

Two native Californians, children of one of the many Indian tribes of
that peninsula, were sent to Rome to be educated at the Propaganda. One
of these died not very long after his arrival; the other, whose native
name was Tac, and who exhibited much more talent than his companion,
lived in the Propaganda for about three years, but eventually sunk under
the effects of the Roman climate, and perhaps, of the confinement and
unwonted habits of collegiate life. To these youths, from the day of
their arrival, Mezzofanti attached himself with all the interest which a
new language always possessed for him.[479]

The Indians of the Californian peninsula are broken up into several
independent tribes, the principal of which are three in number, the
Picos, the Waicuros, and the Laymones. Their languages are as various
as their subdivisions of race. In the days of the Spanish missionaries,
there could hardly be found any two or three missions in which the same
dialect was spoken;[480] insomuch that the fathers of these missions have
never succeeded in doing for the native language, what they have done for
most of the other languages of Northern and Central America—reducing it
to an intelligible grammatical system.[481] Upon Mezzofanti, therefore,
in his intercourse with these youths, devolved all the trouble of
discovering the grammatical structure of the Californian language, and
of reducing it to rules. It was a most curious process. He began by
making his pupils recite the Lord’s Prayer, until he picked up first the
general meaning, and afterwards the particular sounds, and what may be
called the rhythm of the language. The next step was to ascertain and to
classify the particles, both affixes and suffixes; to distinguish verbs
from nouns, and substantives from adjectives; to discover the principal
inflexions of both. Having once mastered the preliminaries, his power
of generalising seemed rather to be an instinct than an exercise of the
reasoning faculty. With him the knowledge of words led, almost without an
effort, to the power of speaking.

I have been assured by the Rev. James Doyle, who was a student of
the Propaganda at the time, and who had frequent opportunities of
witnessing Mezzofanti’s conversation with these youths, that his
success was complete, at least so far as could be judged from external
appearance—from his fluency, his facility of speech, and all the other
outward indications of familiarity.[482] Some time before the arrival of
these Californians, and soon after Mezzofanti’s coming to Rome, Bishop
Fenwick, of Cincinnati, had sent for education to the Propaganda two
North American Indians, youths of the Ottawa tribe, then residing near
Mackinaw, at the upper end of Lake Michegan. The elder of these, named
Augustine Hamelin, was a half-breed, being the son of a French father;
the younger, whose Indian name was _Maccodobenesi_, (“the Blackbird,”)
was of pure Ottawa blood.[483] Unhappily, as almost invariably happens
in similar circumstances, the Indian, although a youth of much promise
and very remarkable piety, pined away in the College, and eventually
died from the bursting of a blood-vessel. Augustin Hamelin, the elder,
spent a considerable time in the Propaganda, where he studied with
great success, but in the end, being seized with blood-spitting, the
authorities of the College, apprehensive of a recurrence of the same
disease which had befallen Maccodobenesi, judged it more prudent to
send him back to America. In consequence, he rejoined his tribe in the
year 1835, or 1836. Mrs. Jameson, who in her “Rambles among the Red
Men,” speaks of the Roman Catholic Ottawa converts in general, as “in
appearance, dress, intelligence, industry, and general civilization,
superior to the converts of all other communions,” refers in particular
to “a well-looking young man, dressed in European fashion and in black,
of mixed blood, French and Indian, who had been sent, when young, to be
educated at the Propaganda, and was lately come to settle as a teacher
and interpreter among his people.”[484] This youth, there can be no
doubt, was Hamelin. Having come soon afterwards to Washington, as one
of a deputation from his tribe to negociate a treaty with the United
States Government, he produced a great sensation by his high education,
his great general knowledge, and especially his skill in languages; and
on a subsequent occasion, in 1840, Bishop O’Connor, of Pittsburgh, who
had known him in the Propaganda, and to whom I am indebted for these
particulars regarding him, encountered him in Philadelphia, engaged in a
similar mission to the American Government.

The well-known Indian philologer, M. du Ponceau, met him about the same
time, and speaks with much praise of his intelligence and ability. It
was from Hamelin that M. du Ponceau obtained the information regarding
the Ottawa language which he has used in the comparative vocabulary of
Indian languages, appended to his _Memoire sur le Systeme Grammaticale
des Langues Indiennes_.[485]

Whether Mezzofanti learned the Ottawa dialect from these youths I have
not positively ascertained. Indeed it is difficult to say at what precise
time he first directed his attention to the Indian languages of North
America. He certainly knew something of them before he left Bologna.
He read for M. Libri, in 1830, a book in one of the Indian languages.
Prince Lewis Lucian Bonaparte too, in a communication with which he
has honoured me, mentions a conversation with him at Bologna, in which
he spoke of these Indian languages, and alluded to one in particular in
which the letter _B_ is wanting; “not,” as he explained to the Prince,
“on account of any peculiarity in the genius of the language which
excludes this sound, but because the Indians of this tribe wear a heavy
ornament suspended by a ring from the under lip, which by dragging the
under lip downwards, and thus preventing its contact with the upper,
renders it impossible for them to produce the sound of _B_ or any other
labial.” It is probable therefore, that even before he first met Hamelin
and his companion, Mezzofanti had already learnt something of these
Indian languages; and as, in his conversation with Dr. Kip, some years
later, the only languages which he mentioned as known to him are the
Chippewa, the Delaware, and the Algonquin, it is most likely that it
was the first of these—a variety of which is spoken by the Ottawas—that
formed his medium of conversation with these youths. On this point, Dr.
O’Connor is unable to speak from his own knowledge.

The Indian language which he knew best, however, was the Algonquin, the
parent of a large progeny of dialects; and this he learnt not from the
natives, but from Father Thavenet, of the congregation of St. Sulpice,
for many years a missionary among that tribe, and perhaps more profoundly
skilled in their language[486] than any European scholar before his time.
Of the Algonquin Mezzofanti became completely master—a success which can
only be appreciated by those who understand the peculiar,[487] and to a
European entirely novel structure of these languages.

       *       *       *       *       *

But whatever uncertainty may exist as to the manner in which he acquired
these particular languages, there are many others with regard to which it
cannot be doubted that he turned most industriously to account, during
these years, the many resources supplied by the Propaganda, and that to
this noble institution he was indebted for many of his later acquisitions.

It may perhaps be remembered, that, when Dr. Tholuck saw him in 1830,
and changed quite suddenly to Arabic in the midst of a conversation in
German, although he replied in that language “without hesitation and
quite correctly,” yet he “spoke very slowly, and, as it were, composing
the words one with another.” Now Dr. O’Connor informs me, that, from the
day of his first coming to the Propaganda, he “fastened upon” an Egyptian
student named Sciahuan, with whom he conversed continually in Arabic; and
that he also undertook (thus enjoying an opportunity of practice in two
languages at once,) to instruct in it a young Maltese, likewise a student
of the college. With what success this twofold practice was attended may
be inferred from the fact, already recorded, that, a few years later,
when M. d’Abbadie was in Rome (in 1839,) he was told by a native Syrian
that Mezzofanti’s fluency, as well as his knowledge of Arabic, were both
admirable.[488]

Another language which Mezzofanti, in 1839, told Dr. Tholuck he had
studied, but in which Dr. Tholuck had no means of trying him, was the
Albanese. The late M. Matranga mentioned that he also spoke this language
with some Albanian students who were in the Propaganda, soon after his
arrival in Rome: but that, as they were from upper Albania, and spoke a
corrupt half Turkish dialect of Albanese, he conversed but rarely with
them. I may add, however, that Signor Agostino Ricci who came to the
Propaganda in 1846, assured me, in a note written two years since,[489]
that, between 1846, and the Cardinal’s death in 1849, he had “repeatedly
conversed with him in Albanese, and that he spoke it very well.” (_assai
bene_.)

For Armenian, Turkish, and Greek, the Propaganda also supplied abundant
resources. The students, Hassun and Musabini—the first, it will be
recollected, whom Mezzofanti chanced to meet at his earliest visit—ever
afterwards continued his especial favourites and friends. With the former
he always spoke in Turkish, with the latter in Greek. A youth named
Tigrani, supplied him with practice in Armenian; but to this language,
which he enjoyed other opportunities of cultivating, he seldom devoted
much of the time which he spent in the Propaganda. It was the same for
most of the European languages which he constantly met outside. In the
college, for the most part, he confined himself to those which he had no
means of cultivating elsewhere.

Without wearying the reader, however, with further details, I shall
transcribe (although it regards a later period,) an interesting letter
received from the Rev. Charles Fernando, the missionary apostolic at the
Point of Galle in Ceylon, which enters briefly, but yet very fully and
distinctly, into the particulars of the languages which Mezzofanti used
to speak in the Propaganda, during the writer’s residence there as a
student. M. Fernando is a native of Colombo in the Island of Ceylon. He
came to Rome early in the year 1843, and remained until after the death
of Cardinal Mezzofanti.

    “When I left Ceylon for Rome,” he writes, August 29, 1855,
    “I knew but very little of the Cingalese language; a very
    small vocabulary of domestic words, and a facility in reading
    in Cingalese characters, without understanding the written
    language, was the full stock of my knowledge when I reached
    the college of the Propaganda. From such a master you might be
    disposed to augur badly of the scholar. Still it was not so.

    A few days after my arrival in college, I was introduced to his
    Eminence in his polyglot library and study room in the college
    itself. Cardinal Mezzofanti knew nothing of the Cingalese
    before I went to the Propaganda, yet in a few days he was able
    to assist me to put together a short plain discourse for our
    academical exhibition of the Epiphany.

    My own knowledge of the language, nevertheless, was not at that
    time such as to warrant my saying that he knew the Cingalese,
    or that he spoke it well. This, however, I can assert
    confidently, that, after a few conversations with me, (I don’t
    recollect having been with him above a dozen times for the
    purpose,) he thoroughly entered into the nature and system of
    the Cingalese language.

    Among the other languages of Hindostan, I can only speak as to
    one. In my time there were no students who spoke the Mahratta,
    Canarese, or Malayalim; but I heard him speak Hindostani with a
    student who is now missionary apostolic in Agra, where he was
    brought up, the Rev. William Keegan.

    The most remarkable characteristic of the Cardinal as a
    linguist was his power of passing from one language to another
    without the least effort. I recollect having often seen him
    speak to a whole _Camerata_ of the Propaganda students,
    addressing each in his own language or dialect in rapid
    succession, and with such ease, fluency, and spirit, and so
    much of the character and tone of each language that it used
    to draw a burst of merry laughter from the company; every one
    delighted to have heard his own language spoken by the amiable
    Cardinal with its characteristic precision. I may mention the
    names of many with whom the Cardinal thus conversed; with Moses
    Ngau (who died in Pegu not long ago) in the Peguan language;
    with Zaccaria Cohen in Abyssinian; with Gabriel, another
    Abyssinian, in the Amariña dialect; with Sciata, an Egyptian,
    in the Coptic; with Hollas in Armenian; with Churi[490] in
    Arabic; with Barsciu in Syriac; with Abdo in Arabico-maltese,
    (the Maltese speak a mixture of Arabic and Italian); in Tamulic
    with Pedro Royapen, (of this, however, I am not so sure);
    with Leang and Mong in Chinese; with Jakopski and Arabagiski
    in Bulgarian; with Beriscia and Baddovani in Albanian. With
    regard to Malay, Tibetan, and Mantchu, I cannot bear witness,
    as there were no students who spoke those dialects in my time.
    As for the European languages, I can assure you that I heard
    the Cardinal speak a great variety, Polish, Hungarian,[491]
    Rhetian, Swedish, Danish, German, Russian, &c.”

The caution with which M. Fernando speaks on the subject of Cingalese,
as well as of the rest of the Indian languages, makes his testimony in
other respects more valuable, inasmuch as I had frequently heard it said
in Rome that the Cardinal spoke “Hindostani and all the dialects of
India.” It needed, however, but a moment’s recollection of the number
and variety of these dialects, (several of which till very recently were
almost unknown even by name to Europeans,) to assure me that this was a
great exaggeration. I am inclined to think that his knowledge of Indian
languages lay entirely among those which are derived from the Sanscrit.
The notion of Colebrook and the philologers of his time, that all the
languages of India are of Sanscrit origin, is now commonly abandoned.
It is found that the languages of the Deccan have but little of the
Sanscrit element; and Mr. Caldwell, in his recent comparative grammar
of the South-Indian Languages,[492] has enumerated under the general
designation of Dravidian, nine un-Sanscritic languages of this region
of India, among which the best known are the Tamil, Telugu, Canarese,
and Malayalim. There seems no reason to believe that Mezzofanti was
familiarly acquainted with any one of these four, or indeed with any
member of Dravidian family, unless the Guzarattee can be included therein.

M. Fernando’s hesitation regarding his knowledge of Tamil, induced me to
inquire of Rev. Dr. MacAuliffe, lately a Missionary at Madras, who, after
spending several years in that Presidency, had entered the Propaganda,
and who knew the Cardinal at the same time with M. Fernando. Dr.
MacAuliffe informs me, that his eminence did not know Tamil. The Indian
languages which he knew, according to Dr. MacAuliffe, were Hindostani and
Mahratta; that he was acquainted with at least the first of these there
seems no possible doubt, both from M. Fernando’s testimony, and from that
of Count Lackersteen of Calcutta, a native East Indian gentleman, who
assures me[493] that he conversed with him in Hindostani, in 1843-4. As
to the Mahratta dialect, I have not (beyond Dr. MacAuliffe’s assurance)
been able to obtain any direct information; but Mr. Eyoob, an Armenian
merchant of Calcutta, testifies to the Cardinal’s acquaintance with
another Indian language—the Guzarattee. Mr. Eyoob saw the Cardinal in
the same year with Count Lackersteen, and writes[494] that, when he
was introduced to his eminence as a native of Bombay, the Cardinal at
once addressed him in _Guzarattee_. Mr. Eyoob adds, that the Cardinal
also spoke with him in Armenian and in Portuguese, in both of which
languages his accent, vocabulary, and grammatical accuracy, were beyond
all exception. Count Lackersteen’s letter fully confirms so much of this
statement as regards Portuguese. The Count also spoke with Mezzofanti in
Persian: but, as he does not profess to be a profound Persian scholar,
his testimony on this head is not of so much value.

By far the most remarkable, however, of Mezzofanti’s successes in the
Propaganda was his acquisition of Chinese. The difficulty of that
language for Europeans has long been proverbial,[495] and it argued no
ordinary courage in a scholar now on the verge of his sixtieth year to
enter regularly upon such a study. His first progress at Naples, before
he was interrupted by the severe illness which there seized him, has
been already described. It was not for a considerable time after his
return, that he was enabled to resume the attempt systematically. A
wish was expressed by the authorities of the Propaganda that a select
number of the students of the Naples college should be sent to Rome for
the completion of their theological studies. Three young Chinese had
already visited the Propaganda while Mezzofanti was still in Bologna,
one of whom, named Pacifico Yu, offered himself to the Cardinal Prefect,
as a missionary to the Corea, at a period when the attempt was almost
a certain road to martyrdom: but it was not until the year 1835-6 that
the design of adopting a few of the Neapolitan students into the college
of the Propaganda was actually carried out. Don Raffaelle Umpierres,
for many years Procurator of the mission at Macao, was soon afterwards
appointed their prefect and professor; and under his auspices and with
the assistance of the young Chinese, Mezzofanti resumed the study with
new energy. His success is admitted on all hands to have been almost
unexampled. Certainly it has never been surpassed by any European
not resident in China. In the year 1843, I was myself present while
he conversed with two youths, named Leang and Mong, and although my
evidence cannot extend beyond these external signs, I can at least bear
witness to the fluency with which he spoke, and the ease and spirit with
which he seemed to sustain the conversation. But his complete success
is placed beyond all doubt by an attestation forwarded to me, by the
abate Umpierres, the Chinese Professor,[496] already named, who declares
that he “frequently conversed with the Cardinal in Chinese, from the
year 1837, up to the date of his death, and that he not only spoke the
mandarin Chinese,[497] but understood other dialects of the language.”

Mezzofanti himself freely confessed the exceeding difficulty which he
had found in mastering this language. It cost him, as he assured Father
Arsenius Angiarakian, four months of uninterrupted study. Speaking
once with Cardinal Wiseman of his method of linguistic study, he said
that the “ear and not the eye was for him the ordinary medium through
which language was conveyed;” and he added, that the true origin of the
difficulty which he had felt in learning Chinese, was not so much the
novelty of its words and forms, as the fact that, departing from the
analogy of other languages, it disconcerted the pre-arranged system on
which he had theretofore proceeded; it _has an eye-language distinct from
the ear-language_, which he was obliged to make an especial study.

It is worth while to mention that the Cardinal successfully accomplished
in a short time what cost the missionaries in China, with all their
advantages of position, many years of labour, having actually preached
to the Chinese students in the Propaganda, on occasion of one of the
spiritual retreats which are periodically observed in ecclesiastical
seminaries.

It must not be supposed, however, that the Propaganda was his only school
of languages. Not unfrequently, also, missionaries from various parts of
the world, who repaired to the Propaganda on the affairs of their several
missions, supplied a sort of supplement to the ordinary resources of
the institution. In this way a German missionary, Father Brunner, (now,
I believe, superior of a religious congregation in the United States,)
initiated him in the languages of Western Africa. Father Brunner had been
for a time a missionary in Congo. On his arrival in Rome, Mezzofanti
placed himself in communication with him; and Cardinal Reisach, (who was
at that time Rector of the Propaganda,) states that he soon progressed
so far as to be able to keep up a conversation in the language. The
general language of Congo comprises many distinct branches, the Loango,
the Kakongo, the Mandongo, the Angolese, and the Camba.[498] Of these
Mezzofanti applied himself especially to the Angolese, in which he more
than once composed pieces for recitation at the academical exhibition of
the Epiphany. Two of these, which will be found in the appendix, have
been submitted to the criticism of Mr. Consul Brande, long a resident
at Loango, who pronounces them “to exhibit a correct knowledge of the
Angolese or Bunda language.”[499]

I may add to the number of those with whom he was accustomed to speak
oriental languages, two others mentioned to me by Cardinal Wiseman. The
first was a learned Chaldean, Paul Alkushi, who had once been a student
of the Propaganda, but relinquished the intention of embracing the
ecclesiastical profession. The other was a converted Jew, a native of
Bagdad, and who, although otherwise illiterate, spoke fluently Hebrew,
Arabic, and Persian. He was familiarly known in Rome by the sobriquet of
“_Shalom_,” from the habitual salutation with which he used to address
his friends at meeting and parting.

       *       *       *       *       *

The only letters of this period which I have been able to procure are
two, addressed to his Bolognese friends, Michael Ferrucci and Liborio
Veggetti. The former (dated June 6th, 1836,) is in acknowledgment of some
copies of Latin Epigrams, partly from his own pen, partly from that of
the Canonico Schiassi, which Ferrucci had sent to Mezzofanti: but it is
chiefly noticeable for the warm interest which it evinces in the welfare
of his old friend, who had written to ask advice and assistance in his
candidature for a professorship in one of the Tuscan Universities, Signor
Ferrucci, some time afterwards, went to Geneva, as professor of rhetoric,
but he eventually obtained an appointment in the University of Pisa,
where he is now Librarian.

The letter to Veggetti, (February 17, 1838,) regards his appointment as
Librarian of the University of Bologna, in which Mezzofanti had been
much interested.

    “I am delighted that my wishes have not been in vain or
    without effect, and that the Library, for so many years the
    object of my care, is confided to the direction of an old and
    distinguished pupil of my own. I need not give you any advice,
    knowing, as I do, what exactness and assiduity you have always
    shown in the discharge of your duties. Knowing, also, the good
    understanding you maintain with my nephew, Monsignor Minarelli,
    in whom I repose the fullest confidence, I need only say that
    if you consult with him in any doubt which may arise regarding
    your duties, it will be the same as if you were speaking with
    the old librarian himself.

    I must confess I am more gratified at your having obtained this
    appointment, than if you had been appointed to the chair of
    History, a difficult post, and more difficult the farther one
    advances. And while I congratulate you, I must also felicitate
    myself on leaving in such excellent hands the precious deposit
    hitherto entrusted to my own care. I will not fail to profit by
    your work which you have so kindly presented to me.”

Dr. Veggetti still holds the office of Librarian at Bologna. He continued
to correspond occasionally with Mezzofanti, up to the period of his
death.




CHAPTER XIV.

[1838-1841.]


Among the offices connected with the Roman Court, there is a certain
class, known as _Poste Cardinalizie_, the tenure of which is, in the
ordinary course of affairs, a step to the Cardinalate. The chief
keepership of the Vatican Library is not necessarily one of these;
but it had long been known that Monsignor Mezzofanti was destined for
the purple; and, in a consistory held on the 12th of February, 1838,
he was “preconized” as Cardinal Priest, in company with three other
prelates—Angelo Mai, (who had been “reserved _in petto_” from the former
year,) Orioli, and Mellini.

The order of Cardinal Priests, as is well known, are the representatives,
in the more modern constitution of the Roman church, of the ancient
_Presbyteri Cardinales_—the priests of the principal churches in which
Baptism was administered, (_tituli Cardinales_) of the ancient city.
Their number, which at the end of the fifth century was twenty-five, has
been gradually increased to fifty: but the memory of their primitive
institution is preserved in the titles under which they are named, and
which are taken from the churches over which the ancient Presbyters
presided. The title of Cardinal Mezzofanti was derived from the ancient
church of Saint Onuphrius, (Sant’ Onofrio,) on the Janiculum, which is
probably best known to visitors of Rome as the last resting-place of the
poet Tasso.

To many persons, no doubt, the office of Cardinal has but little
significance, except as a part of the stately ceremonial of the Roman
court—a brilliant and enviable sinecure, sometimes the reward of
distinguished merit, sometimes the prize of political influence or
hereditary family claims. But to well informed readers it is scarcely
necessary to explain that the College of Cardinals forms, or rather
supplies, the entire deliberative and executive administration of the
Pope in the general management of the affairs of the Church; holding
permanently and systematically the place of the council of which we so
often read in the early centuries. By the ancient constitution of the
Sacred College, all matters of importance were considered and discussed
in the general meeting of the body, called the Consistory; but, in
the multiplication of business, it became necessary to distribute the
labour; and, since the latter part of the sixteenth century,[500] under
the great administrative Pontiffs, Paul IV., Pius IV., Pius V., and
above all Sixtus V., a system of “_congregations_” has arisen, by
which, as by a series of committees, the details of all the various
departments are administered; yet under the general superintendence of
the Pope himself, and subject, in all things, to his final revision.
Some of these congregations, (which amount to nearly twenty in all,)
consist exclusively of Cardinals; some are composed both of Cardinals
and prelates; and a few of prelates only: but, in almost every case,
the Prefect, at least, of the congregation is a Cardinal. Some
congregations meet every week, others only once a month; but in all
the leading ones, as for instance in the Propaganda, there is a weekly
meeting (_congresso_) of the Prefect and secretary with the clerks or
_minutanti_, for the despatch of pressing business or of affairs of
routine; all the business of these meetings being submitted to the Pope
for his approval.

To each Cardinal, either as Prefect, or at least as member, four of
these congregations, as an ordinary rule, are assigned at his first
appointment; in many cases, the number is afterwards increased; and,
when it is remembered that in many of these the business is weighty
and complicated, often involving much documentary matter, extensive
theological or canonical research, and careful investigation of
precedents, &c.; and that these congregations, after all, form but a part
of the duties of a Cardinal; it will be understood that his position is
very far from the sinecure which the unreflecting may suppose it to be.

In the congregations assigned to Cardinal Mezzofanti at his nomination,
regard was of course paid to his peculiar qualifications. He was named
Prefect of the “Congregation for the correction of the Liturgical Books
of the Oriental Church,” and also of the “Congregation of Studies.”
He was also, on the same grounds, appointed a member, not only of the
general “Congregation of the Propaganda,” but also of the special one “On
the affairs of the Chinese Mission,” and of those of “the Index,” “of
Rites,” and of “the Examination of Bishops.”

With a similar consideration for his well known habits and tastes, and
with a due appreciation of the charity for the sick which had always
characterized him, he was named President of the great Hospital of San
Salvatore, and visitor of the House of Catechumens, in which, as being
chiefly destined for converted Jews and Mahomedans, his acquaintance with
the Hebrew and Arabic languages and literatures rendered his services
peculiarly valuable.

The official revenue assigned from the Civil List for a cardinal resident
in Rome, is four thousand Roman crowns (between eight and nine hundred
pounds sterling); by far the greater part of which is absorbed in the
necessary expenses of his household, the payment of his chaplain,
secretary, and servants, the maintenance of his state equipage, &c.;
so that for those cardinals who, like Mezzofanti, possess no private
fortune, the remnant available for purely personal expenditure is very
trifling indeed. With Mezzofanti’s frugal and simple habits, however, it
not only proved amply sufficient to supply all his own modest wants,
but also enabled him to enlarge and extend the unostentatious charities
which, throughout his entire life, he had never failed to bestow, even
while he was himself struggling against the disadvantages of a narrow
and precarious income. So well known, indeed, were his almost prodigal
charities, while in charge of the Vatican, and his consequent poverty at
the time of his nomination to the Cardinalate, that the Pope, Gregory
XVI., himself presented him, from the Pontifical establishment, the two
state carriages[501] which form the necessary equipage of a Cardinal in
all processions and other occasions of public ceremonial.

He selected for his residence the Palazzo Valentiniani, in the Piazza
SS. Apostoli; where his nephew, Gaetano Minarelli, and Anna, one of
his unmarried nieces, came to live with him on his nomination to the
Cardinalate, and continued to reside until his death.

The news of his elevation was received with great pleasure at Bologna,
and was the occasion of many public and private demonstrations. The
most remarkable of these was from the Academy of the _Filopieri_, of
which he had been the President at the time of his removal from Bologna.
The Italians are singularly conservative of established forms; the
members of the Academy, in accordance with a usage which may almost be
called classical, met in full assembly (with all the accompaniments of
decorations, inscriptions, and music, in which Italian taste is displayed
on such occasions), to congratulate their fellow-academician. The
congratulatory addresses, however, which in England would have been a set
of speeches and resolutions, here, as became the “Lovers of the Muses,”
took a poetical form; and a series of odes, sonnets,[502] elegies,
_canzoni_, _terzine_, and epigrams, in Greek, Latin, and Italian, were
recited by the members. Some of them are exceedingly spirited and
graceful. They were all collected into a little volume, which, with great
delicacy and good taste, is dedicated not to the Cardinal himself, but to
his nephew, Monsignor Joseph Minarelli, of whom I have already spoken,
and who was at this time Rector of the university of Bologna.[503]

A still more characteristic tribute on his elevation was a polyglot
visit of congratulation from his young friends in the Propaganda. A
party of fifty-three, comprising all the languages and nationalities at
that time represented in the institution, waited upon him to offer their
greetings in their various tongues. The new Cardinal was at once amused
by the novel exhibition, and gratified by the compliment thus delicately
implied. True, however, to his old character for readiness and dexterity,
he was found fully equal to the occasion, and answered each in his own
language with great spirit and precision.[504]

Cardinal Mezzofanti’s elevation, of course, brought him into closer,
and, if possible, more affectionate relations with the Pope. Among
his brethren of the Sacred College, too, there were many whom, even
as prelate, he could call his friends. I have already spoken of his
relations with the learned Cardinal Giustiniani, and the venerable
Cardinal Pacca. With Cardinal Lambruschini, the Secretary of State, and
Cardinal Fransoni, Prefect of the Propaganda, he had long been on a
footing of most confidential intimacy. His especial friends, however,
were Cardinals Mai, Polidori, Bernetti, and the amiable and learned
English Cardinal Acton, who, although not proclaimed till 1842, was named
_in petto_ in the year after the elevation of Cardinal Mezzofanti.[505]

But, with the exception of the public and ceremonial observances which
his new dignity exacted, it brought no change in his simple, and almost
ascetic manner of life. The externals of his household, of course,
underwent considerable alteration, but his personal habits remained the
same. He continued to rise at the same hour: his morning devotions,
his daily mass, his visits to the hospitals, and other private acts
of charity, remained unaltered. His table, though displaying somewhat
more ceremonial, continued almost as frugal, and entirely as simple, as
before his elevation. He persevered, unless when prevented by his various
official duties, in paying his daily visit to the Propaganda, and in
assisting and directing the studies of its young inmates, with all his
accustomed friendliness and familiarity. His affability to visitors,
even of the humblest class, was, if possible, increased. Above all, as
regarded his favourite studies, and the exercise of his wonderful talent,
his elevation to the Cardinalate brought no abatement of enthusiasm, and
no relaxation of energy. It is not merely that the visitors who saw him
as Cardinal, concur in attesting the unaltered activity of his mind, and
the undiminished interest with which he availed himself of every new
opportunity of perfecting or exercising his favourite accomplishment.
For years after his elevation, he continued to add zealously and
successfully to the stores which he had already laid up. There is
distinct evidence that after this period, (although he had now entered
upon his sixty-fourth year,) he acquired several languages, with which he
had previously had little, and perhaps no acquaintance.

A very interesting instance has been communicated to me by M. Antoine
d’Abbadie,[506] who visited the Cardinal in 1839, at Rome. M. d’Abbadie
had been a traveller from early manhood. Setting out in the year 1837,
in company with his brother Arnauld, to explore the sources of the
White Nile, he traversed the greater part of north eastern Africa.
Their wanderings, however, proved a mission of religion and charity, no
less than of science. During their long and varied intercourse with the
several tribes of Abyssinia, they observed with painful interest that
strange admixture of primitive Catholic truth with gross and revolting
superstition by which all travellers have been struck; and their first
care was to study carefully the condition of the country and the
character of the people, with a view to the organization of a judicious
and effective missionary expedition by which their many capabilities
for good might be developed. Hence, it is that, while their letters,
reports, and essays, communicated to the various scientific journals and
societies of France and England,[507] have added largely to our knowledge
of the languages,[508] the geography, and the natural history of these
imperfectly explored provinces, their services to the Church by the
introduction of missionaries, by the advice and information which they
have uniformly afforded them, and even by their own personal co-operation
in the great work, have entitled them to the gratitude of all to whom the
interests of truth and civilization are dear.

M. Antoine d’Abbadie, after two years spent in such labours, returned
to Europe in 1839, for the purpose of preparing himself for a further
and more systematic exploration. On arriving in Rome, he took an early
opportunity of waiting upon the Cardinal, accompanied by two Abyssinians,
who spoke only the Amarinna language, and by a Galla servant, whose
native (and only) language was the Ilmorma, a tongue almost entirely
unknown, even to the learned in this branch of philology.[509] M.
d’Abbadie himself spoke Basque, a language which was still new to
Mezzofanti; and he was thus witness of what was certainly a very unwonted
scene—the great Polyglottist completely at fault.

    “I saw Cardinal Mezzofanti,” writes M. d’Abbadie, “in 1839.
    He asked me in Arabic what language I wished to speak, and I,
    in order to test him, proposed conversing in Basque. I am far
    from knowing this idiom well; but, as I transact my farmer’s
    business in Basque, I can easily puzzle a foreigner in it. The
    Cardinal waived my proposal, and asked me what African language
    I would speak. I now spoke Amarinna, i.e., the language named
    _Ancharica_ by Ludolf, who probably added the final _c_ in
    order to suit the word to Latin articulation. Not being able
    to answer in Amarinna, Mezzofanti said: _Ti amirnu timhirta
    lisana Gi-iz_ (‘Have you the knowledge of the Gi-iz language?’)
    This was well said, and beautifully pronounced, but shewed
    that the Cardinal got his knowledge of Gi-iz from persons who
    read, but did not speak it in general. I afterwards ascertained
    in Abyssinia that no professor, i.e., no person accustomed to
    colloquial Gi-iz, had been yet in Rome, during this century at
    least. I may here mention that Gi-iz, generally called Ethiopic
    in Europe, is the liturgical language in Abyssinia, where it
    is looked on by the learned as a dead language, although it
    is still spoken by at least one of the shepherd tribes near
    the Red Sea. In my visit to Cardinal Mezzofanti, I had with me
    two Amara Abyssines, with whom he could not speak, as neither
    of them knew Gi-iz enough, and I had not yet learned that
    language. My third companion was a Galla, who had taught me his
    language, viz., Ilmorma, in a most tedious way, for he knew no
    other tongue, and I was forced to elicit every meaning by a
    slowly convergent series of questions, which I put every time
    he used a word new to me. Some of these had until then remained
    a mystery to me; as the word _self_, and some others of the
    same abstract class. I had likewise laboured in vain to get
    the Ilmorma word for ‘soul’; and having mentioned all this to
    Mezzofanti, I added, that as a philologist and a father of the
    church, he could render me no better service than giving me the
    means of teaching my Galla barbarian that he had a soul to be
    saved. ‘Could not your eminence,’ said I, ‘find the means of
    learning from this African what is the word for soul? I have
    written twelve hundred words of his language, which you will
    certainly turn to better account than I can.’ The Cardinal
    made no direct answer. I saw him several times afterwards,
    and he always addressed me in Arabic; but, being a tyro in
    that language, I could not pretend to judge his knowledge or
    fluency. However, a native Syrian then in Rome, told me that
    both were admirable: this referred, I suppose now, to the
    Syrian dialect.”

A failure so unusual for Mezzofanti, and in so many languages, could
not but prove a stimulus to the industry of this indefatigable student.
He was at the moment busily engaged in the revision of the Maronite and
Armenian liturgies;—a circumstance, by the way, which perhaps may account
for his passing over without notice, M. d’Abbadie’s proposal about the
Galla language;—but, a few months later, he addressed himself to the
Amarinna with all the energy of his most youthful days. How it ended, we
shall see.

In the close of July, 1841, when I first had the honour of seeing him,
he was surrounded by a group of Abyssinians, who had just come to Rome
under the escort of Monsignor de Jacobis, the apostolic Prefect of the
Abyssinian mission. These Abyssinians were all reputed to be persons
of distinction among their countrymen, and several of the number were
understood to be professors and men of letters. The Cardinal was speaking
to them freely and without embarrassment; and his whole manner, as well
as theirs, appeared to me (so far as one entirely unacquainted with
the language could judge) to indicate that he spoke with ease, and was
understood by them without an effort. Thinking it probable, however, that
M. d’Abbadie during his second sojourn in Abyssinia, must have known
something of this mission, I thought it well to write to him on the
subject. He informed me, in reply, that the Abyssinians whom I had thus
seen were a deputation of the schismatical Christians of that country,
who had been sent by the native chieftains to Alexandria, to obtain
from the Patriarch (to whom they so far recognise their subjection) the
consecration of the Abun, or Primate, of their national church. Father
de Jacobis, who was their fellow-traveller as far as Alexandria, induced
them to accompany him to Rome, where they were so much struck with all
that they saw and heard, that “two out of the three professors of Gondar,
who were the leaders of the deputation, have, since their return, freely
and knowingly entered the one true Church—Amari, Kanfu, and the one-eyed
professor, Gab’ra Mikaël.” One of these told M. d’Abbadie that “Cardinal
Mezzofanti conversed very well with him in Amarinna, and that he also
knew the Gi-iz language.” He had thus learned the Amarinna between 1839
and 1841.

       *       *       *       *       *

I am indebted to M. d’Abbadie for an account of another still later
acquisition of the Cardinal’s declining years. Before the summer of 1841,
he had acquired the Amarinna language. Now at that time he was actually
engaged, with all the energy of his early years, in the study of the
proverbially “impossible”[510] Basque, in which, as we have seen, M.
d’Abbadie found him a novice in 1839.

One of my companions in Rome in 1841, the lamented Guido Görres, of
Munich, son of the venerable author of that name, and himself one of the
most accomplished writers of Catholic Germany, having chanced to say to
the Cardinal that he was then engaged in the study of Basque, the latter
proposed that they should pursue it in company. Their readings had only
just commenced when I last saw Herr Görres; but M. d’Abbadie’s testimony
at a later date places the Cardinal’s success in this study likewise
entirely beyond question. He had not only learned before the year 1844,
the general body of the language, but even mastered its various dialects
so as to be able to converse both in the Labourdain and the Souletin;
which, it should be observed, are not simply dialects of Basque, but
minor sub-divisions of one out of the four leading dialects which prevail
in the different districts of Biscay and Navarre.

    “My friend M. Dassance,” says M. d’Abbadie, “who has published
    several works, and who, after declining a bishopric, is still
    a canon in the Bayonne Cathedral, told me the other day, that,
    on visiting the Cardinal in 1844, he was surprised to hear him
    speak French with that peculiar Parisian accent which pertains
    to the ancient nobility of the Faubourg St. Germain. This is a
    nice distinction of which several Frenchmen are not aware. On
    hearing that Dassance was a Basque, the Cardinal immediately
    said: _Mingo zitugu?_ (_verbatim_—‘Of whence have we you’?)
    thus shewing that he had mastered the tremendous difficulty of
    our vernacular verb. The ensuing conversation took place in the
    pure Labourdain dialect, which is spoken here (at Urrugne,)
    but one of the professors of the Bayonne Seminary, Father
    Chilo, from Soule, avers that the Cardinal spoke to him in the
    Souletin dialect.”[511]

I afterwards shewed to M. d’Abbadie a short sentence in Basque which the
Cardinal wrote with his own hand, and which is printed among the fac
similes prefixed to this volume.

    Tauna! zu servitzea da erreguiñatea;
    Zu maitatzea da zoriona,
    “Lord! to serve Thee is to reign;
    To love Thee, is happiness.”

M. d’Abbadie, as also his Highness Prince Lewis L. Bonaparte, to whom M.
d’Abbadie submitted it, had some doubt as to the propriety of the form,
‘_zu_ servitzea,’ ‘_zu_ maitatzea’; both of them preferring to write
_zure_. But, as the dialect in which the sentence is written is that
of Guipuscoa, both his Highness and M. d’Abbadie have kindly taken the
trouble to refer the question to native Guipuscoan scholars; and I have
had the gratification to learn by a letter of M. d’Abbadie, (January
18th, 1858,) that “the construction ‘_zu_ servitzea,’ is perfectly
correct in Guipuscoan.”

M. d’Abbadie subjoins, that, in addition to the authority of his friend,
M. Dassance, for the Cardinal’s knowledge of Basque, he has since been
assured by a Spanish lady, a native of San Sebastian, the capital of
Guipuscoa, that the Cardinal had also conversed with her in her native
Guipuscoan dialect. Moreover, when M. Manavit saw him in Rome in 1846,
he translated freely in his presence a newly published Basque catechism,
which M. Manavit presented to him on the part of the Bishop of Astros:
and several distinguished Biscayan ecclesiastics assured M. Manavit that
the Cardinal spoke both the dialects of Basque with equal fluency.[512]
In a word, it appears impossible to doubt the complete success of this,
one of his latest essays in the acquisition of a new language.

As the object of this biography, however, is not merely to bring together
such marvels as these, but to collect all the materials for a just
portraiture of the linguist himself, I must place in contrast with these
truly wonderful narratives, the judgments of other travellers, in order
that the reader may be enabled to modify each by comparison with its
pendant, and to form his own estimate from a just combination of both.

It must be confessed, as a set off against the wonders which have been
just recounted, that there were others of Mezzofanti’s visitors who were
unable to see in him any of these excellencies. I think, however, that
these depreciatory judgments will be found for the most part to proceed
from ignorant and superficial tourists, and from those who are least
qualified to form an accurate estimate of the attainments of a linguist.
One of the heaviest penalties of eminence is the exposure which it
involves to impertinent or malevolent criticism, nor is it wonderful that
one who received so great a variety of visitors as did Mezzofanti, should
have had his share of this infliction.

Mrs. Paget, a Transylvanian lady, married to an English gentleman, who
saw Mezzofanti a little before M. d’Abbadie, is cited by Mr. Watts.[513]
Her characteristic is rather recklessness and ill-breeding than positive
malevolence. But as her strictures, ill-bred as they are, contain some
facts which tend to illustrate the main subject of inquiry, I shall
insert them without abridgment.

    “Mezzofanti entered, in conversation with two young Moors,
    and, turning to us, asked us to be seated. On me his first
    appearance produced an unfavourable impression. His age might
    be about seventy; he was small in stature, dry, and of a pale
    unhealthy look. His whole person was in monkey-like restless
    motion. We conversed together for some time. He speaks
    Hungarian well enough, and his pronunciation is not bad. I
    asked him from whom he had learned it; he said from the common
    soldiers at Milan. He had read the works of Kisfaludi and
    Csokonai, Pethe’s Natural History, and some other Hungarian
    books, but it seemed to me that he rather studies the words
    than the subject of what he reads. Some English being present,
    he spoke English with them very fluently and well; with me
    he afterwards spoke French and German, and he even addressed
    me in Wallachian; but to my shame I was unable to answer. He
    asked if I knew Slowakian. In showing us some books, he read
    out from them in Ancient and Modern Greek, Latin and Hebrew. To
    a priest who was with us, and who had travelled in Palestine,
    he spoke in Turkish. I asked him how many languages he knew:
    ‘Not many,’ he replied, ‘for I only speak forty or fifty.’
    Amazing incomprehensible faculty! but not one that I should
    in the least be tempted to envy; for the empty unreflecting
    word-knowledge, and the innocently exhibited small vanity
    with which he was filled, reminded me rather of a monkey or
    a parrot, a talking machine, or a sort of organ wound up for
    the performance of certain tunes, than of a being endowed with
    reason. He can, in fact, only be looked upon as one of the
    curiosities of the Vatican.

    “At parting, I took an opportunity of asking if he would allow
    me to present an Hungarian book to the Vatican library. My
    first care at my hotel was to send a copy of M. W.’s book,
    ‘Balitéletekröl’ (‘On Prejudices’)[514] to the binder, and
    a few days afterwards I took it, handsomely bound in white
    leather, to Mezzofanti, whom I found in a hurry to go and
    baptize some Jews and Moors. As soon as he saw the book,
    without once looking into it, even to ascertain the name of the
    author, he called out, ‘Ah! igen szép, igen szép, munka. Szepen
    van bekötve. Aranyos, szép, szép, igen szép, igen koszönöm.’
    (Ah! very fine, very fine, very finely bound. Beautiful, very
    fine, very fine, thank you very much;)—and put it away in a
    book-case. Unhappy Magyar volumes, never looked at out of their
    own country, but by some curious student of philology like
    Mezzofanti, and in their own country read by how few!”

Now, in the first place, in the midst of this lady’s supercilious and
depreciatory strictures, it may safely be inferred, that Mezzofanti’s
Hungarian at least must have been unexceptionable, in order to draw
from one so evidently prejudiced, the admission that he “spoke it well
enough,” and that “his pronunciation was not bad.” Lest, however, any
doubt should be created by these grudging acknowledgments, I shall quote
the testimony of a Hungarian nobleman, Baron Glucky de Stenitzer, who
met the Cardinal in Rome some years later, in 1845. The Baron not only
testifies to the excellence of his Magyar, but affirms “that, in the
course of the interview, his Eminence spoke no less than four different
dialects of that tongue—the pure Magyar of Debreczeny, that of the
environs of Eperies, that of Pesth, and that of Transylvania!”

In like manner, though Madame Paget takes upon her to say, that “the
Cardinal studies the words rather than the subject of what he reads,”
Baron Glucky found him “profoundly versed in the laws and constitution
of Hungary”; and when, in speaking of the extraordinary power enjoyed by
the Primate of Hungary, the Baron chanced to allude to his privilege of
coining money, his Eminence promptly reminded him that “this privilege
had been withdrawn by the Emperor Ferdinand, and even quoted the year of
the edict by which it was annulled!”[515]

As regards the dashing style in which this lady sets aside the Cardinal’s
Magyar reading, which _only_ embraced “the works of Kisfaludi and
Czokonai, Pethe’s Natural History, and some other Hungarian books,” it
may be enough for the reader to know that, without reckoning the “other
Hungarian books,” the three works which she names thus slightingly,
comprise no less than _seven volumes_ of poetry and miscellaneous
literature.

For what remains of her strictures upon the character of
Mezzofanti—strictures be it observed, which she has the hardihood to
offer, although her entire knowledge was derived from two interviews
of a few minutes, among a crowd of other visitors—her charge of love
of display, “empty word-knowledge,” “monkey-like” exhibition, and the
other pettinesses of “small vanity,” the best commentary that can be
offered is an account of the Cardinal published at this very period, by
one who knew him intimately during a residence of many months in Rome,
who was actually for a time his pupil or fellow student, and who, from
his position, was thoroughly conversant, not only with the sentiments
of the Cardinal’s friends and admirers, but with all the variety of
criticisms to which, according to the diversity of tastes and opinions,
his character and his gifts were subjected in the general society of the
literary circles of Rome—I mean the amiable and learned Guido Görres.
I may add that I myself was Herr Görres’s companion in one of his
interviews with the Cardinal.

    “If any one should imagine,” he writes, (in the
    Historisch-Politische Blätter,[516] of which, conjointly with
    Dr. Phillips, he was editor,) “that all the honours which
    he has received have produced the slightest effect upon his
    character or disposition, he is grievously mistaken. Under all
    the insignia of the cardinalate, Mezzofanti is still the same
    plain, simple, almost bashful, good-natured, conscientious,
    indefatigable, active priest that he was, while a poor
    professor, struggling by the exercise of his talents, in the
    humblest form, to gain a livelihood for the relatives who were
    dependant on his exertions. Although his head is stored with so
    many languages, it has never, as so frequently occurs to the
    learned, shown the least indication of lightness. As Prefect of
    the House of Catechumens he is merely of course, charged with
    the supervision of their instruction; but he still discharges
    the duty in person, with all the exactness of a conscientious
    schoolmaster. He visits the establishment almost every day, and
    devotes a considerable part of his income to the support of its
    inmates.

    In like manner he still, as Cardinal, maintains with the
    Propaganda precisely the same relations which he held as
    a simple prelate. Although he is not bound thereto by any
    possible obligation, he devotes every day to the students of
    that institution, in summer an hour, in winter an hour and
    a half. He practises them and also himself in their several
    languages, and zealously avails himself of the opportunity thus
    afforded him, to exhort them to piety and to strengthen them in
    the spirit of their calling.

    It is scarcely necessary to say that these youths regard their
    disinterested friend and benefactor with the most devoted
    affection....

    When I spoke to him, one day, about his relations with the
    pupils, he said to me, ‘It is not as a Cardinal I go there; it
    is as a student—as a youth—(giovanetto.)’...

    He is familiar with all the European languages. And by this we
    understand not merely the old classical tongues and the first
    class modern ones; that is to say, the Greek and Latin, the
    Italian, French, Spanish, Portuguese, German and English; his
    knowledge embraces also the languages of the second class, viz.
    the Dutch, the Polish, Bohemian or Czechish, and Servian, the
    Hungarian, and Turkish; and even those of the third and fourth
    class—the Irish, Welsh, Albanian, Wallachian, Bulgarian, and
    Illyrian—are equally at his command. On my happening to mention
    that I had once dabbled a little in Basque, he at once proposed
    that we should set about it together. Even the Romani of the
    Alps, and the Lettish, are not unfamiliar to him; nay, he has
    made himself acquainted with Lappish, the language of the
    wretched nomadic tribes of Lapland; although he told me he did
    not know whether it should be called Lappish or Laplandish.
    He is master of all the languages which are classed under the
    Indo-German family—the Sanscrit and Persian, the Koordish, the
    Armenian, and the Georgian; he is familiar with all the members
    of the Semitic family, the Hebrew, Arabic, Syriac, Samaritan,
    Chaldee, Sabaic, and even the Chinese, which he not only reads
    but speaks. As regards Africa, he knows the Coptic, Ethiopic,
    Abyssinian, Amharic, and Angolese.”

Görres adds what I have already mentioned, as a characteristic mark of
their affectionate gratitude, that forty-three of his Propaganda scholars
waited upon him on occasion of his promotion to the Cardinalate, and
addressed to him a series of congratulations, each in his native dialect.
He fully bears out too, the assurance which has been repeated over and
over again by every one who had really enjoyed the intimacy of the
Cardinal, that, frequently as he came before the public in circumstances
which seemed to savour of display, and freely as he contributed to the
amusement of his visitors by exhibiting in conversation with them his
extraordinary acquirements, he was entirely free from that vanity to
which Madame Paget thinks proper to ascribe it all.

“With all his high qualifications,” says the Rev. Ingraham Kip,[517] a
clergyman of the American episcopal church, “there is a modesty about
Cardinal Mezzofanti which shrinks from anything like praise.” “It would
be a cruel misconception of his character,” says Guido Görres, “to
imagine that, with all the admiration and all the wonder of which he
habitually saw himself the object, he yet prided himself in the least
upon this extraordinary gift. ‘Alas!’ he once said to a friend of mine,
a good simple priest, who, sharing in the universal curiosity to see
this wonderful celebrity, apologized to the Cardinal for his visit by
some compliment upon his European reputation:—‘alas! what will all these
languages avail me for the kingdom of heaven, since it is by works, not
words, that we must win our way thither!’”

In truth Cardinal Mezzofanti possessed in an eminent degree the great
safeguard of christian humility—a habitual consciousness of what he
_was not_, rather than a self-complacent recollection of what he was.
He used to speak freely of his acquirement as one of little value, and
one especially for which he himself had little merit—a mere physical
endowment—a thing of instinct, and almost of routine. God, he said, had
gifted him with a good memory and a quick ear. There lay the secret of
his success—“What am I,” he would pleasantly say, “but an ill-bound
dictionary!” “He used to disparage his gifts to me,” says Cardinal
Wiseman; “and he once quoted a saying ascribed to Catherine de Medici,
who when told that Scaliger knew twenty languages, observed, ‘that is
twenty words for one idea! For my part I would rather have twenty ideas
for one word!’” On one occasion, after the publication of Cardinal
Wiseman’s _Horæ Syriacæ_, Mezzofanti said to him: “You have put your
knowledge of languages to some purpose. When I go, I shall not leave
a trace of what I know behind me!” And when his friend suggested that
it was not yet too late, he “shook his head and said it was”—which he
also repeated to Guido Görres, earnestly expressing his “regret that his
youth had fallen upon a time when languages were not studied from that
scientific point of view from which they are now regarded.” In a word,
the habitual tendency of his mind in reference to himself, and to his own
acquirements, was to depreciate them, and to dwell rather upon his own
deficiency and short-comings, than upon his success.

Accordingly, while he was always ready to gratify the learned interest,
or even to amuse the lighter curiosity, with which his extraordinary
talent was regarded, there was as little thought of himself in the
performance, and as little idea of display, as though he were engaged in
an ordinary animated conversation. It was to him an exciting agreeable
exercise and nothing more. He engaged in it for its own sake. To him
it was as natural to talk in a foreign language as it would be to
another to sing, to relate a lively anecdote, or to take part in an
interesting discussion. To his humble and guileless mind the notion of
exhibition never presented itself. He retained to his latest hour and
through all the successive steps of his advancement, the simplicity and
lightheartedness of boyhood. It was impossible to spend half an hour in
his company without feeling the literal truth of what he himself said to
Görres regarding his relations to the pupils of the Propaganda;—that he
went among them not as a Cardinal, but as a school-boy, (_giovanetto_.)
What Madame Paget puts down to the account of “small vanity,” was in
reality the result of these almost boyish spirits, and of this simple
and unaffected good nature. He delighted in amusing and giving pleasure;
he was always ready to display his extraordinary gifts, partly for the
gratification of others, partly because it was to himself an innocent and
amusing relaxation: but, among the various impulses to which he yielded,
unquestionably the idea of display was the last that occurred to him as
a motive of action. I can say, from my own observation, that never in
the most distinguished circle, did he give himself to those linguistic
exercises with half the spirit which he evinced among his humble friends,
the obscure and almost nameless students of the Propaganda.




CHAPTER XV.

[1841-1843.]


Although my own recollections of Cardinal Mezzofanti, in comparison with
those which have already been laid before the reader, are so few and
unimportant that I hesitated at one time as to the propriety of alluding
to them, I feel that I should be very forgetful of the kindness which I
experienced at all times at his hands, were I to withhold the impressions
of his character as well as of his gifts, which I received from my
intercourse with him.

I saw Cardinal Mezzofanti for the first time, in July, 1841. He was then
in his sixty-seventh year: but, although his look and colour betrayed
the delicacy of his constitution, his carriage, as yet, exhibited little
indication of the feebleness of approaching age. He was below the middle
stature, and altogether of a diminutive, though light, and in youth most
active frame. His shoulders, it is true, were slightly rounded, and
his chest had an appearance of contraction; but his movements were yet
free, tolerably vigorous, and, although perhaps too hurried for dignity,
not ungraceful. His hair was plentifully dashed with gray; but, except
on the crown, where the baldness was but partially concealed by the
red _zucchetto_, (skull cap,) it was still thick and almost luxuriant.
More than one portrait of him has been published, and several of those
who saw him at different times have recorded their impressions of his
appearance: but I cannot say that any of these portraitures, whether of
pencil or of pen, conveys a full idea of the man. His countenance was
one of those which Madame Dudevant strangely, but yet significantly,
describes as “not a face, but a physiognomy.” Its character lay far less
in the features than in the expression. The former, taken separately,
were unattractive, and even insignificant. The proportions of the face
were far from regular. The complexion was dead and colourless, and these
defects were made still more remarkable by a small mole upon one cheek.
There was an occasional nervous winking of the eyelids, too, which
produced an air of weakness, and at times even of constraint; but there
was, nevertheless, a pervading expression of gentleness, simplicity, and
open-hearted candour, which carried off all these individual defects,
and which no portrait could adequately embody. Mr. Monckton Milnes
told me that the best likeness of the Cardinal he ever saw, was the
kneeling figure in Raffaelle’s noble picture, the Madonna di Foligno:
and undoubtedly, without any close affinity of lineament, it has a
strong general similitude of air and expression:—the same “open brow of
undisturbed humanity,” on which no passion had written a single line, and
which care had touched only to soften and spiritualize; the same quiet
smile, playful, yet subdued, humility blended with self-respect, modesty
unmarred by shyness or timidity;—above all the same

    Eyes beaming courtesy and mild regard—

radiant with a sweetness which I have seldom seen equalled; singularly
soft and winning, and possessing that undefined power which is the
true beauty of an honest eye—a full and earnest, but not scrutinizing
look—deep, but tranquil, and placing you entirely at ease with yourself
by assuring you of its own perfect calmness and self-possession. But
the great charm of Cardinal Mezzofanti’s countenance was the look of
purity and innocence which it always wore. I have seldom seen a face
which retained in old age so much of the simple expression of youth,
I had almost said of childhood; although, with all this gaiety and
light-heartedness, there was a gentle gravity in his bearing which kept
it in perfect harmony with his years and character. He had acquired,
or he possessed from nature, the rare and difficult characteristic of
cheerful old age, to which Rochefoucault alludes when he says:—_Peu
de gens savent être vieux_. And thus he was equally at home among
his venerable peers of the Consistory, and in the youngest and most
light-hearted _camerata_ of the Propaganda. No old man ever illustrated
more clearly that

    The heart—the heart, is the heritage
    Which keepeth the old man young!

During a sojourn of some weeks in Rome, in the summer of 1841, I had the
honour of conversing with his eminence several times; at the Propaganda;
at the Roman Seminary; at a meeting of the Accademia della Religione
Cattolica; and more than once in his own apartments. In the course of one
of these interviews I heard him speak in several languages, to different
acquaintances whom he met, and with each of whom he conversed in his own
tongue—English, German, French, Spanish, Romaic, and Hungarian. With
myself his conversation was always in English.

His English, as we have seen, has been variously judged. Herr Fleck
describes it as “only middling:” by others it is pronounced to be
undistinguishable from that of a native. The truth, as in all such cases,
lies between these extremes.

All visitors, with the single exception of Herr Fleck, (certainly a very
questionable authority,) concur in admitting at least the perfect fluency
and strict grammatical accuracy of the Cardinal’s English conversation:
but some have hesitated as to its idiomatical propriety. M. Crawford,
ex-secretary of the Ionian Islands, told M. d’Abbadie[518] last year,
that Mezzofanti appeared to him to use some un-English constructions. To
Dean Milman, who was introduced to him several years ago by Mr. Francis
Hare, his English appeared “as if learned from books, grammatical,
rather than idiomatical.”[519] And Lady Morgan even determines the period
of English literature on which his English appeared to be modelled.[520]

I cannot fully concur, nevertheless, in this opinion. My own impressions
of the Cardinal’s English, derived from many conversations on different
occasions, agree with those already quoted from Mr. Stewart Rose, Lady
Blessington, Mr. Harford, Bishop Baines, Cardinal Wiseman, and others,
who attest his perfect accuracy both of grammar and of idiom. Mr.
Badeley, the eminent lawyer, who saw him but one year before his death,
told me that “he spoke English in a perfectly easy and natural manner;”
and Mr. Kip, whose visit was about the same time, declares that, “in
the course of a long conversation which he held with the Cardinal, his
eminence did not use a single expression or word in any way that was not
strictly and idiomatically correct.” It is true that I should hardly
have been deceived as to his being a foreigner; but the slight, though
to my ear decisive, foreign characteristics of his English, were rather
of accent than of language; or, if they regarded language at all, it was
not that his expressions were unidiomatical, or that his vocabulary was
wanting in propriety, but merely that his sentences were occasionally
more formal—more like the periods of a regular oratorical composition
than is common in the freedom of every-day conversation. Nor did the
peculiarity of accent to which I refer amount to anything like absolute
impropriety. His pronunciation was most exact; his accentuation almost
unerring; and, although it certainly could be distinguished from that of
a born Englishman, the difference lay chiefly in its being more marked,
and in its precision being more evidently the result of effort and of
rule, than the unstudied and instinctive enunciation of a native speaking
his own language. If I were disposed to criticize it very strictly,
I might say (paradoxical as this may seem,) that, _compared with the
enunciation of a native_, it was almost _too correct to appear completely
natural_; and that its very correctness gave to it some slight tendency
to that extreme which the Italians themselves, in reference to their own
language in the mouth of a stranger, describe as _caricato_. But I have
no hesitation in saying, that I never met any foreigner, not resident in
England, whose English conversation could be preferred to Mezzofanti’s.
The foreign peculiarity was, in my judgment, so slight as to be barely
perceptible, and I have myself known more than one instance similar to
that already related from Cardinal Wiseman, in which Irish visitors
meeting the Cardinal for the first time, without knowing who he was,
took him _for an English dignitary_,[521] mistaking the slight trace of
foreign peculiarity which I have described for what is called in Ireland,
“the English accent.”

Indeed with what care he had attended to the niceties of English
pronunciation—the great stumbling block of all foreign students of
the language—may be inferred from his familiarity with the peculiar
characteristics, even of the provincial dialects. It will be recollected
how he had amused Mr. Harford in 1817, by his specimens of the Yorkshire
and the _Zummer_setshire dialects, and how successfully he imitated
for Mr. Walsh the slang of a London cabman. And a still more amusing
example of the minuteness of his knowledge of these dialects has been
communicated to me by Rev. Mr. Grant of Lytham, brother of my friend the
Bishop of Southwark, to whose unfailing kindness I am indebted for this
and for many other most interesting particulars regarding the Cardinal.
Mr. Grant was presented to his eminence in the Spring of 1841, by the
Rev. Father Kelleher, an Irish Carmelite, of which order the Cardinal
was Protector. After some preliminaries the conversation turned upon the
English language.

    “‘You have many patois in the English language,’ said the
    Cardinal. ‘For instance, the Lancashire dialect is very
    different from that spoken by the Cockneys; [he used this
    word;—] so much so, that some Londoners would find considerable
    difficulty in understanding what a Lancashire man said. The
    Cockneys always use _v_ instead of _w_, and _w_ instead of
    _v_: so that they say ‘vine’ instead of ‘wine;’ [he gave
    this example.] And then the Irish _brogue_, as it is called,
    is another variety. I remember very distinctly having a
    conversation with an Irish gentleman whom I met soon after
    the peace, and he always mis-pronounced that word, calling it
    ‘_pace_.’’

    Here, F. Kelleher broke out into a horse-laugh, and, slapping
    his hand upon his thigh, cried out, ‘Oh! excèllent! your
    Eminence, excèllent!’ ‘Now, there you are wrong,’ said
    Mezzofanti: ‘you ought not to say excèllent, but èxcellent.’

    Then he went off into a disquisition on the word ‘great,’
    contending that, according to all analogy, it should be
    pronounced like ‘gr_ee_t’—for that the diphthong _ea_ is so
    pronounced in almost all, if not in _every_ word, in which it
    occurs; and he instanced these words:—‘_eagle_, _meat_, _beat_,
    _fear_,’ and some others. And he said Lord Chesterfield thought
    the same, and considered it a vulgarism to pronounce it like
    ‘grate.’ He next spoke about the Welsh language—but I really
    quite forget what he said: I only remember that the impression
    left on me was that he knew Welsh also.”

As to the extent of his acquaintance with English literature, my own
personal knowledge is very limited. His only allusion to the subject
which I recollect, was a question which he put to me about the completion
of Moore’s History of Ireland. He expressed a strong feeling of regret
that we had not some Irish History, as learned, as impartial, and as
admirable in its style, as Lingard’s History of England.

This is a point, however, on which we have the concurring testimony of
a number of English visitors, extending over a period of nearly thirty
years. The report of Mr. Harford in 1817, has been already quoted; Dr.
Cox of Southampton, spoke with high admiration of the Cardinal’s powers
as an English critic. Cardinal Wiseman assures me that “he often heard
him speaking on English style, and criticizing our writers with great
justness and accuracy. He certainly,” adds the Cardinal, “knew the
language and its literature far better than many an English gentleman.”
With Mr. Henry Grattan, then (in the year 1843,) member of Parliament
for Meath, he held a long conversation on the English language and
literature, especially its poets.

    “He spoke in English,” says Mr. Grattan, “and with great
    rapidity. He talked of Milton, Pope, Gray, and Chaucer. Milton,
    he observed, was our English Homer, but he was formed by the
    study of Dante, and of the Prophets. On Gray’s Elegy, and on
    Moore’s Melodies, he dwelt with great delight; of the latter he
    repeated some passages, and admired them extremely. Chaucer, he
    said, was taken from Boccaccio. He added that Milton, besides
    his merit as an English poet, also wrote very pretty Italian
    poetry. Talking of French literature, he said that, properly
    speaking, the French have no poetry: ‘they have too much poetry
    in their prose,’ said he, ‘and besides they want the heart that
    is necessary for genuine poetry.’”

But the most extraordinary example of Mezzofanti’s minute acquaintance
with English literature that I have heard, has been communicated to me by
Mr. Badeley, who found him quite familiar with an author so little read,
even by Englishmen, as Hudibras!

    “The Cardinal,” says Mr. Badeley, “received me most graciously;
    his first question was, ‘Well, what language shall we talk?’
    I said, ‘Your eminence’s English is doubtless far better than
    my Italian, and therefore we had better speak English.’ He
    accordingly spoke English to me, in the most easy and natural
    manner, and the conversation soon turned upon the English
    language, and upon English literature; and his reference to
    some of our principal authors, such as Milton, and others of
    that class, shewed me that he was well acquainted with them.
    We talked of translations, and I mentioned that the most
    extraordinary translation I had ever seen was that of Hudibras
    in French. He quite started with astonishment. ‘Hudibras in
    French! impossible—it cannot be!’ I assured him that it was
    so, and that I had the book. ‘But how is it possible,’ said
    he, ‘to translate such a book? The rhymes, the wit, the jokes,
    are the material points of the work—and it is impossible to
    translate these—you cannot give _them_ in French!’ I told
    him that, strange as it might seem, they were very admirably
    preserved in the translation, the measure and versification
    being the same, and the point and spirit of the original
    maintained with the utmost fidelity. He seemed quite lost
    in wonder, and almost incredulous—repeating several times,
    ‘Hudibras in French! Hudibras in French! Most extraordinary—I
    never heard of such a thing!’ During the rest of our interview,
    he broke out occasionally with the same exclamations; and, as
    I took leave, he again asked me about the book. I said that
    it was rather scarce, as it had been published many years
    ago;[522] but, that I had a copy, which I should be happy
    to send him, if he would do me the honour of accepting it.
    Unfortunately, on my return to England, before I could find
    anybody to take charge of it for him, he died.”

The very capacity to appreciate “the rhymes, the wit, the jokes,” of
Hudibras, in itself implies no common mastery of English. How few even
among learned Englishmen, could similarly appreciate Berni, Pulci,
Scarron, or Gresset, not to speak of the minor humourists of France or
Italy!

In all this, however, I have been anticipating. My own conversations
with him, during my first visit to Rome, had but little reference to
languages or to any kindred subject. He questioned me chiefly about our
college, about the general condition of the Church in Ireland, and the
relations of religious parties in Ireland and England. My sojourn in Rome
occurred at a time of great religious excitement in the latter country.
The Tractarian Movement had reached its highest point of interest. The
secessions from the ranks of Anglicanism had already become so numerous
as to attract the attention of foreign churches. The strong assertion
of catholic principles brought out by the Hampden Controversy; the
steady advance in tone which the successive issues of the Tracts for
the Times, and still more of the “British Critic,” had exhibited; above
all, the almost complete identification in doctrine with the decrees of
the Council of Trent, avowed in the celebrated Tract 90; had created
everywhere a confident hope that many and extensive changes were imminent
in England: and there were not a few among the best informed foreign
Catholics, who were enthusiastic in their anticipation of the approaching
reconciliation of that country with the Church. It was almost exclusively
on this topic that Cardinal Mezzofanti spoke during my several interviews
with him, in 1841. He was already well informed as to the general
progress of the movement; but he enquired anxiously about individuals,
and especially about the authors of the Tracts for the Times. I was much
struck by the extent and the accuracy of his information on the subject,
as well as by the justice of his views. He was well acquainted with the
relations of the High and Low Church parties and with their history.

“Rest assured,” he one day said to me, “that it is to individual
conversions you are to look in England. There will be no general
approximation of the Churches. This is not the first time these
principles have been popular for a while in the English Church. It was
the same at the time of Laud, and again in the time of the Catholic King,
James II. But no general movement followed. Many individuals became
Catholics; but the mass of the public still remained Protestant, and were
even more violent afterwards.”

More than once during the many outbursts of fanaticism, which we have
since that time witnessed in England, I have called to mind this wise and
far-seeing prediction.

But, although the Cardinal did not partake in the anticipation, which
some indulged, of a general movement of the English Church towards
Rome, his interest in the conversion of individuals was most anxious
and animated. It was his favourite subject of conversation with English
visitors at this period. Mr. Grattan has kindly permitted me to copy from
his journal an account of one of his interviews with the Cardinal, (a few
months after this date) which describes a half serious, half jocular,
attempt on the part of his Eminence to convert him from Protestantism.
Mrs. Grattan, who is a Catholic, was present during the interview.

Having referred, in the course of a very interesting discussion on
English literature, which the reader has already seen, to Sir Thomas
More, as the earliest model of English prose, the Cardinal observed that
More was a truly great and good man.

    “‘He made an enemy of his King,’ said he, ‘but he made a
    friend in his God.’ He then inquired of Mrs. Grattan, how it
    happened that I had not changed my religion, and become a
    Catholic—‘Now-a-days,’ said he, ‘there is no penalty and no
    shame attached to the step; on the contrary, a great party in
    England esteem you the more for it, and many learned men of
    your own day have set you the example. You have, besides, the
    venerable Bede; you have St. Patrick, too—both the greatest of
    your countrymen in their age; you have King Alfred, and the
    Edwards, all inviting you to the Church.’ He then approached
    me in the most affectionate manner, took my hand and pressed
    it, with a mixture of tenderness, drollery, and good nature.
    ‘Now you _must_ change,’ he continued. ‘You will not be able to
    escape it; your religion is but three hundred years old: the
    Catholic dates from the beginning of Christianity. It is the
    religion of Christ; its head on earth is the Pope—not, as yours
    once was, an old woman, but the Pope!’ Here he became quite
    animated, took Mrs. Grattan’s hand, and drew her over, holding
    each of us by the hand; his manner became most fervent, his old
    eye glistened, he looked up to Heaven, and exclaimed,—‘There
    is the place to make a friend!’ Then turning to me, he said,
    ‘Ireland is the garden of religion, and you must one day become
    a flower in it.’”

Mr. Grattan was deeply affected by this remarkable interview; and I may
add that I have known few Protestant visitors of the Cardinal, who did
not carry away the most favourable impressions regarding him. With all
the earnestness and fervour of his own religious convictions, he was
singularly tolerant and forbearing towards the followers of another
creed. “His gentleness and modesty,” writes Chevalier (now Baron)
Bunsen, “have often struck me. Once, some misrepresentations of Lady
Morgan in her book on Italy, being mentioned in his presence with strong
vituperation, he gently interposed. ‘Poor Lady Morgan!’ said he; ‘it is
not yet given to her to see truth.’”

But although in my conversations with the Cardinal in 1841, his Eminence
confined himself entirely to English, yet on one occasion, at the close
of a meeting of the Accademia della Cattolica Religione, I heard him
converse, with every appearance of fluency and ease, in six different
languages with the various members of a group who collected around him;
in Romaic with Monsignor Missir, a Greek Archbishop; in German with
Guido Görres; in Magyar with a Hungarian artist who accompanied him; in
French with the Abbé La Croix, of the French church of St. Lewis; in
Spanish with a young Spanish Dominican; and in English with myself and my
companions. It was only however, during a second and more prolonged visit
to Rome in the first six months of 1843, that I was witness, in its full
reality, of the marvellous gift of which I had read and heard so much.

I was fortunate enough to arrive on Rome in the vigil of the great
annual “Academy” of the Propaganda, which, from immemorial time has
been held during the octave of the Epiphany, the special festival of
that institution. It is hardly necessary, in speaking of an exercise
now so celebrated, to explain that this Academy consists of a series of
brief addresses and recitations, generally speaking in a metrical form,
delivered by the students in all the various languages which happen
at the time to be represented in the college. The subjects of these
compositions are commonly drawn from the festival itself, or from some
kindred theme; and the rapidity with which they succeed each other,
and the earnestness and vigour with which most of them are delivered,
create an impression which hardly any other conceivable exhibition
could produce. To the audience, of course, the greater number of these
recitations are an unknown sound; but the earnest manner of the speakers;
their foreign and unwonted intonations; the curious variety of feature
and expression which they present; and the unique character of the whole
proceeding—gave to the scene an interest entirely independent of the
recitations themselves considered as literary compositions.

I never shall forget the impression which I received at my first entrance
at the _Aula Maxima_[523] on the evening of Sunday, January 8th, 1843.
At the farther end of the hall, on an elevated platform, the benches
of which rose above each other like the seats of a theatre, sat the
assembled pupils, arranged with some view to effect, in the order in
which they were to take part in the exercise. They seemed of all ages,
from the dawn of youth to mature manhood. It would be difficult to find
elsewhere collected together so many specimens of the minor varieties of
the human race. Gazing upon the eager faces crowded within that little
space, one might almost persuade himself that he had the whole world in
miniature before him, with all its motley tribes and races—

    Che comprender non può prosa ne vérso:—
    Da India, dal Catai, Marrocco, e Spagna.

Some of the varieties, and perhaps those which present the most marked
physiological contrasts with the rest, it is true, were wanting; but
all the more delicate shades of difference were clearly discernable;
the familiar lineaments of the Celtic and Anglo-Saxon race; all the
well-known European types of feature and complexion; the endless though
highly contrasted varieties of Asiatic and North African form—the classic
Indian, the stately Armenian, the calm and impassive Chaldee, the solemn
Syrian, the fiery Arab, the crafty Egyptian, the swarthy Abyssinian, the
stunted Birman, the stolid Chinese. And yet in all, far as they seemed
asunder in sentient and intelligent qualities, might be traced the common
interest of the occasion. Each appeared to feel that this—the feast of
the illumination of the Gentiles—was indeed his own peculiar festival.
All were lighted up by the excitement of the approaching exercise; and
it was impossible, looking upon them, and recalling the object which had
brought them all together from their distant homes, not to give glory to
God for this, the most glorious work of his church: in which “Parthians,
and Medes, and Elamites, and the inhabitants of Mesopotamia, Judea, and
Cappadocia, Pontus and Asia, Phrygia and Pamphylia, Egypt, and the parts
of Lybia about Cyrene, and strangers of Rome, Jews also, and proselytes,
Cretes and Arabians, speak the wonderful works of God;”—not, as of old,
in one tongue, but each in the tongue of his own people.

Below the platform were arrayed the auditory. The front seats,
distinguished by their red drapery, were reserved for the Cardinals, of
whom several were present,—Franzoni, the Cardinal Prefect, with his pale
and passionless face—the very ideal of self-denying spirituality;—the
English Cardinal Acton, shrinking, as it seemed, from the notice which
his prominent position drew upon him—Castracane, Cardinal Penitentiary,
with the look of earnest and settled purpose which he always wore;—the
lively little Cardinal Massimo,[524] in animated and evidently pleasant
conversation, with two of the Professors, the lamented abate Palma
and abate Graziosi;—the classic head of Mai, every feature instinct
with intellectuality—every look bespeaking the scholar and the priest.
But it need scarcely be said, that on this evening, despite his scant
proportions and unimposing presence, every other claimant for notice was
forgotten in comparison with the true hero of such a scene—the great
polyglot Cardinal Mezzofanti. He was seated on the extreme right of the
front rank, and, as I entered, was conversing eagerly with a stately
looking Greek bishop, Monsignor Missir, whose towering stature and
singularly noble head contrasted strongly with the diminutive and almost
insignificant figure of the great linguist.

Behind the Cardinals sate a number of foreign bishops, prelates, members
of religious orders, and other distinguished strangers, many of them
evidently orientals. The general assembly at the back included most
of the literary foreigners then in Rome, among whom were more than one
English clergyman, at that time the object of many an anxious prayer and
aspiration, of which we have since been permitted to witness the happy
fulfilment in their accession to the fold of the Church.

The exercises of the evening, besides a Latin proem and an epilogue in
Italian, comprised forty-eight recitations on “the Illumination of the
Gentiles;” but, as these included several varieties of Latin and Italian
versification, the total number of languages represented in the Academy
was only forty-two. The Latin proem was delivered by a young Irish
student from the centre of the platform; the other speakers delivering
their parts from the places assigned to them by the programme. Most of
the languages were spoken by natives of the several countries where they
prevail; and, where no native representative could be found, a student
remarkable for his proficiency in the language was selected instead.
It thus happened that the Hebrew psalm was recited by a Dutchman; the
Spanish ode fell to a native of Stockholm; and the soft measures of the
Italian _terzine_ and anacreontics were committed to the tender mercies
of two youths from beyond the Tweed!

With those of the odes which I was in some degree able to follow, the
Latin, Italian, French, Spanish, and German, I was much pleased. They
appeared to me remarkably simple, elegant, and in good taste. But for the
rest, it would be idle to attempt to convey an idea of the strange effect
produced by the rapid succession of unknown sounds, uttered with every
diversity of intonation,[525] accompanied by every variety of gesture,
and running through every interval in the musical scale, from “syllables
which breathe of the soft south,” to the

    Harsh northern whistling, grunting, guttural,
    That we’re obliged to hiss, and spit, and sputter all.

Some of the recitations were singularly soft and harmonious; some
came, even upon an uninstructed ear, with a force and dignity, almost
independent of the sense which they conveyed; some on the contrary,
especially when taken in connexion with the gestures and intonation of
the reciter, were indescribably ludicrous. Among the former was the
Syriac ode, recited by Joseph Churi, a youth since known in English
literature. Among the latter, the most curious were a Chinese Eclogue,
and a Peguan Dialogue. The speakers in both cases were natives, and I
was assured by a gentleman who was present at the exercise, and who
had visited China more than once, that their recitation was a perfect
reproduction of the tone and manner of the native theatre of China.

       *       *       *       *       *

Throughout the entire proceedings Cardinal Mezzofanti was a most
attentive, and evidently an anxious listener. Every one of the young
aspirants to public favour was personally and familiarly known to
him. Many of the pieces, moreover, upon these occasions, were his own
composition, or at least revised by him; and thus, besides his paternal
anxiety for the success of his young friends, he generally had somewhat
of the interest of an author in the literary part of the performance. It
was plain, too, that, for the young speakers themselves, his Eminence
was, in his turn, the principal object of consideration; and it was
amusing to observe, in the case of one of the oriental recitations,
that the speaker almost appeared to forget the presence of the general
auditory, and to address himself entirely to the spot where Cardinal
Mezzofanti sate.

At the close of the exercises, as soon as the interesting assemblage
of the platform broke up, a motley group was speedily formed around
the good-natured Cardinal, to hear his criticisms, or to receive his
congratulations on the performance; and I then was witness for the first
time of what I saw on more than one subsequent occasion—the almost
inconceivable versatility of his wonderful faculty, and his power of
flying from language to language with the rapidity of thought itself,
as he was addressed in each in succession;—hardly ever hesitating, or
ever confounding a word or interchanging a construction. Most of the
members of the polyglot group which thus crowded around him and plied
him with this linguistic fusilade, were of course unknown to me; but I
particularly noticed among the busiest of the questioners, the Chinese
youths who had taken part in their native eclogue, and a strange,
mercurial, monkey-like, but evidently most intelligent lad, whom I
afterwards recognized as one of the speakers in the Peguan Dialogue.[526]
I was gratified, too, to see a gap which I had observed in the programme
of the exercises—the omission of the Russian language—supplied by his
Eminence in this curious after-performance. A Russian gentleman, who
had sate near me during the evening, now joined the group assembled
around the Cardinal, and good-humouredly complained of the oversight.
His Eminence, without a moment’s thought, replied to him in Russian;—in
which language a lengthened conversation ensued between them, with every
evidence of ease and fluency on the part of the Cardinal. Although I have
never since learned the name of this traveller, I noted the circumstance
with peculiar interest at the time, because he had already established
a claim upon my remembrance, by selecting (without knowing me as an
Irishman,) among all the recitations of the evening, as especially
harmonious and expressive in its sounds, the _Irish Ode_; which had been
delivered with great character and effect by a young student of the
County Mayo.

During my first visit to Rome, I had heard a great deal of this curious
power of maintaining a conversation simultaneously with several
individuals, and in many different languages; but I was far from being
prepared for an exhibition of it so wonderful as that which I have
witnessed. I cannot, at this distance of time, say what was the exact
number of the group which stood around him, nor can I assert that they
all spoke different languages; but making every deduction, the number
of speakers cannot have been less than ten or twelve; and I do not
think that he once hesitated for a sentence or even for a word! Many
very wonderful examples of the power of dividing the attention between
different objects have been recorded. Julius Cæsar, if we believe Pliny,
was able to listen with his ears, read with his eyes, write with his
pen, and dictate with his lips, at the same time. Mordaunt, Earl of
Peterborough, often dictated to six or seven secretaries simultaneously.
Walter Scott, when engaged in his Life of Napoleon, used to dictate
fluently to his amanuensis, while he was, at the same time, taking down
and reading books, consulting papers, and comparing authorities on the
difficult points of the history which were to follow. The wonderful
powers of the same kind possessed by Phillidor, the chess-player, too,
are well known.[527] But I cannot think that there is any example of
the faculty of mental self-multiplication, if it can be thus called,
upon record, so wonderful as that exhibited by Mezzofanti in these, so
to speak, linguistic tournaments, in which he held the lists against all
opponents, not successively, but at once. Guido Görres, describing the
rapidity of his transitions from one language to another, compares it
to “a bird flitting from spray to spray.” The learned Armenian, Father
Arsenius, speaking of the perfect distinctness of his use of each, and
of the entire absence of confusion or intermixture, says his change from
language to language “was like passing from one room into another.”
“Mezzofanti himself told me,” writes Cardinal Wiseman, “that whenever he
began to speak in one tongue, or turned into it from another, he seemed
to forget all other languages except that one. He has illustrated to me
the difficulty he had to encounter in these transitions, by taking a
common word, such as ‘bread,’ and giving it in several cognate languages,
as Russian, Polish, Bohemian, Hungarian, &c., the differences being very
slight, and difficult to remember. Yet he never made the least mistake in
any of them.”

When Rev. John Strain, now of St. Andrew’s, Dumfries, who assures me
that, while he was in the Propaganda, he often heard Mezzofanti speak
seven or eight languages in the course of half an hour, asked him how it
was that he never jumbled or confused them. Mezzofanti laughingly asked
in his turn.

“Have you ever _tried on a pair of green spectacles_?”

“Yes,” replied his companion.

“Well,” said Mezzofanti, “while you wore these spectacles everything
was green to your eyes. It is precisely so with me. While I am speaking
any language, for instance, Russian, _I put on my Russian spectacles_,
and for the time, _they colour everything Russian_. I see all my ideas
in that language alone. If I pass to another language, _I have only to
change the spectacles, and it is the same for that language also_!”

This amusing illustration perfectly describes the phenomenon so far
as it fell under observation; but, so far as I am aware, no one has
attempted to analyse the mental operation by which these astounding
external effects were produced. The faculty, whatever it was, may have
been improved and sharpened by exercise; but there is no part of the
extraordinary gift of this great linguist so clearly exceptional, and so
unprecedented in the history of the faculty of language.

A few weeks after the Propaganda academy, I met his Eminence at the
levee of the newly created Cardinal Cadolini, ex-Secretary of the Sacred
Congregation. Recognizing me at once as “the Maynooth Professor,” he
addressed me laughingly in Irish: _Cion̄us tá tú_ “How are you?” It has
repeatedly been stated that he knew Irish; and that language is actually
enumerated in more than one published list of the languages which he
spoke. Had it not been for his own candour on the occasion in question, I
myself should have carried away the same impression from our interview.
But on my declaring my inability to enter into an Irish conversation,
he at once confessed that, had I been able to go farther, I should have
found himself at fault; as, although he knew so much as enabled him to
initiate a conversation, and to make his way through a book, he had not
formally studied the Irish language. Nevertheless that he was acquainted
with its general characteristics, and the leading principles of its
inflections and grammatical structure, its analogies with Gælic, as well
as their leading points of difference, and its general relations with
the common Celtic family, I was enabled to ascertain in a subsequent
interview, in which I was accompanied by an accomplished Irish scholar,
the late Rev. Dr. Murphy of Kinsale. Dr. Murphy was much struck with the
accuracy and soundness of his views.

One of the observations which he made during this interview was
afterwards the occasion of no little amusement to us. During an audience
which Dr. Murphy, accompanied by Dr. Cullen, then Rector of the Irish
College, had had a few days before with the Pope, Gregory XVI., a new
work of Sir William Betham, _Etruria Celtica_—in which an attempt is made
to establish the identity of the Irish and Etrurian languages, and in
which the celebrated Eugubian inscriptions are explained as Irish,—had
been presented to the Pope. His holiness, who was much interested in
Etruscan antiquities, on hearing from Dr. Cullen the nature and object
of the work, had expressed great amusement at this latest discovery in a
matter which had already been explained in at least a dozen different and
conflicting ways. We mentioned this to the Cardinal.

“His Holiness is perfectly right,”he replied. “There is no possible
meaning which could not be taken out of it, if you only grant the licence
which these antiquarians claim. The Eugubian tables, in different
systems,[528] have been explained by some as a calendar of Festivals; by
others as a code of laws; by others as a system of agricultural precepts.
It is no wonder that your Irish author explains them as Irish. But I
will venture to say that, if you only take any common Italian or Latin
sentence, and apply to it the same system of interpretation, you may
explain it as Irish, and find it make excellent sense.”

On leaving his Eminence, we resolved to put his suggestion to the test.
We took the first sentence in the first of F. Segneri’s sermons which
opened in the volume. I have since tried, but in vain, to find the
passage: and I only recollect about it, that it related to the ardent
desire of our Divine Lord, that the light of his gospel should shine
among men. Dr. Murphy, without exceeding in the slightest degree the
license which Sir W. Betham allows himself, in dealing with the Eugubian
inscriptions, converted this Italian sentence into an Irish one, which,
to our infinite amusement, literally rendered, ran as follows: “In
sailing into the harbour, they came to the place of his habitation; and
_they took a vast quantity of large specked trouts, by the great virtue
of white Irish fishing-rods_!”

The Cardinal repeated to Dr. Murphy during this visit what he had before
said, that he did not pretend to speak Irish, but added that, if he had a
little practice, he would easily acquire it. I had already heard the same
from the Archbishop of Tuam, who knew him on his first arrival in Rome. I
have since been told that, in the following winter, he formally addressed
himself to the study, with the assistance of the late Rev. Dr. Lyons of
Erris, who was then in Rome; but I have no means of testing the truth of
the statement, or of ascertaining the extent of his progress.

This discussion regarding the Irish language naturally suggested a
similar inquiry as to the Cardinal’s knowledge of the kindred Gælic.
The Rev. John Strain, who knew him in 1832, when he first came to Rome,
informs me that in that year he had no knowledge whatever of the Gælic
language. He got a friend of Mr. Strain’s to repeat some sentences in it
for him, and expressed a wish to procure some books for the purpose of
learning it. I find from the catalogue of his library that he did procure
a few Gælic books: and Rev. John Gray of Glasgow, who was a student of
the Propaganda till the year 1841, informs me that he at that time knew
the language, but spoke it very imperfectly.[529]

An American gentleman whom I met one day in the Cardinal’s ante-chamber,
showed me an impromptu English couplet which his eminence had just
written for him, on his asking for some memorial of their interview. I
am not able now to recall this distich to memory; but it is only one of
numberless similar tokens which the Cardinal presented to his visitors
and friends. One of his favourite amusements consisted in improvising
little scraps of verse in various languages, for the most part embodying
some pious or moral sentiment, which he flung off with the rapidity of
thought, and without the slightest effort. Few of those which I have
seen, indeed, can be said to exhibit much poetical genius. There is
but little trace of imagination in them, and the sentiments, though
excellent, are generally commonplace enough. But while, considered as a
test of command over the languages in which they are written, even the
most worthless of them cannot be regarded as insignificant, there are
many of them which are very prettily turned, and display no common power
of versification.

It is difficult to recover scraps like these, fragmentary of their own
nature, and scattered over every country of the earth. I have sought in
vain for oriental specimens, although the Cardinal distributed numbers
of them to the students of the Propaganda at their leaving college. In
a sheet of autographs prefixed to this volume will be found verses in
sixteen different languages. A few others are given in the appendix.
I shall jot down here two or three specimens of his classical epigrams
which have fallen in my way.

Most of them arose out of the very circumstance of his being asked for
such a token of remembrance.

For instance, on one occasion when the request was addressed to him _in
Greek_, he wrote:

    Ἑλλάδος ἠρώτας ἐμε ῥήμασιν. Ἑλλάδος ἁυδήν
    Ἐκχὲω, οὐδ’ ἄλλην χρή ἀπαμειβόμενον.
    Οὐ φθόγγος φθόγγοισιν ἀμείβεται, εί μὴ ὁμοῖος,
    Ἀλλ’ ἀπὸ συμφώνων γίγνεται ἁρμονίη.
    Νῦν δέ τίνα Γνώμην δώσω ἀιτοῦντι; τιν ἄλλην
    Ἡ—— ’Θεὸν ἐν πάσῃ, δὲι φιλέειν κραδίῃ.’

So again, when a visitor begged him to write _his name_ in an album, he
gave, instead, this pretty couplet.

    Pauca dedi—nomen. Tu sane pauca petisti,
    Assiduus sed ego te rogo plura—preces.

In answer to a similar request at another time, he replied—

    Accipe quod poscis—nomen. Scribatur ut ipsum
    In cœlo, ad Dominum tu bone funde preces.

On being presented on New Year’s day with a pair of spectacles by his
friend, Dr. Peter Trombetti, of Bologna, he wrote:—

    Deficit heu acies oculorum! instante senecta;
    Deficit;—at comis lumina tu duplicas.
    Lumen utrumque mihi argento dum nocte coruscat
    Haud mihi qui dederit decidet ex animo.

A similar present at the next New Year elicited the following:—

    Cum vix sufficiunt oculi mihi nocte legenti,
    Ecce bonus rursum lumina tu geminas.
    Prospera ut eveniant multis volventibus annis,
    Cuncta tibi, par est me geminare preces.

To another of his Bolognese friends, the Canonico Tartaglia, now rector
of the Pontifical seminary, who begged some memorial, he sent the
following pretty epigram:—

    Sæpe ego versiculos heic dicto, stans pede in uno;
    Carmina sed fingo nulla linenda cedro.
    Qualiacumque cano velox heu dissipat aura!
    Unum de innumeris hoc mihi vix superest,
    Mittimus hoc unum interea. Exiguum accipe donum
    Eternæ veteris pignus amicitiæ.

Any one who has ever tried to turn a verse in any foreign tongue, will
agree with me in regarding the rapidity with which these trifles were
written, as one of the most curious evidences of the writer’s mastery
over the many languages in which he is known to have indulged this fancy.
The really pretty Dutch verses—verses as graceful in sentiment as they
are elegant in language—in reply to Dr. Wap’s address, were penned in Dr.
Wap’s presence and with great rapidity. Father Legrelle’s Flemish verses
were dashed off with equal quickness. The American of whom I spoke told
me that the Cardinal wrote almost without a moment’s thought. It was the
same for the lady mentioned by Dr. Wap, although the subject of these
verses arose during the interview; and even the Persian stanza which he
wrote for Dr. Tholuck, and which “contained several pretty ἐνθυμήσεις,”
cost him only about half an hour! How many of those who consider
themselves most perfect in French, Italian, or German, have ever ventured
even upon a single line of poetry in any of them?

I must not omit another circumstance which I myself observed, and which
struck me forcibly as illustrating the singular nicety of his ear, and
still more the completeness with which he threw himself into all the
details of every language which he cultivated;—I mean his manner and
accent in pronouncing Latin in conversation with natives of different
countries. One day I was speaking to him in company with Guido Görres,
when he had occasion to quote to me Horace’s line.

    Si paulum a summo decessit, vergit ad imum:—

which he pronounced quite as I should have pronounced it, and without
any of the peculiarities of Italian pronunciation. He turned at once to
Görres, and added—

“Or, as you would say:

    Si _pow_lum a _soomm_o _det_sessit, ver_ghit_ ad imum,”

introducing into it every single characteristic of the German manner
of pronouncing the Latin language. I have heard the same from other
foreigners. It was amusing, too, to observe that he had taken the
trouble to note and to acquire the peculiar expletive or interjectional
sounds, with which, as it is well known, natives of different countries
unconsciously interlard their conversation, and the absence or misuse
of which will sometimes serve to discover the foreign origin of one who
seems to speak a language with every refinement of correctness.[530] The
Englishman’s “ah!” the Frenchman’s “oh!” the whistling interjection of
the Neapolitan, the grunt of the Turk, the Spaniard’s nasal twang—were
all at his command.

My brief and casual intercourse with the Cardinal would not entitle me to
speak of his character and disposition, were it not that my impressions
are but an echo of all that has been said and written before me, of his
cheerful courtesy, his open-hearted frankness, and his unaffected good
nature. To all his visitors of whatever degree, he was the same—gay,
amiable, and unreserved. With him humility was an instinct. It seemed
as though he never thought of himself, or of any claim of his to
consideration. He would hardly permit the simple mark of respect—the
kissing of the ring which ordinarily accompanies the salutation of one of
high ecclesiastical dignity in Italy; and his demeanour was so entirely
devoid of assumption of superiority that the humblest visitor was at once
made to feel at home in his company.

His conversation was uniformly gay and cheerful, and no man entered
more heartily into the spirit of any little pleasantry which might
arise. On one occasion, upon a melting summer day, as he was shewing the
magnificent Giulio Clovio Dante, in the Vatican library, to a well-known
London clergyman, the latter, in his delight at one of the beautiful
miniatures by which it is illustrated—a moonlight scene—was in the act of
pointing out _with his moist finger_ some particular beauty which struck
him, when Mezzofanti, horror-struck at the danger, caught his arm.

“Softly, my dear Doctor,” he playfully interposed: “these things may be
looked at with the eyes, but not with the fingers.”

He delighted, too, in puns, and was equally ready in all languages. He
laughed heartily at Cardinal Rivarola’s Italian pun against himself,
about the _orecchini_;[531] and one day, while he was speaking German
with Guido Görres, the latter having made some allusion to his
Eminence’s increasing gray hairs, and spoken of him as a _weiss-haar_
(white-haired,)

“Ach!” he replied with a gentle smile, not untinged with
melancholy;—“ach! gäbe Gott dass ich, wie _weiss-haar_, so auch _weiser_
geworden wäre.”[532]

It will easily be inferred from this, that, among etymologies, he was
especially attracted by those which involved a play upon words:—if they
admitted a pun so much the better. He was much amused by Herr Fleck’s
suggestion, that the name Mezzofanti, was derived from Ἑν μέσῳ φαίνεται;
and Cardinal Wiseman told me that once, after learnedly canvassing the
various etymologies suggested for Felsina, the ancient name of his
native city, Bologna, he laughingly brought the discussion to a close by
suggesting that probably it was _Fé l’asina_, (the ass made it.)

Probably it was to this taste he was indebted for that familiarity with
Hudibras—a writer, otherwise so unattractive to a foreigner—which took
Mr. Badeley by surprise.




CHAPTER XVI.

[1843-1849.]


In the midst of the honours and occupations of his new dignity, Cardinal
Mezzofanti sustained a severe affliction in the death of his favourite
nephew, Monsignor Minarelli—the _Giuseppino_ (Joe) so often commemorated
in his early correspondence. This amiable and learned ecclesiastic
instead of accompanying his uncle to Rome, where the most brilliant
prospects were open to him, preferred to pursue the quiet and useful
career of university life, in which he had hitherto been associated with
him in Bologna. By successive steps, he had risen to the Rectorate of
the University; and in recognition of his services to that institution,
the honorary dignity of a prelate of the first class in the Roman
Court—popularly styled _del mantelletto_—had been conferred on him by the
Pope. The Cardinal, as is plain from his own letters and those of his
Bologna friends, was warmly attached to him. While he lived in Bologna
Giuseppe was his friend and companion, rather than his pupil; and the
young man’s early death was felt the more deeply by him, from the
congeniality of tastes and studies which had always subsisted between
them.

The Cardinal’s sister, Teresa, (mother of the deceased prelate,) although
she was ten years his senior, was still living in their old home at
Bologna, and he continued to correspond with her up to the time of his
death. His letters to her are all exceedingly simple and unaffected—so
entirely of a domestic character, and without public interest, that, if
I translate one of them here—the latest which has come into my hands—it
is merely as a specimen of the warmth and tenderness, as well as deeply
religious character of the Cardinal’s affection for his sister and for
her children.

    “We are on the eve of your Saint’s Day, my dearest sister. I am
    to say Mass on that day in the Church of the Servites; but I
    shall offer it for you, praying with all the fervor of my heart
    that God may long preserve you in health, and console you under
    your affliction, and that your holy patroness may protect you,
    and obtain for you all the graces of which you stand in need.
    I wish to mark the occasion by a little token of my affection,
    and I have already written to Gesnalde to transmit it to you.
    It is a mere trifle, but I know that you will only look, as
    you have always done in past years, to the person it comes
    from, and that you will give it value by accepting it, and by
    corresponding with me in recommending me, as I do you, to the
    special favour of the Almighty. As being my elder sister, you
    used always, when we were children, to pray for your little
    brother; and I know that you still continue the practice; I am
    most grateful for it, and I try to make you every return.

    Your sons, and my niece Anna unite with me in their
    affectionate wishes, and beg your blessing. May God bestow his
    most abundant blessings on you!”

The history of the later years of the Cardinal’s life presents scarcely
any incidents of any special interest. Few of the reports of the
foreigners who met him at this period, differ in any material particulars
from those which we have already seen. I shall content myself, therefore,
with two or three of them, which may be taken as specimens of the entire,
but which are selected also with a view to serve in guiding the reader
in his estimate, not merely of the general attainments of the Cardinal
as a linguist, but of his proficiency in the languages of the writers
themselves, and in other languages, not specially commemorated hitherto.

We have already passingly alluded to the account of Mezzofanti given
by the Rev. Ingraham Kip, a clergyman of the Episcopalian Church in
America: but the details into which this gentleman enters, regarding
his Eminence’s knowledge of the English language and literature, are so
important, that it would be unpardonable to pass them by.

    “He is a small lively looking man,” says Mr. Kip, “apparently
    over seventy. He speaks English with a slight foreign
    accent—yet remarkably correct. Indeed, I never before met with
    a foreigner who could talk for ten minutes without using some
    word with a shade of meaning not exactly right; yet, in the
    _long conversation I had with the Cardinal, I detected nothing
    like this. He did not use a single expression or word in any
    way which was not strictly and idiomatically correct._ He
    converses, too, without the slightest hesitation, never being
    at the least loss for the proper phrase.

    In talking about him some time before to an ecclesiastic, I
    quoted Lady Blessington’s remark, ‘that she did not believe he
    had made much progress in the literature of these forty-two
    languages; but was rather like a man who spent his time in
    manufacturing keys to palaces which he had not time to enter;’
    and I inquired whether this was true. ‘Try him,’ said he,
    laughing; and, having now the opportunity, I endeavoured to do
    so. I led him, therefore, to talk of Lord Byron and his works,
    and then of English literature generally. He gave me, in the
    course of his conversation, quite a discussion on the subject
    which was the golden period of the English language; and of
    course fixed on the days of Addison. He drew a comparison
    between the characteristics of the French, Italian, and Spanish
    languages; spoke of Lockhart’s translation from the Spanish,
    and incidentally referred to various other English writers. He
    then went on to speak of American literature, and paid high
    compliments to the pure style of some of our best writers. He
    expressed an opinion that, with many, it had been evidently
    formed by a careful study of the old authors—those ‘wells of
    English undefiled’—and, that within the last fifty years we had
    imported fewer foreign words than had been done in England. He
    spoke very warmly of the works of Mr. Fennimore Cooper, whose
    name, by the way, is better known on the continent than that of
    any other American author.”

As Mr. Kip, unfortunately, was not acquainted with any of the Indian
languages of North America, he was unable to test the extent of the
Cardinal’s attainments in these languages. His account, nevertheless, is
not without interest.

    “In referring to our Indian languages, he remarked, that the
    only one with which he was well acquainted was the Algonquin,
    although he knew something of the Chippewa and Delaware; and
    asked whether I understood Algonquin; I instantly disowned
    any knowledge of the literature of that respectable tribe of
    Savages; for I was afraid the next thing would be a proposal
    that we should continue the conversation in their mellifluous
    tongue. He learned it from an Algonquin missionary, who
    returned to Rome, and lived just long enough to enable the
    Cardinal to begin this study. He had read the works of Mr.
    Du Ponceau[533] of Philadelphia, on the subject of Indian
    languages, and spoke very highly of them.”

It is right to add Mr. Kip’s conclusions from the entire interview, and
his impressions regarding the natural and acquired powers of the great
linguist.

    “And yet,” he concludes, “_all this conversation by no
    means satisfied me_ of the depth of the Cardinal’s literary
    acquirements. There was nothing said which gave evidence of
    more than a superficial acquaintance with English literature;
    the kind of knowledge which passes current in society, and
    which is necessarily picked up by one who meets so often
    with cultivated people of each country. His acquirements in
    words are certainly wonderful; but I could not help asking
    myself their use. I have never yet heard of their being of
    any practical benefit to the world during the long life of
    their possessor. He has never displayed anything philosophical
    in his character of mind; none of that power of combination
    which enables Schlegel to excel in all questions of philology,
    and gives him a talent for discriminating and a power of
    handling the resources of a language which have never been
    surpassed.”[534]

Perhaps the reader will be disposed to regard Mr. Kip’s criticism as
somewhat _exigeant_ in its character; and to think that, even taking his
own report of his conversation with the Cardinal, and of the number and
variety of the English and American writers, with whom, and with whose
peculiar characteristics, he was acquainted—some of them, moreover—as
for example, Lockhart’s Spanish Ballads—a translation from a foreign
language—most unlikely to attract a “superficial” foreigner, he was a
little unreasonable in refusing “to be satisfied with the depth of the
Cardinal’s literary acquirements.” For my part, I cannot help thinking
this interview, even as recorded by Mr. Kip, one of the most astonishing
incidents in the entire history of this extraordinary man. And I may add
to what is here stated of his familiarity with the principal English
authors, native and American, that, as I am informed by the Rev. Mr.
Gray, of Glasgow, the Cardinal was also intimately acquainted with the
national literature of Scotland; that he had read many of the works of
Walter Scott and Burns; and that he understood and was able to enjoy the
Lowland Scottish dialect, which is one of the great charms of both.

Mr. Kip’s impressions as to the Cardinal’s want of skill in the science
of language and of its philosophical bearing on history and ethnology,
must be admitted to have more foundation, and are shared by several of
the scholars who visited him, especially those who cultivated ethnology
as a particular study. I have reserved for this place a short notice of
the Cardinal, which has been communicated to me by Baron Bunsen, and
which, while it does ample justice to Mezzofanti’s merits as a linguist,
puts a very low estimate on his accomplishments as a philologer, and a
critic. The reader will gather from much of what has been already said,
that I am far from adopting this estimate in several of its particulars;
but Baron Bunsen’s opinion upon any question of scholarship or criticism
is too important to be overlooked.

    “I saw him first as Abate and Librarian at Bologna, in 1828,
    when travelling through Italy, with the Crown Prince (now
    King) of Prussia. When he came to Rome as head librarian to
    the Vatican, I have frequently had the pleasure of seeing
    him in my house, and in the Vatican. He was always amiable,
    humane, courteous, and spoke with equal fluency the different
    languages of Europe. His gentleness and modesty have often
    struck me. Once, when some misrepresentations of Lady Morgan
    in her book on Italy, were mentioned before him with very
    strong vituperation, ‘Poor Lady Morgan!’ he said, ‘it is not
    yet given to her to see truth.’ When complimented by an English
    lady upon his miraculous facility in acquiring languages, with
    the additional observation that Charles the Fifth had said,
    ‘as many languages as a man knows, so many times he is a man,’
    he replied, ‘Well, that ought rather to humble us; for it is
    essential to man to err, and therefore, such a man is the more
    liable to error, if Charles the Fifth’s observation is true.’

    On the other side, I must confess that I was always struck by
    the observation of an Italian who answered to the question:
    ‘Non è miracoloso di vedere un uomo parlare quaranta due
    lingue?’ replied, ‘Si, senza dubbio; ma più miracoloso ancora
    è di sentire che questo uomo in quaranta due lingue non dice
    _niente_.’ A giant as a linguist, Mezzofanti certainly was a
    child as a philologer and philological critic.

    He delighted in etymologies, and sometimes he mentioned new
    and striking ones, particularly as to the Romanic languages
    and their dialects. But he could not draw any philosophical
    or historical consequences from that circumstance, beyond the
    first self-evident elements. He had no idea of philosophical
    grammar. I have once seen his attempt at decyphering a Greek
    inscription, and never was there such a failure. Nor has he
    left or published anything worth notice.

    I explain this by his ignorance of all _realities_. He
    remembered words and their sounds and significations almost
    instinctively; but he lived upon reminiscences: he never had
    an original thought. I understood from one of his learned
    colleagues, (a Roman Prelate,) that it was the same with his
    theology; there was no acuteness in his divinity, although he
    knew well St. Thomas and other scholastics.

    As to Biblical Criticism, he had no idea of it. His knowledge
    of Greek criticism too was very shallow.

    In short, his linguistic talent was that of seizing sounds and
    accents, and the whole (so to say) idiom of a language, and
    reproducing them by a wonderful, but equally special, memory.

    I do not think he had ever his equal in this respect.

    But the cultivation of this power had absorbed all the rest.

    Let it, however, never be forgotten that he was, according to
    all I have heard from him, a charitable, kind Christian, devout
    but not intolerant, and that his habitual meekness was not a
    cloak, but a real Christian habit and virtue. Honour be to his
    memory.”

There is a part of this criticism which is unquestionably just: but
there are also several of the views from which I am bound to dissent
most strongly, and to which I shall have occasion to revert hereafter.
Meanwhile, that the Cardinal paid more attention to these inquiries than
Mr. Kip and M. Bunsen suppose, will appear from the testimony of the Abbé
Gaume, author of the interesting work, “_Les Trois Rome_.”

    “I had often met the illustrious philologer,” says M. Gaume,
    “at the Propaganda, where he used to come to spend the
    afternoon. Kind, affable, modest, he mixed with the students,
    and spoke by turns Arabic, Turkish, Armenian, Chinese, and
    twenty other languages, with a facility almost prodigious.
    When I entered, I found him studying Bas-Breton, and I have
    no doubt that in a short time he will be able to exhibit it
    to the inhabitants of Vannes themselves. His eminence assured
    me of two points. The first is the fundamental unity of all
    languages. This unity is observable especially in the parts of
    speech, which are the same or nearly so in all languages. The
    second is the trinity of dialects in the primitive language;—a
    trinity corresponding with the three races of mankind. The
    Cardinal has satisfied himself that there are but three races
    sprung from one common stock, as there are but three languages
    or principal dialects of one primitive language;—the Japhetic
    language and race; the Semitic language and race; and the
    Chamitic language and race. Thus the unity of the human kind
    and the trinity of races, which are established by all the
    monuments of history, are found also to be supported by the
    authority of the most extraordinary philologer that has even
    been known.

    The Cardinal’s testimony is the more important inasmuch as
    his linguistic acquirements are not confined to a superficial
    knowledge. Of the many languages which he possesses, there is
    not one in which he is not familiar with the every day words,
    common sayings, adages, and all that difficult nomenclature
    which constitutes the popular part of a language. One day
    he asked one of our friends to what province of France he
    belonged. ‘To Burgundy;’ replied my friend. ‘Oh!’ said
    Mezzofanti, ‘you have two Burgundian dialects; which of them do
    you speak?’ ‘I know,’ replied our friend, ‘the patois of Lower
    Burgundy.’ Whereupon the Cardinal began to talk to him in Lower
    Burgundian, with a fluency which the vine-dressers of Nantes or
    Beaune might envy.”[535]

This curious familiarity with provincial _patois_, described by the
Abbé Gaume, extended to the other provincial dialects of France. M.
Manavit found him not only acquainted with the Tolosan dialect, but
even not unread in its local literature. His library contains books in
the dialects of Lorraine, Bearne, Franche Comté, and Dauphiné. I have
already mentioned his speaking Provençal with Madame de Chaussegros;
and Dr. Grant, bishop of Southwark, told me that he was able, solely by
the accent of the Abbé Carbry, to determine the precise place of his
nativity, Montauban.

Another language regarding which, although it has more than once been
alluded to, few testimonies have as yet been brought forward, is Spanish.
I shall content myself, nevertheless, with the evidence of a single
Spaniard, which, brief as it is, leaves nothing to be desired. “I can
assert of his Eminence,” writes Father Diego Burrueco, a Trinitarian
of Zamora, who knew the Cardinal during many of these years, “that he
spoke our Spanish like a native of Castile. He could converse in the
Andalusian dialect with Andalusians; he was able, also, to distinguish
the Catalonian dialect from that of Valencia, and both from that of the
Island of Majorca.”[536] We have already seen that, at a very early
period of his life, he studied the Mexican, Peruvian, and other languages
of Spanish America. That he spoke both Mexican and Peruvian after he
came to Rome, Cardinal Wiseman has no doubt. He is also stated to have
learned something of the languages of Oceanica from Bishop Pompalier,
of New Zealand. I may add here, though I have failed in finding native
witnesses, that it is the universal belief in Rome that he spoke well
both ancient and modern Chaldee, and ancient Coptic, as also the modern
dialect of Egypt. He had the repute also of being thoroughly familiar
with both branches of the Illyrian family—the Slavonic and the Romanic.
To the testimonies already borne to his skill in Armenian and Turkish,
I must add that of the Mechitarist, Father Raphael Trenz, Superior of
the Armenian College in Paris, who knew him in 1846. “Having conversed
with his Eminence,” writes this father,[537] “in ancient and in modern
Armenian, and also in Turkish, I am able to attest that he spoke and
pronounced them all with the purity and propriety of a native of these
countries.”

Perhaps also, although we have had many notices of his skill in Russian
and Polish from a very early period, it may be satisfactory to subjoin
the reports of one or two travellers who conversed with him in these
languages during his latter years.

To begin with Russian. A traveller of that nation who twice visited him
about this time, cited by Mr. Watts, describes him as “a phenomenon as
yet unparalleled in the literary world, and one that will scarce be
repeated, unless the gift of tongues be given anew, as at the dawn of
Christianity.”

    “Cardinal Mezzofanti,” he writes, “spoke eight languages
    fluently in my presence: he expressed himself in Russian
    very purely and correctly; but, as he is more accustomed to
    the style of books than that of ordinary discourse, it is
    necessary to use the language of books in talking with him for
    the conversation to flow freely. His passion for acquiring
    languages is so great, that even now, in advanced age, he
    continues to study fresh dialects. He learned Chinese not long
    ago; and is constantly visiting the Propaganda for practice in
    conversation with its pupils of all sorts of races. I asked
    him to give me a list of all the languages and dialects in
    which he was able to express himself, and he sent me the name
    of GOD written in his own hand, in fifty-six languages, of
    which thirty were European, not counting their subdivision of
    dialects, seventeen Asiatic, also without reckoning dialects,
    five African, and four American. In his person, the confusion
    that arose at the building of Babel is annihilated, and all
    nations, according to the sublime expression of Scriptures,
    are again of one tongue. Will posterity ever see anything
    similar? Mezzofanti is one of the most wonderful curiosities of
    Rome.”[538]

In the end of the year 1845, Nicholas, the late Emperor of Russia, (who
of course is an authority also on the Polish language,) came to Rome, on
his return from Naples, where he had been visiting his invalid Empress.
The history of his interview with the Pope, Gregory XVI., and of the
apostolic courage and candour with which, in two successive conferences,
that great pontiff laid before him the cruelty, injustice, and impolicy
of his treatment of the Catholic subjects of his empire, is too well
known to need repetition here.[539] It was commonly said at the time,
and has been repeated in more than one publication, that the Pope’s
interpreter in this memorable conference was Cardinal Mezzofanti. This is
a mistake. The only Cardinal present at the interview was the mild and
retiring, but truly noble-minded and apostolic, Cardinal Acton.

A few days, however, after this interview, M. Boutanieff, the Russian
minister at Rome, wrote to request that Cardinal Mezzofanti would wait
upon the Emperor; and a still more direct invitation was conveyed to
him, in the name of the Emperor himself, by his first aide-de-camp. The
Cardinal of course could not hesitate to comply. Their conversation was
held both in Russian and in Polish. The Emperor was filled with wonder,
and confessed that, in either of these languages it would be difficult
to discover any trace of foreign peculiarity in the Cardinal’s accent or
manner.[540] It is somewhat amusing to add, that the Cardinal is said to
have taken some exceptions to the purity, or at least the elegance, of
the Emperor’s Polish conversational style.

As regards the Polish language, however, the year 1845 supplies other and
more direct testimonies than that of the Emperor Nicholas.

In an extract cited by Mr. Watts from the Posthumous Works of the eminent
Polish authoress, Klementyna z Tanskich Hoffmanowa, who visited Rome in
the March of that year, it is stated that “the cardinal spoke Polish
well, though with somewhat strained and far-fetched expressions;” and
that he was master of the great difficulty of Polish pronunciation—that
of the marked _l_—“although he often forgot it.” This lady has preserved
in her Diary a Polish couplet, written for her by the Cardinal with his
own hand, under a little picture of the Madonna.

    Ten ogien ktory żyia w sercu twoiem
    O Matko Boża! zapal w sercu moiem.[541]

Another, and to the Cardinal far more interesting, representative of the
Polish language appeared in Rome during the same year. Mezzofanti had
long felt deeply the wrongs of his oppressed fellow-Catholics in Poland
and Lithuania. A few months before the Emperor’s arrival in Rome, they
had been brought most painfully under his eyes by the visit of a refugee
of that vast empire, and a victim of the atrocious policy which had
become its ruling spirit—the heroic Makrena Mirazylawski, abbess of the
Basilian convent of Minsk, the capital of the province of that name. The
organized measures of coercion by which the Emperor endeavoured to compel
the Catholic population of Lithuania and Poland, and the other Catholic
subjects of the empire, into renunciation of their allegiance to the
Holy See, and conformity with the doctrine and discipline of the Russian
church, comprised all the members of the Catholic church in Russia
without exception, even the nuns of the various communities throughout
their provinces. Among these was a sisterhood of the Basilian order in
the city of Minsk, thirty-five in number. The bishop of the diocese and
the chaplain of the convent, having themselves conformed to the imperial
will, first endeavoured to bend the resolution of these sisters by
blandishment, but in the end sought by open violence to compel them into
submission. But the nobleminded sisters, with their abbess at their head,
firmly refused to yield; and, in the year 1839, the entire community
(with the exception of one who died from grief and terror) were driven
from their convent, and marched in chains to Witepsk, and afterwards
to Polosk, where, with two other communities equally firm in their
attachment to their creed, they were subjected, for nearly six years, to
a series of cruelties and indignities of which it is difficult to think
without horror, and which would revolt all credibility, were they not
attested by authorities far from partial to the monastic institute.[542]
Chained hand and foot; flogged; beaten with the fist and with clubs;
thrown to the earth and trampled under foot; compelled to break stones
and to labour at quarries and earthworks; dragged in sacks after a
boat through a lake in the depth of winter; supplied only with the
most loathsome food and in most insufficient quantity; lodged in cells
creeping with maggots and with vermin; fed for a time exclusively on salt
herrings, without a drop of water; tried, in a word, by every conceivable
device of cruelty;—the perseverance of these heroic women is a living
miracle of martyr-like fidelity. Nine of the number died from the effects
of the excessive and repeated floggings to which, week after week, they
were subjected, three fell dead in the course of their cruel tasks; two
were trampled to death by their drunken guards; three were drowned in
these brutal _noyades_; nine were killed by the falling of a wall, and
five were crushed in an excavation, while engaged in the works already
referred to; eight became blind; two lost their reason; several others
were maimed and crippled in various ways; so that, in the year 1845,
out of the three united communities (which at the first had numbered
fifty-eight) only four, of whom Makrena was the chief, retained the use
of their limbs! These heroines of faith and endurance contrived at last
to effect their escape from Polosk, from which place it had been resolved
to transport them to Siberia; and, through a thousand difficulties and
dangers, Makrena Mirazylawski made her adventurous way to Rome.

The sufferings and the wrongs of this interesting stranger found a ready
sympathy in Cardinal Mezzofanti’s generous heart. He listened to her
narrative with deep indignation, and took the liveliest interest in all
the arrangements for her safe and fitting reception and that of her
companions.

I was naturally anxious to hear what, on the other hand, were the
abbess’s impressions of the cardinal. In reply to the inquiries of my
friend, Rev. Dr. Morris, she “spoke of him in the very highest terms.”
“He was,” she said, “a living saint,” and she described both his charity
and his spirituality as very remarkable. When Father Ryllo (the Jesuit
Rector of the Propaganda before F. Bresciani) left Rome for the African
Mission, Cardinal Mezzofanti became Mother Makrena’s director, and
continued to be so for two years. “He spoke Polish,” she declares,
“like a native of Poland, and wrote it with great correctness.” Having
ascertained that the abbess had had a considerable packet of papers
written by him in Polish, generally on those occasions when he could not
come to her as usual, on various spiritual subjects, I was most anxious
to obtain copies of them; but I was deeply mortified to learn that they
were all unfortunately lost in the Revolution, when she was driven out
of her little convent near Santa Maria Maggiore. This humble community
was afterwards increased by the arrival of other fugitives from different
parts of the Russian Empire; nor did the cardinal cease till the very
last days of his life his anxious care of all their spiritual and
temporal interests.

Another religious institution to which he devoted a good deal of his
time was the House of Catechumens, of which, as has already been stated,
he was Cardinal Protector. When M. Manavit was in Rome the inmates of
this establishment, then in preparation for baptism, were between thirty
and forty, several of whom were Moors or natives of Algeria; and there
are few who will not cordially agree with him[543] in looking upon “the
modest Cardinal, catechism in hand, in the midst of this humble flock, as
a nobler picture, more truly worthy of admiration, than delivering his
most learned dissertation on the Vedas to the most brilliant company that
ever assembled in the halls of the Propaganda.”

In this, and in more than one other charitable institution of Rome, the
Cardinal took especial delight in assisting at the First Communion of the
young inmates; and, from the simple fervour of his manner and the genuine
truthfulness of his piety, he was most happy and effective in the little
half hortatory, half ejaculatory discourses, called _Fervorini_, which in
Rome ordinarily, on occasions of a First Communion, precede the actual
administration of the sacrament.

M. Manavit adds that, even after Mezzofanti became cardinal, his old
character of _Confessario dei Forestieri_ (“Foreigners’ Confessor”) was
by no means a sinecure. To many of the Polish exiles, clergy and laity,
who visited or settled in Rome, he acted as director, especially after
Father Ryllo’s departure to Africa. He was equally accessible to low and
high degree. M. Mouravieff[544] (the Russian traveller already cited)
mentions an instance in which, having heard of a poor servant maid,
a young Russian girl, who desired to be received into the Church, he
paid her repeated visits, instructed her in the catechism, and himself
completed in person every part of her preparation for the sacraments.

       *       *       *       *       *

The death of Pope Gregory XVI., (June 1st, 1846) which, although in a
ripe old age, was at the time entirely unexpected, was a great affliction
to Mezzofanti, whose affectionate relations with him were maintained to
the very last. The Cardinal was, of course, a member of the conclave
in which (June 16th) Pius IX. was elected. The speedy and unanimous
agreement of the Cardinals in this election—one of the few which seemed
to convert the traditional form of “election by inspiration,” into a
reality—was commemorated impromptu by him in the following graceful
epigram:—

    Gregorius cœlo invectus sic protinus orat:
    “Heu cito Pastorem da, bone Christe, gregi!”
    Audit; et immissus pervadit pectora Patrum,
    Spiritus: et Nonus prodiitecce Pius![545]

During the pontificate of Gregory XVI., Cardinal Mezzofanti never held
any office of state; nor did the change of sovereign make any change
in his rank or his occupations. He was, of course, continued by the
new government in all his appointments; and the new Pope, Pius IX.,
regarded him with the same friendship and favour which he had enjoyed
at the hands of his predecessor. In the social and political changes
which ensued, Mezzofanti, from his non-political character, had no part.
No one sympathized more cordially with the beneficent intentions of
his Sovereign; but, completely shut out as he was by his position from
political affairs, he pursued his quiet career, with all its wonted
regularity, through the very hottest excitement of the eventful years of
1847 and 1848.

Many visitors who conversed with him in these, the last years of his
life, have repeated to me the accounts which have already become familiar
from the reports of those who knew him in earlier years. The fulfilment
of his public duties as Cardinal;—the care of the institutions over which
an especial charge had been assigned him;—the confessional, whenever his
services were sought by a foreigner;—above all, his beloved pupils in the
Propaganda—these formed for him the business of life.

    “Almost every evening, when I was in the College of the
    Propaganda,” says F. Bresciani, “he would come to exercise
    himself with these dear pupils, who are collected there from
    all nations of the world, to be educated in sacred and profane
    literature and in the apostolic spirit. Then, as he conversed
    with me in the halls of the Propaganda when the pupils were
    returning from their evening walks, he would go to meet them
    as he saw them coming up the steps, and, as they passed him,
    would say something to them in their own languages; speaking
    to one, Chinese; to another, Armenian; to a third, Greek; to a
    fourth, Bulgarian. This one he would accost in Arabic, that, in
    Ethiopic, Geez, or Abyssinian; now he would speak in Russian,
    then in Albanian, in Persian, in Peguan, in Coptic, in English,
    in Lithuanian, in German, in Danish, in Georgian, in Kurdish,
    in Norwegian, in Swedish. Nor was there ever any risk that he
    should get entangled, or that a word of another language or a
    wrong pronunciation should escape him.”[546]...

    “Every year, from the time of his coming to Rome, even after
    he had been made Cardinal, he used to assist the students in
    composing their several national odes for the Polyglot Academy
    of the Propaganda, which is held during the octave of the
    Epiphany, and in which the astonished foreigners who witness
    it behold a living emblem of the unity of the Catholic Church,
    which alone is able, through the Holy Spirit that vivifieth
    her, to show forth in one fraternity the union of all tongues,
    in praising and blessing the Lord who created us and redeemed
    us by the blood of Jesus Christ. Now the Cardinal, in these
    fifty tongues and upwards, in which the pupils composed, would
    make all the necessary corrections whether of thought, metre,
    or phrase, with all, and perhaps more than all, the facility
    and exactness of others in writing poetry in their native
    tongue. After he had corrected the compositions, he would
    take his beloved pupils, one by one, and instruct them in the
    proper mode of reciting and pronouncing each. And, as some of
    them occasionally had entered college when very little boys,
    and had forgotten some of the tones or cadence of their native
    languages, he would come to their aid by suggesting these,
    testing and correcting them with the utmost gentleness and
    patience.”[547]

It would be out of place here to enter into any detail of the startling
and violent changes by which these tranquil occupations were rudely
interrupted. The Cardinal had watched with deep anxiety the gradually
increasing demands with which each successive generous and confiding
measure of the administration of Pius IX. had been met; but even his
sagacious mind, schooled as it had already been in the vicissitudes of
former revolutions, was not prepared for the succession of terrible
events which crowded themselves into the last few weeks of the “year
of revolution”—the furious demands of the clubs—the expulsion of the
Jesuits—the assassination of De Rossi—the obtrusion of a republican
ministry—the flight of the Pope—the proclamation of the Republic. Amid
all the terrors of the time, he had but one thought—gratitude for the
safety of the Pope. He was urged by his friends to imitate the example
of the main body of the Cardinals, and to follow his Sovereign to Gaeta
or Naples; but he refused to leave Rome, and continued through all the
scenes of violence which followed the flight of Pius IX., to live,
without any attempt at concealment, at his old quarters in the Palazzo
Valentiniani.

Nevertheless, although, personally, Cardinal Mezzofanti suffered no
molestation, the alarm and anxiety inseparable from such a time, could
not fail to tell upon a constitution, at no time robust, and of late
years much enfeebled. From the beginning of the year 1849, his strength
began sensibly to diminish. It was characteristic of the man that even
all the terrors of the period could not make him forget his favourite
festival of the Epiphany; and that, among the numberless more deplorable
changes which surrounded him, he still had a regret for the absence of
the accustomed Polyglot Academy of the Propaganda. Before the middle of
January he became so weak, that it was with the utmost difficulty he was
able to say mass in his private chapel. While he was in this state of
extreme debility, he was seized with an alarming attack of pleurisy; and
although the acute symptoms were so far relieved at the end of January,
that his family entertained sanguine hopes of his recovery, this illness
was followed, in the early part of February, by an attack of gastric
fever, by which the slender remains of his strength were speedily
exhausted.

The venerable sufferer at once became sensible of his condition. From the
very first intimation of his danger, he had commenced his preparation
for death, with all the calm and simple piety which had characterised
his life. In accordance with one of our beautiful Catholic customs—at
once most holy in themselves, and an admirable help even to the sublimest
piety—he at once entered upon a _Novena_, or nine days’ devotion, to St.
Joseph; who, as, according to an old tradition, his own eyes were closed
in death by the blessed hands of his divine Saviour, has been adopted
by Catholic usage as the Patron of the Dying, and who was besides the
name-saint and especial Patron of the Cardinal himself. In these pious
exercises he was accompanied by his chaplain, by his nephews, Gaetano and
Pietro, and above all, by his niece, Anna, who was most tenderly attached
to him, and was inconsolable at the prospect of his death. He himself
fixed the time for receiving the Holy Viaticum and the Extreme Unction.
They were administered by Padre Ligi, parish priest of the Church of SS.
Apostoli, assisted by the Cardinal’s chaplain, and by his confessor,
Padre Proja, now Sacristan of St. Peter’s. The chaplain and the members
of his family frequently assembled at his bed-side, to accompany and
assist him in his dying devotions; and the intervals between these common
prayers, in which all alike took part, were filled up with pious readings
by Anna Minarelli, and with short prayers of the holy Cardinal himself.
“Dio mio! abbiate pietà di me!” “My God, have mercy on me!”—was his ever
recurring ejaculation, mingled occasionally with prayers for the exiled
Pontiff, for the welfare of his widowed Church, and for the peace of his
distracted country. “_Abbiate pietà della Chiesa! Preghiamo per lei!_”

By degrees he became too feeble to maintain his attention through a
long prayer; but even still, with that deeply reverent spirit which had
always distinguished him, he would not suffer the prayer to be abruptly
terminated. “_Terminiamo con un Gloria Patri_,” “Let us finish with a
Gloria Patri:”—he would say, when he found himself unable longer to
attend to the Litany of the Dying, or the Rosary of the Blessed Virgin.
But in a short time he would again summon them to resume their devotion.

Early in March it became evident that his end was fast approaching. He
still retained strength by energy enough to commence a second Novena
to his holy Patron St. Joseph—a pious exercise, which, in the simple
words of his biographer, “he was destined to bring to an end in heaven.”
During the last three days of life, his articulation, at times, was
barely distinguishable; but even when his words were inaudible, his
attendants could not mistake the unvarying fervour of his look, and the
reverent movements of the lips and eyes, which betokened his unceasing
prayer. From the morning of the 15th of March, the decline of strength
became visibly more rapid; and, on the night of that day, he calmly
expired.[548] His last distinguishable words, a happy augury of his
blessed end—were: “_Andiamo, andiamo, presto in Paradiso._” “_I am
going—I am going—soon to Paradise!_”

The absence of the Roman Court, as well as the other unhappy
circumstances of the times, precluded the possibility of performing his
obsequies with the accustomed ceremonial. An offer of the honours of
a public funeral, with deputations from the university, and an escort
of the National Guard, was made by M. Gherardi, the Minister of Public
Instruction in the new-born Republic. But these, and all other honours
of the anti-Papal Republic, were declined by his family;—not only from
the unseemliness of such a ceremonial at such a time, but still more as
inconsistent with the loyalty, and the personal feelings, principles, and
character, of the illustrious deceased.

Without a trace, therefore, of the wonted solemnities of a cardinalitial
funeral—the _cappella ardente_; the lofty catafalque; the solemn lying in
state; the grand _Missa de Requiem_;—the remains of the great linguist
were, on the evening of the 17th of March, conducted unostentatiously,
with no escort but that of his own family and of the members of his
modest household, bearing torches in their hands, to their last
resting-place in Sant’ Onofrio, on the Janiculum—the church of his
Cardinalitial title.

There, within the same walls which, as we saw, enclose the ashes of
Torquato Tasso, the tomb of Cardinal Mezzofanti may be recognised by
the following unpretending inscription, from the pen of his friend Mgr.
Laureani:—

                      HEIC. IN. SEDE. HONORIS. SUI.
                               SITUS. EST.
                   JOSEPHUS. MEZZOFANTI. S. R. E. CARD.
               INNOCENTIA. MORUM. ET. PIETATE. MEMORANDUS.
                      ITEMQUE. OMNIUM. DOCTRINARUM.
                   AC. VETERUM. NOVORUMQUE. IDIOMATUM.
                                SCIENTIA.
               PLANE. SINGULARIS. ET. FAMA. CULTIORI. ORBI.
                               NOTISSIMUS.
                    BONONIAE. NATUS. ANNO. MDCCLXXIV.
                    ROMAE. DECESSIT. AN. MDCCCXLVIIII.




CHAPTER XVII.

(RECAPITULATION.)


We have now before us, in the narrative of Cardinal Mezzofanti’s life,
such materials for an estimate of his attainments as a linguist and a
scholar, as a most diligent and impartial inquiry has enabled me to bring
together. I can truly say that in no single instance have I suffered
my own personal admiration of his extraordinary gifts to shape or to
influence that inquiry. I have not looked to secure a verdict by culling
the evidence. A great name is but tarnished by unmerited praise—_non
eget mendacio nostro_. I have felt that I should consult best for the
fame of Mezzofanti, by exhibiting it in its simple truth; and I have
sought information regarding him, fearlessly and honestly, in every
field in which I saw a prospect of obtaining it,—from persons of every
class, country, and creed—from friendly, from indifferent, and even from
hostile quarters;—from all, in a word, without exception, whom I knew
or thought likely to possess the means of contributing to the solution
of the interesting problem in the annals of the human mind, which is
involved in his history. It only remains to sum up the results. Nor is
it easy to approach this duty with a perfectly unbiassed mind. If, on the
one hand, there is a temptation to heighten the marvels of the history,
viewed through what Carlyle calls “the magnifying _camera oscura_ of
tradition,” on the other, there is the opposite danger of unduly yielding
to incredulity, and discarding its genuine facts on the sole ground
of their marvellousness. I shall endeavour to hold a middle course. I
shall not accept any of the wonders related of Mezzofanti, unless they
seem attested by undisputable authority: but neither shall I, in a case
so clearly abnormal as his, and one in which all ordinary laws are so
completely at fault, reject well-attested facts, because they may seem
irreconcilable with every-day experience. Our judgments of unwonted
mental phenomena can hardly be too diffident, or too circumspect. The
marvels of the faculty of memory which we all have read of; the prodigies
of analysis which many of us have witnessed in the mental arithmeticians
who occasionally present themselves for exhibition; the very vagaries
of the senses themselves, which occasionally follow certain abnormal
conditions of the organs—are almost as wide a departure from what we are
accustomed to in these departments, as is the greatest marvel related of
Mezzofanti in the faculty of language. Perhaps there could not be a more
significant rebuke of this universal scepticism, than the fact that the
very event which Juvenal, in his celebrated sneer at the tale of

    Velificatus Athos, et quidquid Græcia mendax
    Audet in historiâ—

has selected as the type of self-convicted mendacity—the passage of
Xerxes’s fleet through Mount Athos—now proves to be not only possible,
but absolutely true; and it is wisely observed by Mr. Grote, that, while
no amount of mere intrinsic probability is sufficient to establish the
truth of an unattested statement, on the other hand, “statements in
themselves highly improbable may well deserve belief, provided they be
supported by sufficient positive evidence.” (_Hist. of Greece_, I. 571.)

       *       *       *       *       *

There are two heads of inquiry which appear to me specially deserving of
attention.

First, the number of languages with which Cardinal Mezzofanti was
acquainted, and the degree of his proficiency in each.

Secondly, his method of studying languages, and the peculiar mental
development to which his extraordinary success as a linguist is
attributable.

I.—I wish I could begin, in accordance with a suggestion of my friend
M. d’Abbadie, by defining exactly what is meant by _knowledge_ of a
language. But unfortunately, the shades of such knowledge are almost
infinite. The vocabularies of our modern languages contain as many
as forty or fifty thousand words; and Claude Chappe, the inventor of
the telegraph, calculates, that for the complete expression of human
thought and sentiment in all its forms, at least ten thousand words
are necessary. On the other hand, M. d’Abbadie, in his explorations in
Abyssinia, was able to make his way without an interpreter, though his
vocabulary did not comprise quite six hundred words; and M. Julien,
in his controversy with Pauthier, asserts that about four thousand
words will amply suffice even for the study of the great classics of a
language, as Homer, Byron, or Racine.

Which of these standards are we to adopt?

And even if we fix upon any one of them, how shall we apply it to
the Cardinal, whereas we can only judge of him by the reports of his
visitors, who applied to him, each a standard of his own?

It is plain that any such strict philosophical notion, however desirable,
would be inapplicable in practice. It appears to me, however, that the
objects of this inquiry will be sufficiently attained by adopting a
popular notion, founded upon the common estimation of mankind. I think a
man may be truly said to know a language thoroughly, if he can read it
fluently and with ease; if he can write it correctly in prose, or still
more, in verse; and above all, if he be admitted by intelligent and
educated natives to speak it correctly and idiomatically.

I shall be content to apply this standard to Cardinal Mezzofanti.

       *       *       *       *       *

Looking back over the narrative of Cardinal Mezzofanti’s life, we can
trace a tolerably regular progress in the number of languages ascribed to
him through its several stages. In 1805, according to Father Caronni, “he
was commonly reported to be master of more than twenty-four languages.”
Giordani’s account of him in 1812, seems, although it does not specify
any number, to indicate a greater total than this. Stewart Rose, in
1817, speaks of him as “reading twenty languages, and conversing in
eighteen.” Baron von Zach, in 1820, brings the number of the languages
spoken by him up to thirty-two. Lady Morgan states, that by the public
report of Bologna he was reputed to be master of forty. He himself, in
1836, stated to M. Mazzinghi that he knew forty-five; and before 1839, he
used to say that he knew “fifty, and Bolognese.” In reply to the request
of M. Mouravieff, a little later, that he would give him a list of the
languages that he knew, he sent him a sheet containing the name of God in
fifty-six languages. In the year 1846 he told Father Bresciani that he
knew seventy-eight languages and dialects;[549] and a list communicated
to me by his nephew, Dr. Gaetano Minarelli, by whom it has been compiled
after a diligent examination of his deceased uncle’s books and papers,
reaches the astounding total of one hundred and fourteen!

It is clear, however, that these, and the similar statements which have
been current, require considerable examination and explanation. It is
much to be regretted that the Cardinal did not, with his own hand,
draw up, as he had often been requested, and as he certainly intended,
a complete catalogue of the languages known by him, distinguishing,
as in the similar statement left by Sir William Jones, the degrees of
his knowledge of the several languages which it comprised. In none of
the statements on the subject which are in existence, is any attempt
made to discriminate the languages with which he was familiar from
those imperfectly known by him. On the contrary, from the tone of some
of his panegyrists, it would seem that they wish to represent him as
equally at home in all;—a notion which he himself, in his conversations
with Lady Morgan, with Dr. Tholuck, with M. Mazzinghi, and on many
subsequent occasions, distinctly repudiated and ridiculed. In his
statement to Father Bresciani, in 1846, the Cardinal did not enumerate
the seventy-eight languages and dialects which he knew or had studied;
but in the year before his death, 1848, he told Father Bresciani that he
was then engaged in drawing up a comparative scheme of languages, their
common descent, their affinities, and their ramifications; together with
a simple and easy plan for acquiring a number of languages, however
dissimilar.[550] At my request, Father Bresciani kindly applied to Dr.
Minarelli, the nephew and representative of the deceased, for a copy
of this interesting paper; but unfortunately no trace of it is now
discoverable, and Dr. Minarelli supposes that, as was usual with him when
dissatisfied with any of his compositions, the Cardinal burnt it before
his death.

During the course of this search, however, Dr. Minarelli himself was led
to draw up, partly from his own knowledge of his uncle’s attainments,
partly from the inspection of his books and papers, a detailed list
of the languages with which he believes the Cardinal to have been
acquainted. This list he has kindly communicated to me. From its very
nature, of course, it is to a great extent conjectural; it makes no
pretension to a scientific classification of the languages; and it
contains several evident oversights and errors; but as the writer, in
addition to his long personal intercourse with his uncle, enjoyed the
opportunity of access to his papers and memoranda, and above all to his
books in various languages, his grammars, dictionaries, and vocabularies,
and the marginal notes and observations—the schemes, paradigms,
critical analyses, and other evidences of knowledge, or at least of
study—which they contain; and as he has been mainly guided by these in
the compilation of his list of languages, I shall translate the paper in
its integrity, merely correcting certain obvious errors, and striking
out a few of the items in the enumeration, in which, clearly by mistake,
the same language is twice repeated. The order of languages is in part
alphabetical.

      1. Albanese or Epirote.
      2. Arabic.
      3. Armenian.
      4. Angolese.
      5. Aymara.
      6. Algonquin.
      7. Brazilian.
      8. Mexican.
      9. Paraguay.
     10. Peruvian.
     11. Birman.
     12. Bohemian.
     13. Bunda, (in Angola.)
     14. Betoi.
     15. _Baure_,[551] (?)
     16. _Braubica_,[552] (?)
     17. Chaldee.
     18. Chinese.
     19. Cochin-Chinese.
     20. Tonkinese.
     21. Japanese.
     22. Curaçao.
     23. Coptic.
     24. Chilian.
     25. Koordish.
     26. Californian.
     27. Cora.
     28. _Conserica_,[553] (?)
     29 _Cahuapana_.[554] (?)
     30 Canisiana.
     31 Cayubaba.
     32 Cochimi.
     33 Danish.
     34 Swedish.
     35 Norwegian.
     36 Icelandic.
     37 Lappish.
     38 Tamul.
     39 Hebrew.
     40 Rabbinical Hebrew.
     41 Samaritan.
     42 Coptic Egyptian.
     43 Coptic Arabic.[555]
     44 Etruscan[556] (so far as known to the learned.)
     45 Ethiopic.
     46 _Emabellada_.[557] (?)
     47 Phenician, (so far as it is known.)
     48 Flemish.
     49 French.
     50 Breton French.
     51 Lorraine Dialect.
     52 Provençal.
     53 Gothic and Visi Gothic.
     54 Ancient Greek.
     55 Romaic.
     56 Georgian or Iberian.
     57 Grisons, or Rhetian.
     58 Guarany.
     59 Guariza.
     60 Illyrian.
     61 Iberian.[558]
     62 _Idioma Mistico._[559]
     63 Itomani.
     64 Cingalese.
     65 Hindostani.
     66 Malabar.
     67 Malay.
     68 Sanscrit.
     69 Sanscrit Dialect of Eastern Persia.
     70 English.
     71 Ancient Breton.[560]
     72 Scottish Celtic.[561]
     73 Scotch.
     74 Irish.
     75 Welsh.
     76 Italian.
     77 Friulese.
     78 Maltese.
     79 Sardinian.
     80 Lombard, Ligurian, Piedmontese, Sicilian & Tuscan dialect of
          Italian.
     81 Latin.
     82 Maronite and Syro-Maronite. (?)
     83 Madagascar.
     84 Mobima.
     85 Moorish.
     86 Maya.
     87 Dutch.
     88 Othomi.
     89 Omagua.
     90 Australian.[562]
     91 Persian.
     92 Polish.
     93 Portuguese.
     94 Peguan.
     95 Pimpanga.[563]
     96 Quichua.[564]
     97 Russian.
     98 _Rocorana_ (?)[565]
     99 Slavonic.
    100 Slavo-Carniolan.
    101 Slavo-Servian.
    102 Slavo-Ruthenian.
    103 Slavo-Wallachian.
    104 Syriac.
    105 Samogitian, or Lettish.
    106 Spanish.
    107 Catalonian.
    108 Basque.
    109 Tanna.[566]
    110 German.
    111 Tibetan.
    112 Turkish.
    113 Hungarian.
    114 Gipsy.

Such is the Cavaliere Minarelli’s report of the result at which he
has arrived, after an examination of the books and manuscripts of
his illustrious uncle. In its form, I regret to say, it is far from
satisfactory. It places on exactly the same level languages generically
distinct and mere provincial varieties of dialect. In one or two
instances, also, (as Angolese and Bunda, Swedish and Norwegian,) the same
language appears twice under different names. Above all, the compiler has
not attempted to classify the languages according _to the degree of the
Cardinal’s acquaintance with each of them_; nor has he entered into any
explanation of the nature of the evidence of acquaintance with each of
them which is supplied by the documents upon which he relies.[567]

As I cannot, consistently with the fundamental principle of this inquiry,
accept such a statement, when unsupported by the testimony of native (or
otherwise competent) witnesses for the several languages, as conclusive
evidence of the Cardinal’s knowledge of the languages which it ascribes
to him, I shall merely offer this otherwise interesting paper at whatever
may be considered its just value; and I shall endeavour to decide the
question upon grounds entirely independent of it, and drawn solely from
the materials which I have already placed before the reader.

It will, no doubt, have been observed that, so far as regards the reports
of the travellers and others who conversed with the Cardinal, the degrees
of his power of speaking the several languages have been very differently
tested. In some languages he was, as it were, perpetually under trial:
in others, very frequently, and in prolonged conversations; in others,
less frequently, but nevertheless searchingly enough; in others, in
fine, perhaps only to the extent of a few questions and answers. It is
absolutely necessary, in forming any judgment, to attend carefully to
this circumstance. I shall endeavour, therefore, to divide the languages
ascribed to him into four different classes.

First, languages certainly spoken by Cardinal Mezzofanti with a
perfection rare in foreigners.

Secondly, languages which is he said to have spoken well, but as to which
the evidence of sufficient trial is not so complete.

Thirdly, languages which he spoke freely, but less perfectly.

Fourthly, languages in which he could merely express himself and initiate
a conversation. I shall add:—

Fifthly, certain other languages which he had studied from books, but
does not appear to have spoken.

And lastly, dialects of the principal languages. This order, of course,
precludes all idea of a scientific classification[568] of the languages
according to families.

I.—_Languages frequently tested, and spoken with rare excellence._[569]

     1 Hebrew, (Supra, p. 283, 341, 345, 371.)
     2 Rabbinical Hebrew, (283, 341.)
     3 Arabic, (283, 371, 441.)
     4 Chaldee, (278, 384, 362, 451.)
     5 Coptic, (311, 441, 451.)
     6 Ancient Armenian, (352, 441.)
     7 Modern Armenian, (352, 441.)
     8 Persian, (278, 352, 394.)
     9 Turkish, (226, 311, 393, 441.)
    10 Albanese, (362, 393, 451.)
    11 Maltese, (336, 362.)
    12 Greek, (353.)
    13 Romaic, (353.)
    14 Latin, (201, 347.)
    15 Italian, (_passim._)
    16 Spanish, (276, 312, 441.)
    17 Portuguese, (337, 367.)
    18 French, (271, 276, 387.)
    19 German, (239, 250, 271, 277, 281, 325, 345, 346, 393.)
    20 Swedish, (271, 272, 350, 351.)
    21 Danish, (239, 281.)
    22 Dutch, (328, 330, 332.)
    23 Flemish, (324, 328.)
    24 English, (223, 226, 228, 348, 403.)
    25 Illyrian, (393, 441.)
    26 Russian, (244, 442, 443.)
    27 Polish, (328, 444, 447.)
    28 Czechish, or Bohemian, (246, 233.)
    29 Magyar, (242, 389, 391.)
    30 Chinese, (309, 310, 365, 368, 369, 451.)

II.—_Stated to have been spoken fluently, but hardly sufficiently tested._

     1 Syriac, (354, 364.)
     2 Geez, (383, 385, 394.)
     3 Amarinna, (384, 385, 334.)
     4 Hindostani, (364, 366.)
     5 Guzarattee, (367.)
     6 Basque, (393, 388.)
     7 Wallachian, (216, 244.)
     8 Californian, (355-7.)
     9 Algonquin, (360-1.).

III. _Spoken rarely, and less perfectly._

     1 Koordish, (394, 451.)
     2 Georgian, (251, 394.)
     3 Servian (the dialects of Bosnia and of the Bannat,) (394.)
     4 Bulgarian, (365, 393, 441.)
     5 Gipsy language, (244.)
     6 Peguan, (364, 418, 451.)
     7 Welsh, (320, 322, 323.)
     8 Angolese, (370, 394.)
     9 Mexican, (441.)
    10 Chilian, (441.)
    11 Peruvian, (441.)

IV. _Spoken imperfectly;—a few sentences and conversational forms._

     1 Cingalese, (363.)
     2 Birmese, (270, 463.[570])
     3 Japanese, (463.)
     4 Irish, (442.)
     5 Gælic, (424.)
     6 Chippewa Indian, (360.)
     7 Delaware, (360.)
     8 Some of the languages of Oceanica, (441.)

V. _Studied from books, but not known to have been spoken._

     1 Sanscrit, (291, 394.)
     2 Malay, (464.)
     3 Tonquinese, (463.)
     4 Cochin-Chinese, (463.)
     5 Tibetan, (465.)
     6 Japanese, (463.)
     7 Icelandic, (464.)
     8 Lappish, (394.)
     9 Ruthenian, (311.)
    10 Frisian, (282.)
    11 Lettish, (394, 451.)
    12 Cornish, (old British of Cornwall,) (280.)
    13 Quichua, (ancient Peruvian,) (281.)
    14 Bimbarra, (Central African,) (281.)

VI.—_Dialects spoken, or their peculiarities understood._

1.—HEBREW.

    Samaritan, (416.)

2.—ARABIC.

    Syrian dialect (fluently, 371.)
    Egyptian do., (311.)
    Moorish, (171.)
    Berber, (463.)

3.—CHINESE.

    Kiang-Si dialect, (416.)
    Hu-quam do., (416.)

4.—ITALIAN.

    Sicilian, (324, 354.)
    Sardinian, (158-9.)
    Neapolitan, (324.)
    Bolognese, (247, 344.)
    Lombard, (464.)
    Friulese, (464.)

5.—SPANISH

    Catalan, (441.)
    Valencian, (441.)
    Majorican, (441.)

6.—BASQUE.

    Labourdain, (387-8.)
    Souletin, (387.)
    Guipuscoan, (388.)

7.—MAGYAR.

    Debreczeny, (391.)
    Eperies, (391.)
    Pesth, (391.)
    Transylvanian, (491.)

8.—GERMAN.

    Ancient Gothic, (464.)
    Rhetian (Grisons,) (Appendix.)
    _Sette Communi_ dialect, (218.)
    Dialects of Northern and Southern Germany, (243.)

9.—FRENCH.

    Provençal, (275.)
    Tolosan, (440.)
    Burgundian, (444.)
    Gascon, (463.)
    Bearnais, (440.)
    Lorraine, (463.)
    Bas Breton, (439.)

10.—ENGLISH.

    Somersetshire, Yorkshire, and Lancashire dialects, (404.)
    Lowland Scotch, (437.)

I should add that many of these dialects, as the Moorish and Berber
Arabic, the Spanish of Majorca, the Provençal French, the Italian of
Sicily and Sardinia, and the language of the Grisons or Graubünden, might
most justly be described as separate languages, at least as regards the
difficulty of acquisition. In the catalogue of the Cavaliere Minarelli a
series of languages (the very names of which the reader probably never
has heard,) are enumerated, chiefly of the central and South American
families—of the former, the Cora, the Tepehuana, the Mistek, the Othomi,
the Maya; of the latter, the Paraguay, the Omagua, the Aymara, the
Canisiana, and the Mobima. I am not aware of the authority on which the
Cavaliere relies in reference to these languages. For the majority of
them, I must say that I cannot find in the catalogue of the Cardinal’s
library any distinct trace whatever of his having studied them; but it
is certain that he had given his attention early to the languages of
these countries; that he had opportunities in Bologna of conversing with
ex-Jesuit missionaries from the central and South American provinces; and
that the library of the Propaganda, of which he had the unrestricted use,
contains many printed and manuscript elementary works in languages of
which little trace is elsewhere to be found.

Summing up, therefore, all the authentic accounts of him as yet made
public; discarding the loose statements of superficial marvel-mongers,
and divesting the genuine reports, as far as possible, of the vagueness
by which many of them have been characterized, it appears that, in
addition to a large number of (more than thirty) minor dialects,
Mezzofanti was acquainted in various degrees with seventy-two languages,
popularly, if not scientifically, regarded as distinct:—almost the exact
number which F. Bresciani ascribes to him; that of these he spoke with
freedom, and with a purity of accent, of vocabulary, and of idiom, rarely
attained by foreigners, no fewer than thirty; that he was intimately
acquainted with all the leading dialects of these; that he spoke less
perfectly, (or rather is not shown to have possessed the same mastery
of) nine others, in all of which, however, his pronunciation, at least,
is described as quite perfect; that he could, (and occasionally did,)
converse in eleven other languages, but with what degree of accuracy it
is difficult to say; that he could at least initiate a conversation,
and exchange certain conversational forms in eight others; and that he
had studied the structure and the elementary vocabularies of fourteen
others. As regards the languages included in the latter categories, it
is quite possible that he may also have spoken in a certain way some at
least among them. So far as I have learned, there is no evidence that he
actually did speak any of them: but with him there was little perceptible
interval between knowledge of the elementary structure and vocabulary of
a language, and the power of conversing in it.

Such is the astounding result to which the united evidence of this
vast body of witnesses, testifying without consent, and indeed for
the most part utterly unknown to each other, appears irresistibly to
lead. I am far, I confess, from accepting in their strict letter many
of the rhetorical expressions of these writers—the natural result of
warm admiration, however just and well founded. I do not believe, for
example, that in each and all the thirty languages enumerated in the
first category, the Cardinal actually spoke, as some of the witnesses
say, “with all the purity and propriety of a native;” that he could not
in any one of them “be recognized as a foreigner;” or that, in them
all, he “spoke without the slightest trace of peculiar accent.” On the
contrary, I know that, in several of these, he made occasional trips.
I do not overlook the “four minor mistakes” in his German conversation
with Dr. Tholuck; nor his occasionally “forgetting the marked _l_ in his
Polish,” nor the criticism of his manner in several other languages,
as “formed rather from books than from conversation.” Neither do I
believe that he had mastered the _entire_ vocabulary of each of these
languages. Nor shall I even venture to say to what point his knowledge
of the several vocabularies extended. So far from shutting out from my
judgment the drawbacks on the undiscriminating praise heaped upon the
Cardinal by some of his biographers, which these criticisms imply, I
regard them as (by recalling it from the realm of legend,) forming the
best and most secure foundation of a reputation which, allowing for every
drawback, far transcends all that the world has ever hitherto known.
I do not say that in all these languages, or perhaps in any of them,
Cardinal Mezzofanti was the perfect paragon which some have described
him; but, reverting to the standard with which I set out, I cannot
hesitate to infer from these united testimonies, that his knowledge of
each and every one of the leading languages of the world, ancient and
modern, fully equalled, and in several of these languages excelled, the
knowledge of those who are commonly reputed as accomplished linguists in
the several languages, even when they have devoted their attention to
the study of one or other of these languages exclusively. I do not say
that he was _literally faultless_ in speaking these languages; nor that
what I have said is literally true of _each and every one_ of the thirty
that have been enumerated: but, if the attestations recorded in this
volume have any meaning, they lead to the inevitable conclusion, that in
the power of speaking the languages in which he was best tried,—whether
Hebrew, or Arabic, or Armenian, or Persian, or Turkish, or Albanese,
or Maltese, or Greek, or Romaic, or Latin, or Italian, or Spanish, or
Portuguese, or French, or Swedish, or Danish, or Dutch, or Flemish, or
English, or Russian, or Bohemian, or Magyar, or Chinese;—his success is
entirely beyond suspicion, and will bear comparison with that of the most
accomplished non-native masters of these languages, even those who have
confined themselves to one or two of the number. For the few languages
upon which I myself may presume to speak, I most unhesitatingly adopt
this conclusion, comparing my recollections of the Cardinal with those
I retain of almost any other foreigner whom I have ever heard speak the
same languages.

The reader’s recollection of the attainments of the most remarkable
linguists enumerated in the memoir prefixed to this biography will enable
him, therefore, to see how immeasurably Cardinal Mezzofanti transcends
them all. Taking the very highest estimate which has been offered of
their attainments, the list of those reputed to have possessed more
than ten languages is a very short one. Only four—Mithridates, Pico
of Mirandola, Jonadab Alhanar, and Sir William Jones—are said, in the
loosest sense, to have passed the limit of twenty. To the first two fame
ascribes twenty-two, to the last two twenty-eight languages. Müller,
Niebuhr, Fulgence Fresnel, and perhaps Sir John Bowring, are usually set
down as knowing twenty languages. For Elihu Burritt, Csoma de Körös,
their admirers claim eighteen. Renaudot, the controversialist, is said
to have known seventeen, Professor Lee sixteen, and the attainments of
the older linguists, as Arias Montamus, Martin del Rio, the converted
Rabbi Libertas Cominetus, the Admirable Crichton—are said to have ranged
from this down to ten or twelve—most of them the ordinary languages of
learned and of polite society. It is further to be observed that in no
one of those cases has the evidence been examined, the trustworthiness
of the witnesses considered, or the degrees of knowledge of the various
languages ascertained. Whatever of doubt rests even upon the vaguest
statements regarding Mezzofanti, applies with double force in every one
of the above instances.

But even putting these considerations aside, and accepting the estimates
upon the showing of the parties themselves or their admirers, how far
does the very highest of them fall short of what has been demonstrated of
Cardinal Mezzofanti!

       *       *       *       *       *

II. On the curious question as to the system pursued by the Cardinal
in the study of languages, I regret to say that little light seems now
obtainable. The variety of systems employed by students is endless.
The eccentric linguist, Roberts Jones, described in the Introductory
Memoir, as soon as he had an opportunity of comparing the vocabulary of
a new language with those which he had already studied, proceeded by
_striking out of it_ all those words which were common to it with any of
the languages already familiar to him, and then impressing on his memory
_the words which remained_. M. Antoine d’Abbadie told me that, in the
unwritten languages with which he had to deal, his plan was to write
out, with the aid of an interpreter, a list of about five hundred of the
leading and most indispensable words, and a few conversational forms; and
then to complete his stock of words “by the assistance of _an intelligent
child who knew no language but the one which he was studying_;—because
children best understand, and most readily apprehend, an imperfectly
conveyed meaning.” Some students commence with the vocabulary; others,
with the structural forms of a language. With some the process is tedious
and full of labour: others proceed with almost the rapidity of intuition.
In comparing the various possible systems, it has not unnaturally
been supposed that the process which, in Cardinal Mezzofanti, led to
results so rapid and so extraordinary, might be usefully applied, at
least in some modified form, to the practical study of languages, even
on that modest scale in which they enter into ordinary education. But
unfortunately, even if such a fruit could be hoped from his experience,
it does not appear that the Cardinal possessed any extraordinary secret,
or at least that he ever clearly explained to any of his visitors the
secret process, if any, which he employed. One thing at least is certain,
and should not be forgotten by those who are always on the look out for
short roads to learning, that, whatever may have been his system, and
however it may have quickened or facilitated the result for him, it did
not enable him to dispense with the sedulous and systematic use of all
the ordinary appliances of study, and especially of every available means
for the acquisition of vocabularies, and of practice in their exercise.

It is true he told M. Libri that he found the learning of languages
“less difficult than is generally thought: that there is but a limited
number of points to which it is necessary to direct attention; and that,
when one is master of these points, the remainder follows with great
facility;” adding that, “when one has learned ten or a dozen languages
essentially different from each other, one may, with a little study and
attention, learn any number of them.” But he also stated to Dr. Tholuck
“that his own way of learning new languages was no other than that of
our school-boys, by writing out paradigms and words, and committing
them to memory.” (P. 278.) Dictionaries, reading-books, catechisms,
vocabularies, were anxiously sought by him, and industriously used. The
society and conversation of strangers was eagerly—in one less modest
and simple it might almost appear obtrusively—courted, and turned to
advantage. A constant and systematic habit of translation and composition
both in prose and verse was maintained. In a word, nothing can be
clearer than that with Mezzofanti, as with the humblest cultivators of
the same study, the process of acquiring each new language was, if not
slow, at least laborious; and that, with all his extraordinary gifts,
the eminence to which he attained, is in great part to be attributed to
his own almost unexampled energy, and to the perseverance with which he
continued to cultivate these gifts to the very latest day of his life.
He understood thoroughly, as all who have ever attained to eminence
have understood, the true secret of study—economical and systematic
employment of time. The great jurist D’Aguesseau composed one of his
most valuable works in the scraps of time which he was able to save
from his wife’s unpunctuality in the hour of dinner. Mezzofanti made it
a rule, even amid his most frequent and most distracting occupations,
to turn to account every chance moment in which he was released from
actual pressure. No matter how brief or how precarious the interval, his
books and papers were generally at hand. And even when no such appliance
of study were within reach his active and self-concentrated mind was
constantly engaged. He possessed a rare power of self-abstraction, by
which he was able to concentrate all his faculties upon any language
which he desired to pursue, to the exclusion of all the others that he
knew. In this respect he was entirely independent of books. When the
great mathematician, Euler, became blind, he was able to form the most
complicated diagrams, and to resolve the most intricate calculations, in
his mind. Every one has heard, too, of cases like that of the prisoner
described by Pope:—

    Who, locked from ink and paper, scrawls
    With desperate charcoal on his darkened walls.

But Mezzofanti’s power of mental study was even more wonderful. He
had the habit of _thinking when alone, in each and all of his various
languages_ in succession; so that, without the presence of a second
individual, he almost enjoyed the advantage of practice in conversation!
The only parallel for this extraordinary mental phenomenon that I know,
is a story which I have somewhere read, of a musician who attained to
great perfection as an instrumental performer, although hardly ever known
to touch an instrument for the purpose of practice. This man, it is said,
was _constantly practising in his mind_; and his fingers were actually
observed to be always in motion, as though engaged in the act of playing.

On the other hand, it is certain that Mezzofanti’s power of acquiring
languages was mainly a gift of nature. It is not easy to say in what this
natural gift consisted. Among the faculties of the mind chiefly employed
in acquiring language—perception, analysis, judgment, and memory—by some
it has been placed in his intuitive quickness of perception—by others
in his memory—and by others, in his power of analysing the leading
inflexional and structural characteristics by which each language is
distinguished. Others place it in some mysterious delicacy of his
ear, which detected in each language a sort of rhythm or systematic
structure, and thus supplied a key to all its forms. But no one of these
characteristics, taken singly, even in its very highest development, will
account for a success so entirely unexampled. Almost all great linguists,
it is true, have been remarkable for their powers of memory; but there
are many examples of such memory, unaccompanied by any very peculiar
excellence in the gift of languages. Still less can it be ascribed
exclusively to any quickness of perception, or any perfection of analytic
or synthetic power. Perhaps there is no form in which these powers are so
wondrously displayed, as in the curious phenomena of mental arithmetic.
And yet I am not aware that any of the extraordinary mental calculators
has been distinguished as a linguist. On the contrary, many of them have
been singularly deficient in this respect. Mr. George Bidder, one of the
latest, and in many respects most creditable, examples of this faculty,
confesses his entire deficiency in talent for literature or language; and
Zachariah Dase, whose performances as a calculator almost exceeded all
belief, could never master a word of any foreign language except a little
German.

But in Cardinal Mezzofanti we meet not only each of these qualities, but
a most perfect and perfectly balanced union of them all. His memory in
itself would have made him an object of wonder. Quick and tenacious to a
degree certainly not inferior to any recorded example of the faculty, it
was one of the most universal in its application of which any record is
preserved; embracing every variety of subject—not alone the vocabularies
and forms which he acquired, but every kind of matter to which it was
directed; history, poetry, and even persons and personal occurrences. But
there was, above all, one characteristic in which it was distinguished
from almost all other memories. Some of those qualities already named
were possessed by other individuals in an equal, if not a greater or more
striking, degree. Henderson, the player, was said to be able to repeat
the greater part of the most miscellaneous contents of a newspaper after
a single reading; and the mental arithmetician just named, Zachariah
Dase, after _dipping_ his eye over a row of twelve figures, could repeat
them backwards and forwards, and in every other order, and could multiply
them instantaneously by one or two figures at pleasure. Some memories
too possessed this faculty entirely independent of the judgment or the
reasoning powers. Père Menestrier was able to repeat a long jumble of
unmeaning names after hearing them but once, and the young Corsican
mentioned by Padre Menocchio could do the same, even after the lapse of
an entire year! But the perfection of Mezzofanti’s memory was different
from all these, and consisted in its _extraordinary readiness_. Sir W.
Hamilton, in one of his notes on Reid, happily reviving an old view of
Aristotle, distinguishes between _memory_ (μνημή) and _reminiscence_,
(ἀνάμνησις)—between spontaneous and elaborated memory—memory of
intuition, and memory of evolution. In Mezzofanti the latter hardly
appears to have had a place. His memory seems to have acted by intuition
alone. It was not only a rare capacity for storing up and retaining the
impressions once made upon it, no matter how rapid and how various, but a
power of holding them _distinct from each other_, and ready for instant
use. And thus, over the vast and various assortment of vocabularies
which he possessed, he enjoyed a control so complete, that he would
draw upon each and all at pleasure, as the medium for the expression of
his thoughts;—just as the experimentalist, by the shifting of a slide,
can change, instantaneously and at will, the colour of the light with
which he illuminates the object of exhibition. Dugald Stewart tells the
case of a young woman who could repeat an entire sermon after a single
hearing, and whose sole trick of memory consisted in connecting in her
mind each part of the discourse with a part of the ceiling. It would
almost seem as if the memory of Mezzofanti had some such local division
into compartments, in which the several vocabularies _could_, as it were,
_be stored apart_, and through which his mind could range at pleasure,
culling from each the objects or words which it desired, no matter how
various or how unconnected with each other.

With such a memory as this to guide its action, and to supply the
material for its operation, the extraordinary and almost intuitive power
of analysis—something in its own order like what Wollaston called in
William Phillips, the “mathematical sense”—which Mezzofanti possessed,
and which enabled him at once to seize upon the whole system of a
language—form, structure, idiom, genius, spirit—led by a process which it
is easy to understand, to the wonderful results which this great linguist
accomplished. Memory supplied the material with unfailing abundance and
regularity. The analytic faculties were the tools which the mind employed
in operating upon the material thus supplied for the use.

Such appears to have been the mental process. But for the practical power
of speaking the languages thus mastered in theory, Mezzofanti was also
indebted to his singularly quick and delicate organization of ear and
tongue. It might seem that the former of these organs could only enter
as a very subordinate element, and in a purely mechanical way, into
the faculty of speech. Indeed the French journals of the past month,
(February, 1858,) contain an account of a deaf and dumb man, M. Moser,
who (of course entirely unaided by ear,) has mastered, besides Greek and
Latin, no fewer than fourteen modern languages. But, strange as this may
seem, it is certain that in Mezzofanti’s case the ear, in addition to
its direct and natural use in comprehending and catching up the sounds
of languages, and appreciating all their delicate varieties and shades,
(in which it is admitted to have been ready and infallible beyond all
precedent,) had a nobler, and as it were, more intellectual function;
that its office was a thing of mind as well as of organization; that he
possessed, as it were, _an inner and higher sense_, distinct from the
_material organ_; and that the impressions which this sense conveyed,
helped him to the structure and the philosophical character of language,
as well as to its rhythm, its vocal sounds, and its peculiar intonations.
It is difficult to explain the exact mental operation, by which this
curious result was attained; but the Cardinal himself repeatedly declared
his consciousness of such an operation, and ascribed to it, in a great
degree, the rapidity and the ease with which he overcame what to others
form the main difficulty in the study of a language, and with which,
having once made the first step in each language, he mastered, as if by
intuition, all the mysteries of its structural system.

Another element of his wonderful talent was his genuine enthusiasm
and the unpretending simplicity of his character. “Pretension,” says
Emerson, “may sit still, but cannot act.” There was no pretension about
Mezzofanti; nor had he anything of that morbid intellectual sensitiveness
which shrinks from the first blunders to which a novice in a foreign
language is exposed, and which restrains many from the attempt to speak,
by the very apprehension of failure.[571] Children, as is well known,
learn to speak a language more rapidly than their elders. I cannot doubt
that Mezzofanti’s child-like simplicity and innocence, were among the
causes of his wonderful success as a speaker of many tongues.

       *       *       *       *       *

It was not to be expected that a man so eminent in one absorbing pursuit
should have made a very distinguished figure in general literature or
science. Among the many laudatory reports of him which are contained
in this volume, a few will be found which hardly concede to him even a
second-rate place as a scholar, still less as a philologer. In some of
the literary circles of Rome, Mezzofanti was not popular. M. Libri[572]
alludes to one source of unfriendly feeling in his regard. There is
another which may perhaps have already struck the reader. From some of
the facts noticed in the Introductory Memoir of German linguists[573]
and from other incidental allusions, the reader will have observed a
certain tendency on the part of philologers to depreciate the pursuit of
linguists, and to undervalue its usefulness; and it is precisely from
the philologers that this low estimate of Mezzofanti proceeds. It is
only just, however, to Baron Bunsen, who is pre-eminently the head of
the German school of that science, to admit that he carefully draws the
distinction between the two branches of the study of language—that of the
linguist, and that of the philologer. And although the natural preference
which a student unconsciously gives to his own favourite pursuit, no
doubt leads him to attach little value to what Mezzofanti knew, and to
dwell more on what in his opinion he did not know, yet it must be said
that he gives him full credit for his unexampled power as a linguist.

The Baron’s recollections, nevertheless, contain a summary of the
strictures upon the literary character of Mezzofanti, which were current
during his lifetime—that his learning was merely superficial—that in the
phrase of the late Mr. Francis Hare, “with the keys of the knowledge of
every nation in his hand, he never unlocked their real treasures;” that
in all the countless languages which he spoke he “never said anything;”
that he left no work or none of any value behind him; that he was utterly
ignorant of philology; that his theology was mere scholasticism; that
he had no idea of Biblical criticism, and that even as a critical Greek
scholar, he was very deficient.

It would be a very mistaken zeal for the honour of Cardinal Mezzofanti
to deny the literal truth of several of these criticisms. Most of the
branches of knowledge in which he is here represented as deficient, are
in themselves the study of an ordinary life. To have added them all to
what he really did possess, would have been a marvel far exceeding the
greatest wonder that has ever been ascribed to him; nor was any one
more ready than the modest Cardinal himself, not merely to admit many
particulars in which his learning was defective, but even to disparage
the learning which he actually possessed. He confessed over and over
again, that he was no philologer—that he was nothing but “an ill bound
dictionary.” He expressed his regret to Guido Görres, that he had begun
his studies at a time when this science was not cultivated. He lamented
the weakness of his chest and other constitutional infirmities, which
prevented him from writing. He deplored to Cardinal Wiseman, that, when
he should be gone, he would have left behind him no trace of what he knew.

But, notwithstanding his own modest estimate of himself, I think enough
will be found in the testimonies of many unsuspected witnesses embodied
in this Memoir, to shew that the depreciating strictures, to which I have
here alluded, are grievously exaggerated. Cardinal Mezzofanti certainly
was not a scientific philologer; but the Abbé Gaume’s memorandum proves
that, while he had little taste for the mere speculative part of the
subject—for those

    Cloud-built towers by ghostly masons wrought,
    On shadowy thoroughfares of thought—

he was fully sensible of the true use of the science, and had not
neglected the study, especially in its most important aspect—its bearing
upon religious history. He was not a professed archæologist. He may have
failed in the interpretation of the particular Greek inscription, to
which Baron Bunsen refers; nor did he pursue Greek criticism as a special
study. But his friends Cavedoni and Laureani, themselves accomplished
archæologists, entertained the highest respect for his judgment in that
study. The Abate Matranga bore ample witness to the depth and accuracy
of his Greek scholarship; and I myself, in the few observations which I
heard him offer on the Eugubian inscriptions, was struck by the sagacity,
the precision, and the suggestive spirit which they evinced.

Far more unjust, however, are Mr. Hare’s remark about the keys, and the
still more disparaging saying, quoted by Baron Bunsen, which describes
Mezzofanti as, “with all his forty-two languages, never saying anything.”
The numberless reports of visitors at every period of his life, from Mr.
Stewart Rose, in 1817, downwards, which are detailed in this volume, put
entirely beyond question both his capacity and his actual attainments
in general literature. Each visitor, for the most part, found him well
acquainted with the literature of his own country. Very many of them
(as Baron Glucky de Stenitzer for Hungary[574]) bear witness to his
familiarity with their national histories. His conversation with M.
Libri, “on the most difficult points in the history of India,” evinced a
mind of a very different calibre from what these supercilious criticisms
suppose: and, from the historian of the Mathematical Sciences, it is no
ordinary compliment towards one with whom these can have been but a
subordinate study, that, without a moment’s preparation, (the subject
having been only casually introduced by M. Libri,) he “spoke for
half-an-hour on the astronomy and mathematics of the Indian races, in
a manner which would have done honour to a man whose chief occupation
had been tracing the history of the sciences.”[575] I must dissent
strongly, also, from the disparaging opinion that M. Bunsen expresses
as to the Cardinal’s capacity for the more strictly professional
sciences of Biblical criticism and Theology. M. Bunsen, no doubt, when
he speaks of Biblical criticism, speaks mainly of the German School of
that science, and very probably of the last and most popular critic,
Lachmann. Now, with all their merits, there is much in the spirit and
the language of many of these writers, and, I may specially say, of
Lachmann, against which Mezzofanti’s whole mind would have revolted; and
I can well understand that, between his opinions and those of the Baron
regarding them, there would have been but little sympathy. But it is
most unjust to Mezzofanti to say that “he had no idea” of the subject.
One of his earliest literary friends was the great Biblical scholar and
critic, De Rossi. While he was still professor at Bologna, the Abate
Cavedoni, of Modena, spoke with high praise of his ability as a biblical
critic. The Abate Mellini, professor of Scripture in Bologna, gratefully
acknowledges the assistance which he derived from him in reference to the
versions of the Bible: and Cardinal Wiseman, who will not be suspected
of undervaluing any branch of Biblical science, told me that, although
it is quite true that Mezzofanti had no love for the German critics,
and though he never was a professed critic himself, he was nevertheless
quite conversant with the science, and understood its history and its
principles, and the divisions of MMS., recensions, families, &c.,
perfectly well.

As to Theology, his reputation in Rome was not high. Yet his attainments,
especially in moral theology, were considered respectable. The readers
of Sir W. Hamilton will not look on the charge of “scholasticism” as any
very grave disparagement; but I must add that neither did Mezzofanti
neglect the modern divines, even those outside of Italy. With Guido
Görres he spoke of Möhler’s well-known _Symbolik_, although it was at
that period but little known beyond the limits of Germany.

As a preacher, Mezzofanti, though earnest and impressive, never was
in any way remarkable. He confined himself chiefly to the duty of
catechetical instruction; and in Rome his only efforts as a preacher,
were the short and simple exhortations addressed to children at the time
of admitting them to their first Communion—a duty of the ministry which
was especially dear to him.

The truth is, that all these criticisms of Mezzofanti, and the
impressions as to the superficial character of his acquirements which
they embody, have emanated for the most part from casual visitors, who
saw him but for a brief space, and whose opportunity of testing his
knowledge was probably limited to a few questions and answers, in a
language not his own; the main object of the visit being, not to sound
the depth or accuracy of his knowledge in itself, but merely the fluency
and correctness of his manner of speaking the language in which the
visitor desired to try him. Whereas, on the contrary, those who bear
witness to the solidity of his information and the vast range of his
knowledge, are those who knew him long and intimately; who met him as a
friend and companion, not as an object of curiosity, and of wonder; and
whose estimate of him was founded upon the impressions of familiar and
every-day intercourse—the only safe test of character or of acquirements.

       *       *       *       *       *

There is more truth in the strictures upon Mezzofanti as a writer. In
this respect, indeed, he is known very little; for his only published
composition, the Panegyric of Father Aponte, and the fugitive poetical
exercises in the appendix of this Memoir, can hardly be said to place him
in the category of authors. Unhappily, indeed, the spirit of authorship
is, with many, a question rather of temperament than of ability. In some
it is the very breath of their life—an actual necessity of existence. To
others it is a barren and ungrateful labour—undertaken with reluctance,
and pursued without satisfaction. Southey used to say, that he never
felt fully master of himself and of all his unclouded faculties, till
he found himself seated at his desk. The current of his thoughts never
flowed freely except through his pen. On the contrary, Magliabecchi—the
living library—the _helluo librorum_—never could prevail on himself to
publish a single line! Unfortunately for science, Mezzofanti was of the
latter class. Partly from constitutional delicacy, and especially from
weakness of the chest, the effort of writing was to him irksome and
even injurious. Partly too, no doubt, the same constitutional tendency
of mind which rendered speaking easy and attractive, indisposed him for
the more toilsome—to him positively distressing—mode of communicating
his thoughts by writing. Except for the purposes of private study,
therefore, he seldom wrote more than some fugitive piece; and, even
when he was prevailed on to write at greater length, he was seldom
sufficiently satisfied with his own performances to permit them to be
made public. Several, even of these essays which were read by him in the
learned societies of Bologna and Rome, are known to have been destroyed
by himself before his death; including some which, from their title
and subject, might naturally have been expected to afford some insight
into the character of his mind, and his capacity for dealing with the
philosophy of language.

Accordingly, the small figure which he made as a writer, and the little
trace which he has left behind him of the vast stores of languages
which he had laid up during life, have led to an undue depreciation
of his career, as objectless and unprofitable, whether to himself or
to his fellow-men. Whatever be the truth of this estimate, no one was
more painfully sensible of it than the Cardinal himself. Many of his
expressions of regret have been already recorded; but only those who knew
him intimately, could know the depth and sincerity of his repinings.
Still, although it is not possible to avoid sharing in this regret, he
would be very exacting, indeed, and would set up for himself a very
terrible standard whereby to judge his own conduct, who could venture to
pronounce such a career as Mezzofanti’s empty or unprofitable. Even if
we put aside entirely the consideration of his literary life, and test
him by the rules of personal duty alone, the life of Cardinal Mezzofanti
was a model of every virtue of the Christian and of the priest. Devout
almost to scrupulousness, sincerely humble, simple in his habits, modest
and unexacting in his own person, but spending himself unhesitatingly
in the service of others; courteous, amiable, affectionate, warm in his
friendships, he was known only to be loved, and he never forfeited a
friendship which he once had formed. His benevolence was of the true
Christian stamp—not a mere unreflecting impulse, but a sustained and
systematic love of his fellow creatures. Although his charity was of the
tenderest and most melting kind—although in truth, like Goldsmith’s Vicar,

    His pity gave, ere charity began—

although his alms, limited as were his means, were so prodigal as
to earn for him the sobriquet of _Monsignor Limosiniere_, “_My Lord
Almoner_;”—yet it would be a great mistake to measure his benevolence
by the actual extent of poverty which it relieved, or of the assistance
it administered. His active spirit grasped every detail of this work of
God—the care of the sick, the instruction of the young, the edification
and enlightenment of the stranger;—nay, the very courtesies of social
intercourse had for him all the sacred significance of a duty; and, while
he never offended the sensibility of his companions by unseasonably
obtruding over-serious conversation, yet he never lost sight, even in
his lightest hours, of the obligation of good example and edification
which his position and character imposed upon him.

And as regards the great pursuit of his literary life, which some have
presumed to deny as “empty word-knowledge,” and unprofitable display, it
must never be forgotten—even though we should be content to judge its
value by the selfish standard of mere utility—that, for himself, one of
its earliest and most attractive, as well as most endearing sources of
interest, lay in the opportunity which it afforded him for the exercise
of his sacred ministry and the only less sacred offices of charity and
humanity; that many of its most precious acquisitions were gathered in
these very exercises of religion and of benevolence; that his usual text
books in each new language were the catechism and the Bible; and that his
favourite theatre for the display of his gifts were the sick wards of the
hospitals of Bologna, the Santo Spirito or the House of Catechumens at
Rome, and the halls and _camerate_ of the great Missionary College of the
Propaganda.

For myself, I cannot envy the moral and intellectual utilitarianism,
which pauses to measure by so paltry a standard a great psychological
phenomenon, such as Nature, in the most prodigal exercise of her powers,
has never before given to man to see. As well might we shut our eyes
to the glory of those splendid meteors which at intervals illumine the
sky, because we are unable to see what cold and sordid purpose of human
utility they may be made to subserve.

I prefer to look to him with grateful and affectionate admiration, as
a great example of the successful cultivation of one of the noblest of
God’s gifts to His creatures;—as the man who has approached nearest
to the withdrawal of that barrier to intercommunion of speech which,
in punishment of human pride, was set up at Babel; and of whom, more
literally than of any other son of Adam, it may be said, that he could

    Hold converse with all forms
    Of the many-sided mind.




APPENDIX.


[Allusion is made, more than once, in this volume, to Cardinal
Mezzofanti’s habit of amusing himself and his friends by writing short
metrical pieces in various languages, and of composing or correcting
the odes recited by the pupils at the annual Polyglot Academy of the
Propaganda. In the absence of other data for judging of his skill as a
linguist, these fragments, trifling though they be, are of considerable
interest; and I had hopes of being able to form a little collection of
them, as a contribution to the enquiry regarding him. Unfortunately my
search for these remains, trivial and fugitive as most of them must have
been, has been very unsuccessful. I am only able to add a few to those
which appear in the sheet of fac-similes, or which have been already
incidentally introduced in the course of the narrative.

The short pieces recited at the Propaganda Academy, being the property of
the pupils themselves, are not preserved in the college archives. I have
only succeeded in obtaining four of these pieces:—two from Rome, a Greek
Anacreontic Ode, and a couple of stanzas in the Grisons dialect; and
two in Angolese from the Rev. Charles Fernando, Missionary Apostolic in
Ceylon.

The Abbate Mazza, Vice-Rector of the Pontifical Seminary at Bologna, has
kindly sent me a Hebrew Psalm addressed by Mezzofanti, as a tribute on
his Jubilee (or the fiftieth anniversary of his ordination as a priest),
to his old friend and master, Father Emmanuel Aponte; and a Latin
Hexameter Poem, descriptive of St. Peter’s Church at Rome, recited by him
in the _Accademia degli Arcadi_, on his being elected a member of that
body.

These little pieces, it need hardly be said, are offered merely as
specimens of Mezzofanti’s power as a linguist, and not as possessing any
striking excellence, whether of poetry or sentiment. It is only just to
his memory to add that, judging from his well-known habit of composition,
they may all be presumed to be literally _impromptu_, and are entitled to
the full indulgence usually accorded to such productions.]


I. _Hebrew Psalm,[576] addressed to Father Emmanuel Aponte—on the
fiftieth anniversary of his ordination._

    לסיוף מהזופאנתי

    א. שמך עמנואל שס טוב כשמן תורף ץל כן רצו נץריﬦ ואהיבוך וזקניﬦ
    גם המה בקשו חכמה שפתיך

    ב. מה גאוו צל צייﬦ רגליך מבשר משמיץ משמיץ שלוס מבשר טוב משמיץ
    ישוץה

    ג. אור גגה בארצסו בץﬨ באך ממזרת מאז הגדלת השמחה והרביﬨ דץﬨ
    ומוםר נﬨﬨ לרﬥ דורשי בינה ואור פני אדני בכל מץשיך ראו ץינינו

    ד. הנה היום החלפת כנשר לבוא משכנות אדגי ואחרי חמישים שנﬣ תוצא
    עוד לחם ויין כהן לאל ץליון כהן ץולם ץל דברתי מלכיצדך

    ה. לכו נננו לארנדי ﬨשוץה לעור ישץנו כי התלה זקן טוכ חסיד לו
    לגשת אליו לכהן להתפלל לפניו ולכתר ץןיגו

    ו. גתת ארני לעמגואל חן וכבוד כי ﬣלך בתמים למד חןכמה ועאה עדק

    ז. וץﬨה לנך אזנך אלהיﬦ מלך הכבור ץנה עבדיך תלמידי זקן טוב תן לו
    ארך ומיﬦ ורצון וברכה תעטרהו

Transcriber’s Note: A better version might be:

    ליוסף מהזופאנתי

    א. שמך עמנואל שם טוב כשמן תורק על כן רצו נערים ואהיבוך וזקנים
    גם המה בקשו חכמה שפתיך

    ב. מה גאוו על איים רגליך מבשר משמיע משמיע שלום מבשר טוב משמיע
    ישועה

    ג. אור נגה בארצנו בעת באך ממזרח מאז הגדלת השמחה והרבית דעה
    ומוסר נתת לכל דורשי בינה ואור פני אדני בכל מעשיך ראו עינינו

    ד. הנה היום החלפת כנשר לבוא משכנות אדגי ואחרי חמישים שנה תוצא
    עוד לחם ויין כהן לאל עליון כהן עולם על דברתי מלכיצדך

    ה. לכו רננו לאדני תשועה לצור ישענו כי הפלה זקן טוב חסיד לו לגשת
    אליו לכהן להתפלל לפניו ולכפר עלינו

    ו. נתת אדני לעמגואל חן וכבוד כי הלך בתמים למד חכמה ועאה עדק

    ז. ועתה לנך אזנך אלהים מלך הכבוד ענה עבדיך תלמידי זקן טוב תן לו
    ארך יומים ורצון וברכה תעטרהו

_Latin Translation._

                          Josephus Mezzofanti.

    1. Nomen tuum, Emanuel, nomen bonum, sicut oleum effusum,
    propterea excurrerunt adolescentes, et dilexerunt te. Et senes
    ipsi quoque quæsierunt sapientiam labiorum tuorum,

    2. Quam speciosi fuerunt in insulis pedes tui, evangelizans
    predicator! prædicans pacem, evangelizans bonum, prædicans
    salutem!

    3. Luxfulsit in terra nostra, quando venisti ab oriente: ex
    eo tempore magnificasti lætitiam et multiplicasti scientiam,
    et eruditionem dedisti omnibus quærentibus intelligentiam; et
    lumen vultus Domini in omnibus operibus tuis viderunt oculi
    nostri.

    4. Ecce hodie innovas te sicut aquila, ut intres in habitacula
    Domini: et post quinquaginta annos profers adhuc panem et
    vinum, sacerdos Dei Altissimi, sacerdos in eternum secundum
    ordinem Melchisedec.

    5. Venite exultemus Domino, jubilemus petræ salutis nostræ;
    quia segregavit senem bonum sanctum sibi, ut accederet ad
    eum, ut fungeretur sacerdotio, ut ovaret ante faciem ejus, ut
    propitiaret super nos.

    6. Dedisti Domine Emanueli gratiam et gloriam, quia ambulavit
    in integritate, docuit sapientiam, et operatus est justitiam.

    7. Nunc ergo inclina aurem tuam, Deus Rex Gloriæ! Exaudi servos
    tuos, discipulos senis boni! Da illi longitudinem dierum et
    beneplacito ac benedictione corona his illum!


II. _Greek Anacreontie Ode “On the Adoration of the Shepherds,” composed
for the Propaganda Academy._

    Ὁ καιρὸς ἦλθεν ᾔδη
    Ὁν εἵσαν οἱ προφήται·
    Υἱος δ’ ὁ του Θέοῖο
    Ἐξ ουρανῶν κατήλθεν,
    Ἱνα βροτους σαὤσῃ.
    Αύτὸς δ’ Ἄναξ ἀνάκτων,
    Ἐκ Παρθένου γενητὸς,
    Θρόνον Θεῳ πρέποντα,
    Οὐκ εἶχεν, ἄλλὰ φάτνον.
    Ὁ δ’ Ἄγγελος παραστάς
    Τοἶς ποιμεδιν, διδάσει
    Ὡς κόσμου ἤλθ’ ὁ Σωτήρ.
    Oἱ δ’ εὐθεώς λαβόντες
    Δῶρα βρέφει φέεουσι,
    Χάριν δ’ ἀπ’ αὐτοῦ εὖρον.
    Πένης δ’ ὅλως ἅμ’ ἆυτοίς
    Ἀμνὸν τὸν εἶχε μοῦνον
    Ἤνεγκε τῴ Νεογνῷ.
    Ὁ Παῖς ὁρᾷ τὸν ὰμνόν,
    Καί προζγελᾲ διδόντι.
    Τὶ τότ’; Ἔγνω γἕρ αὑτου
    Τῦπὸν—Θεοῦ περ αὐτός
    Ὁ πρᾶος ἐστίν ἀμνός
    Ἁμαρτίας ἀφαιρὡν
    Tόυ κόσμου—Αμνὲ, χαἶρε!
    Ἄρον δ’ ἁμαρτίας μου!
    Ἄρον—χάριν τε δός μοι!


III. _Latin Hexameter Poem, recited in the Arcadian Academy at Rome._

                       J. M.
                    PASTOR ARCAS.

    Romuleas Arces, fulgentia Templa Tonantis
    Quae fuerant dudum, conscendo munere vestro,
    Arcades; et celsas sedes teneo, Arcas et ipse,
    Et parvi custos nemoris. Sed non ego doctus,
    Aut calamos inflare leves, aut dicere versus;
    At geminare sonos gaudens, et reddere voces,
    Quas longinqua edit gens, aut contermina nostræ.

    Hic adsum, florens postquam est exacta juventa,
    Temporaque adventans mihi tardior inficit aetas,
    Adsumus hic, patriosque lares, et linquimus arva,
    Pinguia quæ Rheni preterfluit unda minoris:
    Linquimus et colles, varium queis Daedala tellus
    Submittit florem et vites—tua munera, Bacche!
    Linquimus et turres, quarum altera celsa minatur
    In cœlum, impendit præfracto vertice flexa
    Altera, nutanti similis jam jamque ruenti.
    Adsumus hic tandem, Eumetes[577] cum tempora vittâ
    Tergeminâ redimit, cœlique oracula promit.
    Scilicet hic nobis suprema e sede benignus,
    Annuit. Æternam tum nos advenimus Urbem.

    Hic vestra assidue lustrans decora alta, Quirites,
    Quaeque recens tulit, et quæ prisci temporis aetas.
    Vocibus hæc refero, “Vos terque, quaterque beati,
    Non peritura quibus vulgata est fama per orbem!”
    Eximia at quoties cerno heic monumenta virorum,
    Felsina quos aluit, quosve extulit infula Petri,
    Quive aedes vestras decorant et Templa, Quirites,
    Tunc animus nobis patriæ exardescit amore!
    Dulcia tune nostrum pertentant gaudia pectus!

    Tum Templum ingressus, quo nil præstantius aevis,
    Praeteritis vidit Sol, aspicietque futuris,
    Admiror molem ingentem, artificumque labores,
    En mihi spectanti fulget morientis imago,
    Mira senis,[578] sapiens qui dia volumina pandit!
    Aspice, ut in genua is procumbens corpore toto,
    Brachia demittit, languentia lumina torquet,
    Et capit extrema, eternae sed pabula vitæ,
    Illic cerne modo, ut malo suspenditur alto,
    Saevi qui morbi contagia depulit Urbe!
    Hinc miles validis incurvat viribus arcum,
    Atque hinc acer equus permissis fertur habenis:—
    Diffugiunt matres, puerique, ignobile vulgus;—
    Ast Heros ad cœlum ardentia lumina tendit,
    Dicenti similis:—“Nostrum accipe, Christe, cruorem!”
    Protinus en Michael exerto devolat ense,[579]
    Ac monstrum horrendum sub tristia Tartara mittit,
    Parte alia occubuit cœlesti percita amore,
    Et volat ad superos virgo de germine Petri![580]

    Hæc præclara artis miracula, Felsina prodis,
    In tua cum varios inducis vela colores!
    Sed quinam effulgent niveo de marmore vultus!
    En opus, en!—Algarde, tuum, et spirantia signa![581]
    Attila hic, ille Leo: demissi nubibus instant
    Et Petrus et Paulus, magnæ tutamina Romæ!
    Attila terrarum metus, et squalentibus armis,
    Horridus, ense ferox Martis, (sic namque putaret,
    Ensem quem Pastor vitulæ vestigia læsæ,
    Atra cruore sequens Scythiis invenerat agris,)
    Elatosque gerens animos cœlique flage lum,
    Sese compellans, sibi totum adsciverat Orbem.
    Ergo suis atrox erumpit sedibus, atque
    Bella ciet populis late, crudelia bella;
    Omnia namque furens ferro populatur et igne;
    Efferus incedit per membra fluentia tabo;
    Respicit, et gaudet loca jam convulsa ruinis.
    Immites primum Dacas juga ferre coegit;
    Tum quoque Bistonios, dein Odrysiosque feroces;
    Illyriumque; tuas exin, Germania, terras!
    Illum nec Rhenus nec Gallia terret ovantem;
    Pulsus, proh, remeat, pelagi ceu refluit unda!
    Ocius ille domum rediit: pudor incitat iras;
    Agmina dira legit, bellumque ferocius urget,
    Ac nova Romanæ meditatur praelia genti.
    Qualis percussus saevo leo vulnere, pugnam
    Integrat, et late silvas rugitibus implet;
    Talem Hunnorum Rex gestans in corde furorem,
    Italiae ingreditur campos et milite complet.
    Omnis humo fumat jam Aquileja; Mediolanum,
    Et Verona ruunt; Ticinum et Parma fatiscunt:
    Attila per medias cædes bacchatur et ignes:
    Sed nihil ille actum reputat, dum Roma superstes.
    Ire parat Romam: convellit signa, movetque
    Agmina; cen apium ducunt examina reges!
    Tunc illum miles dictis affatur amicis.
    “Quo tibi nunc iter? Heu! acies Alaricus in Urbem,
    Induxit;—mox ingreditur dum mænia Rhegi,
    Connubiumque parat, fato decedit acerbo!”
    Hæc audit, dubiusque hæret. Mox æstuat ira
    Dux, movet et castra. Est eadem sententia menti,
    Cum subito miserisque dolens, et cœlitus actus,
    Magnus adest Leo, sacra vitta et veste decorus.
    Constitit ille tremens, stupet, et vox faucibus hæret!
    Verba deinde audit dulci stillantia melle;
    Mitescunt animi dictis, et corda residunt.
    “Attila quo cessere minæ, quo spiritus acer?”
    Hæc miles. Contra Hunnorum Rex talia fatur:
    “Nonne duos aetate graves atque ore severo,
    Delapsos caelo spectas mortemque minantes,
    Districtis gladiis? Feror hinc!—Jam tollite signa,
    Et patrios fines, montes silvasque petamus:—
    Mens hand illa mihi bello contendere Divis!”
    Hæc ait, et nostris excedit finibus Hunnus.
    Ast nullæ servant latebræ, nullique recessus,
    Persequitur quos ira Dei. Namque Attila, solvit
    Dum metibus sese, parat et dulces hymenæos,
    Occubuit proprio suffusus nocte cruore!
    Est Deus in cœlis fandi memor atque nefandi!
    At Leo contendit Romam, jussitque lubentes,
    Et Petro et Paulo persolvere vota Quirites;
    Et Petrus et Paulus resonant per templa, per aedes!

    Felix Roma! Tibi hæc data sunt munimina cœlo!
    Et dedit Eumetem mitis Deus atque benignus!
    Imperat Eumetes, et pax dominabitur Orbi!
    Arcades, o Petrum et Paulum celebrate canentes;
    Et vestros repetent septena cacumina versus!

    Vos Petri Paulique fidem servate, Quirites!
    Eternum servate fidem, servabitis Urbem!


IV. _Epiphany Ode in the Angolese language, written for the Academy of
1845._[582]

    He Zambi! Mubundulula,
    Mubundulula coettu.
    Mu Quixixi Quitombi,
    Quitombi, O—vundu,
    O Riala muca cuffua mucutu,
    Muca! I’nhia!
    Tctembuca!
    Kieno ki Miscino,
    Skitatu miscino,
    A—ssueta a Belem,
    A-beza camona,
    Camona cafeli.
    Nhi-bula-canu,
    Una camona Zambi,
    Zambi ni Riala ni,
    Mubundulula via Quinixi,
    Ocutanhinha u-a-gile,
    Hi Riala! batessa ocutanhinha,
    Beza a-camona,
    A-camona cafeli,
    Eyè muca muno,


V. _Angolese Ode for the Academy of 1846._

    Tctembuca, Tctembuca!
    I’nhai? Kieno ki,
    Amona—Miscino,
    Kitatu Misciso,
    A-bocala monsu,
    Monsu via Kian cu,
    Kieno-ki! una-a-beza,
    A-beza camona,
    Camona cafeli.
    Ah! nghi-bala cana,
    Tina camona Zambi,
    Monandanghi Zambi,
    Mubundulula, Mobundulala, coettu!


VI. _Epiphany Ode in the Grisons, or Graubünden, Dialect._

    Steila che partas legerment,
    E trej reigs clomag d’alg orient,
    Ti clara steila ventireila,
    Meinag a Dieu l’olma fideiola!

    O Telg da Dieu! o mig salvader!
    D’ilg pievelg tuttig ti ey sprindrader!
    Gloria al Bab che Ti ha envian!
    Piugch alg Christgang ehe Ti has trostigian!


VII. [The following epigram was addressed to Cardinal Lambruschini on the
appearance of his Essay on the Immaculate Conception of the B.V.M. It is
hardly worthy of the subject.]

    Tota es pulcra, DEI Genitrix, ab origine pulcra es!
      Hoc decuit, potuit, fecit et Omnipotens.
    Asserit invictus decus hoc Tibi fulgidus ostro
      Auctor. Scriptorem protege, Virgo, tuum.

The Italian version which accompanied it is much more happy.

    Tutta se’bella, o di DIO Madre;
    Sin da principio bella tu sé.
    Cosi addicevasi, e il Sommo Padre
    Tutto potendo, cosi pur fé.

    Or Ti mantiene un tanto onore,
    Chi d’ostro fulgido tra lo splendor,
    A’ penna invitta di grande Autore:
    Proteggi, o Vergine, il tuo Scrittor!


VIII. _French Stanza given to children after their First Communion._

    Demandez an bon Dieu le don de la sagesse;
    C’est le veritable trésor!—demandez-le sans cesse!
    Mais it faut le chercher avec simplicité
    Pour guide, mes enfans, prenant la Pieté.


IX. _Italian Stanza._

    Di mille voci e mille quanto al cuore
    Più soave e gradita è la parola,
    Che un afflitto consola,
    E l’anima solleva al Creatore!


X. _English verses given to an Irish student on his leaving the
Propaganda._

    “May Christ be on your lips and heart!
    Show forth by facts what words impart;
    That, by sound words and good behaviour,
    You may lead others to the Saviour.”


XI. _Written for a student._

    O man, what is thy science?—Vanity:
    And thou art nothing without charity.


END.




FOOTNOTES


[1] Works I., p. 42.

[2] Mithridates, Vol. II. Einleitung, p. 7.

[3] See the whole legend in Huc’s Chinese Empire, II., p. 187-8.

[4] Auswahl Historischer Stücke aus Hebräischen Schriftstellern, von den
zweiten Jahrhundert bis auf die Gegenwart, Berlin, 1840, p. 10. The book
is entitled _Pirki Rabbi Eliezer_, “The chapters of Rabbi Eliezer.” Its
date is extremely uncertain. See Moreri Dict. Hist. VII., 361.

[5] See Prideaux’s Life of Mahomet, p. 66.

[6] According to the account of Pliny, Dioscurias, a city of Colchis (the
present Iskuriah,) was frequented for commercial purposes by no less than
_three hundred different races_; and he adds that a hundred and thirty
interpreters were employed there under the Romans (_Hist. Nat._ VI.,
5. Miller’s Ed. II., 176.) The Arabian writers, Ibn Haukal and Musadi,
mention seventy-two languages which were spoken at Derbent. Strabo speaks
of twenty-six in the Eastern Caucasus alone. See _The Tribes of the
Caucasus_, p. 14, also p. 32.

[7] Dahlmann, p. 47. It would be presumptuous to differ from so ingenious
a writer, and so profound a master of the subject which he treats; but I
may observe that there are some passages of Herodotus which seem to imply
a certain degree at least of acquaintance with Egyptian (for instance II.
79, II. 99), and with the ancient language of Persia, as IX. 100, &c. It
must be admitted, however, that a very superficial knowledge of either
language would suffice to explain these allusions.

[8] XVII. 17.

[9] This is not Mithridates’s only title to distinction. Perhaps it may
not be so generally known that he was equally celebrated for his powers
of eating and drinking! Athenæus tells of him that he once offered a
prize of a talent to the greatest eater in his dominions. After a full
competition the prize was awarded to Mithridates _himself_.—_Athenæus,
Deipnosoph., Book X., p. 415._

[10] VIII. 7.

[11] Hist. Nat. VII. 24, and again XXV. 2.

[12] Life of Anthony. Langhorne’s Plutarch, v. p. 182.

[13] It was probably by some such fanciful analogy that Cecrops obtained
the name δίφυης, because he knew both Greek and Egyptian.

[14] See a long list of examples cited by Bayle, Dict. Histor. I. 943.
The legislation on the subject, however, was not uniform; nor is it easy
to reconcile some parts of it with each other, or to understand any
general principles on which they can be founded.

[15] Pænulus, act v., sc. 1.

[16] With the exception of Tacitus, who claimed to be of the family of
the great historian, and made a vigorous but unsuccessful effort for the
revival of declining Latinity.

[17] See Milman’s Latin Christianity, I., 28-9.

[18] In some congregations, as early as the first and second century,
there were official interpreters [Ἑρμηνεύται], whose duty it was to
translate into the provincial tongues, what had been read in the church.
They resembled the interpreters of the Jewish synagogue. See Neander’s
Kirchen-Geschichte, I. 530.

[19] Stromata, I. 276 (Paris, 1641.)

[20] Opp. I. 326 (Paris, 1609.) Hom. in Laudem St. Basilii.

[21] See Bayle, Dict. Historique, I. 408. It is curious that the
victorious Mussulmen at Jerusalem enacted the very opposite. No Christian
was permitted to speak the sacred language of the Koran. See Milman’s
“Latin Christianity,” II. 42, and again III. 225. It would be interesting
to examine the history of enactments of this kind, and their effects upon
the languages which they were intended to suppress,—the Norman efforts
against English, those of the English against Celtic, Joseph II’s against
Magyar, and others of the same kind.

[22] Ep. VI. 27.

[23] When the Patriarch Nestorius wrote to Pope Celestine his account of
the controversy now known under his name, the latter was obliged, before
he could reply, to wait till Nestorius’s letter had been translated into
Latin. Erat enim in Latinum sermo vertendus. This letter, together with
those of Cyril of Alexandria, form part of an interesting correspondence
which illustrates very strikingly the pre-eminence then enjoyed in the
Church by the Roman bishop, and is found in Hardouin’s Concilia, I. 1302.
See also Walch’s Historie der Ketzereien, V. 701.

[24] Even Pope Vigilius himself professes his want of familiarity with
the Greek language. See his celebrated _Constitutum_ in Hardouin’s Coll.
Concil III. col. 39.

[25] See the original in Labbe’s _Concilia_, VIII. 835. Both the original
and the translation will be found in Leibnitz’s “System of Theology,” p.
52, note.

[26] See Milman’s Latin Christianity, IV. p. 58, and again 367.

[27] The titles of nearly two hundred of his works are still preserved.

[28] Rohrbacher Hist. de l’Eglise, XIX., 569.

[29] He is the author of a History of Spain, in nine books; and besides
his very remarkable attainments as a linguist, was reputed among the most
learned scholars of his age.

[30] See the account in Labbe, Collect. Concil. VII. 79. The writer
observes; Cum ab apostolorum tempore auditum non sit nec scriptum
reperiatur, quemque ad populum eandem concionem habuisse tot ac tam
diversis linguis cuncta exponendo. The fact is also related by Feyjoo,
Teatro critico, IV. p. 400. An interesting account of this remarkable
scholar will be found in the _Bibliotheca Hispana Vetus_ II. _pp. 149-50_.

[31] The Family of Barbaro produced many distinguished linguists,
according to the opportunities of the time. Francesco Barbaro, born in
1398, was one of the earliest eminent Greek scholars of Italy. Ermolao,
the commentator on Aristotle, was said by the wits of his time to have
been such a purist in Greek, that he did not stop at consulting the devil
when he was at a loss for the precise meaning of a word—the much disputed
ἐντελεχέια of Aristotle!—See Bayle’s Dict. Hist. Art. _Barbaro_ I. 473.

[32] Venice was long remarkable for her encouragement of skill in living
languages. It was a necessary qualification for most of her diplomatic
appointments; and, while Latin, in Europe, was still the ordinary medium
of diplomatic intercourse, we find a Venetian ambassador to England, in
1509, Badoer, capable of conversing like a native in English, French, and
German.—See an interesting paper, “Venetian Dispatches,” in the Quarterly
Review, vol. xcvi. p. 369.

[33] M’Crie’s Reformation in Spain, I. p. 61. See also Hallam’s Literary
History, I. p. 197.

[34] See the Bibliotheca Hispana, vol. I. pref. p. vii.

[35] See Hefele’s _Der Cardinal Ximenes_: one of the most interesting and
learned biographies with which I am acquainted, p. 124.

[36] Vol. II., p. 788.

[37] Naima’s Annals of the Turkish Empire, translated by M. Frazer, for
the Oriental Translation Society. For this fact I am indebted to the
kindness of Mr. Watts, of the British Museum, but I am unable to refer to
the passage.

[38] Pilgrimage to El Medinah, II. p. 368.

[39] Ibid. I., p. 179.

[40] Burton’s Pilgrimage to El Medinah and Meccah. III., 368.

[41] Annals of the Turkish Empire, p. 45.

[42] A melancholy instance of the capriciousness of this sort of
reputation, and of the unhappiness by which, in common with many other
gifts, it is often accompanied, is recorded in the Paris journals of the
early part of this year. A man apparently about fifty years old, named
Tinconi, a native of Constantinople, was found dead at his lodgings in
the Rue des Vieux Augustins, having perished, as it afterwards appeared,
of hunger. This ill-fated man was possessed of an ample fortune, and had
held high diplomatic appointments; and, besides being well-versed in
ancient and modern literature, he spoke not fewer than ten languages,
and knew several others! Yet almost the only record of his varied
accomplishments is that which also tells the story of his melancholy end!

[43] See his life by Pococke, prefixed to the translation of his work _De
Termino Vitæ_. 1699.

[44] See Dr. Paul De Lagarde’s learned dissertation, “De Geoponicon
Versione Syriacâ” (p. 3, Leipsig, 1855). This dissertation is an account
of a hitherto unknown Syriac version of the “Scriptores Rei Rusticæ”
which Dr. De Lagarde discovered among the Syriac MSS. of the British
Museum. He has also transcribed from the same collection many similar
remains of Syriac literature, partly sacred, partly profane, which he
purposes to publish at intervals. Some of the former especially, as
referring to the Ante-Nicene period, are, like those already published
by Mr. Cureton, of great interest to students of Christian antiquity,
although the same drawback—doubt as to their age and authorship—must
affect the doctrinal value of them all.

[45] This laborious and prolific writer, whose works fill nearly 20
volumes, is said to have used the same pen for no less than forty
years, and to have been thrown almost into despair upon its accidental
destruction at the end of that period.

[46] Some of these visited the English universities. Of one among the
number, named Metrophanes Critopulus, who was sent by Cyrillus Lucaris
to be indoctrinated in Anglican Theology, and who lived at Oxford at
the charge of archbishop Abbott, a very amusing account is given by the
disappointed prelate in a letter quoted by Neale (History of Alexandria,
II., 413-5.) He turned out “an unworthy fellow,” “far from ingenuity
or any grateful respect,” a “rogue and beggar,” and in other ways
disappointed the care bestowed on him.

[47] One specimen may suffice, which is furnished by Mr. Neale:
“_Collavi_ (_I have collated_) sua notata cum textu Bellarmini.” Neale,
II., p. 402. The Easterns seldom seem at home in the languages of Europe;
Italian, and still more French orthography, is their great puzzle. I have
seen specimens of Oriental Italian which, for orthography, might rival
“Jeames’s” English, or the French of Augustus the Strong.

[48] Panagiotes was a native of Scio, and was known in his later life
under the sobriquet of “the Green Horse,” in allusion to a local proverb,
that “it is easier to find a green horse than a wise man in Scio.”
The appellation was the highest tribute that could be rendered to the
prudence and ability of Panagiotes; but it is also a curious confirmation
of the evil repute, as regards honesty, in which the islanders of the
Egean were held from the earliest times. The reader will probably
remember the satirical couplet of Phocylides about the honesty of the
Lerians, which Porson applied, in a well-known English parody, to the
Greek scholarship of Herrmann.

        ————Λέριοι κάκοι ὄυκ ὁ μὲν ὅστδ’ όυ
    Πάντες πλήν Προκλέους και Πρόκλεης Λέριος.

[49] An elaborate account of them will be found in Neumann’s _Versuch
einer Geschichte der Armenischen Literatur_. Leipzig, 1836. On the
exceeding importance of the Armenian language for the general study
of the entire Indo-Germanic family, see the extremely learned essay,
_Urgeschichte der Armenier, ein Philologischer Versuch_. (Berlin, 1854.)
It is published anonymously, but is believed to be from the pen of the
distinguished Orientalist named in page 22.

[50] I do not think it necessary to mention (though he is a little
earlier) Felix of Ragusa, the principal librarian, or rather book
collector, of Matthias Corvinus, king of Hungary. He is said to have
known, besides Greek and Latin, the Chaldee, Arabic, and Syriac languages.

[51] Sugli Uomini di gran Memoria, p. 27.

[52] The history of this MS. is a strange one. In the sack of Pavia by
the French under Lautrec, it was carried off among the plunder. Teseo was
in despair at the loss, and was returning to Rome with a sad heart. At
Ferrara, he chanced to see a quantity of papers at a charcoal burner’s,
just on the point of being consigned to the furnace. What was his delight
to find his precious Psalter among them! He began the printing of it at
Ferrara without delay, but did not live to see its completion.

[53] Adelung’s Mithridates, I., 646. See also Biogr. Universelle, II., p.
25.

[54] Biograph. Univ. XV. 239.

[55] There is another Pigafetta (Felippo), some years the junior of
Antonio, who was also a very extensive traveller, having visited Turkey,
Egypt, Syria, Croatia, Hungary, the Ukraine, and the northern kingdoms.
He was sent into Persia on a diplomatic mission by Sixtus V. But I have
not been able to find any record of his skill in languages.

[56] Thevet’s _Thresor des Langues_, p. 964.

[57] Raimondi had spent many years in the East, and was acquainted
with most of the Oriental languages, living and dead. He projected
a polyglot bible which should contain the Arabic, Syriac, Persic,
Ethiopic, Armenian, and Coptic versions, accompanied by the Grammars and
Dictionaries of these languages. But the death of Gregory XIII., on whose
patronage he mainly relied for the execution of his project, put a stop
to the undertaking.

[58] A copy of this work is found in the Catalogue of Cardinal
Mezzofanti’s Library, by Signor Bonifazi. It is in 4 vols., fol., Milan,
1632.

[59] Conciliatio Ecclesiæ Armenæ cum Romana, ex ipsis Armenorum Patrum
et Doctorum Testimoniis. 2 vols fol., Romæ 1658—It is in Bonifazi’s
Catalogue of the Mezzofanti Library, p. 20.

[60] Feller’s Dict. Biog. art. _Galani_.

[61] The learned Jesuit, Father Giambattista Ferrari, author of the
_Nomenclator Syrus_, is an exception to the general rule. He does not
appear to have been a member of any of the Eastern missions. Angelo
Canini, the eminent Syriac scholar, though born in Italy, belongs rather
to the French school.

[62] Wadding assigns his death to the year 1638; but it is clear from
the preface of the Thesaurus that he was dead several years before its
publication, which was in 1636.

[63] _Alcorani Textus Universus._ 2 vols, fol., Padua, 1698.

[64] Biogr. Uni. XV. 263, (Brussels Ed.)

[65] He must not be confounded with a German Orientalist, Christopher
Sigismund Georgi, who lived about the same time.

[66] Biographie Universelle, Vol. XXVI, p. 128.

[67] For this interesting anecdote of Father Ignazio de Rossi, I am
indebted to Cardinal Wiseman, who learned it from the companions of the
good old father upon the occasion. His Eminence added, that it was done
as a mere amusement, and without the least effort or the remotest idea of
preparation.

[68] Through the kindness of the Cavaliere Pezzana, Royal Librarian and
Privy Councillor of Parma, I have been fortunate enough to obtain copies
of some of Mezzofanti’s letters to De Rossi, which will be found in their
chronological order hereafter.

[69] It is a magnificent folio, entitled “Epithalamia Exoticis Linguis
Reddita;” one of the most curious productions of the celebrated press of
Bodoni. Parma, 1775.

[70] The _Panglossia_ in honour of Peiresc was the work of many hands,
and cannot fairly be compared with the Epithalamia of De Rossi. I have
never seen a copy of the latter, nor does De Rossi himself, in his modest
autobiography, (_Memorie Storiche_, Parma, 1807, p. 19), enumerate the
languages which it contained.

[71] The ingenious mechanician, Prince Raimondo di Sansevero, of Naples,
had some name as a linguist. He is said to have known Latin, Greek,
Hebrew, Syriac, Arabic, and several modern languages. But his knowledge
was very superficial.

[72] _Theatro Critico_, IV., p. 401, Art. _Glorias de España_.

[73] _Bibliotheca Hispana_, Vol. IV., p. 75.

[74] Thus amusingly “Englished” in Wanley’s “Wonders of the Little
World,” p. 285:—

    “A young man have I seen,
    At twenty years so skilled,
    That every art he knew, and all
    In all degrees excelled!
    Whatever yet was writ,
    He vaunted to pronounce
    (Like a young Antichrist) if he
    Did read the same but once.”

[75] P. 457. The work was printed in the same volume with Peter Martyr’s
_De Rebus Oceanicis_. Cologne, 1574.

[76] Bruce’s Travels, III, 134.

[77] Duret refers for some notice of Covilham, to the rare work of
Alvarez, _De Historia Ethiopum_. In the hope of discovering something
further regarding this remarkable and little-known linguist, I
endeavoured to consult that author; but I have not been able to find a
copy. It is not in the British Museum.

[78] Galatinus de Arcanis Cath. Veritatis Libri XII. (Frankfort 1572), B.
III. c. 6, p. 120.

[79] There is considerable difference of opinion as to his birth-place.
But Nicholas Antonio, in the Bibliotheca Hispana, says it was Frexenal.
Vol. III. p. 207.

[80] Enfans Celebres, p. 198. Baillet says it was an edition of Seneca’s
Tragedies; but this is a mistake. The _In Senecæ Tragedias Adversaria_
did not appear till 1574.

[81] _Teatro Critico_, IV. 401.

[82] Feyjoo IV. p. 401. “Seguramente podemos creers in alguna rebaxa.”
The _Bibliotheca Hispana_ enumerates twelve languages, Greek, Latin,
Hebrew, Chaldee, Syriac, Arabic, French, Flemish, Spanish, Italian, and
English. I. p. 207.

[83] This is, strange as it may seem, the lowest computation, and rests
on _Lope de Vega’s_ own testimony, written in 1630, five years before his
death. Speaking of the number of his dramatic fictions, he says to his
friend,

    _Mil y quinientos_ fabulas admira.

By other authors the number is made much greater. According to some, as
his friend, Montalvan, he wrote _eighteen hundred_ plays; and Bouterwek,
in his History of Spanish Literature, puts it down at the enormous
estimate of _two thousand_. “_Spanish Literature_,” I. p. 361.

[84] Montalvan says _four hundred_. The _Bibliotheca Hispana_ says (vol.
iv., p. 75) “_eighteen hundred plays, and above four hundred sacred
dramas_.”

[85] A long list of grammars, vocabularies, dictionaries, catechisms,
&c., in more than forty-five different languages, compiled by the Spanish
missionaries, is given in the Bibliotheca Hispana, vol. IV. pp. 577-79.

[86] M. d’Abbadie assures me that Father Paez is still spoken of as “Ma
alim Petros” by the professors of Gondar and Bagënndir.

[87] Neale’s _History of the Patriarchate of Alexandria_ (London, 1837)
II. 405.

[88] Letter to M. Le Leu de Wilhem, quoted by Neale, II. 402.

[89] Biographie Universelle, IX. 301.

[90] Of the latter work I have never seen the Italian original. I know it
only from the Spanish _Catalogo de las Lenguas de las naciones conocidas,
y numeracion, division, y classes de estas, segun la Diversidad de sus
idiomas y dialectos_. 6 vols 4to. Madrid, 1800-5.

[91] Anthony Rodolph Chevalier, a Hebraist of some eminence, born in
Normandy in 1507, three years before Postel, has perhaps some claim to be
mentioned before him, inasmuch as several of his versions are inserted in
Walton’s Polyglot; but his history has hardly any interest.

[92] See Adelung’s Mithridates, I. 646. Postel published in the same
year, the first grammar of the Arabic language ever printed. Paris 1558.

[93] _Thresor de l’ Histoire de toutes les Langues de cet Univers._
Cologne, 613, p. 964.

[94] Adelung, in the appendix of the first volume of his _Mithridates_,
has enumerated several other Pater Nosters, Thevet, Vulcanius (the
latinized form of _Smet_), Merula, Duret, Mauer Waser, Reuter, Witzen,
Bartsch, Bergmann, and others. None of these collections, however,
possesses any special interest, as bearing on the present inquiry, nor
does it appear that any of the authors was particularly eminent as a
speaker of languages; unless we are to presume that Thevet, Duret,
Gramaye, and Witzen, may, in their long travel or sojourn in foreign
countries, have acquired the languages of the nations among whom they
lived. Of the last three names I shall say a few words hereafter.

[95] A portion of the edition contains a Latin preface, explanatory of
the plan and contents; but the majority of the copies have this preface
in Russian; and, in all, the character employed throughout the body of
the work is Russian. This character, however, may be mastered with so
little difficulty, that, practically, its adoption can hardly be said
to interfere materially with the usefulness of the work; and the use of
the Russian character had many advantages over the Roman, in accurately
representing the various sounds, especially those of the northern
languages.

An alphabetical digest (4 vols. 4to. 1790-1) of all the words contained
in the Vocabulary (arranged in the order of the alphabet without
reference to language) was compiled, a few years later, by Theodor
Jankiewitsch de Miriewo, by which it may be seen at once to what language
each word belongs. But this digest is described as unscientific in its
plan and execution; and it was commonly believed that the Empress was so
dissatisfied with it, that the work was suppressed and is now extremely
rare; but I have been informed by Mr. Watts of the British Museum, that
copies of it are now not unfrequently offered for sale. A copy has been
for some years in the British Museum.

[96] It is true that some part of its materials have since become
superannuated by the fuller and more accurate researches of later
investigators, (see Bunsen’s Christianity and Mankind, III. 47.) But it
is nevertheless a work even still of immense value.

[97] Strange and incredible as this anecdote may seem, it is told
seriously by Scaliger himself, who adds that the same extraordinary power
was possessed also by Jerome Cardan and by his father. See the curious
article in _Moreri_, _voce_ “Scaliger.”

[98] Enfans Celebres, p. 196.

[99] An equally eulogistic epigram, by Heinsius, is quoted by Hallam,
Literary History, II. 35.

[100] Scaligeriana, p. 130. This collection is the first of the series of
_anas_ since so popular.

[101] Ibid. p. 232.

[102] On Scaliger’s powers of abuse, see M. Nisard’s brilliant and
amusing Triumvirat Literaire au XVI. Siecle, p. 296, 302, 305, &c. The
“triumvirs” are Lipsius, Scaliger and Casaubon.

[103] Feller’s Dict. Biograph., vol. V. p. 312.

[104] Mithridates, I. 650.

[105] Cologne 1615.

[106] I cannot help thinking that Adelung quite underrates this curious
work. I have seldom consulted it but with pleasure or profit. And the
concluding chapter, “on the language of animals and of birds,” on
which great ridicule has been thrown, is in reality a very curious,
interesting, and judicious essay.

[107] Mr. Kenrick, in the preface of his recent work on Phœnicia,
confesses that “the most diligent reader of ancient authors with a view
to the illustration of Phœnician history, will find himself anticipated
or surpassed by Bochart.”

[108] Bochart’s death was the consequence of a fit with which he was
seized during a vehement dispute which he had with Huet, in the academy
of Caen in 1667, respecting the authenticity of some Spanish medals.
Huet appears to have long felt the memory of it painfully. He alludes to
it in a letter to his nephew, Piadore de Chersigne, above forty years
afterwards; and seems to console himself by thinking that Bochart’s death
“ne lui fut causèe par notre dispute, sinon en partie.” It is curious
that Disraeli has overlooked this in his “Quarrels of Authors.”

[109] Feller’s Dict. Biograph., vol. X. p. 476.

[110] Perhaps I ought to mention Renaudot’s contemporary, the Jesuit,
Father Claude Francis Menestrier, (1631-1704), who although not a great
linguist, is at least notable for the rather rare accomplishment of
speaking Greek with remarkable propriety and fluency, and still more for
his prodigious memory, which Queen Christina of Sweden tried by a very
singular ordeal. She had a string of three hundred words, the oddest
and most unconnected that could be devised, written down without the
least order or connexion, and read over once in Menestrier’s presence.
He repeated them in their exact order, without a single mistake or
hesitation!—_Biographie Univ., Vol. XXVIII._, _p._ 293.

A still more extraordinary example of this power of memory is related
by Padre Menocchio (the well-known Biblical commentator, Menochius) of
a young Corsican whom Muret met at Padua, and who was not only able
to repeat in their regular order a jumble of words similar to that
described above, but could repeat them _backwards, and with various other
modifications_! The youth assured Muret that he could retain in this way
36,000 words, and that he would undertake to keep them in memory for an
entire year! See Menocchio’s _Stuore_, Part III., p. 89. The _Stuore_
is a miscellaneous collection, compiled by this learned Jesuit during
his hours of recreation. He called the work by this quaint title (Ang.
“_Mats_”) in allusion to the habit of the ancient monks, who used to
employ their leisure hours in weaving _mats_, in the literal sense of
the word. This fanciful title is not unlike that chosen by Clement of
Alexandria for a somewhat similar miscellany, his Στρώματα [Tapestry], or
perhaps the more literal one “Patchwork,” assumed by a popular writer of
our own time.

[111] Many of the French missionaries in China, of course, were
distinguished Chinese scholars. The Dictionary of Pere Amiot, for
example, although not published till after his death, is still a standard
work. It was edited by Langlés in 1789-90.

[112] For instance his _Memoire dans le quel on prouve que les Chinois
sont une Colonie Egyptienne_; a notion which was warmly controverted by
his fellow pupil, Deshauterayes. De Guignes argues from the supposed
resemblance of the Chinese and Phœnician characters. His great Chinese
Dictionary, with Klaproth’s supplement, (2 vols. fol., Paris, 1813-19) is
in Mezzofanti’s Catalogue, p. 6.

[113] Although of French parents, Ruffin was born in 1742 at Salonica,
where his father was living in the capacity of chief interpreter of
France. Feller, vol XI., p. 163.

[114] Biogr. Univ. XIX., 172 (Brussels ed.)

[115] Biogr. Univ., vol. LXX., p. 189-200.

[116] Auguste Herbin, a few years Remusat’s senior (having been born at
Paris 1783), was cut off in the very commencement of a most promising
career as an Orientalist. He died in 1806, before he had completed his
twenty-fourth year.

[117] M. Eugene Borè has been in Armenia what the two D’Abbadies have
been in Abyssinia—at once a scholar and a missionary—the pioneer of
religion and civilization, no less than of science.

[118] I gladly avail myself of this opportunity to acknowledge the
valuable assistance on many points which I have received, in the form
both of information and of suggestion, at the hands of this distinguished
philologist and traveller. I am but speaking the common feeling of the
learned of every country, when I express a hope that, before long,
the world may be favoured with the results of his long and laborious
researches in the language, literature, and history of Ethiopia.

[119] Journ. Asiat. 3me., Serie, Vol. VI. p. 79.

[120] Under this head are included all the members of the German
family—Dutch, Flemings, Swedes, Danes, Swiss, &c. I have found it
convenient, too, to include Hungarians (as Austrian subjects), although,
of course, their proper ethnological place should be elsewhere.

[121] Better known by his Grecised name, Capnio (καπνιον, _Rauchlein_,
“_a little smoke_.”)

[122] Bibliander was a Swiss, born at Bischoffzell about 1500. His family
name was _Buchmann_ (Bookman), which, in the fashion of his time, he
translated into the Greek, Bibliander.

[123] Duret says they were “beyond numbering”; but so vague a statement
cannot be urged too literally. _Thresor_, p. 963.

[124] Zurich 1545. It is a small 12mo.

[125] Gesner’s Mithridates is perhaps remarkable as containing the
earliest printed specimen of the Rothwälsches, or “Gipsy-German.” He
gives a vocabulary of this slang language, of about seven pages in
length. It is only just to his memory to add that in his Epilogue,
which is a very pleasing composition, he acknowledges the manifold
imperfections of the work, and only claims the merit of opening a way for
inquirers of more capacity and better opportunities of research.

[126] Mithridates, I., 649.

[127] Biographie Universelle, Vol. VIII., 485.

[128] Feller, Vol. VIII., 136.

[129] Mithridates, I., 596.

[130] Biogr. Univ., Art. Kircher.

[131] Even at his meals Ludolf always kept an open book before him.

[132] Feller’s Dict. Biog. VII., p. 622.

[133] Biographie Universelle, Vol. XLI., p. 180.

[134] Adelung’s Mithridates, I., 660.

[135] They are given in the second volume. Witzen’s letters to Leibnitz
are of the years 1697, 1698, and 1699. Opp. Vol. VI., Part II., pp.
191-206. The specimens of the Pater Noster are in the Collectanea
Etymol., ib. 187.

[136] I., 664.

[137] See several interesting examples in the first of Cardinal Wiseman’s
Lectures “On the Connexion between Science and Revealed Religion,”
I., p. 25. The two lectures on the Comparative Study of Languages
exhaust the whole history of philological science down to the date of
their publication. Ample justice is also rendered to Leibnitz’s rare
philological instinct by Chevalier Bunsen, Christianity and Mankind,
III., 44. See also Guhrauer’s “Leibnitz: Eine Biographie,” II., 129.

[138] See Denina’s La Prusse Litteraire, III., 83.

[139] He wrote chiefly in Russian. See Meusel’s Gelehrte Deutschland, a
dry but learned and accurate Dictionary of the living writers of Germany
in the end of the eighteenth century, begun by Homberger in 1783, but
continued by Meusel.

[140] Biogr. Univ., VI., 399.

[141] Biog. Univ., p. 402.

[142] Denina (Prusse Litteraire, III., p. 31) observes that the name of
Michaelis would appear to have had the profession of Oriental literature
as its peculiar inheritance.

[143] For a complete enumeration of his works see Meusel’s Gelehrte
Deutschland, II., 563.

[144] 3 vols., 8vo., London, 1827.

[145] Biographie Universelle, LVIII., p. 4.

[146] Feller, I., 66. See also Bunsen, III., 42.

[147] Vol. I., p. xx.

[148] Bunsen’s “Christianity and Mankind,” III., p. 44.

[149] See preface of the _Vocabularia Comparativa_. Also Biographie
Universelle, XXXII., p. 440.

[150] The Japanese he learned from a shipwrecked native of Japan whom he
met at Irkutsch; probably the same mentioned in “Golownin’s Narrative.”

[151] Biogr. Univ., LXVIII., 532.

[152] Life and Letters of Niebuhr, I. p. 27-8.

[153] “Christianity and Mankind,” III., p. 60.

[154] As a mere linguist I should name Dr. Pruner, a native of Bavaria,
but long a resident of Egypt, where he was physician of the late Pasha.
M. d’Abbadie states that Dr. Pruner is reputed to speak twelve languages,
Persian, Turkish, Arabic, Greek, Latin, German, English, French, Italian,
Spanish, Portuguese, and Danish.

[155] This Grammar has appeared in successive sections, commencing in
1833, and only completed in 1852.

[156] Klaproth, the great explorer of the Caucasian languages, does not
properly belong to Schlegel’s school, as he comparatively overlooks the
great principle of Schlegel—the grammatical structure of languages.

[157] Castrén was an accomplished writer both in his own language and in
German, and a poet of much merit. His Swedish version of the old Finnic
Saga “Kalevala,” is perhaps deserving of notice as having furnished in
its metre the model of the new English measure adopted by Longfellow in
his recent poem “Hiawatha.” Castrén’s birth-place is close to Uleåborg,
the spot resorted to commonly by travellers who desire to witness the
phenomenon of “the Midnight Sun.”

[158] Bunsen, III., p. 274.

[159] Bunsen, III., p. 53.

[160] Ibid, 270.

[161] In his “Comparative Grammar of the Drâvidian or South-Indian Family
of Languages.”

[162] The fiercest of them all is contained not in the Journal, but in a
pamphlet which was distributed to members of the Society.

[163] Dr. Paul De Lagarde, for instance, has the reputation of knowing
above twenty languages.

[164] Christianity and Mankind, III., 271.

[165] Knight’s Cyclopædia of Biography, I. 450-3.

[166] Cancellieri, Sugli Uomini di gran Memoria, e sugli Uomini
smemorati, p. 50-1.

[167] Life of James Crichton of Cluny, commonly called “the Admirable
Crichton.” Edinburgh, 1819.

[168] _Wonders of the Little World_, p. 286.

[169] II., p. 223.

[170] “New Atlantis.” Bacon’s Works, II., 84.

[171] Life of Edward Lord Clarendon, I., p. 35.

[172] Literary History, II., 85.

[173] Church History, III., 87.

[174] Disraeli’s Miscellanies, p. 131.

[175] Ibid.

[176] Rose’s Biographical Dictionary, XI., 166.

[177] Disraeli’s Miscellanies, p. 131.

[178] Wilkins was an eminent mathematician, and one of the first members
of the Royal Society. But his reputation as a humourist was his chief
recommendation to Buckingham. His character in many respects resembled
that of Swift. One of his witticisms is worth recording. After the first
appearance of his well-known Voyage to the Moon [“Discovery of a New
World, with a Discourse concerning the Possibility of a Voyage thither”],
the eccentric Duchess of Newcastle jestingly remarked to him that the
only defect in his account was that it omitted to tell where the voyagers
would find lodging and accommodation by the way. “That need present no
difficulty to your Grace,” said Wilkins; “you have built so many _castles
in the air_ that _you_ cannot be at any loss for accommodation on the
journey.”

[179] He published the “Pantheisticon,” the most profane of all his
works, under this pseudonym. I regret to see that an elaborate attempt
to recall this long-forgotten book into notice, is made by Dr. Hermann
Hettner, in his “Geschichte der Englischen Literatur von 1660 bis 1770,”
the first volume of which has just been published at Leipsic (1856). Dr.
Hettner has even been at the pains to translate largely from its worst
profanities.

[180] Disraeli’s Miscellanies, p. 110.

[181] Among the crowd of bubble companies which arose about the time
of the Revolution, was the “Royal Academies Company,” which professed
to have engaged the best masters in every department of knowledge, and
issued 20,000 tickets at twenty shillings each. The fortunate holders
were to be taught at the charge of the company! Among the subjects of
instruction languages held a high place; and the scheme of education
comprised Latin, Greek, Hebrew, French, and Spanish! See Macaulay’s
History of England, IV., 307.

[182] Disraeli has a curious chapter on Henley, _Miscellanies_, pp. 73-8.

[183] A plan for the promotion of Oriental studies, under the patronage
of the Company, formed one of the many magnificent schemes of Warren
Hastings, himself no mean linguist. Hastings consulted Johnson on the
subject; and it is observed as an evidence of his extraordinary coolness
and self-possession, that his letter, acknowledging Johnson’s present
of Sir W. Jones’s Persian Grammar, was written in the midst of the
excitement of one of the most eventful days in his chequered life. See
Croker’s Boswell’s Life of Johnson. VIII., 38-42, and Macaulay’s Essays,
p. 593.

[184] Even during an attack of ophthalmia he did not relax in his
application to study, but used to get some of his schoolfellows to read
for him while he was himself disabled from reading.

[185] Lord Teignmouth’s Life of Sir William Jones, II., 168.

[186] II., 168.

[187] He displayed great disinterestedness in the public service by
voluntarily relinquishing, several years before his death, (1836) a large
pension which he held under the crown.

[188] 1765-1837.

[189] Memorials of My Own Time, p. 180.

[190] Lockhart’s Life of Scott, I., p. 323.

[191] Life of Thomas Young, M.D. By George Peacock, D.D. London, 1855.

[192] See an interesting memoir in the National Review, II., 69-97.

[193] Christianity and Mankind, III., 48.

[194] Lectures on Science and Revealed Religion, I., 180.

[195] See especially an exceedingly learned and interesting article in
the Dublin Review, Vol. XXXIX., pp. 199-244. on Dr. Donaldson’s _Jashar_.

[196] Illustrated London News, Feb. 10, 1856.

[197] See a memoir of Dr. Samuel Lee in Jerdan’s “Portrait Gallery,” Vol.
V.

[198] Journal of a Residence in London. By Nathaniel Wheaton, A.M., p. 85.

[199] People’s Journal, Vol. I., p. 244.

[200] Knight’s Cyclopædia of Biography, art. Burritt.

[201] I must here acknowledge my especial obligations to Mr. Watts; not
alone for the facilities kindly afforded to me in consulting books in the
British Museum Library, but for the valuable assistance in discovering
the best sources of information which his extensive acquaintance with
Slavonic literature enabled him to render to me in the inquiry.

[202] For some account of this traveller see Otto’s Lehrbuch der
Russischen Literatur, p. 231.

[203] König’s Literarische Bilder aus Russland, p. 33.

[204] Ibid.

[205] Otto’s Lehrbuch, p 246. Pameva was not properly a Russian, having
been born in Moldavia; but he became a monk at Kiew, which thenceforward
was the country of his adoption.

[206] Grammatica Russica et Manuductio ad Linguam Slavorum, Oxford, 1696.

[207] See Guhrauer’s “_Leibnitz, eine Biographie_,” Vol. II., pp. 271-5,
for the details of this magnificent scheme.

[208] Otto’s Lehrbuch, p. 179.

[209] See an article on “Russian Literature,” _Foreign Quart. Review_,
Vol. 1., p. 610.

[210] See an interesting notice in Otto’s Lehrbuch, _sub voce_.

[211] Otto’s Lehrbuch, p. 294. 5.

[212] See König’s _Literarische Bilder aus Russland_, p. 38, also Otto’s
_Lehrbuch_, p. 204, and Bowring’s _Russian Anthology_, 1. 205. 8. His
works fill 6 vols. 8vo. 1804.

[213] Otto’s Lehrbuch, p. 257.

[214] Biograph. Univ. VIII. p. 87.

[215] Otto’s Lehrbuch, p. 246.

[216] See an interesting sketch of this institute, by M. Dulaurier:
L’Institut Lazareff des Langues Orientales, Paris 1856.

[217] Dulaurier, p. 48.

[218] Historic View of the Language and Literature of the Slavonic
Nations, by Talvi—the pseudonym of Theresa A. L. von Jacob, (formed of
her several initials), daughter of the celebrated Professor von Jacob,
and now wife of Dr. Robinson the eminent American Biblical scholar, p. 73.

[219] Ibid.

[220] Travels of the Russian Mission through Mongolia and China, 2 vols.
8vo, 1827.

[221] Historical View of Slavonic Languages, p. 32.

[222] Ibid, p. 98. His Georgian Dictionary obtained the Demidoff prize.
See catalogue de l’Academie Imperiale a St. Petersbourg, p. 58.

[223] 3 vols. 4to. Moscow, 1840.

[224] Literarische Bilder aus Russland (König), pp. 312-21.

[225] Literature and Language of Slavonic Nations, p. 244.

[226] In one vol. 4to, Petersburg, 1851.

[227] De Origine et Rebus Gestis Polonorum, Lib. XXX., ibid. 244.

[228] Lit. and Lang. of Slavonic Nations, p. 178.

[229] The _Thesaurus_ (4 vols, folio, Vienna 1680) supposes in its
author a knowledge of at least eight different languages, Arabic,
Persian, Turkish, Latin, Italian, French, German, and Polish. Meninski
was a man of indomitable energy. In two successive pamphlets which he
published in the course of a controversy which he carried on with his
great rival, Podestà (who was professor of Arabic in the University) he
went to the pains of actually _transcribing with his own hand in each
copy_ the quotations from Oriental authors, as there were no Oriental
types in Vienna from which they could be printed! Meninski’s Thesaurus,
however, is best known from the learned edition of it which was printed
at Vienna (1780-1802) under the revision of Baron von Ienisch, himself
an Orientalist of very high reputation, and for a considerable time
interpreter of the Austrian embassy at Constantinople.

[230] Literature of Slavonic Nations, 270. See also an interesting memoir
in the _Biographie Universelle_. He was born at Warsaw in 1731, and
survived till 1808.

[231] See Biographie Universelle (Supplement), Vol. LVII., p. 589.
Italinski continued and completed D’Hancarville’s great work on Etruscan
Antiquities.

[232] Ibid., p. 190.

[233] See an interesting memoir in Knight’s Cyclopædia of Biography, Vol.
III., pp. 280-1.

[234] See Staudenmaier’s “Pragmatismus der Geistes-gaben,” [Tübingen
1835], and Englmann’s “Von der Charismen im allgemeinen, und von
dem Sprachen-charismen im Besondern.” [Regensburg, 1848]. See also
a long list of earlier writers (chiefly Rationalistic) in Kuinoel’s
“Commentarius in Libros N. T.” vol. IV. pp. 40-2; also in Englmann, pp.
15-23.

[235] Jost’s Geschichte der Israeliten, VI., 166.

[236] P. 15. The example and patronage of Frederic tended much to promote
the revival of Oriental studies. Many of the earliest versions of the
works of Aristotle from the Arabic, were made under his auspices or those
of his son Manfred; among others (compare Jourdain’s “Recherches sur
les Traductions Latines d’Aristote,” p. 124, Paris 1843; also Whewell’s
“History of the Inductive Sciences,” I., p. 343;) that of Sir Michael
Scott of Balwearie, a learned Orientalist and an accomplished general
scholar, although his traditionary character is that of “the wizard
Michael Scott.” His namesake, Sir Walter, has immortalized him, not as a
scholar, but as

    “A wizard of such dreaded fame,
    That when, in Salamanca’s cave,
    Him listed his magic wand to wave
    The bells would ring in Notre Dame!”

Roger Bacon’s skill in Arabic and other Eastern tongues was probably one
of the causes which drew upon him the same evil reputation. I should have
mentioned Bacon among the few notable mediæval linguists. He was “an
industrious student of Hebrew, Arabic, Greek, and the modern tongues.”
(Milman’s Latin Christianity, VI., p. 477). Perhaps I ought also to have
named Albert the Great (Ibid., p. 453); but I am rather disposed to
believe that the knowledge which he had of Hebrew, Chaldee, and Arabic
authors, was derived from Latin versions, and not from the original works
themselves.

[237] Gerbert travelled to Spain with the express purpose of studying in
the Arabian schools. See Hock’s “Sylvester II., und sein Jahrhundert;”
also Whewell’s “Inductive Sciences,” I., 273.

[238] Duret’s _Thresor_, p. 963.

[239] Paul IV. is mentioned by Cancellieri, as having known the entire
Bible by heart. He names several other men, (one of them _blind_,) and
_six ladies_, who could do the same; he tells of one man who could repeat
it in Hebrew.

[240] Kemble’s Social and Political State of Europe, p. 9.

[241] His full name is “Phra Bard Somdetch Phra Paramendt Maha Mongkut
Phra Chom Klau Chau Hu Yua.” _Bowring’s Siam_, (Dedication.) The account
of the king is most interesting.

[242] Valery. Voyage Litteraire de l’Italie, p. 237. I have just met a
modern parallel for her. The brilliant Mme. Henrietta Herz, according
to her new biographer, Dr. Fürst, knew Hebrew, Greek, Latin, Italian,
French, Spanish, German, English, and Swedish, besides a slight knowledge
of Sanscrit, Turkish, and Malay—“Henriette Herz, ihre Leben und
Erinnerurgen,” Berlin, 1858.

[243] Tiraboschi Storia, Vol. V., p. 358.

[244] Valery, 237. Fleck (Wissenschaftliche Reise II., p. 97) says
Anatomy; but this is a mistake. There is a very interesting sketch of
Laura Bassi in Chambers’s Edinburgh Journal, New Series, Vol. XII., pp.
31-2. She was solemnly admitted to the degree of Doctor of Philosophy in
1732.

[245] Cancellieri, “Uomini di gran Memoria.”

[246] In the Bibliotheca Hispana, Vol. IV., pp. 344-53.

[247] Ibid, p. 345.

[248] Bibliotheca Hispana, vol. IV. p. 346.

[249] P. 346. An ode of Lope Vega’s in her praise describes her as a
“fourth Grace,” and a “tenth Muse”—“que as hecho quatre las Gracias y las
Musas diez.”

[250] Fragments in Prose and Verse, by Elizabeth Smith. With a Life by
Mrs. Bowdler, (Bath, 1810,) p. 264.

[251] Knight’s Cyclopædia of Biography, II. 419.

[252] “Sugli Uomini di gran Memoria,” pp. 72-80.

[253] His family name seems unknown; his father, who was a _facchino_,
(or porter,) being called simply _Il Modenese_.

[254] So marvellous was his performance, that it was seriously ascribed
to the Devil by Candido Brognolo, in his “_Alexicacon_,” (Venice 1663),
and Padre Cardi thought it not beneath him to publish a formal reply to
this charge.

[255] Feller, III. 132.

[256] Ibid, p. 70.

[257] Johnson’s Works, VI. p. 368-74.

[258] The Biographie Universelle places Amaduzzi’s birth (curiously
enough for its coincidence with those of the three just mentioned), in
1720: but this is a mistake; he was seventeen years old at the visit of
Joseph II. to Rome, in 1767. His birth therefore must be assigned to 1750.

[259] Cancellieri, pp. 84-7.

[260] The learned patristical scholar, John Baptist Cotelier,
(Cotelerius,) is another example of precocious development leading to
solid fruit. At twelve years of age Cotelier could read and translate
fluently any part of the Bible that was opened for him! I may also recall
here the case of Dr. Thomas Young, of whom I have already spoken. His
early feat of reading the entire Bible twice through before he was four
years old, is hardly less wonderful than any of those above recorded. See
National Review, vol. II. p. 69.

[261] A vocalist, named H. K. von Freher, has appeared recently, who
advertises _to sing_ in thirty-six different languages! He is a native
of Hungary. With how many of these languages, however, he professes to
be acquainted, and what degree of familiarity he claims with each, I am
unable to say; but he is described in the public journals as “speaking
English with purity;” and in one of his latest performances he favoured
the audience with “portions of songs in no less than three or four
and twenty different languages, commencing with a Russian hymn, and
proceeding on with a French romance, a Styrian song, a Polish air, which
he screeched most amusingly, a Sicilian song, as dismal as the far-famed
Vespers of that country, a Canadian ditty, a Hungarian serenade, a
Maltese air, a Bavarian, a Neapolitan barcarole, a Hebrew psalm, a
Tyrolean air, in which the rapid changes from the basso profondo to the
falsetto had a most singular effect.”

[262] The title of this singular volume is worth transcribing: “Coryat’s
Crudities, hastily gobbled up in five months’ Travels in France, Savoy,
Italy, Rhetia, (commonly called the Grisons’ Country), Helvetia, alias
Switzerland, some parts of High Germany, and the Netherlands; newly
digested in the hungry air of Odcombe in the county of Somersetshire,
and now dispersed to the Nourishment of the travelling Members of this
Kingdom.” 4to. London, 1611. It is further noticeable in this place for a
polyglot appendix of quizzical verses in Greek, Latin, Spanish, Italian,
French, Welsh, Irish, Macaronic, and Utopian, “by various hands.”

[263] 1 vol. 12mo, printed at Strawberry Hill, 1758, and re-printed in
Dodsley’s Collections, 1761.

[264] This name was afterwards the subject of a punning epigram.
Mezzofanti is a compound word, (like the names Mezzaharba, Mezzavacca.
Mezzomorto, &c.,) and means _half-child_, [Mezzo-Fante.] Hence the
following distich:—

    _Dimidium Fantis_ jam nunc supereminct omnes!
    Quid, credis, fieret, si _integer_ ipse foret?

[265] In the Via Malcontenti. The house still exists, but has been
entirely remodelled. An inscription for the apartment in which Mezzofanti
was born was composed by D. Vincenzo Mignani:—

    Heic Mezzofantus natus, notissimus Orbi,
    Unus qui linguas calluit omnigenas.

Some years later Francis Mezzofanti removed to a house on the opposite
side of the same street, in which he thenceforward continued to reside.
This house also is still in existence, but has been modernized. In the
early part of the year 1800, Mezzofanti established himself, together
with the family of his sister, Signora Minarelli, in a separate
house, situated however in the same street: but, from the time of his
appointment as Librarian, in 1815, till his final removal to Rome, he
occupied the Librarian’s apartments in the Palazzo Dell’ Università.

[266] There has been some diversity of statement as to the year. The
_Enciclopedia Popolare_ (Turin 1851, supp. p. 299,) hesitates between
1774 and 1771. But there can be no doubt that it was the former.

[267] He merely learned to read and write.

[268] Antonio Dall’ Olmo was a professor in the University so far back as
1360. See Tiraboschi, “Letteratura Italiana,” V. p. 56.

[269] Mingarelli has been a distinguished name in Bolognese letters. The
two brothers, Ferdinand and John Lewis, were among the most diligent
patristical students of the last century. To the latter (of whom I shall
have to speak hereafter,) we are indebted for a learned edition of
the lost Περὶ Tρiάδος of the celebrated Didymus, the blind teacher of
Alexandria; the former also is spoken of with high praise by Tiraboschi,
VII., 1073. This family, however, is different from that of Minarelli,
with which Mezzofanti was connected.

[270] No fewer than eleven sons and four daughters. Of the sons only
two are now living—the Cavaliere Pietro Minarelli, who is a physician
and member of the Medical Faculty of Bologna, and the Cavaliere
Gaetano, an advocate and notary. A third son, Giuseppe, embraced the
ecclesiastical profession in which he rose to considerable distinction.
He was a linguist of some reputation, being acquainted with no fewer
than eight languages, (see the _Cantica di G. Morocco_, p. 12, note,)
an accomplishment which he owed mainly to the instruction of his uncle.
Some time after the departure of the latter for Rome, Giuseppe was named
Rector of the University of Bologna, and honorary Domestic Prelate of
the Pope Gregory XVI., but he died at a comparatively early age in
1843. A fourth son, Filippo, became an architect, but was disabled by a
paralytic attack from prosecuting his studies, and died after a lingering
and painful illness, July 23rd, 1839. The other sons died in childhood.
The four daughters, Maria, Anna, Gesualda, and Gertrude, still survive.
Maria and Gertrude married—the first, Signor Mazzoli, the second,
Signor Calori—and are now widows. Anna and Gesualda are unmarried. The
former resided with her uncle, from the time of his elevation to the
cardinalate till his death. She is said to be an accomplished painter in
water-colours. Her sister, Gesualda, is an excellent linguist.

[271] I take the earliest opportunity to express my most grateful
acknowledgment of the exceeding courtesy, not only of the Cavaliere
Minarelli and other members of Cardinal Mezzofanti’s family, but of many
other gentlemen of Bologna, Parma, Modena, Florence, Rome, and Naples.
I must mention with especial gratitude the Abate Mazza, Vice-Rector of
the Pontifical Seminary, at Bologna; Cavaliere Angelo Pezzana, Librarian
of the Ducal Library, at Parma; Cavaliere Cavedoni, Librarian of Modena;
Professor Guasti at Florence; Padre Bresciani, the distinguished author
of the “Ebreo di Verona,” at Rome; the Rector and Vice-Rector of the
Irish College, and the Rector and Vice-Rector of the English College in
the same city; and Padre Vinditti of the Jesuit College at Naples. For
some personal recollections of Mezzofanti and his early friends, and for
other interesting information obtained from Bologna, I am indebted to
Dr. Santagata, to Mgr. Trombetti, and to the kind offices of the learned
Archbishop of Tarsus, Mgr. De Luca, Apostolic Nuncio at Munich.

[272] This anecdote was told to Cardinal Wiseman by the late Archdeacon
Hare, as current in Bologna during the residence of his family in
that city. The Archdeacon’s brother, Mr. Francis Hare, was intimately
acquainted with Mezzofanti during his early life, and was for some time
his pupil.

[273] Headley’s “Letters from Italy,” pp. 152-3.

[274] Ibid, p. 152.

[275] He published a number of polemical and moral treatises, which are
enumerated in the “Memorie di Religione,” a journal published at Modena,
vol IV., pp. 456-61, where will also be found an interesting memoir of
the author.

[276] Another name, Molina, is mentioned, as one of his early masters,
in a rude poetical panegyric of the Cardinal, by an improvisatore named
Giovanni Masocco:—“Per la illustre e sempre cara Memoria del Card.
Giuseppe Mezzofanti,” [Roma 1849]. But I have not learned any particulars
regarding this Molina.

[277] This at least was Thiulen’s ordinary department. See the _Memorie
di Religione_, already cited.

[278] _Esquisse Historique sur le Cardinal Mezzofanti. Par A. Manavit._
Paris, 1853, p. 15.

[279] See the _Memorie di Religione_, vol. XV., where an interesting
biography of the Abate Ranzani will be found.

[280] Manavit, “Esquisse Historique,” p. 9.

[281] Ibid, p. 12.

[282] Manavit assigns a much later date, 1791. But the short memoir
by Signor Stoltz, [Biografia del Cardinal Mezzofanti; Scritta dall’
Avvocato G. Stoltz, Roma 1851,] founded upon information supplied by the
Cardinal’s family, which states that he had completed his philosophy
when he was but fifteen, (p. 6,) is much more reconcilable with facts
otherwise ascertained. His philosophical course occupied three years.
(See _De Josepho Mezzofantio, Sermones Duo auctore Ant. Santagata_,
published in the acts of the Institute of Bologna, vol. V. p. 169, et
seq.) His theological course (probably of four,) was completed in 1796,
or at farthest early in 1797. This would clearly have been impossible in
the interval assigned by Manavit.

[283] One of these, _Reflessioni sul Manuale dei Teofilantropi_,
is directed against the singular half-religious, half-social
confederation, entitled “Theophilanthropists,” founded in 1795, by La
Reveillere-Lepéaux, one of the directors of the French Republic. These
treatises are noticed in the _Memorie di Religione_, 1822, 1823, and
1824. Joseph Voglio is not to be confounded with the physiologist of the
same name, (John Hyacinth,) who was also professor in Bologna, but in the
previous generation.

[284] “De Josepho Mezzofantio Sermones Duo,” p. 172.

[285] Manavit, p. 13.

[286] Santagata’s “Sermones Duo,” p. 173.

[287] Elementi della Lingua Greca, per uso delle Scuole di Bologna.
Bologna 1807.

[288] See Kephalides “Reise durch Italien und Sicilien.” Vol. I. p. 29.

[289] See two interesting articles in the “Historisch-Politische
Blätter,” vol. X. p. 200, and folio. The writer was the younger Görres,
(Guido,) son of the well-known professor of that name. Most of his
information as to the early life of Mezzofanti was derived from the
Cardinal himself, with whom, during a long sojourn in Rome, in 1841-2, he
formed a very close and intimate friendship, and in company with whom he
studied the Basque language. I have spoken of Mingarelli in a former page.

[290] Manavit, p. 17.

[291] Santagata, p. 171.

[292] “Memorie di Religione,” vol. IV., p. 450.

[293] Santagata “De Josepho Mezzofantio,” p. 185. “Applausi dei
Filopieri,” p. 12-3. Mezzofanti was more fortunate in this experiment
than the Frenchman mentioned in Moore’s “Diary,” (vol. VI., p. 190,) who,
after he had taken infinite pains to learn a language which he _believed
to be Swedish_, discovered, at the end of his studies, that the language
which he had acquired with so much labour was _Bas-Breton_.

[294] M. Manavit (p. 19,) says, that he was at this time _twenty-two
years_ old. But this is an error of a full year. He was born on the
17th September, 1774; and therefore, before September 24th, 1797, had
completed his twenty-third year. M. Manavit was probably misled by
the dispensation in age which was obtained for him. But it must be
recollected that such dispensation is required for all candidates for
priesthood under _twenty-four years_ complete.

[295] This date, and the others relating to his university career, have
(through the kindness of the Nuncio at Munich, Mgr. De Luca,) been
extracted for me from an autograph note, deposited by Mezzofanti himself
in the archives of the university of Bologna, on the 25th of April, 1815.

[296] Santagata, Sermones, p. 190.

[297] Manavit, p. 28.

[298] Whewell’s Inductive Sciences, III. p. 86.

[299] Manavit, p. 19.

[300] Ibid, p. 29.

[301] The learned and munificent Egidio Albornoz, whom English readers
probably know solely from the revolting picture in Bulwer’s “Rienzi.”
The Albornoz College was founded in pursuance of his will, in 1377, with
an endowment for twenty-four Spanish students, and two chaplains. See
Tiraboschi “Letteratura Italiana,” V. p. 58.

[302] Görres, in the Histor. Polit. Blätter, X. p. 203.

[303] Manavit, p. 21.

[304] Manavit, p. 23.

[305] Ibid, pp. 104-5.

[306] Zach’s “Correspondance Astronomique,” vol. IV. p. 192.

[307] Alison’s “History of Europe,” vol. IV. p. 241, (fifth edition).

[308] Wap’s Mijne Reis naar Rome, in het Voorjaar van 1837. 2 vols. 8vo,
Breda, 1838, II. p. 28.

[309] p. 105.

[310] Santagata “Sermones,” p. 189.

[311] Ibid, p. 189.

[312] Lexicon Heptaglotton, Preface.

[313] Disraeli’s Curiosities of Literature, p. 372.

[314] Ibid, 369.

[315] Historisch-Polit. Blätter, Vol. X., p. 204.

[316] It would be curious to collect the opinions of scholars upon the
amount of time which may profitably be devoted to study. Some students,
like those named above, and others who might easily have been added;—as
the celebrated Père Hardouin; or the ill-fated Robert Heron, who died in
Newgate in 1807, and who for many years had spent from twelve to sixteen
hours a day at his desk [Disraeli, p. 84];—place no limit to the time of
study beyond that of the student’s physical powers of endurance. On the
other hand, Sir Matthew Hale (see Southey’s Life, IV., 357) said that six
hours a day were as much as any student could usefully bear; and even
Lord Coke was fully satisfied with eight. Much, of course, must depend
on the individual constitution; but of the two opinions the latter is
certainly nearer the truth.

[317] In “Lettere di Varii illustri Itali, del Secolo XVII., e del
Secolo XVIII.” Vol. III., p. 183. Count Stratico is the well-known
mathematician, the friend and colleague of Volta in the University of
Pavia.

[318] A Mission had existed in Congo since the end of the fifteenth
century.

[319] “Ragguaglio del Viaggio compendioso d’un Dilettante Antiquario
sorpreso da’ Corsari, condotto in Barberia, e felicemente ripatriato.”
2 vols. Milan, 1805-6. The work is anonymous, but the authorship is
plain from the passport and other circumstances. I am indebted for the
knowledge of the book (which is now rare) to Mr. Garnett of the British
Museum. A tolerably full account of it may be found in the _Bibliothèque
Universelle de Genêve_ (a continuation of the _Bibliothèque Britannique_)
vol. VIII., pp. 388-408.

[320] A similar narrative was published as late as 1817 by Pananti.
“Avventure ed Osservazioni sopra le Coste di Barberia.” Firenze 1817. It
was translated into English by Mr. Blacquiere, and published in 1819.
In the end of the seventeenth century, France and England severally
compelled the Dey of Algiers to enter into treaties by which their
subjects were protected from these piratical outrages; and in the
following century, the increasing naval power of the other great European
states tended to secure for them a similar immunity. But the weaker
maritime states of the Mediterranean, especially Naples, Sicily, and
Sardinia, were still exposed not only to attacks upon their vessels at
sea, but even to descents upon their shores, in which persons of every
age and sex were carried off and sold into slavery. The long wars of
the Revolution secured a sort of impunity for these outrages, which at
length reached such a height, that when, in 1816, the combined English
and Dutch squadron under Lord Exmouth destroyed the arsenal and fleet
of Algiers, the number of Christian captives set at liberty was no less
than ten hundred and eighty-three. Nevertheless even still the evil was
not entirely abated; nor can the secure navigation of the Mediterranean
be said to have been completely established till the final capture of
Algiers by the French under Duperre and Bourmont, in 1830.

[321] In virtue of a treaty made in 1683, after the memorable bombardment
of Algiers by Admiral Du Quesne.

[322] The Moorish form of the common Arabic name _Tezkerah_, [in Egypt,
(see Burton’s “Medinah and Meccah,” I. 26.) Tazkirêh] of a passport. The
Moorish Arabic differs considerably (especially in the vowel sounds,)
from the common dialect of the East. Caussin de Percival’s Grammar
contains both dialects, and a special Grammar of Moorish Arabic was
published at Vienna by Dombay, of which Mezzofanti was already possessed
(inf. 178.) Both the Grammars named above are in the Mezzofanti Library.
_Catalogo_, pp. 14 and 17. Father Caronni gives a fac-simile of a portion
of the _Tiscara_.

[323] Sidi Hamudah had been Bey of Tunis from the year 1782, when he
succeeded his brother, Ali Bey. He survived till 1815. His reign is
described as the Augustan age of Tunis (Diary of a Tour in Barbary,
II. 79). Father Caronni tells of him that when one of his generals,—a
Christian,—was about to become a Mahomedan in the hope of ingratiating
himself with Hamudah, he rebuked the renegade for his meanness. “A hog,”
said he, “remains always a hog in my eyes, even though he has lost his
tail.”

[324] This month is called in the common Arabic of Egypt _Gumada_. There
are two of the Mahomedan months called by this name, _Gumada-l-Oola_, and
_Gumada-t-Taniyeh_ (Lane’s Modern Egyptians, I. 330). The latter, which
is the sixth month of the year, is the one meant here. As the Mahomedan
year consists of only three hundred and fifty days, it is hardly
necessary to say that its months do not permanently correspond with those
of our year. They retrograde through the several seasons during a cycle
of thirty-three years.

[325] The year of the Hegira, 1219, corresponds with A.D. 1804.

[326] Ragguaglio del Viaggio, vol. II. p. 140-1. Milan 1806.—The book,
though exceedingly rambling and discursive, is not uninteresting. The
second part contains the Author’s antiquarian speculations, which
curiously anticipate some of the results of the recent explorations at
Tunis.

[327] Moore’s “Diary.” III. 138.

[328] This book is still in the Mezzofanti Library. It is entitled
_Anthologia Persiana: Seu selecta e diversis Persicis Auctoribus in
Latinum translata, 4to._ Vienna, 1778. See the “Catalogo della Libreria
del Card. Mezzofanti,” p. 109.

[329] Bodoni was the printer of De Rossi’s “Epithalamium” of Prince
Charles Emmanuel, in twenty-five languages, alluded to in page 33. I
should say however, that some of his classics,—especially his “Virgilii
Opera,” although beautiful specimens of typography, have but little
critical reputation.

[330] “Grammatica Linguæ Mauro-Arabicæ, juxta vernaculi Idiomatis Usum.”
4to. Vienna, 1800. See the “Catalogo della Libreria Mezzofanti” p. 14.

[331] “Institutiones Linguæ Turcicæ, cum Rudimentis parallelis Linguarum
Arabicæ et Persicæ.” 2 vols. 4to. Vienna, 1756. “Catalogo,” p. 36.

[332] An intended reprint of the edition of the _Divan_, which was
published at Calcutta, 1791.

[333] Probably the “Lexicon Hebraicum Selectum;” or the “Dissertation on
an edition of the Koran,” both of which were published at Parma, in 1805.
See “Catalogo della Lib. Mezzofanti,” p. 17 and p. 40.

[334] It was on occasion of one of Volta’s demonstrations that Napoleon
made the comparison which has since become celebrated. “Here, doctor,”
said he, to his physician Corvisart, pointing to the Voltaic pile; “here
is the image of life! The vertebral column is the pile: the liver is
the negative, the bladder, the positive pole.” See Whewell’s Inductive
Sciences, III. 87.

[335] For instance among the books which he asks the Count in this
letter to send, are the works of “_l’immortale Haüy_”—the celebrated
Abbé Haüy, who after Romè de l’Isle, is the founder of the science of
Crystallography, and who at this time was at the height of his brilliant
career of discovery. (Whewell’s “Inductive Sciences” III. 222.) Haüy’s
works were intended for his friend Ranzani.

[336] He alludes to the _Bibliotheca Orientalis Clementino-Vaticana_.
Joseph Assemani’s nephew, Stephen Evodius, compiled a catalogue of the
Oriental MSS. at Florence.

[337] The exact title is “Geschichte der Scherifen, oder der Könige des
jetzt regierendes Hauses zu Marokko.” It was published, not at Vienna, as
this letter supposes, but at Agram, in 1801.

[338] A Moorish physician of Cordova, in the twelfth century, variously
called _Albucasa_, _Buchasis_, _Bulcaris_, _Gafar_; but properly _Abul
Cassem Khalaf Ben Abbas_. There are many early Latin translations of
his work. A very curious edition, with wood-cuts, (Venice, 1500,) is in
the British Museum. The one referred to in this letter is in Arabic and
Latin, 2 vols. 4to.

[339] “Arabisches, Syrisches, und Chaldäisches Lesebuch, Von Friederich
Theodor Rink und J. Severinus Vater,” Leipsic, 1802. Rink, Professor of
Theology and of Oriental Languages, at Heidelberg, was an orientalist of
considerable eminence. Vater is, of course, the well-known successor of
Adelung as editor of the _Mithridates_.

[340] Thus, in one of Mezzofanti’s letters, in 1812, he speaks of “Le
molestie che si spesso Le ho date colle mie lettere.”

[341] M. Patru spent three years in translating Cicero’s “Pro Archia;”
and in the end, had not satisfied himself as to the rendering of the very
first sentence.

[342] Moore’s _Diary_, III., 183.

[343] D’ Israeli’s Curiosities of Literature, p. 524.

[344] Moore’s _Diary_, III., 183.

[345] See Historisch-Politische Blätter, x. 203-4.

[346] See Alison’s History of Europe, Vol. vi., p. 371-2.

[347] Santagata “Sermones Duo,” p. 9.

[348] By his celebrated Essay “Ueber die Sprache und Weisheit der
Indier,” 1808.

[349] As this letter may perhaps possess some bibliographical value, I
shall translate it here—

“In making the catalogue for the library of His Excellency Count
Marescalchi, Minister of Foreign Affairs for the kingdom of Italy, I
have discovered a copy of the Siliprandine edition of Petrarch, which
corresponds exactly to the very full description published by you, except
that in this one the table of contents is at the close, in which place
you remark, (at page 35,) it would stand better than in that which it
occupies in your Parma copies. The leaves are 188 in number, as there
happens to be a second blank one before the index.

“I mention the fact to you at the suggestion of His Excellency; but I
gladly avail myself of the opportunity which the communication affords
me of thanking you in writing for your kindness in presenting me with
your learned letter upon the present edition, together with your valuable
bibliographical notices of the two exceedingly rare editions of the 15th
century,” and of renewing, at the same time, the assurance of my respect
and esteem.

“Bologna, Nov. 30, 1811.”

The title of Pezzana’s essay is “Noticie bibliographiche intoruo a due
rarissime edizioni del Petrarca del Secolo xv.,” Parma: 1808. It is
printed by Bodoni.

[350] _Opere di Pietro Giordani, Vols. I.-VI._ Milano, 1845. Giordani
is mentioned by Byron, (Life and Journals, VI, 262,) as one of the few
“foreign literary men whom he ever could abide.” It is curious that the
only other name which he adds is that of Mezzofanti.

[351] Opere di Pietro Giordani: Edited (with a biography) by Antonio
Gussalli. Gussalli is also the translator of F. Cordara’s “Expedition of
Charles Edward,” Milan: 1845. See Quarterly Review, lxxix., pp. 141-68.

[352] Ibid, pp. 235-36

[353] Cicognara is mentioned by Byron in the Dedication of the Fourth
Canto of Childe Harold (VIII. 192.) among “the great names which Italy
has still.”

[354] Ibid, p. 240.

[355] Opere di Pietro Giordani, II. 231.—Letter to Leopoldo Cicognara,
Jan. 30.

[356] Santagata “Sermones,” p. 20-1. There is a mixture of humour and
stateliness in the Doctor’s Latin rendering of the exclamation;—“_Ædepol,
est Diabolus!_”

[357] “Orazioni Funebrie Discorsi Panegyrici, di quelli pronunciati da
Moise S. Beer, già Rabbino Maggiore presso l’Università Israelitica di
Roma.” Fascicolo primo. Livorno 1837. The name _Beer_ is an eminent one
among the German Jews. The dramatist Michael Beer of Berlin; his brother,
William Beer the astronomer; and a second brother, Meyer Beer the
composer, (commonly written as one name, _Meyerbeer_,) have made it known
throughout Europe. Possibly Moses Beer was of the same family.

[358] See Stolz, “Biografia,” p. 12, Manavit, “Esquisse Historique,” p.
34.

[359] Memorandum in the archives of the University of Bologna.

[360] Many of these will be found in Mr. Watts’s interesting paper read
before the Philological Society, January 23, 1852: “On the Extraordinary
Powers of Cardinal Mezzofanti as a Linguist.” Some other notices, not
contained in that Paper, have since been kindly pointed out to me by the
same gentleman. I have been enabled to add several, hitherto unpublished,
certainly not inferior in authority and interest to any of the published
testimonies.

[361] He is so described by Baron Zach, (Correspondance Astronomique, IV.
145,) who commends the work highly.

[362] Kephalides, “Reise durch Italien und Sicilien,” vol. I. p.
28. The book is in two volumes, and has no date. The above passage
is quoted in Vulpius’s singular miscellany, “Curiositäten der
physisch-literarisch-artistisch-historischen Vor- und Mit-welt.” Vol.
X. p. 422. The Article contains nothing else of interest regarding
Mezzofanti; but it alludes to some curious examples of extraordinary
powers of memory.

[363] MS. Memorandum in the University Archives.

[364] The exact amount I am unable to state. But that, according to our
notions, it was very humble, may be inferred from the fact that, in the
same University and but a short time before, Giordani’s income from the
united offices of Lecturer on Latin and Italian Eloquence and Assistant
Librarian, was but 1800 francs. See his Life by Gussalli, “_Opere_,” Vol.
I., p. 19.

[365] MS. Memorandum in the University Archives.

[366] “Tragedie di Sofocle, recate in Versi Italiani da Massimo
Angelelli.” 2 vols., 4to. Bologna, 1823-4. This translation is highly
commended by Federici, in his “Notizie degli Scrittori Greci e delle
Versioni Italiane delle loro Opere,” p. 95.

[367] See Adelung’s “Mithridates,” II., 723-30. I refer to this passage
particularly, as explaining the peculiar difficulty which Wallachian, as
a spoken language, presents to a foreigner, from _its close resemblance
to other languages_.

[368] Manavit, p. 37.

[369] Besides the _Sette Communi_ of Vicenza, there are also
thirteen parishes in the province of Verona, called the _Tredici
Communi_;—evidently of the same Teutonic stock, and a remnant of the same
Roman slaughter. Adelung (II., 215) gives a specimen of each language.
Both are perfectly intelligible to any German scholar: but that of
Verona resembles more nearly the modern form of the German language.
The affinity is much more closely preserved in both, than it is in
the analogous instance of the Roman colony in Transylvania. I may be
permitted to refer to the very similar example of an isolated race and
language which subsisted _among ourselves_ down to the last generation,
in the Baronies of Forth and Bargie in the county of Wexford in Ireland.
The remnant of the first English or Welsh adventurers under Strongbow,
who obtained lands in that district, maintained themselves, through
a long series of generations, distinct in manners, usages, costume,
and even language, both from the Irish population, and, what is more
remarkable, from the _English settlers of all subsequent periods_.
An essay on their peculiar dialect, with a vocabulary and a metrical
specimen, by Vallancey, will be found in the Transactions of the Royal
Irish Academy, Vol. II. (Antiquities), pp. 194-3.

[370] Eustace’s Classical Tour in Italy, I., 142. The fact of Frederic’s
visit is mentioned by Maffei, in his Verona Illustrata.

[371] Memoirs of Robert Southey, Vol. V., p. 60.

[372] Life of Michael Angelo Buonarroti, 2 vols., 8vo. London, 1857.

[373] Treasures of Art in England. By Dr. Waagen. Vol. III., pp. 187-94.

[374] I find the work (Croker’s Edition, London, 1847) in the Catalogue
of the “Libreria Mezzofanti,” p. 72.

[375] I may add that, in order to guard against any possible
misapprehension of Mr. Harford’s opinion, I called his attention to the
doubt which has arisen on the subject. In reply Mr. Harford assured me
that he himself heard Mezzofanti _speak_ Welsh at his first visit to
Bologna, in 1817.

[376] Letters from the North of Italy, Vol. II., p. 54.

[377] See Life, IV., p. 32. He had not visited Bologna in the interval.

[378] Perhaps it might be inferred from the false spelling of the
name—the use of _ph_ for _f_—(a blunder which violates so fundamental a
rule of Italian orthography as to betray a mere tyro in the study) that
this passage was penned soon after Byron’s arrival in Italy. But Byron’s
orthography was never a standard.

[379] Manavit, p. 106.

[380] Life and Works, IV., 262-3. It may be worth while to note this
curious and characteristic passage, as an example of what Byron has
been so often charged with—unacknowledged, (and perhaps unconscious)
plagiarisms from authors or works which are but little known. The idea of
“a universal interpreter at the time of the tower of Babel,” is copied
literally from Pope’s metrical version of the second satire of Dr. Donne,
to the hero of which the same illustration is applied, in exactly the
same way.

    “Thus others’ talents having nicely shown,
    He came by sure transition to his own;
    Till I cried out: ‘You prove yourself so able,
    _Pity you was not druggerman_ [dragoman] _at Babel!_
    For had they found a linguist half so good,
    I make no question but the Tower had stood.’”

[381] Yet not without foundation in fact. My friend Mr. James E. Doyle,
was assured by the late Dr. Charles R. Walsh (an English surgeon of great
ability, who fell a victim to his exertions as an officer of the Board of
Health, during the last cholera in London), that he once heard Mezzofanti
“doing” the slang of a London cabman in great perfection.

[382] Gaume, “Les Trois Rome,” II., p. 415.

[383] Santagata, “Sermones Duo,” p. 11.

[384] Santagata, pp. 19-20.

[385] Bologna, 1820.—It was on the occasion of the celebration of
Father Aponte’s “Jubilee”—the fiftieth anniversary of his ordination as
priest—that Mezzofanti addressed to him the Hebrew Psalm which will be
found in the Appendix.

[386] Reise durch Italien, I. p. 30-2.

[387] Biographie Universelle (Brussels Edition), XIX., 50-1.

[388] Italy, I., 292.

[389] Lady Morgan’s Italy, Vol. I., p. 200.

[390] This was not a mere joke. The Bolognese dialect has so many
peculiarities that, at least by any other than an Italian, it might well
deserve to be specially enumerated as a distinct acquisition. It has even
a kind of literature of its own;—a comedy of the 16th century, entitled
_Filolauro_; a version of the _Gerusalemme Liberata_; and several other
works named by Adelung (II., 514). The Bolognese Pater Noster is as
follows:—

“Pader noster, ch’ si in cil, si pur santifica al voster nom; vegna ’l
voster reyn; sia fatta la vostra volontà, com in cil, cosi in terra; ’l
noster pan quotidian daz incu; e perdonaz i noster debit, sicom no alteri
perdonen ai noster debitur; en c’indusi in Tentazion; ma liberaz da mal.
Amen.” Adelung, II., 515.

[391] Molbech’s Reise giennem en Deel af Tydskland, Frankrige England, og
Italien, i Aarene 1819 og 1820, vol. iii. p. 319, and following.

[392] The _Danske Ordbog_; first published in Copenhagen in 1833. The
veteran author, now in his seventy-first year, is actively employed in
preparing a new edition with large additions and improvements.

[393] Manavit, p. 50.

[394] Ibid, p. 51.

[395] Letter of the Abate Matranga, dated August 17, 1855.

[396] Correspondance Astronomique, February 20. The reader may be puzzled
at this seemingly anticipatory date; but the issue of the journal was
extremely irregular, and the February number was in reality not published
till after September in that year.

[397] Correspondance Astronomique, vol. iv. pp. 191-2.

[398] Correspondance Astronomique, vol. v. p. 160.

[399] Correspondance Astronomique, v. 163.

[400] Vol. I. pp. 481-2, London, 1844.

[401] In accounting for the appearance of such a narrative in a Journal
with a purely scientific title, Admiral Smyth observes, that “it was one
of Von Zach’s axioms that all true friends of science should try to keep
it afloat in society, as fishermen do their nets, by attaching pieces of
cork to the seine; and therefore he embodied a good deal of anecdote in
his monthly journal of astronomical correspondence, a most delightful and
useful periodical.”

[402] Mezzofanti and his friend presented to the Admiral the first volume
of the “Ephemerides,” which contained the coefficients for the principal
stars to be observed during five years—there were still at that time
three years to run;—and expressed a hope that England would contribute
funds towards the cost of the printing. On returning to England, the
admiral gave this copy to the Rev. Dr. William Pearson, then engaged
in the publication of his elaborate work on Practical Astronomy. Dr.
Pearson, (at p. 495 of the first volume,) describing a table of 520
zodiacal stars, thus acknowledges his obligations to that work. “The same
page also contains the N.E. angle that the star’s meridian makes with the
ecliptic, and the annual variation of that angle; the principal columns
of which have been taken from the _Bononiæ Ephemerides_ for 1817-1822,
computed by Pietro Caturegli, which computations have greatly facilitated
our labours.”

[403] Borrow’s Gipsies in Spain, p. 240. Ample specimens and descriptions
of it are given by Adelung, vol. I. pp. 244-52. It may, perhaps, be
necessary to add that neither of these dialects, nor indeed of any of the
dialects used by European gipsies, bears the least resemblance (although
often confounded with it) to the “thieves’ slang,” which is used by
robbers and other _mauvais sujets_ in various countries,—the “Rothwälsch”
(Red Italian) of Germany, the “Argot” of France, the “Germania” of
Spain, and the “Gergo” of Italy. All these, like the English “slang,”
consist chiefly of words borrowed from the languages of the several
countries in which they prevail, applied in a hidden sense known only
to the initiated. On the contrary the gipsy idiom is almost a language
properly so called. See a singular chapter in Borrow’s Gipsies in Spain,
242-57. For a copious vocabulary of the “Argot” of the French thieves,
see M. Nisard’s most curious and amusing _Litterature du Colportage_, II.
383-403.

[404] Blume’s Iter Italicum, II. p. 152.

[405] In 1823. See an interesting biography in the Memorie di Modena.

[406] Manavit, p. 51.

[407] I may preserve here an impromptu Greek distich of Mezzofanti’s,
addressed to Cavedoni on the publication of his “Memoir on the
antiquities of the Museum of Modena,” which, although commonplace enough
in sentiment, at least illustrates his curious facility of versification.

                  “Εις Kαιλεστινον Kαυεδόνιον.
    Μνήματα τῶν πάλαι ἄνθρwπων σοφὸς ὅσσ’ ἀναφαίνεις,
    Ἔκ χρόνος ὂυ πέρθει· σὄν δὲ κλέος θαλέθει.”

It was an impromptu in the literal sense of the word, being thrown off
without a moment’s thought, and in the midst of a group of friends. His
friend Ferrucci rendered it into the following Latin distich.

                  Celestino Cavedonio.
    Omnia que prudens aperis monumenta priorum
    Ævo intacta manent: hinc tibi fama viget.

[408] “L’Eneide di Virgilio, recata in versi Italiani, da Annibale
Caro,” 2 vols. folio. It was printed by De Romanis. The duchess was
the Lady Elizabeth Hervey, daughter of the episcopal Earl of Bristol;
and after the death of her first husband, Mr. Forster, had married
the Duke of Devonshire. She is the true heroine of Gibbon’s ludicrous
love-scene at Lausanne, described by Lord Brougham, but by him related
of Mademoiselle Susan Curchod, afterwards Madame Necker. See an article
in the Biographie Universelle, (lxii, p. 452,) by the Chevalier Artand
de Montor; also “Critical and Miscellaneous Essays, (vol. i., p. 64,) by
an Octogenarian,” (the late Mr. James Roche, of Cork, the J. R. of the
Gentleman’s Magazine, and a frequent contributor to the Dublin Review,
and other periodicals)—a repertory of curious literary and personal
anecdotes, as well of solid and valuable information.

[409] This is probably the Grammar of the Mahratta language, published by
the Propaganda, in 1778. The name is sometimes latinized in this form.
Adelung, I., 220.

[410] Most likely Ludolf’s, Francfort, 1698.

[411] By Barth. Ziegenbolg, Halle, 1716.

[412] Bernard Havestadt, “Descriptio Status tum Naturalis, tum civilis,
tum Moralis, Regni Populique Chilensis,” Munster, 1777. It contains a
Chilian Grammar and Vocabulary, together with a Catechism in prose, and
also in verse.

[413] Probably the Catechism in the Moxa (South American) language,
mentioned by Hervas. See Adelung, III., 564.

[414] Fr. Jacobs, Vermischte Schriften, vol. vi. p. 517, and following.

[415] Stolz. _Biografia_, p. 10. For the details, however, I am indebted
to an interesting communication from the abate Mazza, Vice-Rector of the
Pontifical Seminary at Bologna.

[416] The author of this version, Ercole Faello, is not mentioned by
Tiraboschi, nor can I find any other notice of him. His version has no
value, except perhaps as a bibliographical curiosity; and Mezzofanti’s
criticism of it in his letter to Cavedoni, is the most judicious that
could be offered—the simple recital of a few sentences as a specimen of
its obscure and involved style. The Tetrasticha, especially, deserves
a better rendering. It consists of fifty-nine iambic tetrastichs, many
of which, besides the solid instruction which they embody, are full of
simple beauty. The Monosticha is chiefly notable as an ancient example
of an acrostic poem on a spiritual subject. It consists of twenty-four
iambic verses, commencing in succession with the successive letters of
the alphabet, thus:—

    Ἀρχήν ἁπάντω· καὶ τὲλος ποιὂυ Θεόν·
    Βίου τὸ κέρδος ὲκβιοῦ καθ’ ἡμέραν. κ.τ.λ.

Faello’s version appears not to have been known to the Benedictine
editors.

[417] See _Catalogo della Libreria_, p. 65.

[418] For an account of these books see Father Vincenzo Sangermano’s
_Relazione del Regno Barmano_, Rome, 1833. Sangermano was a Barnabite
Father, and had been for many years a missionary in Ava and Pegu. He
states that he himself translated these sacred books. (p. 359.) His
orthography of the names is slightly different from Mezzofanti’s.

[419] Idler in Italy, III. p. 321.

[420] Padre Scandellari died in December, 1831. He is spoken of in terms
of high praise in the Gazzetta di Bologna for Dec. 27.

[421] Madame de Chaussegros was the widow of the officer by whom Toulon
was surrendered to the English, in 1793.

[422] In the hope of arriving at a still more accurate estimate of
Mezzofanti’s performance in German conversation, I wrote to request of
Dr. Tholuck a note of the “four minor mistakes” to which he alluded.
Unfortunately the memorandum which he had made at the time, although he
recollects to have observed it quite recently in his papers, has been
mislaid, as has also been the Persian distich which Mezzofanti composed
during the interview.

[423] At the time of the Restoration, Cornish was still a living
language, especially in the West; but, a century later it had quite
disappeared, its sole living representative being an old fish-woman,
Dolly Pentrath, who was still able to curse and scold in her expressive
vernacular. See Adelung, II. 152.

[424] It was in great part from these papers that Cav. Minarelli compiled
the list of the several languages cultivated at various times by Cardinal
Mezzofanti, to which I shall have occasion to refer soon after.

[425] There is another circumstance of Dr. Tholuck’s narrative which it
is not easy to reconcile with the account already cited (p. 239,) from
M. Molbech’s Travels;—namely, that “when addressed in Danish he replied
in Swedish,” since the former was the only language in which, during an
interview of about two hours, Mezzofanti conversed with M. Molbech. In
order to remove all uncertainty as to this point, I have had inquiry of
M. Molbech in person, through the kind offices of the Rev. Dr. Grüder,
a learned German Missionary resident at Copenhagen, who himself knew
Cardinal Mezzofanti, and whose testimony to the purity and fluency of
his Eminence’s German conversation I may add to the many already known.
M. Molbech reiterates and confirms all the statements made by him in
his ‘Travels.’ He has even taken the trouble to forward a note in his
own hand-writing, referring to the page in the Transactions of the
Philological Society, which contains M. Watts’s translation from his
book. He adds, that when in 1847, his son waited upon the Cardinal in
Rome, for the purpose of presenting him some of M. Molbech’s works, he
found his Eminence’s recollection of the interview perfectly fresh and
accurate as to all its details.

[426] The reader will scarcely agree with this observation of Dr.
Tholuck. The Quichua was one of the languages which, as the Dr.
testifies, Mezzofanti only professed to know _imperfectly_. It must be
remembered too, that, during his early years he had many and prolonged
opportunities of intercourse with Father Escobar and other South American
Jesuit missionaries, who had settled at Bologna, and from whom he may
have acquired the language, much more solidly than he could be supposed
to learn it from a few casual interviews such as Dr. Tholuck most
probably contemplated.

[427] The Gulistan is found in the Cardinal’s catalogue, p. 109.

[428] p. 26. Oddly enough they are classed among the _Bohemian_ books.

[429] _Friesche Rymlerije._ It is mentioned by Adelung, II. p. 237.

[430] Vol. xvi., p. 229-30.

[431] See a very curious chapter in Tiraboschi, vol. vii., p. 139-201;
which Disraeli has, as usual, turned freely to his own account in the
Curiosities of Literature, p. 348-54.

[432] This is the origin of the nom-de-guerre, La Lasca—(_the Roach_,) by
which the too notorious novelist, Grazzini, chose to designate himself as
member of this society.

[433] All’ Em̅o Signor Cardinal Giuseppe Mezzofanti, Applausi dei
Filopieri, 8vo. Bologna, 1838.

[434] Algebra, with Arithmetic and Mensuration; from the Sanscrit of
Brahmegupta and Bhascara. Translated by H. T. Colebroke, London, 1817.
The _Bija Gannita_ had already been published by Mr. Strachey in 1813.
In referring to these Hindoo treatises on Mathematics, I may add, that
an interesting account of the Hindoo Logic, contributed by Professor Max
Müller, is appended to Mr. Thompson’s “Outline of the Laws of Thought,”
(pp. 369-89,) London, 1853. The analogies of all these treatises with
the works of the Western writers on the same sciences, are exceedingly
curious and interesting.

[435] Some curious and interesting remarks on the peculiarity of the
Indian languages here mentioned by M. Libri, will be found in Du
Ponceau’s “Memoire sur le Systeme Grammaticale des Langues Indiennes,”
pp. 143, and foll. Some words in the Chippewa language contain _thirteen_
or _fourteen_ syllables; but they should be called phrases rather
than words. M. Du Ponceau gives an example from the language of the
Indians of Massachusetts—the word _wutappesittukquissunnuhwehtunkquoh_,
“_genuflecting_!” p. 143. The same characteristic is found in the
Mexican and Central American languages. In Mexican “a parish-priest” is
“_notlazomanitzteopitzkatatzins_!”

[436] While M. Libri was writing this letter, he learned that Count
Pepoli was in possession of a short autobiographical sketch of
Mezzofanti. The count subsequently was good enough to permit me to
inspect this fragment; but I was mortified to find that it was not by the
Cardinal himself, but by some member of his family. It is very short, and
contains no fact which I had not previously known.

[437] See the series of the _Gazzetta di Bologna_; see also Spalding’s
“Italy and the Italian Islands,” for a compendious but accurate summary
of the facts.

[438] See the official announcements in the _Diario di Roma_ in March and
April.

[439] _Diario di Roma_, May 9, 1831.

[440] Mijne Reis naar Rome in het voorjaar van 1837. II. p. 35.

[441] The Memoirs of Father Ripa have enjoyed great popularity in the
abridged form in which they are published in Murray’s Home and Colonial
Library. This abridgment, however, gives but little idea of the work
itself.

[442] This Bull is in the _Bullarium_ of the Propaganda.

[443] Epistola Innocent III. vol. II. 723.

[444] According to my informant at Naples, the affection under which
Mezzofanti laboured is described by the local phrase “_rompergli le
chiancarelle_,”—a Neapolitan idiom which expresses something like our own
phrase that “his brains were addled.” It was ascribed to the excessive
difficulty of the Chinese, and to his own immoderate application. My
informant also states that, at his worst moments, his mind was recalled
at once from its wandering by the mere mention of the name of the Holy
Father, to whom he was most tenderly attached.

[445] Fleck’s Wissenschaftliche Reise, I. p. 94.

[446] After the Revolution of 1848-9 the Chinese students for a time
ceased to be sent to the Propaganda. Their entire course was completed in
the Neapolitan College. They have again resumed their attendance.

[447] Letters and Journals, III. 313, 315, 334.

[448] On the extraordinary Powers of Card. Mezzofanti, p. 122.

[449] Annales d’un Physicien Voyageur, par F. Forster, M.D. pp. 60-1,
Bruges, 1851.

[450] Miss Mitford, in her “Recollections of a Literary Life,” (vol. II.
203) relates this anecdote differently. She has confounded together two
different periods at which Dr. Baines met Mezzofanti—the first at Bologna
when this incident occurred, the second many years later, when Mezzofanti
was Librarian of the Vatican. The anecdote, as related above, was
communicated to me by the late Rev. Dr. Cox, of Southampton, who learned
it from the bishop himself.

[451] The relation of the English language to the ancient British tongue
is discussed by Latham, “The English Language,” vol. I. p. 344-5.

[452] Des Caractères Physiologiques des Races Humaines considérés dans
leur Rapports avec l’Histoire. Par. W. F. Edwards, p. 102.

[453] It can scarcely be necessary to allude to Mgr. Malou’s admirable
book On the Reading of the Bible in the vulgar Tongue. His interesting
essay On the Authorship of the Imitation of Christ, is less known.

[454] For this and the following notices I am indebted to the kind
offices of my friend Canon Donnet of Brussels.

[455]

    “God calls, and points out the path of perfection,
    Hearken my friend, to His voice—the voice of Truth.”

[456] Mijne Reis naar Rom in het Voorjahr van 1837. Door Dr. Jan J. F.
Wap., 2 vols., 8vo., Breda, 1839.

[457] In the year 1837. This is a slight mistake: he was only sixty-three.

[458] These books are found upon the Catalogue, p. 105.

[459] Afterwards Professor in the Catholic Seminary of Warmond, in
Holland, and at present Curé at Soest, in the province of Utrecht.

[460] “Let him who dares to doubt the gift of Pentecost, stand ashamed
and confounded before the mind of Mezzofanti. In him, let him honour that
man who is fit to be the earth’s interpreter—whose intellect penetrates
the language-secret of all nations.

“Accept, son of the South, the respectful salutation of the North. But
think, while your eye beholds my poor address, that if the Batavians’
language lacks Italian melody, their tongue and soul are both averse to
flattery.”

Mezzofanti’s reply:—

“Sir, when first the day my eyes were cast upon your beautiful address,
I was quite enraptured by your great kindness. It so raised up my mind
and heart, that, although master of fifty languages, my tongue remained
speechless—But lest I should seem an ingrate, I beg you just to read my
heart.”

[461] This is not quite correctly cited—The passage is in the sixth of
the Elegies, “aus Rom,” [vol. I. p. 48. Paris, 1836.]

        ————So hab’ ich von Herzen,
    Rothstrumpf immer gehasst und violet-strumpf dazu.

It certainly deserves all the ridicule which Mezzofanti heaps on it, and
might well make

        ————the Muses, on their racks,
    Scream like the winding of ten thousand jacks.

The allusion to ‘red stocking’ and ‘violet stocking,’ is one of Goethe’s
habitual sneers at the Catholic prelacy.

[462] The idea which Mezzofanti throws out here as to the seeming
national unconsciousness of the metrical capabilities of the Magyar
language is very curiously developed by Mr. Watts, in a paper recently
read before the Philological Society. Transactions of Phil. Society,
1855, pp. 285-310.

[463] Steger’s Ergänzungs-Conversations-Lexicon. Vol. IX., pp. 395-7. The
work which is intended as a supplement to the existing Encyclopædias, is
a repertory of interesting and novel information.

[464] The only Maltese books in the Mezzofanti catalogue are the New
Testament; Panzavecchia’s Grammatica della Lingua Maltese, Malta, 1845,
and Vassalli’s Lexicon.

[465] Letter dated February 18, 1857.

[466] Letter dated February 20, 1857.

[467] See Biographie Universelle, art. _Vella_. Also Adelung’s
Mithridates, I. 416.

[468] Di Marco Polo, e degli altri Viaggiatori Veneziani, 2 vols., 4to,
Venice, 1818.

[469] Signor Drach is the author of an erudite Essay, “Du Divorce dans la
Synagogue,” and of several interesting dissertations on the Talmud.

[470] One of the victims in 1840, of the tyrannical church policy of the
late Czar in Poland and Polish Russia—He was exiled to Siberia.

[471] I have used the translation published in Mr. Watts’s paper,
restoring, however, a few sentences which were there omitted.

[472] Fleck’s Wissenschaftliche Reise, I. pp. 93-5.

[473] Miss Mitford’s Recollections of a Literary Life, II. p. 203.

[474] See Supra, pp. 143-4.

[475] The Catalogue (p. 33,) contains the complete edition, 5 vols.,
8vο., Stockholm, 1826; also the works of Kellgren, Leopold, and others.
It also comprises the Frithiofs-Saga, and other early Scandinavian
remains.

[476] Letter of M. D’Abbadie, May 6, 1855.

[477] The Abate Matranga is often mentioned with high praise by Cardinal
Mai in his prefaces. He is favourably known to Greek scholars besides
by his _Anecdota Græca_, 2 vols. 8vo., Rome, 1850, consisting of the
_Allegoriæ Homericæ_ of Tzetzes, and many other remains of ancient
scholiast commentators upon Homer, and of some unpublished Anacreontic
poems of the Byzantine period.

[478] Moore (Diary, III. p. 183,) mentions him as “the Abate Meli, a
Sicilian poet, of whom he had never heard before.” He is, nevertheless,
a voluminous writer of pastorals, sonnets, ballads, and odes, sacred and
profane. His largest poem, however, is an epic of twelve cantos on the
History of Don Quixote, in _ottava rima_. After a little trouble it may
be read without much difficulty by any one acquainted with the ordinary
Italian, and is highly amusing. Meli’s works are collected into one vol.
royal 8vo., Palermo, 1846.

[479] See account in _Civiltà Cattolica_ (by F. Bresciani) vii., p. 569.

[480] See Adelung’s _Mithridates_, vol. iii, part iii, p. 186.

[481] Ibid, p. 187.

[482] Since the above was written, a case somewhat similar has been
mentioned to me by the Rev Dr. Murray of Dublin, also a student of the
Propaganda. A young Mulatto of the Dutch West Indian Island of Curaçoa,
named Enrico Gomez, arrived about a fortnight before Epiphany, 1845.
He spoke no language except the “Nigger Dutch,” of his native island.
Mezzofanti took him into his hands, and before the day of Academy
(the Sunday after Epiphany) he had not only established a mode of
communication with him, but had learned his language, and even composed
for him a short poetical piece, which Gomez recited at the Academy!
A third case, of three Albanian youths, is mentioned in the Civiltà
Cattolica, VII. p. 571.

[483] These youths are mentioned in “Shea’s Catholic Missions among the
Indian Tribes” (p. 387,) a work of exceeding interest and most carefully
executed.

[484] Sketches in Canada, pp. 214-15.

[485] See his Memoire sur le Systeme Grammaticale, p. 97, also p. 306,
and in the appendix _passim_.

[486] See Du Ponceau, Memoire, p. 294-5.

[487] Not only are the inflexions entirely different from those of the
languages to which we are accustomed, but the very use of inflexions is
altogether peculiar. For example, in the Chippewa language there is an
inflexion of nouns, similar to our conjugation of verbs, by which all the
states of the noun are expressed. Thus the word _man_ can be inflected
for person, to signify, ‘_I am_ a man,’ ‘_thou art_ a man,’ ‘_he is_ a
man;’ &c. So also the inflexions of the verb transitive vary according to
the gender of the object—See Mrs. Jameson, p. 196. Schoolcraft ascribes
the same character to the entire Algonquin family—See Du Ponceau, pp.
130-5.

[488] Letter of M. d’Abbadie, dated May 4, 1855.

[489] Letter of May 23rd, 1855.

[490] The Signor Churi mentioned by M. Fernando is the author of a
curious and interesting volume of travels—“The Sea Nile, the Desert
and Nigritia,” published in 1853. Being obliged by ill health to leave
the Propaganda, and unwilling for many reasons to return to his native
Lebanon, he settled in London as a teacher of oriental languages. One
of his pupils in Arabic, Captain Peel, engaged him in 1850, as his
interpreter in a tour of Egypt, Syria, and the Holy Land, and afterwards,
in 1851, in an expedition to the interior of Africa, which forms the
subject of Signor Churi’s volume.

[491] I have been assured by M. Bauer, a student of the Propaganda in
1855, that he often conversed with the Cardinal in Hungarian, during the
years 1847 and 1848.

[492] A comparative Grammar of the Dravidian, or South-Indian Family of
Languages. By the Rev. R. Caldwell, B.A., London, 1856.

[493] In a letter dated Calcutta, September 20, 1855.

[494] Letter dated Calcutta, September 22, 1855.

[495] See a most amusing account by Père Bourgeois, in the Lettres
Edifiantes, of his first Chinese Sermon, which D’Israeli has translated.
An interesting exposition of the difficulties of the Chinese language is
found in Grüber’s Relazione di Cina, Florence, 1697.

[496] Dated Rome, May 23, 1855.

[497] What Europeans call the Mandarin language is by the Chinese
designated Houan-Hoa, or universal language. It is spoken by instructed
persons throughout the Empire, although with a marked difference of
pronunciation in the northern and the southern provinces. Besides this,
there are dialects peculiar to the provinces of Kouang-tong, and Fo-kien,
as well as several minor dialects. See Huc’s Chinese Empire, I. p. 319-20.

[498] See Adelung, Mithridates, III. part I. pp. 207-24.

[499] Letter of February 7, 1857. I had submitted these pieces to Dr.
Livingston; but as he, having been ill all the time he remained in
Angola, had never learned that language, he was good enough to send the
papers to Mr. Brande. The latter, besides kindly communicating to me his
own opinion regarding them, has taken the trouble to forward them to
a friend at Loando, to be submitted to an intelligent native in whose
judgment Mr. Brande has full confidence; but as yet (March 15, 1858,) no
reply has reached me.

[500] See an excellent article in Morone’s “Dizionario di Erudizione
Storico-ecclesiastica,” as also the Kirchen-Lexicon, vol. II. 344 and
foll.

[501] A friend of mine who chanced to pass as one of these carriages
(which had been dismantled preparatory to its being newly fitted up,)
was on its way to the Pontifical Factory for the purpose, overheard some
idle boys who were looking on, laughing at its heavy, lumbering look, and
saying to each other: “_Che barcaccia!_” (What a shocking old boat!). He
was greatly amused at the indignation with which the coachman resented
this impertinent criticism.

[502] A sample of Mezzofanti’s own performance as a Filopiero—his reply
to the verses of his friend, Count Marchesi—is given by Marchetti, in his
_Pagine Monumentali_, p. 150.

    De tuoi versi il contento,
    Cosi nell’ alma io sento,
    Che versi rendo gratulando teco,
    Ma oime’! ch’ io son qual eco,
    Che molti suoni asconde,
    E languida da lungi al fin responde.

[503] The title is “All’ Ementissimo Signor Cardinale Giuseppe
Mezzofanti, Bolognese, elevato all’ Onore della Porpora Romana, Applausi
dei Filopieri, 8vo., Bologna, 1838.” A similar tribute from the pen of
Doctor Veggetti, who had succeeded Mezzofanti as Librarian, appeared
a short time before, entitled “Tributo di Lode a Giuseppe Mezzofanti,
Bolognese, creato Cardinale il Giorno 12 Febbraro, 1838.” Bologna, 1838.

[504] Stolz, Biografia, p. 7.

[505] A bon-mot on occasion of Monsignor Mezzofanti’s elevation, which
I heard from Cardinal Wiseman, and which is ascribed to the good old
Cardinal Rivarola, is worth recording, although the point is not fully
appreciable, except in Italian.

Mezzofanti, from his childhood, had worn ear-rings, as a preventive,
according to the popular notion, against an affection of the eyes, to
which he had been subject. Some one observed that it was strange to see a
“Cardinal wearing ear-rings,” (_chi porta orecchini_.)

“Not at all,” rejoined Cardinal Rivarola, “Ci han da essere tanti uomini
in dignità che portano _orecchine_ (”long ears“—”asses ears,“) e perchè
non ci ha da essere uno almeno chi porti _orecchini_? (ear-rings.) There
are many dignitaries who have _orecchine_, (asses-ears), and why should
not there be at least one with _orecchini_—ear-rings?”

[506] Perhaps it is not generally known that the brothers Antoine and
Arnauld d’Abbadie, although French by name, fortune, and education, are
not only children of an Irish mother, but were born, and spent the first
years of childhood, in Dublin. M. Antoine d’Abbadie lived in Dublin till
his eighth year. See his letter to the Athenæum, (Cairo, Nov. 15, 1848,)
vol. for 1849, p. 93.

[507] The _Journal Asiatique_, passim; the Athenæum, 1839, 1845, 1849:
the Geographical Society of France, and of England, &c.

[508] M. d’Abbadie collected with great care, as opportunity offered,
vocabularies, more or less extensive, of a vast number of the languages
of this region of Africa. His collections, also, on the natural history
and geography, as well as on the religious and social condition of
the country, are most extensive and valuable. The work in which he is
understood to be engaged upon the subject, is looked for with much
interest.

[509] When M. d’Abbadie, in one of his letters to the Athenæum, first
alluded to the Ilmorma, its existence, as a distinct language, was
absolutely denied.

[510] One of the writers on the Basque Grammar, Manuel de Larramendi,
entitles his book, Impossible vencido, (“The Impossible Overcome,”) 8vo.
Salamanca, 1729. Some idea, though a faint one, of the difficulty of this
Grammar, may be formed from the number and names of the words of a Basque
verb. They are no less than eleven; and are denominated by grammarians,
the Indicative, the Consuetudinal, the Potential, the Voluntary,
the Necessary (coactive,) the Imperative, Subjunctive, Optative,
_Penitudinary_ (!) and Infinitive.—The variety of tenses in Basque also,
is very great. But it should be added that the structure of these moods
and tenses is described as singularly philosophical, and full of harmony
and of analogy.

[511] Letter of M. d’Abbadie, May 6, 1855.

[512] Manavit, p. 109.

[513] Olaszhoni es Schweizi Vtazas Irta Paget Janosné Wesselenyi
Polyxena, 1842, vol. I., p. 180. Mr. Watts’s Memoir, p. 121.

[514] This book is in the Library Catalogue, p. 138.

[515] Letter of June 6, 1855.

[516] Volume X. (1842.) p. 227—279-80.

[517] Christmas Holidays at Rome. By the Rev. Ingraham Kip, edited by the
Rev. W. Sewell, p. 175.

[518] Letter of October 11, 1857.

[519] Letter of Feb. 23, 1847.

[520] Italy I. 292.

[521] I think it was the late Rev. John Smyth, a clergyman of Dublin,
who, while I myself was in Rome, conversed with Cardinal Mezzofanti under
the impression that he was speaking with the English Cardinal Acton.

[522] In 3 vols., 12mo., London, 1757. It contains the original and
the translation in parallel pages. The author was Sieur Townley the
well-known collector, and a member of the distinguished catholic family
of that name. The translation is certainly most curiously exact in letter
and in spirit, and fully deserves all that Mr. Badeley has said of it.

[523] The exhibition at present, and for some years back, is held in the
church of the Propaganda.

[524] Of the princely house of Massimo, which is said to claim descent
from the great _Cunctator_. The marked contrast between the diminutive
stature of the Cardinal, and the noble and commanding figure of the
Prince, his elder brother, gave occasion to one of those lively _mots_
for which Rome is celebrated. The brothers were called, “Il Principe
_Massimo_, ed il Cardinal _Menomo_.”

[525] These were (1,) Hebrew; (2,) Syriac; (3,) Samaritan; (4,) ancient
Chaldee; (5,) Modern Chaldee; (6,) Arabic; (7,) ancient Armenian; (8,)
modern Armenian; (9,) Turkish; (10,) Persian; (11,) Albanian; (12,)
Sabean;—a dialect of Syriac, which Adelung prefers to call Zabian;—(13,)
Maltese; (14,) Greek; (15,) Romaic; (16,) Ethiopic; (17,) Coptic; (18,)
Amariña; (19,) Tamul; (20,) Koordish; (21,) Kunkan,—one of the dialects
of the Bengal coast;—(22,) Georgian; (23,) Welsh; (24,) Irish; (25,)
Gælic; (26,) English; (27,) Illyrian; (28,) Bulgarian; (29,) Polish;
(30,) Peguan; (31,) Swedish; (32,) ancient German; (33,) modern German;
(34,) Swiss German; (35,) Dutch; (36,) Spanish; (37,) Catalan; (38,)
Portuguese; (39,) French; (40,) ancient Chinese; (41,) Chinese of
Tchang-si; (42,) Chinese of Canton.

I was somewhat surprised to miss Russian from the catalogue. In the
Academy of the present year, it appears in its proper place. See
“Academia Poliglotta nel Collegio Urbano de Prop. Fide, per l’Epifania
del 1858,” p. 38.

[526] This youth, as I afterwards learned, was called by the strange
name, Moses Ngnau. He was a native of Pegu, and returned to his own
mission in 1850; but unhappily his career was terminated by an early
death.

[527] The journals of this week, (March 18,) relate a most astonishing
feat of the great modern chess-player, Dr. Harwitz. He has just played
three games simultaneously, against three most eminent players, without
once seeing any of the boards, or even entering the room in which the
moves were made, during the entire time! He won two of the games—the
third being a drawn one.

[528] The most recent information regarding this curious subject is
contained in a report by Dr. Aufrecht, which Bunsen has printed in his
Christianity and Mankind, III., p. 87, and foll; See also Mommsen’s
Unter-italische Dialekten.

[529] Letter of January 15, 1857.

[530] Cardinal Wiseman told me of a priest who, after having lived for
twenty years in France, was mortified to find himself discovered as
an Englishman, by the way in which he said “ah!” in expression of his
acknowledgment of an answer given to him by a person to whom he addressed
a question in a crowd. This may explain an anecdote in Moore’s Diary,
which he could not himself understand. A lady was coming in to dinner,
and, on her passing through the ante-room, where Talleyrand was standing,
he looked up and exclaimed insignificantly “ah!” In the course of the
dinner, the lady, having asked him across the table why he had uttered
the exclamation of “oh”! on her entrance, Talleyrand, with a grave
self-vindicatory look, answered; _Madame, je n’ai pas dit_ oh! _j’ai dit_
ah, (_Memoirs VII., p. 5_).

One of the standing jokes against the capuchins in Italy is about an
“alphabet” which they are supposed to learn during the noviciate, and
which consists exclusively of the interjection _O!_—which single sound,
by the varieties of look, gesture, air, and expression which accompany
it, is made to embody almost every conceivable meaning.

Much light is thrown on more than one obscure passage in the Latin
classics by the gesticulations which still prevail in modern Italy,
especially in Naples. See the Canon De Jorio’s extremely curious and
learned book, “Mimica degli Antichi investigata nel Gestire Napolitano.”

[531] Supra, p. 379.

[532] The pun is less observable in writing than in speaking; the words
_weiss-haar_ and _weiser_ resemble each other more closely in sound, than
in appearance. It might be rendered:

“Would to God, that, as I have become _whiter_, so I had also grown
_wiser_!”

[533] This is a mistake. The work published at Philadelphia is not
a general treatise on the Indian Languages, but a Grammar of the
Lenni-Lennape Language nor is it an original work of Du Ponceau: but a
translation by him, with notes, from the German MS. of David Zeisberger.
It is in 4to. and was published at Philadelphia in 1827. Du Ponceau’s own
work on the Indian languages, was published in Paris, 8vo. 1838.

[534] Christmas holidays in Rome, by the Rev. Ingraham Kip.

[535] Gaume, Les Trois Rome, II. 413-4.

[536] Letter of November 9, 1855.

[537] Letter of July 14, 1856.

[538] Remskiya Pisma—(by M. Mouravieff.) vol. I., p. 144.

[539] See the _Allgemeine Zeitung_, for 1846. No. 4, p. 27. See also the
Kirchen-Lexicon. B. IV., p. 729. This interview forms the subject of one
of the most brilliant sketches in Cardinal Wiseman’s “Recollections of
the Last Four Popes,” pp. 409, and foll.

[540] Manavit, p. 113.

[541] Translated by Mr. Watts.

    “The fire that burns within that breast of thine,
    Mother of God! O kindle it in mine.”

                          _Trans. of Philological Society, 1854, p. 148._

[542] See an article in “Household Words,” May 13, 1854 (No. 216). See
also Rohrbacher’s Histoire de l’Eglise, T. XXVIII. pp. 431-42.

[543] Manavit, p. 95.

[544] Quoted by Manavit, p. 98.

[545] Another impromptu epigram composed by the Cardinal, while the
memorable procession of the 8th of September following, was returning
from the Church of Santa Maria del Popolo, amid the universal jubilation
of Rome, and of representatives of all the Papal provinces, has been
communicated to me.

    Te Patre, Teque Pio, junguntur Principe corda:—
    Ecce Tibi unum cor, Felsina, Roma, sumus!

[546] Civiltà Cattolica VII, p. 877. This brilliant account of the
Cardinal is given in the “Appendix” of Father Bresciani’s _Ebreo di
Verona_, and is full of most curious and interesting details.

[547] Civiltà Cattolica, VII. p. 577.

[548] His _zucchetto_, the red skull-cap worn by Cardinals, is preserved
in the collection at Abbotsford.

[549] Civiltà Cattolica, VII. 596.

[550] _Civiltà Cattolica_, VII., p. 578.

[551] I do not know what language is here meant. Perhaps it is a mistake
for _Bavara_—the Bavarian dialect of German: or possibly it may mean the
Dutch of the _Boors_ at the Cape of Good Hope.

[552] Possibly _Berberica_—the Barbary dialect of Arabic.

[553] This is probably meant for _Concanico_—an Indian language which
often appeared in the programme of the Propaganda Academy, while
Mezzofanti was in Rome. It is the dialect of Kunka, in the province of
Orissa.

[554] This is certainly meant for _Tepehuana_, one of the Central
American point of languages.

[555] Probably by these names are meant the two _spoken_ dialects of
the orthodox Christians of modern Egypt. The Coptic (No. 23.) is the
_learned_ language of the Liturgy.

[556] This item, as well as Nos. 47 and 53, may be ascribed to the
writer’s desire to swell the total of his uncle’s languages—I need hardly
say that they have no practical bearing on the question.

[557] I am unable to conjecture the meaning of this name.

[558] This is either a repetition of No. 56., or it designates the whole
class of languages called Iberian, and not an individual language.

[559] Perhaps Misteco—the Mistek; one of the Mexican group of languages.
Many interesting particulars regarding them will be found in Squier’s
Nicaragua.

[560] This probably means the old Celtic of Brittany. No. 50 is the
modern patois of the province.

[561] If this be meant for Gælic, as seems likely, No. 73 can only be the
Lowland Scotch.

[562] I need hardly observe on the vagueness of this name. Mezzofanti
learned from more than one missionary something of the languages of
Oceanica; but how much I have no means of determining.

[563] For Pampanga, one of the languages of the Philippine Islands—an
offshoot of the Malay family.

[564] The old language of Peru. It is fast recovering the ground from
which it had been driven by the Spanish. See Markham’s “Cuzco and Lima.”

[565] I cannot guess what is meant by this name.

[566] A language of the New Hebrides. See Adelung, I. p. 626.

[567] There can be no doubt that much light on this point may be derived
from a thorough examination of these books and manuscripts; and I trust
that some of the Cardinal’s friends at Rome, (where his library is now
deposited, having been purchased for the Vatican,) will undertake the
task. I have endeavoured in some degree to supply the want by a careful
examination of the catalogue published in Rome in 1851, and often cited
in this volume. But it is so full of the grossest and most ludicrous
inaccuracies, so utterly unscientific, and so constantly confounds one
language with another, that it can only be used with the utmost caution,
and at best affords but little assistance for the purposes of the Memoir.

[568] I should observe that I do not think it necessary to adopt the
nomenclature of languages recently introduced. I will for the most part
follow that of Adelung.

[569] I shall refer for the several languages, to the pages which contain
the notices of the Cardinal’s proficiency in each. There are two or three
cases in which the proof may not appear quite decisive: but I have much
understated, even in these, the common opinion of his friends.

[570] In this and the few other instances in which I have referred to
Cavaliere Minarelli’s list of the Cardinal’s languages, it is amply
supported by the printed catalogue of his library, which contains several
works in each language, evidently provided with a view to the study of it.

[571] I once travelled through the entire length of France with a friend,
who was an excellent book-scholar in the French language, but who, from
the feeling which I describe, never could prevail on himself to attempt
to speak French in my presence. During a journey of several days, I only
heard him utter one solitary _oui_; and even this was at a time when he
was not aware that I was within hearing.

[572] p. 290.

[573] p. 78.

[574] P. 391.

[575] P. 291

[576] There is little originality in this piece, the words and forms
being closely scriptural. It is without points, but he occasionally,
also, employed them in writing Hebrew.

[577] Eumetes was the name under which, by ancient usage of the _Arcadi_,
Gregory XVI., before his elevation, had been enrolled in their Academy.

[578] Domenichino’s Communion of St. Jerome.

[579] Communion of St. Sebastian, also by Domenichino.

[580] Guercino’s St. Petronilla.

[581] Algardi’s bas-relief group of Attila and St. Leo.

[582] As I have no knowledge of this or the Grisons language, I fear the
orthography will be found inaccurate.

*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE LIFE OF CARDINAL
MEZZOFANTI ***

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
be renamed.

Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the
United States without permission and without paying copyright
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for an eBook, except by following
the terms of the trademark license, including paying royalties for use
of the Project Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for
copies of this eBook, complying with the trademark license is very
easy. You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation
of derivative works, reports, performances and research. Project
Gutenberg eBooks may be modified and printed and given away--you may
do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks not protected
by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the trademark
license, especially commercial redistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/license.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works

1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
you share it without charge with others.

1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country other than the United States.

1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:

  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  United States, you will have to check the laws of the country where
  you are located before using this eBook.

1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm website
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
provided that:

* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  Literary Archive Foundation."

* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  works.

* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  receipt of the work.

* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of
the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark. Contact the Foundation as set
forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
without further opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
remaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
Defect you cause.

Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
www.gutenberg.org

Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non-profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's business office is located at 809 North 1500 West,
Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up
to date contact information can be found at the Foundation's website
and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without
widespread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine-readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg web pages for current donation
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
edition.

Most people start at our website which has the main PG search
facility: www.gutenberg.org

This website includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

<Y 1874>
<A T. HARDY>
<T Madding Crowd(Penguin 1978)>
<C i>
<P 51>
DESCRIPTION OF FARMER OAK -- AN INCIDENT
When Farmer Oak smiled, the corners of his mouth
spread till they were within an unimportant distance of
his ears, his eyes were reduced to chinks, and diverging
wrinkles appeared round them, extending upon his
countenance like the rays in a rudimentary sketch of
the rising sun.
His Christian name was Gabriel, and on working
days he was a young man of sound judgment, easy
motions, proper dress, and general good character. On
Sundays he was a man of misty views, rather given to
postponing, and hampered by his best clothes and
umbrella : upon the whole, one who felt himself to
occupy morally that vast middle space of Laodicean
neutrality which lay between the Communion people
of the parish and the drunken section, -- that is, he went
to church, but yawned privately by the time the con+
gegation reached the Nicene creed,- and thought of
what there would be for dinner when he meant to be
listening to the sermon. Or, to state his character as
it stood in the scale of public opinion, when his friends
and critics were in tantrums, he was considered rather a
bad man ; when they were pleased, he was rather a good
man ; when they were neither, he was a man whose
moral colour was a kind of pepper-and-salt mixture.
Since he lived six times as many working-days as
Sundays, Oak's appearance in his old clothes was most
peculiarly his own -- the mental picture formed by his
neighbours in imagining him being always dressed in
that way. He wore a low-crowned felt hat, spread out
at the base by tight jamming upon the head for security
in high winds, and a coat like Dr. Johnson's ; his lower
extremities being encased in ordinary leather leggings
and boots emphatically large, affording to each foot a
roomy apartment so constructed that any wearer might
stand in a river all day long and know nothing of
<P 52>
damp -- their maker being a conscientious man who
endeavoured to compensate for any weakness in his cut
by unstinted dimension and solidity.
Mr. Oak 'carried 'about him, by way of watch,+
what may be called a small silver clock; in other
words, it was a watch as to shape and intention, and
a small clock as to size. This instrument being several
years older than Oak's grandfather, had the peculiarity
of going either too fast or not at all. The smaller
of its hands, too, occasionally slipped round on the
pivot, and thus, though the minutes were told with
precision, nobody could be quite certain of the hour
they belonged to. The stopping peculiarity of his
watch Oak remedied by thumps and shakes, and he
escaped any evil consequences from the other two
defects by constant comparisons with and observations
of the sun and stars, and by pressing his face close
to the glass of his neighbours' windows, till he could
discern the hour marked by the green-faced timekeepers
within. It may be mentioned that Oak's fob being
difficult of access, by reason of its somewhat high
situation in the waistband of his trousers (which also
lay at a remote height under his waistcoat), the watch
was as a necessity pulled out by throwing the body to
one-side, compressing the- mouth and face to a mere
mass of- ruddy flesh- on account -of the exertion, and
drawing up the watch by its chain, like a bucket from a
well.
But some thoughtfull persons, who had seen him
walking across one of his fields on a certain December
morning -- sunny and exceedingly mild -- might have
regarded Gabriel Oak in other aspects than these. In
his face one might notice that many of the hues and
curves of youth had tarried on to manhood: there even
remained in his remoter crannies some relics of the boy.
His height and breadth would have been sufficient to
make his presence imposing, had they been exhibited
with due consideration. But there is a way some men
have, rural and urban alike, for which the mind is more
responsible than flesh and sinew : it is a way of curtail+
ing their dimensions by their manner of showing them.
And from a quiet modesty that would have become a
vestal which seemed continually to impress upon him
<P 53>
that he had no great claim on the world's room, Oak
walked unassumingly and with a faintly perceptible
bend, yet distinct from a bowing of the shoulders.
This may be said to be a defect in an individual if he
depends for his valuation more upon his appearance
than upon his capacity to wear well, which Oak did not.
He had just reached the time of life at which " young'
is ceasing to be the prefix of "man ' in speaking of one.
He was at the brightest period of masculine growth,
for his intellect and his emotions were clearly separated :
he had passed the time during which the influence of
youth indiscriminately mingles them in the character
of impulse, and he had not yet arrived at the stage
wherein they become united again, in the character of
prejudice, by the influence of a wife and family. In
short, he was twenty-eight, and a bachelor.
The field he was in this morning sloped to a
ridge called Norcombe Hill. Through a spur of this
hill ran the highway between Emminster and Chalk+
Newton. Casually glancing over the hedge, Oak saw
coming down the incline before him an ornamental
spring waggon, painted yellow and gaily marked,
drawn by two horses, a waggoner walking alongside
bearing a whip perpendicularly. The waggon was
laden with household goods and window plants, and
on the apex of the whole sat a woman, 'young-'and
attractive. Gabriel had not beheld the sight for more
than half a minute, when the vehicle was brought to a
standstill just beneath his eyes.
" The tailboard of the waggon is gone, Miss,' said the
waggoner.
"Then I heard it fall,' said the girl, in a soft, though
not particularly low voice. "I heard a noise I could
not account for when we were coming up the hill.'
"I'll run back.' +
" Do,' she answered. +
The sensible horses stood -- perfectly still, and the
waggoner's steps sank fainter and fainter in the distance.
The girl on the summit of the load sat motionless,
surrounded by tables and chairs with their legs upwards,
backed by an oak settle, and ornamented in front by
pots of geraniums, myrtles, and cactuses, together with
<P 54>
a caged canary -- all probably from the windows of the
house just vacated. There was also a cat in a willow
basket, from the partly-opened lid of which she gazed
with half-closed eyes, and affectionately-surveyed the
small birds around.
The handsome girl waited for some time idly in her
place, and the only sound heard in the stillness-was -the
hopping of the canary up-and down the perches of its
prison. Then she looked attentively downwards. It
was not at the bird, nor at the cat; it was at an oblong
package tied in paper, and lying between them. She
turned her head to learn if the waggoner were coming.
He was not yet in sight; and her-eyes crept back to
the package, her thoughts seeming to run 'upon what
was inside it. At length she drew the article into her
lap, and untied the paper covering; a small swing
looking-glass was disclosed, in which she proceeded to
survey herself attentively. She parted her lips and
smiled.
It was a fine morning, and the sun lighted up to a
scarlet glow the crimson jacket she wore, and painted
a soft lustre upon her bright face and dark hair. The
myrtles, geraniums, and cactuses packed around her
were fresh and green, and at such a leafless season they
invested the whole concern of horses, waggon, furniture,
and girl with a peculiar vernal charm. What possessed
her to indulge in such a performance in the sight of the
sparrows, blackbirds, and unperceived farmer who were
alone its spectators, -- whether the smile began as a
factitious one, to test her capacity in that art, -- nobody
knows ; it ended certainly in a real smile. She blushed
at herself, and seeing her reflection blush, blushed the
more.
The change from the customary spot and necessary
occasion of such an act -- from the dressing hour in a
bedroom to a time of travelling out of doors -- lent to
the idle deed a novelty it did not intrinsically possess.
The picture was a delicate one. Woman's prescriptive
infirmity had stalked into the sunlight, which had
clothed it in the freshness of an originality. A
cynical inference was irresistitle by Gabriel Oak as he
regarded the scene, generous though he fain would have
been. There was no necessity whatever for her looking
in the glass. She did not adjust her hat, or pat her
<P 55>
hair, or press a dimple into shape, or do one thing to
signify that any such intention had been her motive in
taking up the glass. She simply observed herself as a
fair product of Nature in the feminine kind, her thoughts
seeming to glide into far-off though likely dramas in
which men would play a part -- vistas of probable
triumphs -- the smiles being of a phase suggesting that
hearts were imagined as lost and won. Still, this was
but conjecture, and the whole series of actions was so
idly put forth as to make it rash to assert that intention
had any part in them at all.
The waggoner's steps were heard returning. She
put the glass in the paper, and the whole again into its
place.
When the waggon had passed on, Gabriel withdrew
from his point of espial, and descending into the road,
followed the vehicle to the turnpike-gate some way
beyond the bottom of the hill, where the object of his
contemplation now halted for the payment of toll. About
twenty steps still remained between him and the gate,
when he heard a dispute. lt was a difference con+
cerning twopence between the persons with the waggon
and the man at the toll-bar.
" Mis'ess's niece is upon the top of the things, and
she says that's enough that I've offered ye, you great
miser, and she won't pay any more.' These were the
waggoner's words.
"Very well ; then mis'ess's niece can't pass,' said the
turnpike-keeper, closing the gate.
Oak looked from one to the other of the disputants,
and fell into a reverie. There was something in the
tone of twopence remarkably insignificant. Threepence
had a definite value as money -- it was an appreciable
infringement on a day's wages, and, as such, a higgling
matter ; but twopence --  -- " Here,' he said, stepping
forward and handing twopence to the gatekeeper ; "let
the young woman pass.' He looked up at her then;
she heard his words, and looked down.
Gabriel's features adhered throughout their form so
exactly to the middle line between the beauty of St.
John and the ugliness of Judas Iscariot, as represented
in a window of the church he attended, that not a single
lineament could be selected and called worthy either of
distinction or notoriety. The redjacketed and dark+
<P 56>
haired maiden seemed to think so too, for she carelessly
glanced over him, and told her man to drive on. She
might have looked her thanks to Gabriel on a minute
scale, but she did not speak them; more probably she
felt none, for in gaining her a passage he had lost her
her point, and we know how women take a favour of
that kind.
The gatekeeper surveyed the retreating vehicle.
" That's a handsome maid ' he said to Oak
" But she has her faults,' said Gabriel.
" True, farmer. '
"And the greatest of them is -- well, what it is
always.'
" Beating people down ? ay, 'tis so.'
"O no.'
" What, then ? '
Gabriel, perhaps a little piqued by the comely
traveller's indifference, glanced back to where he had
witnessed her performance over the hedge, and said,
" Vanity.'
<C ii>
<P 57>
NIGHT -- THE FLOCK -- AN INIERIOR -- ANOTHER INTERIOR
IT was nearly midnight on the eve of St. Thomas"s, the
shortest day in the year. A desolating wind wandered
from the north over the hill whereon Oak had watched
the yellow waggon and its occupant in the sunshine of
a few days earlier.
  Norcombe Hill -- not far from lonely Toller-Down
 -- was one of the spots which suggest to a passer-by
that he is in the presence of a shape approaching the
indestructible as nearly as any to be found on earth.
It was a featureless convexity of chalk and soil -- an
ordinary specimen of those smoothly-outlined protuber+
ances of the globe which may remain undisturbed on
some great day of confusion, when far grander heights
and dizzy granite precipices topple down.
The hill was covered on its northern side by an
ancient and decaying plantation of beeches, whose
upper verge formed a line over the crest, fringing its
arched curve against the sky, like a mane. To-night
these trees sheltered the southern slope from the keenest
blasts, which smote the wood and floundered through
it with a sound as of grumbling, or gushed over its
crowning boughs in a weakened moan. The dry leaves
in the ditch simmered and boiled in the same breezes,
a tongue of air occasionally ferreting out a few, and
sending them spinning across the grass. A group or
two of the latest in date amongst the dead multitude
had remained till this very mid-winter time on the twigs
which bore them and in falling rattled against the trunks
with smart taps:
Betwenne this half-wooded, half naked hill, and the
vague still horizon that its summit indistinctly com+
manded, was a mysterious sheet of fathomless shade
 -- the sounds from which suggested that what it con+
cealed bore some reduced resemblance to features here.
<P 58>
The thin grasses, more or less coating the hill, were
touched by the wind in breezes of differing powers, and
almost of differing natures -- one rubbing the blades
heavily, another raking them piercingly, another brushing
them like a soft broom. The instinctive act of human+
kind was to stand and listen, and learn how the trees
to each other in the regular antiphonies of a cathedral
choir; how hedges and other shapes to leeward them
caught the note, lowering it to the tenderest sob; and
how the hurrying gust then plunged into the south, to
be heard no more.
The sky was clear -- remarkably clear -- and the
twinkling of all the stars seemed to be but throbs of
one body, timed by a common pulse. The North Star
was directly in the wind's eye, and since evening the
Bear had swung round it outwardly to the east, till he
was now at a right angle with the meridian. A
difference of colour in the stars -- oftener read of than
seen in England-was really perceptible here. The
sovereign brilliancy of Sirius pierced the eye with a steely
glitter, the star called Capella was yellow, Aldebaran and
Betelgueux shone with a fiery red.
To persons standing alone on a hill during a clear
midnight such as this, the roll of the world eastward is
almost a palpable movement. The sensation may be
caused by the panoramic glide of the stars past earthly
objects, which is perceptible in a few minutes of still+
ness, or by the better outlook upon space that a hill
affords, or by the wind, or by the solitude ; but whatever
be its origin, the impression of riding along is vivid and
abiding. The poetry of motion is a phrase much in
use, and to enjoy the epic form of that gratification it
is necessary to stand on a hill at a small hour of the
night, and, having first expanded with a sense of differ+
ence from the mass of civilised mankind, who are
dreamwrapt and disregardful of all such proceedings at
this time, long and quietly watch your stately progress
through the stars. After such a nocturnal reconnoitre
it is hard to get back to earth, and to believe that the
consciousness of such majestic speeding is derived from
a tiny human frame.
Suddenly an unexpected series of sounds began to
<P 59>
be heard
in this place up against the sky. They had a
clearness which was to be found nowhere in the wind,
and a sequence which was to be found nowhere in
nature. They were the notes of Farmer Oak's flute.
The tune was not floating unhindered into the open
air : it seemed muffled in some way, and was altogether
too curtailed in power to spread high or wide. It came
from the direction of a small dark object under the
plantation hedge -- a shepherd's hut -- now presenting
an outline to which an uninitiated person might have
been puzzled to attach either meaning or use.
The image as a whole was that of a small Noah's
Ark on a small Ararat, allowing the traditionary outlines
and general form of the Ark which are followed by toy+
makers -- and by these means are established in men's
imaginations among their firmest, because earliest im+
pressions -- to pass as an approximate pattern. The
hut stood on little wheels, which raised its floor about a
foot from the ground. Such shepherds' huts are dragged
into the fields when the lambing season comes on, to
shelter the shepherd in his- enforced nightly attendance.
It was only latterly that people had begun to call
Gabriel !Farmer' Oak. During the twelvemonth pre+
ceding this time he had been enabled by sustained
efforts of industry and chronic good spirits to lease the
small shepp farm of which Norcombe Hill was a portion,
and stock it with two hundred sheep. Previously he
had been a bailiff for a short time, and earlier still a
shepherd only, having from his childhood assisted his
father in tending the floeks of large proprietors, till old
Gabriel sank to rest.
This venture, unaided and alone, into the paths of
farming as master and not as man, with an advance of
sheep not yet paid for, was a critical juncture with
Gabriel Oak, and he recognised his position clearly.
The first movement in his new progress was the lambing
of his ewes, and sheep having been his speciality from
his "youth, he wisely refrained from deputing -- the task
of tending them at this season to a hireling or a novice.
The wind continued to beat-about the corners of the
hut, but the flute-playing ceased. A rectangular space
of light
<P 60>
appeared in the side of the hut, and in the
opening the outline of Farmer Oak's figure. He carried
a lantern in his hand, and closing the door behind him,
came forward and busied himself about this nook of the
field for nearly twenty minutes, the lantern light appear+
ing and disappearing here and there, and brightening
him or darkening him as he stood before or behind it.
Oak's motions, though they had a quiet-energy, were
slow, and their deliberateness accorded well with his
occupation. Fitness being the basis of beauty, nobody
could-have denied that his steady swings and turns"
in and- about the flock had elements of grace, Yet,
although if occasion demanded he could do or think a
thing with as mercurial a dash as can the men of towns
who are more to the manner born, his special power,
morally, physically, and mentally, was static, owing
little or nothing to momentum as a rule.
A close examination of the ground hereabout, even
by the wan starlight only, revealed how a portion of
what would have been casually called a wild slope had
been appropriated by Farmer Oak for his great purpose
this winter. Detached hurdles thatched with straw
were stuck into the ground at various scattered points,
amid and under which the whitish forms of his meek
ewes moved and rustled. The ring of the sheep-bell,
which had been silent during his absence, recommenced,
in tones that had more mellowness than clearness, owing
to an increasing growth of surrounding wool. This
continued till Oak withdrew again from the flock. He
 --  returned to the hut, bringing in his arms a new-born
lamb, consisting of four legs large enough for a full+
grown sheep, united by a seemingly inconsiderable mem+
brane about half the substance of the legs collectively,
which constituted the animal's entire body just at present.
The little speck of life he placed on a wisp of hay
before the small stove, where a can of milk was simmer+
ing. Oak extinguished the lantern by blowing into it
and then pinching the snuff, the cot being lighted
by a candle suspended by a twisted wire. A rather
hard couch, formed of a few corn sacks thrown carelessly
down, covered half the floor of this little
<P 61>
habitation, and
here the young man stretched himself along, loosened
his woollen cravat, and closed his eyes. In about the
time a person unaccustomed to bodily labour would have
decided upon which side to lie, Farmer Oak was asleep.
The inside of the hut, as it now presented itself, was
cosy and alluring, and the scarlet handful of fire in
addition to the candle, reflecting its own genial colour
upon whatever it could reach, flung associations of
enjoyment even over utensils and tools. In the corner
stood the sheep-crook, and along a shelf at one side
were ranged bottles and canisters of the simple prepara+
tions pertaining to ovine surgery and physic; spirits of
wine, turpentine, tar, magnesia, ginger, and castor-oil
being the chief. On a triangular shelf across the corner
stood bread, bacon, cheese, and a cup for ale or cider,
which was supplied from a flagon beneath. Beside the
provisions lay the flute whose notes had lately been
called forth by the lonely watcher to beguile a tedious
hour. The house was ventilated by two round holes,
like the lights of a ship's cabin, with wood slides+
The lamb, revived by the warmth' began to bleat'
instant meaning, as expected sounds will. Passing
from the profoundest sleep to the most alert wakefulness
with the same ease that had accompanied the reverse
operation, he looked at his watch, found that the hour+
hand had shifted again, put on his hat, took the lamb
in his arms, and carried it into the darkness. After
placing the little creature with its mother, he stood and
carefully examined the sky, to ascertain the time of
night from the altitudes of the stars.
The Dog-star and Aldebaran, pointing to the restless
Pleiades, were half-way up the Southern sky, and between
them hung Orion, which gorgeous constellation never
burnt more vividly than now, as it soared forth above
the rim of the landscape. Castor and Pollux will
the north-west; far away through the plantation Vega
and Cassiopeia's chair stood daintily poised on the
uppermost boughs.
<P 62>
"One o'clock,' said Gabriel.
Being a man not without a frequent consciousness
that there was some charm in this life he led, he stood
still after looking at the sky as a useful instrument, and
regarded it in an appreciative spirit, as a work of art
superlatively beautiful. For a moment he seemed
impressed with the speaking loneliness of the scene, or
rather with the complete abstraction from all its compass
of the sights and sounds of man. Human shapes,interferences,
troubles, and joys were all as if they were not, and there
seemed to be on the shaded hemisphere of the globe no sentient being
save himself; he could fancy them all gone round to the sunny side.
  Occupied this, with eyes stretched afar, Oak gradually per+
ceived that what he had previously taken to be a star low
down behind the outskirts of the plantation was in reality no
such thing. It was an artificial light, almost close at hand.
 To find themselves utterly alone at night where company
is desirable and expected makes some people fearful; but a
case more trying by far to the nerves is to discover some
mysterious companionship when intuition, sensation, memory,
analogy, testimony, probability, induction -- every kind of
evidence in the logician's list -- have united to persuade con+
sciousness that it is quite in isolation.
 Farmer Oak went towards the plantation and pushed
through its lower boughs to the windy side. A dim mass under
the slope reminded him that a shed occupied a place here,
the site being a cutting into the slope of the hill, so that at
its back part the roof was almost level with the ground. In
front it was formed of board nailed to posts and covered with
tar as apreservative. Through crevices in the roof and side
spread streaks and spots of light, a combination of which made
the radiance that had attracted him. Oak stepped up behind,
where,leaning down upon the roof and putting his eye close
to a hole, he could see into the interior clearly.
 The place contained two women and two cows. By the side
of the latter a steaming bran-mash stood in a bucket. One
of the women was past middle age. Her companion was ap+
parently young and graceful; he could form no decided opinion
<P 63>
upon her looks, her position being almost beneath his eye, so
that he saw her in a bird's-eye view, as Milton's Satan first saw
Paradise. She wore no bonnet or het, but had enveloped her+
self in a large cloak, which was carelessly flung over her head
as a covering.
 "There, now we'll go home," said the elder of the two, resting
 her knuckles upon her hips, and looking at their goings-on as
a whole. "I do hope Daisy will fetch round again now. I have
never been more frightened in my life, but I don't mind break+
ing my rest if she recovers."
 The young woman, whose eyelids were apparently inclined
to fall together on the smallest provocation of silence,yawned
in sympathy.
 "I wish we were rich enough to pay a man to do these
things," she said.
 "As we are not, we must do them ourselves," said the other;
"for you must help me if you stay."
"Well, my hat is gone, however," continued the younger. "It
went over the hedge, I think. The idea of such a slight wind
catching it."
 The cow standing erect was of the Devon breed, and was
encased in a tight warm hide of rich Indian red, as absolutely
uniform from eyes to tail as if the animal had been dipped in
a dye of that colour, her long back being mathematically level.
The other was spotted,grey and white. Beside her Oak now
noticed a little calf about a day old, looking idiotically at
the two women, which showed that it had not long been
accustomed to the phenomenon of eyesight, and often turn+
ing to the lantern, which it apparently mistook for the moon.
inherited instinct having as yet had little time for correction
by experience. Between the sheep and the cows Lucina had
been busy on Norcombe hill lately.
 "I think we had better send for some oatmeal," said the
"Yes, aunt; and I'll ride over for it as soon as it is
light. '
" But there's no side-saddle.'
<P 64>
"I can ride on the other : trust me.'
Oak, upon hearing these remarks, became more
curious to observe her features, but this prospect being
denied him by the hooding efect of the cloak, and by his
aerial position, he felt himself drawing upon his fancy
for their details. In making even horizontal and clear
inspections we colour and mould according to the warts
within us whatever our eyes bring in. Had Gabriel
been able from the first to get a distinct view of her +
countenance, his estimate of it as very handsome or
slightly so would have been as his soul required a
divinity at the moment or was ready supplied with one.
Having for some time known the want of a satisfactory
form to fill an increasing void within him, his position
moreover affording the widest scope for his fancy, he
painted her a beauty.
By one of those whimsical coincidences in which
Nature, like a busy mother, seems to spare a moment
from her unremitting labours to turn and make her
children smile, the girl now dropped the cloak, and
forth tumbled ropes of black hair over a red jacket.
Oak knew her instantly as the heroine of the yellow
waggon, myrtles, and looking-glass : prosily, as the
woman who owed him twopence.
They placed the calf beside its mother again, took
up the lantern, and went out, the light sinking down
the hill till it was no more than a nebula. Gabriel
Oak returned to his flock.
<C iii>
<P 65>
A GIRL ON HORSEBACK -- CONVERSATION
THE sluggish day began to break. Even its position
terrestrially is one of the elements of a new interest,
and for no particular reason save that the incident of
the night had occurred there, Oak went again into
the plantation. Lingering and musing here, he heard
the steps of a horse at the foot of the hill, and soon
there appeared in view an auburn pony with a girl on
its back, ascending by the path leading past the cattle+
shed. She was the young woman of the night before.
Gabriel instantly thought of the hat she had mentioned
as having lost in the wind; possibly she had come to
look for it. He hastily scanned the ditch and after
walking about ten yards along it, found the hat among the
leaves. Gabriel took it in his hand and returned to his
hut. Here he ensconced himself, and peeped through
the loophole in the direction of the riders approach.
She came up and looked around -- then on the other
side of the hedge. Gabriel was about to advance and
restore the missing article when an unexpected per+
formance induced him to suspend the action for the
present. The path, after passing the cowshed, bisected
the plantation. It was not a bridle-path -- merely a
pedestrian's track, and the boughs spread horizontally
at a height not greater than seven feet above the ground,
which made it impossible to ride erect beneath them.
The girl, who wore no riding-habit, looked around for
a moment, as if to assure herself that all humanity was
out of view, then dexterously dropped backwards flat
upon the pony's back, her head over its tail, her feet
against its shoulders, and her eyes to the sky. The
rapidity of her glide into this position was that of a
kingfisher -- its noiselessness that of a hawk. Gabriel's
eyes had scarcely been able to follow her. The tall lank
pony seemed used to such doings, and ambled
<P 66>
along unconcerned. Thus she passed under the level boughs.
The performer seemed quite at home anywhere
between a horse's head and its tail, and the necessity
for this abnormal attitude having ceased with the
passage of the plantation, she began to adopt another,
even more obviously convenient than the first. She had
no side-saddle, and it was very apparent that a firm
seat upon the smooth leather beneath her was un+
attainable sideways. Springing to her accustomed
perpendicular like a bowed sapling, and satisfying her,
self that nobody was in sight, she seated herself in the
manner demanded by the saddle, though hardly expected
of the woman, and trotted off in the direction of Tewnell
Mill.
Oak was amused, perhaps a little astonished, and
hanging up the hat in his hut, went again among his
ewes. An hour passed, the girl returned, properly
seated now, with a bag of bran in front of her. On
nearing the cattle-shed she was met by a boy bringing
a milking-pail, who held the reins of the pony whilst
she slid off. The boy led away the horse, leaving the
pail with the young woman.
Soon soft spirts alternating with loud spirts came
in regular succession from within the shed, the obvious
sounds of a person milking a cow. Gabriel took the
lost hat in his hand, and waited beside the path she
would follow in leaving the hill.
She came, the pail in one hand, hanging against her
knee. The left arm was extended as a balance, enough
of it being shown bare to make Oak wish that the event
ha happened in the summer, when the whole would
have been revealed. There was a bright air and manner
about her now, by which she seemed to imply that the
desirability of her existence could not be questioned;
and this rather saucy assumption failed in being offensive,
because a beholder felt it to be, upon the whole, true.
Like exceptional emphasis in the tone of a genius, that
which would have made mediocrity ridiculous was an
addition to recognised power. It was with some
surprise that she saw Gabriel's face rising like the
moon behind the hedge.
The adjustment of the farmer's hazy conceptions of
her
<P 67>
charms to the portrait of herself she now presented
him with was less a diminuition than a difference. The
starting-point selected by the judgment was. her height
She seemed tall, but the pail was a small one, and the
hedge diminutive; hence, making allowance for error
by comparison with these, she could have been not
above the height to be chosen by women as best. All
features of consequence were severe and regular. It
may have been observed by persons who go about the
shires with eyes for beauty, that in Englishwoman a
classically-formed face is seldom found to be united
with a figure of the same pattern, the highly-finished
features being generally too large for the remainder of
the frame ; that a graceful and proportionate figure of
eight heads usually goes off into random facial curves.
Without throwing a Nymphean tissue over a milkmaid,
let it be said that here criticism checked itself as out
of place, and looked at her proportions with a long
consciousness of pleasure. From the contours of her
figure in its upper part, she must have had a beautiful
neek and shoulders ; but since her infancy nobody had
ever seen them. Had she been put into a low dress
she would have run and thrust her head into a bush.
Yet she was not a shy girl by any means; it was merely
her instinct to draw the line dividing the seen from the
unseen higher than they do it in towns.
That the girl's thoughts hovered about her face
and form as soon as she caught Oak's eyes conning the
same page was natural, and almost certain. The self+
consciousness shown would have been vanity if a little
more pronounced, dignity if a little less. Rays of male
vision seem to have a tickling effect upon virgin faces
in rural districts ; she brushed hers with her hand, as if
Gabriel had been irritating its pink surface by actual
touch, and the free air of her previous movements was
reduced at the same time to a chastened phase of
itself. Yet it was the man who blushed, the maid not
at all.
" I found a hat,' said Oak.
" It is mine,' said she, and, from a sense of proportion,
kept down to a small smile an inclination to laugh dis+
tinctly : "it flew away last night.'
" One o'clock this morning ? '
<P 68>
" Well -- it was.' She was surprised. " How did you
know ? ' she said.
" I was here.'
" You are Farmer Oak, are you not ? '
" That or thereabouts. I'm lately come to this place.'
" A large farm ? ' she inquired, casting her eyes round,
and swinging back her hair, which was black in the
shaded hollows of its mass; but it being now an hour
past sunrise, the rays touched its prominent curves with
a colour of their own.
" No ; not large. About a hundred.' (In speaking
of farms the word "acres ' is omitted by the natives, by
analogy to such old expressions as "a stag of ten.')
' "I wanted my hat this morning,' she went on.
had to ride to Tewnell Mill.'
"Yes you had.'
"How do you know?'
"I saw you!
"Where?' she inquired, a misgiving bringing every
muscle of her lineaments and frame to a standstill.
"Here-going through the plantation, and all down
the hill,' said Farmer Oak, with an aspect excessively
knowing with regard to some matter in his mind, as he
gazed at a remote point in the direction named, and then
turned back to meet his colloquist's eyes.
A perception caused him to withdraw his own eyes
from hers as suddenly as if he had been caught in a
theft. Recollection of the strange antics she had
indulged in when passing through the trees, was suc+
ceeded in the girl by a nettled palpitation, and that' by
a hot face. It was a time to see a woman redden who
was not given to reddening s a rule; not a point in
the milkmaid but was of the deepest rose-colour. From
the Maiden's Blush, through all varieties of the Provence
down to the Crimson Tuscany, the countenance of Oak's
acquaintance quickly graduated ; whereupon he, in con+
siderateness, turned away his head.
The sympathetic man still looked the other way, and
wondered when she would recover coolness sufficient to
justify him in facing her again. He heard what seemed
to be the flitting of a
<P 69>
dead leaf upon the breeze, and
looked. She had gone away.
With an air between that of Tragedy and Comedy !
Gabriel returned to his work.
Five mornings and evenings passed. The young
woman came regularly to milk the healthy cow or to
attend to the sick one, but never allowed her vision to
stray in the direction of Oak's person. His want of
tact had deeply offended her -- not by seeing what he
could not help, but by letting her know that he had
seen it. For, as without law there is no sin, without
eyes there is no indecorum; and she appeared to feel
that Gabriel's espial had made her an indecorous woman
without her own connivance. It was food for great regret
with him; it was also a contretemps which touched into
life a latent heat he had experienced in that direction.
The acquaintanceship might, however, have ended in
a slow forgetting, but for an incident which occurred at
the end of the same week. One afternoon it began to
freeze, and the frost increased with evening, which drew
on like a stealthy tightening of bonds. It was a time
when in cottages the breath of the sleepers freezes to
the sheets; when round the drawing-room fire of a
thick-walled mansion the sitters' backs are cold, even
whilst their faces are all aglow. Many a small bird went
to bed supperless that night among the bare boughs.
As the milking-hour drew near, Oak kept his usual
watch upon the cowshed. At last he felt cold, and
shaking an extra quantity of bedding round the yeaning
ewes he entered the hut and heaped more fuel upon
the stove. The wind came in at the bottom of the door,
and to prevent it Oak laid a sack there and wheeled the
cot round a little more to the south. Then the wind
spouted in at a ventilating hole -- of which there was one
on each side of the hut.
Gabriel had always known that when the fire was
lighted and the door closed one of these must be kept
open -- that chosen being always on the side away from
the wind. Closing the slide to windward, he turned to
open the other; on second -- -thoughts the farmer con+
sidered that he would first sit down leaving both
closed for a minute or two, till the temperature of the
hut was a little raised. He sat down.
<P 70>
His head began to ache in an unwonted manner, and,
fancying himself weary by reason of the broken rests of
the preceding nights, Oak decided to get up, open the
slide, and then allow himself to fall asleep. He fell
asleep, however, without having performed the necessary
preliminary.
How long he remained unconseious Gabriel never
knew. During the first stages of his return to percep+
tion peculiar deeds seemed to be in course of enactment.
His dog was howling, his head was aching fearfully --
somebody was pulling him about, hands were loosening
his neckerchief.
On opening his eyes he found that evening had sunk
to dusk in a strange manner of unexpectedness. The
young girl with the remarkably pleasant lips and white
teeth was beside him. More than this -- astonishingly
more -- his head was upon her lap, his face and neck
were disagreeably wet, and her fingers were unbuttoning
his collar.
"Whatever is the matter?' said Oak, vacantly.
She seemed to experience mirth, but of too insignifi+
cant a kind to start enjoyment.
"Nothing now', she answered, "since you are not
dead It is a wonder you were not,suffocated in this
hut of yours.'
"Ah, the hut ! ' murmured Gabriel. "I gave ten
pounds for that hut. But I'll sell it, and sit under
thatched hurdles as they did in old times, curl up
to sleep in a lock of straw! It played me nearly the
same trick the other day .! ' Gabriel, by way of emphasis,
brought down his fist upon the floor.
"It was not exactly the fault of the hut,' she ob+
served in a tone which showed her to be that novelty
among women -- one who finished a thought before
beginning the sentence which was to convey it. " You
should I think, have considered, and not have been so
foolish as to leave the slides closed.'
"Yes I suppose I should,' said Oak, absently. He
was endeavouring to catch and appreciate the sensation
of being thus with her, his head upon her dress, before
the event passed on into the heap of bygone things.
He wished she knew his impressions ; but he would as
soon have thought of carrying an odour in a net as of
attempting to convey the intangibilities
<P 71>
of his feeling
in the coarse meshes of language. So he remained
silent.
She made him sit up, and then Oak began wiping
his face and shaking himself like a Samson. "How
can I thank 'ee ? ' he said at last, gratefully, some of the
natural rusty red having returned to his face.
 " Oh, never mind that,' said the girl, smiling, and
allowing her smile to hold good for Gabriel's next
remark, whatever that might prove to be.
"How did you find me?"
"I heard your dog howling and scratching at the
door of the hut when I came to the milking (it was so
lucky, Daisy's milking is almost over for the season, and
 I shall not come here after this week or the next). The
dog saw me, and jumped over to me, and laid hold of
my skirt. I came across and looked round the hut the
very first thing to see if the slides were closed. My
uncle has a hut like this one, and I have heard him tell
his shepherd not to go to sleep without leaving a slide
open. I opened the door, and there you were like
dead. I threw the milk over you, as there was no
water, forgetting it was warm, and no use.'
"I wonder if I should have died ? ' Gabriel said, in a
low voice, which was rather meant to travel back to
himself than to her.
"O no," the girl replied. She seemed to prefer a
less tragic probability ; to have saved a man from death
'involved talk that should harmonise with the dignity of
such a deed -- and she shunned it.
"I believe you saved my life, Miss --  -- I don!t know
your name. I know your aunt's, but not yours.'
" I would just as soon not tell it -- rather not. There
is no reason either why I should, as you probably will
never have much to do with me.'
 " Still, I should like to know.'
" You can inquire at my aunt's -- she will tell you.'
'My name is Gabriel Oak.'
"And mine isn't. You seem fond of yours in
speaking it so decisively, Gabriel Oak.'
<P 72>
" You see, it is the only one I shall ever have, and I
must make the most of it.'
" I always think mine sounds odd and disagreeable.'
"I should think you might soon get a new one.'
"Mercy ! -- how many opinions you keep about you
concerning other people, Gabriel Oak.
"Well Miss-excuse the words-I thought you
would like them But I can't match you I know in
napping out my mind upon my tongue. I never was
very clever in my inside. But I thank you. Come
give me your hand!'
She hesitated, somewhat disconcerted at Oak's old+
fashioned earnest conclusion. to a dialogue lightly
carried on."Very well,' she said, and gave him her
hand, compressing her lips to a demure impassivity.
He held it but an instant, and in his fear of being too
demonstrative, swerved to the opposite extreme, touching
her fingers with the lightness of a small-hearted person.
" I am sorry,' he said, the instant after.
" What for?'
"You may have it again if you like; there it is.'
She gave him her hand again.
Oak held it longer this time -- indeed, curiously long.
"How soft it is -- being winter time, too -- not chapped
or rough or anything!' he said.
"There -- that's long enough,' said she, though with+
out pulling it away "But I suppose you are thinking
you would like to kiss it? You may if you want to.'
"I wasn't thinking of any such thing,' said Gabriel,
simply ; "but I will'
"That you won't!' She snatched back her hand.
Gabriel felt himself guilty of another want of tact.
"Now find out my name,' she said, teasingly; and
withdrew.
<C iv>
<P 73>
GABRIEL'S RESOLVE -- THE VISIT -- THE MISTAKE
THE only superiority in women that is tolerable to the
rival sex is, as a rule, that of the unconscious kind ; but
a superiority which recognizes itself may sometimes
please by suggesting possibilities of capture to the
subordinated man.
This well-favoured and comely girl soon made appre+
ciable inroads upon the emotional constitution of young
Farmer Oak.
Love, being an extremely exacting usurer (a sense of
exorbitant profit, spiritually, by an exchange of hearts,
being at the bottom of pure passions, as that of exorbi+
tant profit, bodily or materially, is at the bottom of
those of lower atmosphere), every morning Oak's feelings
were as sensitive as the money-market in calculations
upon his chances. His dog waited for his meals in a
way so like that in which Oak waited for the girl's
presence, that the farmer was quite struck with the
resemblance, felt it lowering, and would not look at the
dog. However, he continued to watch through the
hedge for her regular coming, and thus his sentiments
towards her were ideepened without any corresponding
effect being produced upon herself. Oak had nothing
finished and ready to say as yet, and not being able
to frame love phrases which end where they begin ;
passionate tales -- +
     -- -Full of sound and fury
   -- -signifting nothing -- +
he said no word at all.
By making inquiries he found that the girl's name
was Bathsheba Everdene, and that the cow would go
dry in about seven days. He dreaded the eight day.
At last the eighth day came. The cow had ceased
to give milk for that year, and Bathsheba Everdene
came up the hill no more. Gabriel had reached a
pitch of existence he never
<P 74>
could have anticipated a
short time before. He liked saying 'Bathsheba' as a
private enjoyment instead of whistling; turned over his
taste to black hair, though he had sworn by brown ever
since he was a boy, isolated himself till the space he
filled in a possible strength in an actual weakness. Marriage
transforms a distraction into a support, the power of
which should be, and happily often is, in direct pro+
portion to the degree of imbecility it supplants. Oak
began now to see light in this direction, and said to
himself, "I'll make her my wife, or upon my soul I shall
be good for nothing .! '
All this while he was perplexing himself about an
errand on which he might consistently visit the cottage
of Bathsheba's aunt.
He found his opportunity in the death of a ewe,
mother of a living lamb. On a day which had a
summer face and a winter constitution-a fine January
morning, when there was just enough blue sky visible to
make cheerfully-disposed people wish for more, and an
occasional gleam of silvery sunshine, Oak put the lamb
into a respectable Sunday basket, and stalked across the
fields to the house of Mrs. Hurst, the aunt -- George,
the dog walking behind, with a countenance of great
concern at the serious turn pastoral affairs seemed to be
taking.
Gabriel had watched the blue wood-smoke curling
from the chimney with strange meditation. At evening
he had fancifully traced it down the chimney to the
spot of its origin -- seen the hearth and Bathsheba
beside it -- beside it in her out-door dress; for the
clothes she had worn on the hill were by association
equally with her person included in the compass of his
affection; they seemed at this early time of his love a
necessary ingredient of the sweet mixture called Bath+
sheba Everdene.
He had made a toilet of a nicely-adjusted kind -- of a
nature between the carefully neat and the carelessly
ornate -- of a degree between fine-market-day and wet+
Sunday selection. He thoroughly cleaned his silver
watch-chain with whiting, put new lacing straps to his
boots, looked to the brass eyelet-holes,
<P 75>
 went to the
inmost heart of the plantation for a new walking-stick,
and trimmed it vigorously on his way back; took a new
handkerchief from the bottom of his clothes-box, put
on the light waistcoat patterned all over with sprigs
of an elegant flower uniting the beauties of both rose
and lily without the defects of either, and used all the
hair-oil he possessed upon his usually dry, sandy, and
inextricably curly hair, till he had deepened it to a
splendidly novel colour, between that of guano and
Roman cement, making it stick to his head like mace
round a nutmeg, or wet seaweed round a boulder after
the ebb.
Nothing disturbed the stillness of the cottage save
 the chatter of a knot of sparrows on the eaves; one
might fancy scandal and rumour to be no less the
staple topic of these little coteries on roofs than of
those under them. It seemed that the omen was an
unpropitious one, for, as the rather untoward commence+
ment of Oak's overtures, just as he arrived by the garden
gate, he saw a cat inside, going into various arched shapes
and fiendish convulsions at the sight of his dog George.
The dog took no notice , for he had arrived at an age
at which all superfluous barking was cynically avoided
as a waste of breath -- -in fact he never barked even
at the sheep except to order, when it was done with
an absolutely neutral countenance, as a sort of Com+
mination-service, which, though offensive, had to be
gone through once now and then to frighten the flock
for their own good.
A voice came from behind some laurel-bushes into
which the cat had run:
"Poor dear! Did a nasty brute of a dog want to
kill it; -- did he poor dear !'
"I beg your pardon,' said Oak to the voice, 'but
George was walking on behind me with a temper as
mild as milk.'
Almost before he had ceased speaking, Oak was
seized with a misgiving as to whose ear was the recipient
of his answer. Nobody appeared, and he heard the
person retreat among the bushes.
Gabriel meditated, and so deeply that he brought
small furrows into his forehead by sheer force of
reverie. Where the
<P 76>
issue of an interview is as likely
to be a vast change for the worse as for the better,
any initial difference from expectation causes nipping
sensations of failure. Oak went up to the door a little
abashed : his mental rehearsal and the reality had had
no common grounds of opening.
Bathsheba's aunt was indoors. " Will you tell Miss
Everdene that somebody would be glad to speak to
her ?'said Mr. Oak. (Calling one's self merely Some+
body, without giving a name, is not to be taken as
an example of the ill-breeding of the rural world: it
springs from a refined modesty, of which townspeople,
with their cards and announcements, have no notion
whatever.)
Bathsheba was out. The voice had evidently been
hers.
" Will you come in, Mr. Oak ? '
"Oh, thank 'ee, said Gabriel, following her to the
fireplace. "I've brought a lamb for Miss Everdene.
I thought she might like one to rear; girls do.'
" She might,' said Mrs. Hurst, musingly ; " though
she's only a visitor here. If you will wait a minute,
Bathsheba will be in.'
" Yes, I will wait,' said Gabriel, sitting down. " The
lamb isn't really the business I came about, Mrs. Hurst.
In short, I was going to ask her if she'd like to be
married.'
"And were you indeed ?'
" Yes. Because if she would, I should be very glad
to marry her. D'ye know if she's got any other young
man hanging about her at all ?'
"Let me think," said Mrs. Hurst, poking the fire
superfluously.... " Yes -- bless you, ever so many young
men. You see, Farmer Oak, she's so good-looking, and
an excellent scholar besides -- she was going to be a
governess once, you know, only she was too wild. Not
that her young men ever come here -- but, Lord, in the
nature of women, she must have a dozen ! '
" That's unfortunate,' said Farmer Oak, contemplating
a crack in the stone floor with sorrow. "I'm only an
every-day sort of man, and my only chance was in being
the first comer... , Well, there's no use in my waiting,
for that was all I came about: so I'll take myself off
home-along, Mrs. Hurst.'
When Gabriel had gone about two hundred yards
along the
<P 77>
down, he heard a "hoi-hoi .! " uttered behind
him, in a piping note of more treble quality than that
in which the exclamation usually embodies itself when
shouted across a field. He looked round, and saw a girl
racing after him, waving a white handkerchief.
Oak stood still -- and the runner drew nearer. It was
Bathsheba Everdene. Gabriel's colour deepened: hers
was already deep, not, as it appeared, from emotion,
but from running.
"Farmer Oak -- I -- ' she said, pausing for want of
breath pulling up in front of him with a slanted face
and putting her hand to her side.
"I have just called to see you ' said Gabriel, pending
her further speech.
"Yes-I know that,! she said panting like a robin,
her face red and moist from her exertions, like a peony
petal before the sun dries off the dew. "I didn't know
you had come to ask to have me, or I should have come
in from the garden instantly. I ran after you to say --
that my aunt made a mistake in sending you away from
courting me --  --  -- '
Gabriel expanded."I'm sorry to have made you
run so fast, my dear,' he said, with a grateful sense of
favours to come. "Wait a bit till you've found your
breath.'
" -- It was quite a mistake-aunt's telling you I had
a young man "already,'- Bathsheba went on. " I haven't
a sweetheart at all -- and I never had one, and I thought
that, as times go with women, it was such a pity to send
you away thinking that I had several.'
"Really and truly I am glad to hear that.!' said .=
Farmer Oak, smiling one of his long special smiles, and
blushing with gladness. He held out his hand to take
hers, which, when she had eased her side by pressing
it there, was prettily extended upon her bosom to still
her loud-beating heart. Directly he seized it she put
it behind her, so that it slipped through his fingers like
an eel. "
"I have a nice snug little farm,' said Gabriel, with
half a degree less assurance than when he had seized
her hand.
"Yes ; you have.'
"A man has advanced me money to begin with, but
still, it
<P 78>
will soon be paid off and though I am only an
every-day sort of man, I have got on a little since I was
a boy.' Gabriel uttered "a little' in a tone to-show
her that it was the complacent form of "a great deal.'
He continued : " When we be married, I am quite sure
I can work twice as hard as I do now.'
 He went forward and stretched out his arm again.
Bathsheba had overtaken him at a point beside which
stood a low stunted holly bush, now laden with red
berries. Seeing his advance take the form of an attitude
threatening a possible enclosure, if not compression, of
her person, she edged off round the bush.
" Why, Farmer Oak,' she said, over the top, looking
at him with rounded eyes, "I never said I was going to
marry you.'
" Well -- that is a tale .! ' said Oak,  with dismay. " To
run after anybody like this, and then say you don"t
want him ! '
"What I meant to tell you was only this,' she said
eagerly, and yet half conscious of the absurdity of the
position she had made for herself -- "that nobody has
got me yet as a sweetheart, instead of my having a
dozen, as my aunt said; I hate to be thought men's
property in that way, though possibly I shall be had
some day. Why, if I'd wanted you I shouldn't have
run after you like this ; 'twould have'been the forwardest
thing ! But there was no harm in 'hurrying to correct
a piece of false news that had been told you.'
"Oh, no -- no harm at all." But there is such a thing
as being too generous in expressing a judgment impuls+
ively, and Oak added with a more appreciative sense
of all the circumstances -- ' Well, I am not quite certain
it was no harm.'
"Indeed, I hadn't time to think before starting
whether I wanted to marry or not, for you'd have been
gone over the hill.'
" Come,' said Gabriel, freshening again ; "think a
minute or two. I'll wait a while, Miss Everdene. Will
you marry me? Do, Bathsheba. I love you far more
than common!'
"I'll try to think,' she observed, rather more timor+
ously ; "if I can think out of doors; my mind spreads
away so.'
"But you can give a guess.'
<P 79>
"Then give me time.' Bathsheba looked thought+
fully into the distance, away from the direction in which
Gabriel stood.
"I can make you happy,' said he to the back of her
head, across the bush. "You shallo have as piano in a
year or two -- -farmers' wives are getting to have pianos
now --  and I'll practise up the flute right well to play
with you in the evenings.'
" Yes ; I should like that.'
"And have one of those little ten-pound" gigs for
market -- and nice flowers, and birds -- cocks and hens
I mean, because they be useful,' continued Gabriel,
feeling balanced between poetry and practicality.
"I should like it very much.'
"And a frame for cucumbers -- like a gentlman and
lady.'
"Yes.'
"And when the wedding was over, we'd have it put
in the newspaper list of marriages.'
" Dearly I should like that ! '
"And the babies in the births -- every man jack of
'em! And at home by the fire, whenever you look up,
there I shall be -- and whenever I look up' there will
be you.'
"Wait wait and don't be improper .!'
Her countenance fell, and she was silent awhile.
He regarded the red berries between them over and
over again, to such an extent, that holly seemed in
his after life to be a cypher signifying a proposal of
marriage. Bathsheba decisively turned to him.
"No;' 'tis no use,' she said. 'I don't want to marry
you. '
' Try.'
"I have tried hard all the time I've been thinking;
for a marriage would be very nice in one sense.
People would talk about me, and think I had won my
battle, and I should feel triumphant, and' all that,
But a husband --  -- ' - +
" Well .! '
" Why, he'd always be there, as you say; whenever
I looked up, there he'd be.'
" Of course he would -- I, that is.'
<P 80>
" Well, what I mean is that I shouldn't mind being
a bride at a wedding, if I could be one without having
a husband. But since a woman can't show off in that
way by herself, I shan't marry -- at least yet.'
' That's a terrible wooden story.'
At this criticism of her statement Bathsheba made
an addition to her dignity by a slight sweep away
from him.
"Upon my heart and soul, I don't know what a
maid can say stupider than that,' said Oak. "But
dearest,' he continued in a palliative voice, "don't be
like it !.' Oak sighed a deep honest sigh -- none the
less so in that, being like the sigh of a pine plantation,
it was rather noticeable as a disturbance of the atmo+
sphere. " Why won't you have me ? ' he appealed,
creeping round the holly to reach her side.
" I cannot,' she said, retreating.
"But why ?' he persisted, standing still at last in
despair of ever reaching her, and facing over the
bush.
' Because I don't love you.'
" Yes, but --  -- '
She contracted a yawn to an inoffensive smallness,
so that it was hardly ill-mannered at all. "I don't love
you,' she said.'
"But I love you -- and, as for myself, I am content
to be liked.'
" O Mr. Oak -- that's very fine ! You'd get to
despise me.'
"Never,' said Mr Oak, so earnestly that he seemed
to be coming, by the forceof his words, straight
through the bush and into her arms. "I shall do one
thing in this life -- one thing certain -- that is, love you,
and long for you, and keep wanting you till I die.' His
voice had a genuine pathos now, and his large brown
hands perceptibly trembled.
"It seems dreadfully wrong not to have you when
you feel so much!' she said with a little distress, and
looking hopeleely around for some means of escape
from her moral dilemma. " H(ow I wish I hadn't run
after you!' However she seemed to have a short cut
for getting back to cheerfulness, and set her face to
signify archness. "It wouldn't do, Mr Oak. I want
somebody to tame me; I am too independent ; and
you would never be able to, I know.'
<P 81>
Oak cast his eyes down the field in a way implying
that it was useless to attempt argument.
" Mr. Oak,' she said, with luminous distinctness and
common sense, " you are better off than I. I have
hardly a penny in the world -- I am staying with my
aunt for my bare sustenance. I am better educated
than you -- and I don't love you a bit: that's my side
of the case. Now yours: you are a farmer just begin+
ing; and you ought in common prudence, if you marry
at all (which you should certainly not think of doing
at present) to marry a woman with money, who would
admiration.
"That's the very thing I had been thinking myself !'
he naively said.
Farmer Oak had one-and-a-half Christian character
istics too many to succeed with Bathsheba : his humility,
and a superfluous moiety of honesty. Bathsheba was
decidedly disconcerted,
"Well, then, why did you come and disturb me?'
she said, almost angrily, if not quite, an enlarging red
spot rising in each cheek.
" I can't do what I think would be -- would be --  -- '
" Right ? '
" No : wise.'
" You have made an admission now, Mr. Oak,' she
exclaimed, with even more hauteur, and rocking her
head disdainfully. 'After that, do you think I could
marry you? Not if I know it.'
He broke in passionately ! "But don't mistake me
like that! Because I am open enough to own what
every man in my shoes would have thought of, you
make your colours come up your face, and get crabbed
with me. That about your not being good enough for
me is nonsense. You speak like a lady -- all the parish
notice it, and your uncle at Weatherbury is, I have
heerd, a large farmer -- much larger than ever I shall
be. May I call in the evening, or will you walk along
with me o' Sundays? I don't want you to make-up
your mind at once, if you'd rather not.'
<P 82>
" No -- no -- I cannot. Don't press me any more --
don't. I don't love you -- so 'twould be ridiculous,'
she said, with a laugh.
No man likes to see his emotions the sport of a
merry-go-round of skittishness. " Very well,' said Oak,
firmly, with the bearing of one who was going to give '
his days and nights to Ecclesiastes for ever. "Then
I'll ask you no more.'
<C v>
<P 83>
DEPARTURE OF BATHSHEBA -- A PASTORAL TRAGEDY
THE news which one day reached Gabriel, that Bath+
sheba Everdene had left the neighbourhood, had an
influence upon him which might have surprised any
who never suspected that the more emphatic the renun+
ciation the less absolute its character.
It may have been observed that there is no regula
path for getting out of love as there is for getting in.
Some people look upon marriage as a short cut that way,
but it has been known to fail. Separation, which was
the means that chance offered to Gabriel Oak by
Bathsheba's disappearance though effectual with people
of certain humours is apt to idealise the removcd object
with others -- notably those whose affection, placid and
regular as it may be flows deep and long. Oak belonged
to the even-tempered order of humanity, and felt the
secret fusion of himself in Bathsheba to be burning with
a finer flame now that she was gone -- that was all.
His incipient friendship with her aunt-had been
nipped by the failure of his suit, and all that Oak learnt
of Bathsheba's movements was done indirectly. It ap+
peared that she had gone to a place called Weatherbury,
more than twenty miles off, but in what capacity --
whether as a visitor, or permanently, he could not
discover.
Gabriel had two dogs. George, the elder, exhibited
an ebony-tipped nose, surrounded by a narrow margin
of pink flesh, and a coat marked in random splotches
approximating in colour to white and slaty grey ; but the
grey, after years of sun and rain, had been scorched and
washed out of the more prominent locks, leaving them
of a reddish-brown, as if the blue component of the grey
had faded, like the indigo from the same kind of colour in
Turner's pictures. In substance it had originally been
hair, but long contact with sheep seemed
<P 84>
to be turning
it by degrees into wool of a poor quality and staple.
This dog had originally belonged to a shepherd of
inferior morals and dreadful temper, and the result was
that George knew the exact degrees of condemnation
signified by cursing and swearing of all descriptions
better than the wickedest old man in the neighbourhood.
Long experience had so precisely taught the animal the
difference between such exclamations as 'Come in .! '
and 'D --  --  ye, come in !.' that he knew to a hair's
breadth the rate of trotting back from the ewes' tails
that each call involved, if a staggerer with the sheep
crook was to be escaped. Though old, he was clever
and trustworthy still.
The young dog, George's son, might possibly have
been the image of his mother, for there was not much
resemblance between him and George. He was learn+
ing the sheep-keeping business, so as to follow on at
the flock when the other should die, but had got no
further than the rudiments as yet -- still finding an
insuperable difculty in distinguishing between doing a
thing well enough and doing it too well. So earnest
and yet so wrong-headed was this young dog (he had no,
name in particular, and answered with perfect readiness
to any pleasant interjection), that if sent behind the
flock to help them on, he did it so thoroughly that he
would have chased them across the whole county with
the greatest pleasure if not called off or reminded when
to step by the example of old George.
Thus much for the dogs. On the further side of
Norcombe Hill was a chalk-pit, from which chalk had
been drawn for generations, and spread over adjacent
farms. Two hcdges converged upon it in the form of
a V, but without quite meeting. The narrow opening
left, which was immediately over the brow of the pit,
was protected by a rough railing.
One night, when Farmer Oak had returned to, his
house, believing there would be no further necessity for
his attendance on the down, he called as usual to the
dogs, previously to shutting them up in the outhouse till
next morning. Only one responded -- old George ; the
other-could not be found, either in the house, lane, or
garden. - Gabriel then remembered
<P 85>
that he had left the
two dogs on the hill eating a dead lamb (a kind of meat
he usually kept from them, except when other food-ran
finished his meal, he went indoors to the luxury of a bed,
which latterly he had only enjoyed on Sundays.
It was a still, moist night. Just before dawn he was
assisted in waking by the abnormal reverberation of
familiar music. To the shepherd, the note of the sheep'
chronic sound that only makes itself noticed by ceasing
ever distant, that all is well in the fold. In the solemn
This exceptional ringing may be caused in two ways -- +
by the rapid feeding of the sheep bearing the bell, as
when the flock breaks into new pasture, which gives it
an intermittent rapidity, or by the sheep starting off in
a run, when the sound has a regular palpitation. The
experieced ear of Oak knew the sound he now' heard
to be caused by the running of the flock with great
velocity.
He jumped out of bed, dressed, tore down the lane
through a foggy dawn, and ascended the hill. The
forward ewes were kept apart from those among which
the fall of lambs would be later, there being two hundred
of the latter class in Gabriel's flock. These two hundred
seemed to have absolutely vanished from the hill. There
were the fifty with their lambs, enclosed at the other end
as he had left them, but the rest, forming the bulk of
the flock, were nowhere. Gabriel called at the top of
his voice the shepherd's call.
" Ovey, ovey, ovey .! '
Not a single bleat. He went to the hedge -- a gap
had been broken through it, and in the gap were the
footprints of the sheep. Rather surprised to find
them break fence at this season, yet putting it down
instantly to their great fondness for ivy in winter-time,
of which a great deal grew in the plantation, he followed
through the hedge. They were not in the plantation.
He called again : the valleys and farthest hills
<P 86>
resounded
as when the sailors invoked the lost Hylas on the Mysian
shore ; but no sheep. He passed through the trees and
along the ridge of the hill. On the extreme summit,
where the ends of the two converging hedges of which
we have spoken were stopped short by meeting the brow
of the chalk-pit, he saw the younger dog standing against
the sky -- dark and motionless as Napoleon at St.
Helena.
A horrible conviction darted through Oak. With
a sensation of bodily faintness he advanced : at one
point the rails were broken through, and there he saw
the footprints of his ewes. The dog came up, licked
his hand, and made signs implying that he expected
some great reward for signal services rendered. Oak
looked over the precipice. The ewes lay dead and dying
at its foot -- a heap of two hundred mangled careases,
representing in their condition just now at least two
hundred more.
Oak was an intensely humane man: indeed, his
humanity often tore in pieces any politic intentions of
his which bordered on strategy, and carried him on as
by gravitation. A shadow in his life had always been
that his flock ended in mutton -- that a day came and
found every shepherd an arrant traitor to his defenceless
sheep. His first feeling now was one of pity for the
untimely fate of these gentle ewes and their unborn
lambs.
It was a second to remember another phase of the
matter. The sheep were not insured. All the savings
of a frugal life had been dispersed at a blow ; his hopes
of being an independent farmer were laid low -- possibly
for ever. Gabriel's energies, patience, and industry had
been so severely taxed during the years of his life between
eighteen and eight-and-twenty, to reach his present stage
of progress' that no more seemed to be left in him. He
hands.
Stupors, however, do not last for ever, and Farmer
Oak recovered from his. It was as remarkable as it was
characteristic that the one sentence he uttered was in
thankfulness : --
'Thank God I am not married : what would she have
done in the poverty now coming upon me ! '
<P 87>
Oak raised his head, and wondering what he could
do listlessly surveyed the scene. By the outer margin
of the Pit was an oval pond, and over it hung the
attenuated skeleton of a chrome-yellow moon which
had only a few days to last -- the morning star dogging
her on the left hand. The pool glittered like a dead
man's eye, and as the world awoke a breeze blew,
shaking and elongating the reflection of the moon
without breaking it, and turning the image of the star
to a phosphoric streak upon the water. All this Oak
saw and remembered.
As far as could be learnt it appeared that the poor
young dog, still under the impression that since he was
kept for running after sheep, the more he ran after
them the better, had at the end of his meal off the
dead lamb, which may have given him additional energy
and spirits, collected all the ewes into a corner, driven
the timid creatures through the hedge, across the upper
field, and by main force of worrying had given them
momentum enough to break down a portion of the
rotten railing, and so hurled them over the edge.
George's son had done his work so thoroughly that
he was considered too good a workman to live, and was,
in fact, taken and tragically shot at twelve o'clcck that
same day -- another instance of the untoward fate which
so often attends dogs and other philosophers who
follow out a train of reasoning to its logical conclusion,
and attempt perfectly consistent conduct in a world
made up so largely of compromise.
Gabriel's farm had been stocked by a dealer -- on the
strength of Oak's promising look and character -- who
was receiving a percentage from the farmer till such
time as the advance should be cleared off Oak found+
that the value of stock, plant, and implements which
were really his own would be about sufficient to pay his
debts, leaving himself a free man with the clothes he
stood up in, and nothing more.
<C vi>
<P 88>
THE FAIR -- THE JOURNEY -- THE FIRE
TWO months passed away. We are brought on to a
day in February, on which was held the yearly statute
or hiring fair in the county-town of Casterbridge.
At one end of the street stood from two to three
hundred blithe and hearty labourers waiting upon Chance
 -- all men of the stamp to whom labour suggests nothing
worse than a wrestle with gravitation, and pleasure
nothing better than a renunciation of the same among
these, carters and waggoners were distinguished by
having a piece of whip-cord twisted round their hats;
thatchers wore a fragment of woven straw; shepherds
held their sheep-crooks in their hands; and thus the
situation required was known to the hirers at a
glance.
In the crowd was an athletic young fellow of some+
what superior appearance to the rest -- in fact, his
superiority was marked enough to lead several ruddy
peasants standing by to speak to him inquiringly, as to
a farmer, and to use 'Sir' as a finishing word. His
answer always was,
'I am looking for a place myself -- a bailiff's. Do
Ye know of anybody who wants one ?'
Gabriel was paler now. His eyes were more medi+
tative, and his expression was more sad. He had
passed through an ordeal of wretchedness which had
given him more than it had taken away. He had sunk
from his modest elevation as pastoral king into the very
slime-pits of Siddim ; but there was left to him a digni+
fied calm he had never before known, and that indiffer+
ence to fate which, though it often makes a villain of
a man, is the basis of his sublimity when it does not.
And thus the abasement had been exaltation, and the
loss gain.
In the morning a regiment of cavalry had left the
town, and a sergeant and his party had been beating up
for recruits through the four streets. As the end of the
day drew on, and
<P 89>
he found himself not hired, Gabriel
almost wished that he had joined them, and gone off to
serve his country. Weary of standing in the market+
place, and not much minding the kind of work he
turned his hand to, he decided to offer himself in some
other capacity than that of bailiff.
All the farmers seemed to be wanting shepherds.
Sheep-tending was Gabriel's speciality. Turning down
an obscure street and entering an obscurer lane, he went
up to a smith's shop.
'How long would it take you to make a shepherd's
crook ? '
'Twenty minutes.'
'How much ? '
'Two shillings.'
He sat on a bench and the crook was made, a stem
being given him into the bargain.
He then went to a ready-made clothes' shop, the
owner of which had a large rural connection. As the
crook had absorbed most of Gabriel's money, he
attempted, and carried out, an exchange of his overcoat
for a shepherd's regulation smock-frock.
This transaction having been completed, he again
hurried off to the centre of the town, and stood on the
kerb of the pavement, as a shepherd, crook in hand.
Now that Oak had turned himself into a shepherd, it
seemed that bailifs were most in demand. However, two
or three farmers noticed him and drew near. Dialogues
followed, more or lessin the subjoined for: --
'Where do you come from?'
'Norcombe.'
'That's a long way.
'Fifteen miles.'
'Who's farm were you upon last?'
'My own.'
This reply invariably operated like a rumour of
cholera. The inquring farmer would edge away and
shake his head dubiously. Gabriel, like his dog, was
too good to be trustworthy,. and he never made advance
beyond this point.
It is safer to accept any chance that offers itself, and


<P 90>
extemporize a procedure to fit it, than to get a good
shepherd, but had laid himself out for anything in the
whole cycle of labour that was required in the fair. It
grew dusk. Some merry men were whistling and
singing by the corn-exchange. Gabriel's hand, which
had lain for some time idle in his smock-frock pocket,
touched his flute which he carried there. Here was
an opportunity for putting his dearly bought wisdom
into practice.
He drew out his flute and began to play  Jockey to
the Fair' in the style of a man who had never known
moment's sorrow. Oak could pipe with Arcadian
sweetness and the sound of the well-known notes
cheered his own heart as well as those of the loungers.
He played on with spirit, and in half an hour had
earned in pence what was a small fortune to a destitute
man.
By making inquiries he learnt that there was another
fair at Shottsford the next day.
'How far is Shottsford?'
'Ten miles t'other side of Weatherbury.'
Weatherbury!. It was where Bathsheba had gone
two months before. This information was like coming
from night into noon.
'How far is it to Weatherbury ?'
'Five or six miles.'
Bathsheba had probably left Weatherbury long before
this time, but the place had enough interest attaching
to it to lead Oak to choose Shottsford fair as his next
field of inquiry, because it lay in the Weatherbury
quarter. Moreover, the Weatherbury folk were by no
means uninteresting intrinsically. If report spoke truly
they were as hardy, merry, thriving, wicked a set as
any in the whole county. Oak resolved to sleep at
Weatherbury -- -that -- night on his way to Shottsford,
and struck out at once -- into the -- high road which had
been recommended as the direct route to the village in
question.
The road stretched through water-meadows traversed
by little brooks, whose quivering surfaces were braided
along their centres, and folded into creases at the sides;
or, where the flow was more rapid, the stream was pied
with spots of white froth,
<P 91>
which rode on in undisturbed
serenity. On the higher levels the dead and dry carcases
of leaves tapped the ground as they bowled along helter+
skelter upon the shoulders of the wind, and little birds
in the hedges were rustling their feathers and tucking
themselves in comfortably for the night, retaining their
places if Oak kept moving, but flying away if he
stopped to look at them. He passed by Yalbury-Wood
where the game-birds were rising to their roosts, and
heard the crack-voiced cock-pheasants' 'cu-uck, cuck,'
and the wheezy whistle of the hens.
By the time he had walked three or four miles every
shape in the-landscape had assumed a uniform hue of
blackness. He descended Yalbury Hill and could just
discern ahead of him a waggon, drawn up under a great
over-hanging tree by the roadside.
On coming close, he found there were no horses
attached to it, the spot being apparently quite deserted.
The waggon, from its position, seemed to have been left
there for the night, for beyond about half a truss  of hay
which was heaped in the bottom, it was quite empty.
Gabriel sat down on the shafts of the vehicle and con+
sidered his position. He calculated that he had walked
a very fair proportion of the journey; and having been
on foot since daybreak, he felt tempted to lie down upon
the hay in the waggon instead of pushing on to the
village of Weatherbury, and having to pay for a lodging.
Eating his las slices of bread and ham, and drinking
from the bottle of cider he had taken the precaution to
bring with him, he got into the lonely waggon. Here
he spread half of the hay as a bed, and, as well as he
could in the darkness, pulled the other half over him
by way of bed-clothes, covering himself entirely, and
feeling, physically, as comfortable as ever he had been
in his life. Inward melancholy it was impossible for
a man like Oak, introspective far beyond his neighbours,
to banish quite, whilst conning the present. untoward
page of his history. So, thinking of his misfortunes,
amorous and pastoral he fell asleep, shepherds enjoying,
in common with sailors, the privilege of being able to
summon the god instead of having to wait for him.
<P 92>
On somewhat suddenly awaking after a sleep of
whose length he had no idea, Oak found that the waggon
was in motion. He was being carried along the road
at a rate rather considerable for a vehicle without
springs, and under circumstances of physical uneadiness,
his head being dandled up and down on the bed of
the waggon like a kettledrum-stick. He then dis+
tinguished voices in conversation, comig from the
forpart of the waggon. His concern at this dilemma
(which would have been alarm, had he been a thriving
man; but -- misfortune is a fine opiate to personal terror)
led him to peer cautiously from the hay, and the first
sight he beheld was the stars above him. Charles's
Wain was getting towards a right angle with the Pole
star, and Gabriel concluded that it must be about nine
o'clock -- in other words, that he had slept two hours.
This small astronomical calculation was made without
any positive effort, and whilst he was stealthily turning
to discover, if possible, into whose hands he had fallen.
Two figures were dimly visible in front, sitting with
their legs outside the waggon, one of whom was driving.
Gabriel soon found that this was the waggoner, and it
appeared they had come from Casterbridge fair, like
himself.
A conversation was in progress, which continued
thus : --
'Be as 'twill, she's a fine handsome body as far's
looks be concerned. But that's only the skin of the
woman, and these dandy cattle be as-proud as a lucifer
in their insides.'
'Ay -- so 'a do seem, Billy Smallbury -- so 'a do seem.'
This utterance was very shaky by nature, and more so
by circumstance, the jolting of the waggon not being+
without its effect upon the speaker's larynx. It came
'from the man who held the reins.
'She's a very vain feymell -- so 'tis said here and
there.'
'Ah, now. If so be 'tis like that, I can't look her in
the face. Lord, no : not I -- heh-heh-heh .! Such a shy
man as I be.!'
'Yes -- she's very vain. 'Tis said that every night at
going to bed she looks in the glass to put on her night+
cap properly.'
'And not a married woman. Oh, the world .!
"And 'a can play the peanner, so 'tis said. Can
play so clever
<P 93>
that 'a can make a psalm tune sound as
well as the merriest loose song a man can wish for.'
'D'ye tell o't .! A happy time for us, and I feel quite
a new man! And how do she play?'
'That I dson't know, Master Poorgrass.'
On hearing these and other similar remarks, a wild
thought flashed into Gabriel's mind that they might
be speaking of Bathsheba. There were, however, no
ground for retaining such a supposition, for the waggon,
though going in the direction of Weatherbury, might be
going beyond it, and the woman alluded to seemed to be
the mistress of some estate. They were now apparently
close upon Weatherbury and not to alarm the speakers
unnecessarily, Gabriel slipped out of the waggon unseen.
He turned to an opening in the hedge, which he
found to be a gate, and mounting thereon, he sat
meditating whether to seek a cheap lodging in the
village, or to ensure a cheaper one by lying under
some hay or corn-stack. The crunching jangle of the
waggon died upon his ear. He was about to walk on,
when he noticed on his left hand an unusual light -- +
appearing about half a mile distant. Oak watched it,
and the glow increased. Something was on fire.
Gabriel again mounted the gate, and, leaping down
on the other side upon what he found to be ploughed
soil, made across the field in the exact direction of the
fire. The blaze, enlarging in a  double ratio by his
approach and its own increase, showed him as he drew
nearer the outlines of ricks beside it, lighted up to great
distinctness. A rick-yard was the source of the fire.
His weary face now began to be painted over with a
rich orange glow, and the whole front of his smock+
frock and gaiters was covered with a dancing shadow
pattern of thorn-twigs -- the light reaching him through
a leafless intervening hedge -- and the metallic curve of
his sheep-crook shone silver-bright in the same abound+
ing rays. He came up to the boundary fence, and
stood to regain breath. It seemed as if the spot was
unocupied by a living soul.
The fire was issuing from a long straw-stack, which
was so
<P 94>
far gone as to preclude a possibility of saving it.
A rick burns differently from a house. As the wind
blows the fire inwards, the portion in flames completely
disappears like melting sugar, and the outline is lost
to the eye. However, a hay or a wheat-rick, well put
together, will resist combustion for a length of time, if
it begins on the outside.
This before Gabriel's eyes was a- rick of straw, loosely
put together, and the flames darted into it with lightning
swiftness. It glowed on the windward side, rising and
falling in intensity, like the coal of a cigar. Then a
superincumbent bundle rolled down, with a whisking
noise ; flames elongated, and bent themselves about
with a quiet roar, but no crackle. Banks of smoke
went off horizontally at the back like passing clouds,
and behind these burned hidden pyres, illuminating
the semi-transparent sheet of smoke to a lustrous yellow
uniformity. Individual straws in the foreground were
consumed in a creeping movement of ruddy heat, as
if they were knots of red worms, and above shone
imaginary fiery faces, tongues hanging from lips, glaring
eyes, and other impish forms, from which at intervals
sparks flew in clusters like birds from a nest,
Oak suddenly ceased from being a mere spectator
by discovering the case to be more serious than he had
at first imagined. A scroll of smoke blew aside and
revealed to him a wheat-rick in startling juxtaposition
with the decaying one, and behind this a series of
others, composing the main corn produce of the farm;
so that instead of the straw-stack standing, as he had
imagined comparatively isolated, there was a regular
connection between it and the remaining stacks of the
group.
Gabriel leapt over the hedge, and saw that he was
not alone. The first man he came to was running
about in a great hurry, as if his thoughts were several
yards in advance of his body, which they could never
drag on fast enough.
'O, man -- fire, fire ! A good master and a. bad
servant is fire, fire .! -- I mane a bad servant and a good
master O, Mark Clark -- come !- And you, Billy
Smallbury -- and you, Maryann Money -- and you, Jan
Coggan, and Matthew there!' Other figures now
appeared behind this shouting man and among the
smoke, and
<P 95>
Gabriel found that, far from being alone
he was in a great company -- whose shadows danced
merrily up and down, timed by the jigging of the
flames, and not at all by their owners' movements.
The assemblage -- -belonging to that class of society
which casts its thoughts into the form of feeling, and
its feelings into the form of commotion -- set to work
with a remarkable confusion of purpose.
'Stop the draught under the wheat-rick!' cried
Gabriel to those nearest to him. The corn stood on
stone staddles, and between these, tongues of yellow
hue from the burning straw licked and darted playfully.
If the fire once got under this stack, all would be
lost.
'Get a tarpaulin -- quick .! ' said Gabriel.
A rick-cloth was brought, and they hung it like a
curtain across the channel. The flames immediately
ceased to go under the bottom of the corn-stack, and
stood up vertical.
'Stand here with a bucket of water and keep the
cloth wet,' said Gabriel again.
The flames, now driven upwards, began to attack
the angles of the huge roof covering the wheat-stack.
'A ladder,' cried Gabriel.
'The ladder was against the straw-rick and is burnt
to a cinder,' said a spectre-like form in the smoke.
Oak seized the cut ends of the sheaves, as if he
were going to engage in the operation of ' reed-drawing,'
and digging in his feet, and occasionally sticking in the
stem of his sheep-crook, he clambered up the beetling
face. He at once sat astride the very apex, and began
with his crook to beat off the fiery fragments which had
lodged thereon, shouting to the others to get him a
bough and a ladder, and some water.
Billy Smallbury -- one of the men who had been on
the waggon -- by this time had found a ladder, which
Mark Clark ascended, holding on beside Oak upon the
thatch. The smoke at this corner was stifling, and
Clark, a nimble fellow, having been handed a bucket
of water, bathed Oak's face and sprinkled him generally,
whilst Gabriel, now with a long beech-bough in one
hand, in addition to his crook in the other, kept
sweeping the stack and dislodging all fiery particles.
<P 96>
On the ground the groups of villagers were still
occupied in doing all they could to keep down the
conflagration, which was not much. They were all
tinged orange, and backed up by shadows of varying
pattern. Round the corner of the largest stack, out
of the direct rays of the fire, stood a pony, bearing a
young woman on its back. By her side was another
woman, on foot. These two seemed to keep at a
distance from the fire, that the horse might not beome
restive.
'He's a shepherd,' said the woman on foot. 'Yes --
he is. See how his crook shines as he beats the rick
with it. And his smock-frock is burnt in two holes, I
declare.! A fine young shepherd he is too, ma'am.'
' Whose shepherd is he?' said the equestrian in a
clear voice.
'Don't know, ma'am.'
 " Don't any of the others know ?'
 " Nobody at all -- I've asked 'em. Quite a stranger,
 they say.'
 The young woman on the pony rode out from the
shade and looked anxiously around.
"Do you think the barn is safe ?" she said.
"D'ye think the barn is safe, Jan Coggan ?' said
the second woman, passing on the question to the
nearest man in that direction.
"Safe -now -- leastwise I think so. If this rick had
gone the barn would have followed. 'Tis- that bold
shepherd up there that have done the most good -- he
sitting on the top o' rick, whizzing his great long-arms
about like a windmill.'
" He does work hard,' said the young woman on
horseback, looking up at Gabriel through her thick
woollen veil. "I wish he was shepherd here. Don't
any of you know his name.'
"Never heard the man's name in my life, or seed
his form afore.'
The fire began to get worsted, and Gabriel's elevated
position being no longer required of him, he made as
if to descend.
"Maryann,' said the girl on horseback, "go to him
as he comes down, and say that the farmer wishes to
thank him for the great service he has done.'
Maryann stalked off towards the rick and met
Oak at the foot of the ladder. She delivered ber
message.
<P 97>
" Where is your master the farmer ?' asked Gabriel,
kindling with the idea of getting employment that
seemed to strike him now.
" 'Tisn't a master ; 'tis a mistress, shepherd.'
" A woman farmer ? '
"Ay, 'a b'lieve, and a rich one too .!' said a by"
stander. " Lately 'a came here from a distance. Took
on her uncle's farm, who died suddenly. Used to
measure his money in half-pint cups. They say now
that she've business in every bank in Casterbridge, and
thinks no more of playing pitch-and-toss sovereign than
you and I, do pitch-halfpenny -- not a bit in the world,
shepherd.'
"That's she, back there upon the pony,' said Mary+
ann ;"wi'her face a-covered up in that black cloth with
holes in it.'
Oak, his features smudged, grimy, and undiscoverable
from the smoke and heat, his smock-frock burnt-into
holes and dripping with water, the ash stem of his sheep+
crook charred six inches shorter, advansed with the
humility stern adversity had thrust upon him up to
the slight female form in the saddle. He lifted his
hat with respect, and not without galantry: stepping
close to her hanging feet he said in a hesitating voice, --
" Do you happen to want a shepherd, ma'am ? '
She lifted the wool veil tied round her face, and
looked all astonishment. Gabriel and his cold-hearted
darling, Bathsheba Everdene, were face to face.
Bathsheba did not speak, and he mechanically
repeated in an abashed and sad voice, --
" Do you want a shepherd, ma'am ? '
<C vii>
<P 98>
RECOGNITION -- A TIMID GIRL
BATHSHEBA withdrew into the shade. She scarcely
knew whether most to be amused at the singularity of
the meeting, or to be concerned at its awkwardness.
There was room for a little pity, also for a very little
exultation : the former at his position, the latter at her
own. Embarrassed she was not, and she" remembered
Gabriel's declaration of love to her at Norcombe only
to think she had nearly forgotten it.
" Yes,' she murmured, putting on an air of dignity,
and turning again to him with a little warmth of cheek ;
" I do want a shepherd. But --  -- '
" He's the very man, ma'am,' said one of the villagers,
quietly.
Conviction breeds conviction. " Ay, that 'a is,' said
a second, decisively.
"The man, truly .! ' said a third, with heartiness."
" He's all there ! ' said number four, fervidly."
Then will you tell him to speak to the bailiff, said
Bathsheba.
All "was practical again now. A summer eve and
loneliness would have been necessary to give the
meeting its proper fulness of romance.
the palpitation within his breast at discovering that this
Ashtoreth of strange report was only a modification of
Venus the well-known and admired, retired with him to
talk over the necessary preliminaries of hiring.
The fire before them wasted away. "Men,' said
Bathsheba, " you shall take a little refreshment after this
extra work. Will you come to the house ?'
"We could knock in a bit and a drop a good deal
freer, Miss,
<P 99>
if so be ye'd send it to Warren's Malthouse,'
replied the spokesman.
Bathsheba then rode off into the darkness, and the
men straggled on to the village in twos and threes -- Oak
and the bailiff being left by the rick alone.
"And now,' said the bailiff, finally, "all is settled, I
think, about your coming, and I am going home-along.
Good-night to ye, shepherd.'
" Can you get me a lodging ? ' inquired Gabriel.
'That I can't, indeed," he said, moving past Oak as
a Christian edges past an offertory-plate when he does
not mean to contribute. "If you follow on the road till
you come to Warren's Malthouse, where they are all
gone to have their snap of victuals, I daresay some of
'em will tell you of a place. Good-night to ye, shepherd.'
The bailiff who showed this nervous dread of loving
his neighbour as himself, went up the hill, and Oak
walked on to the village, still astonished at the ren+
counter with Bathsheba, glad of his nearness to her, and
perplexed at the rapidity with which the unpractised girl
of Norcombe had developed into the supervising and cool
woman here. But some women only require an emerg+
ency to make them fit for one.
Obligcd, to some extent, to forgo dreaming in order
to find the way, he reachcd the churchyard, and passed
round it under the wall where several ancient trees grew.
There was a wide margin of grass along here, and
Gabriel's footsteps were deadened by its softness, even
at this indurating period of the year. When abreast of
a trunk which appeared to be the oldest of the old, he
became aware that a figure was standing behind it.
Gabriel did not pause in his walk, and in another
moment he accidentally kicked a loose stone. The noise
was enough to disturb the motionless stranger, who
started and assumed a careless position.
It was a slim girl, rather thinly clad.
" Good-night to you,' said Gabriel, heartily.
" Good-night,' said the girl to Gabriel.
The voice was unexpectedly attractive ; it was "the
low and
<P 100>
dulcet note suggestive of romance ; common in
descriptions, rare in experience.
'I'll thank you to tell me if I'm in the way for
Warren's Malthouse ? ' Gabriel resumed, primarily to gain
the information, indirectly to get more of the music.
"Quite right. It's at the bottom of the hill. And
do you know --  -- ' The girl hesitated and then went
on again. "Do you know how late they keep open
the Buck's Head Inn?' She seemed" to be won by
Gabriel's heartiness, as Gabriel had been won by her
modulations.
" I don't know where the Buck's Head is, or anything
about it. Do you think of going there to-night ?'
" Yes --  -- ' The woman again paused. There was
no necessity for any continuance of speech, and the fact
that she did add more seemed to proceed from an
unconscious desire to show unconcern by making a
remark, which is noticeable in the ingenuous when they
are acting by stealth. " You are not a Weatherbury man ? '
she said, timorously.
' I am not. I am the new shepherd -- just arrived.'
"Only a shepherd -- and you seem almost a farmer by
your ways.'
" Only a shepherd,' Gabriel repeated, in a dull cadence
of finality. " His thoughts were directed to the past, his
eyes to the feet of the girl; and for the first time he
saw lying there a bundle of some sort. She may have
perceived the direction of his face, for she said
coaxingly, --
" You won't say anything in the parish about having
seen me here, will you -- at least, not for a day or two ?'
"I won't if you wish me not to,' said Oak.
"Thank you, indeed,' the other replied.'I am
rather poor, and I don't want people to know anything
about me.'  Then she was silent and shivered.
'You ought to have a cloak on such a cold night,'
Gabriel observed. " I would advise 'ee to get indoors."
"O no! Would you mind going on and leaving
me ? I thank you much for what you have told me.'
" I will go on,' he said ; adding hesitatingly, -- ' Since
you are
<P 101>
not very well off, perhaps you would accept this
trifle from me. It is only a shilling, but'it is all I have
to spare.'
' Yes, I will take it,' said the stranger, gratefully.
She extended her hand ; Gabriel his. In feeling for
each other's palm in the gloom before the money could
be passed, a minute incident occurred which told much.
Gabriel's fingers alighted on the young woman's wrist.
It was beating with a throb of tragic intensity. He had
frequently felt the same quick, hard beat in the femoral
artery of -- his lambs when overdriven. It suggested a
consumption too great of a vitality which, to judge from
her figure and stature, was already too little.
"What is the matter ?'
" Nothing.'
'But there is?'
" No, no, no ! Let your having seen me be a.secret .! "
' Very well ; I will. Good-night, again.'
" Good-night.'
The young girl remained motionless by the tree, and
Gabriel descended into the village of Weatherbury, or
Lower Longpuddle as it was sometimes called. He
fancied that he had felt himself in the penumbra of a
very deep sadness when touching that slight and fragile
creature. But wisdom lies in moderating mere impres+
sions, and Gabriel endeavoured to think little of this.
<C viii>
<P 102>
THE MALTHOUSE -- THE CHAT -- NEWS
WARREN'S Malthouse was enclosed by an old wall
inwrapped with ivy, and though not much of the exterior
was visible at this hour, the character and purposes of
the building were clearly enough shown by its outline
upon the sky. From the walls an overhanging thatched
roof sloped up to a point in the centre, upon which rose
a small wooden lantern, fitted with louvre-boards on all
the four sides, and from these openings a mist was dimly
perceived to be escaping into the night air. There was
no window in front ; but a square hole in the door was
glazed with a single pane, through which red, comfortable
rays now stretched out upon the ivied wall in front.
Voices were to be heard inside.
Oak's hand skimmed the surface of the door with
fingers extended to an Elymas-the-Somerer pattern, till
he found a leathern strap, which he pulled. This lifted
a wooden latch, and the door swung open.
The room inside was lighted only by the, ruddy glow
from the kiln mouth, which shone over ,the floor with
the streaming, horizontality of the setting sun, and threw
upwards the shadows of all facial irregularities in those
assembled around. The stone-flag floor was worn into
a path from the doorway to the kiln, and into undula+
tions everywhere. A curved settle of unplaned oak
stretched along one side, and in a remote corner was a
small bed and bedstead, the owner and frequent occupier
of which was the maltster.
This aged man was now sitting opposite the fire, his
frosty white hair and beard overgrowing his gnarled
figure like the grey moss and lichen upon a leafless
apple-tree. He wore breeches and the laced-up shoes
called ankle-jacks; he kept his eyes fixed upon the
fire.
<P 103>
Gabriel's nose was greeted by an atmosphere laden
with the sweet smell of new malt. The conversation
(which seemed to have been concerning the origin of the
fire) immediately ceased, and every one ocularly criticised
him to the degree expressed by contracting the flesh of
their foreheads and looking at him with narrowed eye+
lids, as if he had been a light too strong for their sight.
Several exclaimed meditatively, after this operation had
been completed : --
"Oh, 'tis the new shepherd, 'a b'lieve.'
"We thought we heard a hand pawing about the
door for the bobbin, but weren't sure 'twere not a dead
leaf blowed across,' said another. " Come in, shepherd ;
sure ye be welcome, though we don't know yer name.'
" Gabriel Oak, that's my name, neighbours.'
The ancient maltster sitting in the midst turned up
this -- his turning being as the turning of a rusty
crane.
"That's never Gable Oak's grandson over at Nor+
combe -- never !. ' he said, as a formula expressive of
surprise, which nobody was supposed to take literally'.
'My father and my grandfather were old men of the
name of Gabriel,' said the shepherd, placidly.
"Thought I knowed the man's face as I seed him
on the rick ! -- thought I did.! And where be ye trading
o't to now, shepherd ? '
" I'm thinking of biding here,' said Mr. Oak.
"Knowed yer grandfather for years and years !'
continued the maltster, the words coming forth of their
own accord as if the momentum previously imparted
had been sufficient.
'Ah -- and did you! '
" Knowed yer grandmother.'
'And her too!'
"Likewise knowed yer father when he was a child.
Why, my boy Jacob there and your father were sworn
brothers -- that they were sure -- weren't ye, Jacob ? '
"Ay, sure,' said his son, a young man about sixty+
five, with a semi-bald head and one tooth in the left
centre of his upper jaw, which made much of itself by
standing prominent, like a
<P 104>
milestone in a bank. 'But
'twas Joe had most to do with him. However, my son
William must have knowed the very man afore us --
didn't ye, Billy, afore ye left Norcombe ? '
"No, 'twas Andrew,' said Jacob's son Billy, a child
of forty, or thereabouts, who manifested the peculiarity
of possessing a cheerful soul in a gloomy body, and
whose whiskers were assuming a chinchilla shade here
and there.
"I can mind Andrew,' said Oak, 'as being a man in
the place when I was quite a child.'
"Ay -- the other day I and my youngest daughter,
Liddy, were over at my grandson's christening,' continued
Billy. ' We were talking about this very family, and
'twas only last Purification Day in this very world, when
the use-money is gied away to the second-best poor
folk, you know, shepherd, and I can mind the day
because they all had to traypse up to the vestry -- yes,
this very man's family.'
' Come, shepherd, and drink. 'Tis gape and
swaller with us -- a drap of sommit, but not of much
account,' said the maltster, removing from the fire his
eyes, which were vermilion-red and bleared by gazing
into it for so many years. "Take up the God-forgive"
me, Jacob. See if 'tis warm, Jacoh.'
Jacob stooped to the God-forgive-me, which was a
two-handled tall mug standing in the ashes, cracked
and charred with heat : it was rather furred with ex"
traneous matter about the outside, especially in the
crevices of the handles, the innermost curves of which
may not have seen daylight for several years by reason
of this encrustation thereon -- formed of ashes accident+
ally wetted with cider and baked hard; but to the mind
of any sensible drinker the cup was no worse for that,
being incontestably clean on the inside and about the
rim. It may be observed that such a class of mug is
called a God-forgive-me in Weatherbury and its vicinity
for uncertain reasons ; probably because its size makes
any given toper feel ashamed of himself when he sees
its bottom in drinking it empty.
Jacob, on receiving the order to see if the liquor was
warm enough, placidly dipped his forefinger into it by
way of thermometer, and having pronounced it nearly
of the proper degree, raised the cup and very civilly
attempted to dust some of the
<P 105>
ashes from the bottom
with the skirt of his smock-frock, because Shepherd Oak
was a stranger.
"A clane cup for the shepherd,' said the maltster
commandingly.
"No -- not at all," said Gabriel, in a reproving tone
of considerateness. "I never fuss about dirt in its pure
state, and when I know what sort it is.' Taking the
mug he drank an inch or more from the depth of its
contents, and duly passed it to the next man.
wouldn't think of giving such trouble to neighbours in
washing up when there's so much work to be done in
the world already,' continued Oak in a moister tone,
after recovering from the stoppage of breath which is
occasioned by pulls at large mugs.
' A right sensible man,' said Jacob.
" True, true ; it can't be gainsaid!.' observed a brisk
young man -- Mark Clark by name, a genial and pleasant
gentleman, whom to meet anywhcre in your travels was
to know, to know was to drink with, and to drink with
was, unfortunately, to pay for.
"And here's a mouthful of bread and bacon that
mis'ess have sent, shepherd. The cider will go down
better with a bit of victuals. Don't ye chaw quite close,
shepherd, for I let the bacon fall in the road outside as
I was bringing it along, and may be 'tis rather gritty.
There, 'tis clane dirt; and we all know what that is,
as you say, and you bain't a particular man we see,
shepherd.'
" True, true -- not at all,' said the friendly Oak.
'Don't let your teeth quite meet, and you won't feel
the sandiness at all. Ah !. 'tis wonderful what can be
done by contrivance .! '
" My own mind exactly, neighbour.'
" Ah, he's his grandfer's own grandson .! -- his grandfer
were just such a nice unparticular man !.' said the maltster.
" Drink, Henry Fray -- drink,' magnanimously said
Jan Coggan, a person who held Saint-Simonian notions
of share and share alike where liquor was concerned, as
the vessel showed signs of approaching him in its gradual
revolution among them.
Having at this moment reached the end of a wistful
gaze
<P 106>
into mid-air, Henry did not refuse. He was a man
of more than middle age, with eyebrows high up in his
forehead, who laid it down that the law of the world
was bad, with a long-suffering look through his listeners
at the world alluded to, as it presented itself to his
imagination. He always signed his name 'Henery' --
strenuously insisting upon that spelling, and if any
passing schoolmaster ventured to remark that the second
'e' was superfluous and old-fashioned, he received the
reply that ' H-e-n-e-r-y' was the name he was christened
and the name he 'would stick to -- in the tone of one
to whom orthographical differences were matters which
had a great deal to do with personal character.
Mr. Jan Coggan, who had passed the cup to Henery,
was a crimson man with a spacious countenance, and
private glimmer in his eye, whose name had appeared
on the marriage register of Weatherbury and neighbour+
ing parishes as best man and chief witness in countless
unions of the previous twenty years; he also very
frequently filled the post of head godfather in baptisms
of the subtly-jovial kind.
" Come, Mark Clark -- come. Ther's plenty more
in the barrel,' said Jan.
"Ay -- that I will; 'tis my only doctor,' replied Mr.
Clark, who, twenty years younger than Jan Coggan,
revolved in the same orbit. He secreted mirth on all
occasions for special discharge at popular parties.
" Why, Joseph Poorgrass, ye han't had a drop! ' said
Mr. Coggan to a self-conscious man in the background,
thrusting the cup towards him.
" Such a modest man as he is !. ' said Jacob Smallbury.
" Why, ye've hardly had strength of eye enough to look
in our young mis'ess's face, so I hear, Joseph ?'
All looked at Joseph Poorgrass with pitying reproach.
" No -- I've hardly looked at her at all,' simpered
Joseph, reducing his body smaller whilst talking,
apparently from a meek sense of undue prominence.
"And when I seed her, 'twas nothing but blushes with
me!'
' Poor feller,' said Mr. Clark.
"'Tis a curious nature for a man,' said Jan Coggan.
<P 107>
" Yes,' continued Jdseph Poorgrass -- his shyness,
which was so painful as a defect, filling him with a
mild complacency now that it was regarded as an
interesting study. " 'Twere blush, blush, blush with
me every minute of the time, when she was speaking
to me.'
"I believe ye, Joseph Poorgrass, for we all know ye
to be a very bashful man.'
"'Tis a' awkward gift for a man, poor soul,' said the
maltster. "And ye have suffered from it a long time,
we know.'
"Ay ever since I was a boy. Yes -- mother was
concerned to her heart about it -- yes. But twas all
nought.'
"Did ye ever go into the world to try and stop it,
Joseph Poorgrass ? '
"Oh ay, tried all sorts o' company. They took me
to Greenhill Fair, and into a great gay jerry-go-nimble
show, where there were women-folk riding round --
standing upon horses, with hardly anything on but their
smocks; but it didn't cure me a morsel. And then I
was put errand-man at the Women's Skittle Alley at the
back of the Tailor's Arms in Casterbridge. 'Twas a
horrible sinful situation, and a very curious place for a
good man. I had to stand and look ba'dy people in
the face from morning till night; but 'twas no use -- I
was just as-bad as ever after all. Blushes hev been
in the family for generations. There, 'tis a happy pro+
vidence that I be no worse.'
" True,' said Jacob Smallbury, deepening his thoughts
to a profounder view of the subject. "'Tis a thought
to look at, that ye might have been worse; but even
as you be, 'tis a very bad affliction for 'ee, Joseph. For
ye see, shepherd, though 'tis very well for a woman,
dang it all, 'tis awkward for a man like him, poor
feller ? '
" 'Tis -- 'tis,' said Gabriel, recovering from a medita+
tion. " Yes, very awkward for the man.'
" Ay, and he's very timid, too,' observed Jan Coggan.
"Once he had been working late at Yalbury Bottom,
and had had a drap of drink, and lost his way as he was
coming home-along through Yalbury Wood, didn't ye,
Master Poorgrass ? '
" No, no, no ; not that story !' expostulated the
modest man, forcing a laugh to bury his concern.
<P 108>
" --  --  And so 'a lost himself quite,' continued Mr
Coggan, with an impassive face, implying that a true
narrative, like time and tide, must run its course and
would respect no man. "And as he was coming along
in the middle of the night, much afeared, and not able
to find his way out of the trees nohow, 'a cried out,
" Man-a-lost!. man-a-lost !." A owl in a tree happened
to be crying "Whoo-whoo-whoo !" as owls do, you
know, shepherd ' (Gabriel nodded), " and Joseph, all
in a tremble, said, " Joseph Poorgrass, of Weatherbury,
sir.!"
"No, no, now -- that's too much! ' said the timid
man, becoming a man of brazen courage all of a sudden.
"I didn't say sir. I'll tike my oath I didn't say " Joseph
Poorgrass o' Weatherbury, sir." No, no ; what's right
is right, and I never said sir to the bird, knowing very
well that no man of a gentleman's rank would be
hollering there at that time o' night. " Joseph Poor+
grass of Weatherbury,"  -- that's every word I said, and
I shouldn't ha' said that if 't hadn't been for Keeper
Day's metheglin.... There, 'twas a merciful thing it
ended where it did.'
The question of which was right being tacitly waived
by the company, Jan went on meditatively : --
"And he's the fearfullest man, bain't ye, Joseph?
Ay, another time ye were lost by Lambing-Down Gate,
weren't ye, Joseph ? '
"I was,' replied Poorgrass, as if there were some
conditions too serious even for modesty to remember
itself under, this being one.
' Yes ; that were the middle of the night, too. The
gate would not open, try how he would, and knowing
there was the Devil's hand in it, he kneeled down.'
'Ay,' said Joseph, acquiring confidence from the
warmth of the fire, the cider, and a perception of the
narrative capabilities of the experience alluded to.
" My heart died within me, that time; but I kneeled
down and said the Lord's Prayer, and then the Belie
THE CHAT
right through, and then the Ten Commandments, in
earnest prayer. But no, the gate wouldn't open; and
then I went on with Dearly Beloved Brethren, and,
thinks I, this makes four, and 'tis all I know out of
book, and if this don't do it nothing will, and I'm a
lost man. Well, when I got to
<P 109>
Saying After Me, I
rose from my knees and found the gate would open
 -- yes, neighbours, the gate opened the same as ever.'
  A meditation on the obvious inference wsas indulged
in by all, and during its continuance each directed his
vision into the ashpit, which glowed like a desert in
the tropics under a vertical sun, shaping their eyes long
and liny, partly because of the light, partly from the
depth of the subject discussed.
  Gabriel broke the silence. "What sort of a place
is this to live at, and what sort of a mis'ess is she to
work under?' Gabriel's bosom thrilled gently as he
thus slipped under the notice of the assembly the inner+
most subject of his heart.
  "We d' know little of her -- nothing. She only
showed herself a few days ago. Her uncle was took
bad, and the doctor was called with his world-wide
skill; but he couldn't save the man. As I take it,
she's going to keep on the farm.
  "That's abouyt the shape o't, 'a b'lieve,' said Jan
uncle was a very fair sort of man. Did ye know en,
be under 'em as under one here and there. Her
uncle was a very fair sort of man. Did ye know 'en,
shepherd -- a bachelor-man ? '
  "Not at all.'
  "I used to go to his house a-courting my first wife,
Charlotte, who was his dairymaid. Well, a very good+
hearted man were Farmer Everdene, and I being a
respectable young fellow was allowed to call and see
her and drink as much ale as I liked, but not to carry
away any -- outside my skin I mane of course.'
  "Ay, ay, Jan Coggan; we know yer maning.'
  "And so you see 'twas beautiful ale, and I wished
to value his kindness as much as I could, and not to
be so ill-mannered as to drink only a thimbleful, which
would have been insulting the man's generosity  --  -- '
  "True, Master Coggan, 'twould so,' corroborated
Mark Clark.
  " --  -- And so I used to eat a lot of salt fish afore
going, and then by the time I got there I were as dry
as a lime-basket -- so thorough dry that that ale would
slip down  -- ah, 'twould slip down sweet! Happy
times! heavenly times! Such lovely drunks as I
used to have at that house! You can mind, Jacob?
You used to go wi' me sometimes.'
<P 110>
  "I can -- I can,' said Jacob. "That one, too, that
we had at Buck's Head on a White Monday was a
pretty tipple.'
  "'Twas. But for a wet of the better class, that
brought you no nearer to the horned man than you were
afore you begun, there was none like those in Farmer
Everdene's kitchen. Not a single damn allowed; no,
not a bare poor one, even at the most cheerful moment
when all were blindest, though the good old word of
sin thrown in here and there at such times is a great
relief to a merry soul.'
  "True,' said the maltster. "Nater requires her
swearing at the regular times, or she's not herself; and
unholy exclamations is a necessity of life.'
  "But Charlotte,' continued Coggan -- "not a word of
the sort would Charlotte allow, nor the smallest item of
taking in vain.... Ay, poor Charlotte, I wonder if she
had the good fortune to get into Heaven when 'a died!.
But 'a was never much in luck's way, and perhaps 'a
went downwards after all, poor soul.'
  "And did any of you know Miss Everdene's-father
and mother?' inquired the shepherd, who found some
difficulty in keeping the conversation in the desired
channel.
THE CHAT
  "I knew them a little,' said Jacob Smallbury; "but
they were townsfolk, and didn't live here. They've
been dead for years. Father, what sort of people were
mis'ess' father and mother?'
  "Well,' said the maltster, "he wasn't much to look
at; but she was a lovely woman. He was fond enough
of her as his sweetheart.'
  "Used to kiss her scores and long-hundreds o times,
so 'twas said,' observed Coggan.
  "He was very proud of her, too, when they were
married, as I've been told,' said the maltster.
  "Ay,' said Coggan. "He admired her so much that
he used to light the candle three time a night to look
at her.'
  "Boundless love; I shouldn't have supposed it in the
universe!' murmered Joseph Poorgrass, who habitually
spoke on a large scale in his moral reflections.
  "Well, to be sure,' said Gabriel.
  "Oh, 'tis true enough. I knowed the man and
woman both well. Levi Everdene -- that was the man's
name, sure. ""Man,''
<P 111>
saith I in my hurry, but he were
of a higher circle of life than that -- 'a was a gentleman+
tailor really, worth scores of pounds. And he became
a very celebrated bankrupt two or three times.'
  "Oh, I thought he was quite a common man!.' said
Joseph.
  "O no, no! That man failed for heaps of money;
hundreds in gold and silver.'
  The maltster being rather short of breath, Mr. Coggan,
after absently scrutinising a coal which had fallen among
the ashes, took up the narrative, with a private twirl of
his eye: --
  "Well, now, you'd hardly believe it, but that man --
husbands alive, after a while. Understand' 'a didn't
want to be fickle, but he couldn't help it. The poor
feller were faithful and true enough to her in his wish,
but his heart would rove, do what he would. He spoke
to me in real tribulation about it once. ""Coggan,''
he said, ""I could never wish for a handsomer woman
than I've got, but feeling she's ticketed as my lawful
wife, I can't help my wicked heart wandering, do what
I will.'' But at last I believe he cured it by making her
take off her wedding-ring and calling her by her maiden
name as they sat together after the shop was shut, and
so 'a would get to fancy she was only his sweetheart, and
not married to him at all. And as soon as he could
thoroughly fancy he was doing wrong and committing
the seventh, 'a got to like her as well as ever, and they
lived on a perfect picture of mutel love.'
  "Well, 'twas a most ungodly remedy,' murmured
Joseph Poorgrass; "but we ought to feel deep cheerful+
ness that a 'happy Providence kept it from being any
worse. You see, he might have gone the bad road and
given his eyes to unlawfulness entirely -- yes, gross un+
lawfulness, so to say it.'
  "You see,' said Billy Smallbury, "The man's will was
to do right, sure enough, but his heart didn't chime in.'
  "He got so much better, that he was quite godly
in his later years, wasn't he, Jan ?' said Joseph Poor+
grass. "He got himself confirmed over again in a more
serious way, and took to saying ""Amen'' almost as loud
as the clerk, and he liked to copy comforting verses
from the tombstones. He used, too, to hold the money+
plate at Let Your Light so Shine, and stand
<P 112>
godfather
to poor little come-by-chance children; and he kept a
missionary' box upon his table to nab folks unawares
when they called; yes, and he would-box the charity+
boys' ears, if they laughed in church, till they could
hardly stand upright, and do other deeds of piety
natural to the saintly inclined.'
  "Ay, at that time he thought of nothing but high
things,' added Billy Smallbury. "One day Parson Thirdly
met him and said, ""Good-Morning, Mister Everdene; 'tis
THE CHAT
a fine day!'' ""Amen'' said Everdene, quite absent+
like, thinking only of religion when he seed a parson+
  "Their daughter was not at all a pretty chiel at that
time,' said Henery Fray. "Never should have. thought
she'd have growed up such a handsome body as she is.'
  "'Tis to be hoped her temper is as good as her face.'
  "Well, yes; but the baily will have most to do with
the business and ourselves. Ah!' Henery gazed into
the ashpit, and smiled volumes of ironical knowledge.
  "A queer Christian, like the Devil's head in a cowl,
  "He is,' said Henery, implying that irony must cease
at a certain point. "Between we two, man and man, I
believe that man would as soon tell a lie Sundays as
working-days -- that I do so.'
  "Good faith, you do talk!' said Gabriel.
  "True enough,' said the man of bitter moods, looking
round upon the company with the antithetic laughter
that comes from a keener appreciation of the miseries
of life than ordinary men are capable of. 'Ah, there's
people of one sort, and people of another, but that man
 -- bless your souls!'
  Gabriel thought fit to change the subject. "You
must be a very aged man, malter, to have sons growed
mild and ancient' he remarked.
  "Father's so old that 'a can't mind his age, can ye,
father?' interposed Jacob. "And he growled terrible
crooked too, lately' Jacob continued, surveying his
father's figure, which
<P 113>
was rather more bowed than his own.
"Really one may say that father there is three-double.'
  "Crooked folk will last a long while,' said the maltster,
grimly, and not in the best humour.
  "Shepherd would like to hear the pedigree of yer
life, father -- wouldn't ye, shepherd ?
  "Ay that I should,' said Gabriel with the heartiness
of a man who had longed to hear it for several months.
"What may your age be, malter?'
  The maltster cleared his throat in an exaggerated
form for emphasis, and elongating his gaze to the
remotest point of the ashpit! said, in the slow speech
justifiable when the importance of a subject is so
generally felt that any mannerism must be tolerated
in getting at it, "Well, I don't mind the year I were
born in, but perhaps I can reckon up the places I've
lived at, and so get it that way. I bode at Upper Long+
puddle across there' (nodding to the north) "till I were
eleven. I bode seven at Kingsbere' (nodding to the
east) "where I took to malting. I went therefrom to
Norcombe, and malted there two-and-twenty years, and+
two-and-twenty years I was there turnip-hoeing and
harvesting. Ah, I knowed that old place, Norcombe,
years afore you were thought of, Master Oak' (Oak smiled
sincere belief in the fact). "Then I malted at Dur+
nover four year, and four year turnip-hoeing; and
I was fourteen times eleven months at Millpond St.
Jude's ' (nodding north-west-by-north). "Old Twills
wouldn't hire me for more than eleven months at a
time, to keep me from being chargeable to the parish
if so be I was disabled. Then I was three year at
Mellstock, and I've been here one-and-thirty year come
Candlemas. How much is that?"
  "Hundred and seventeen,' chuckled another old
gentleman, given to mental arithmetic and little con+
versation, who had hitherto sat unobserved in a corner.
  "Well, then, that's my age,' said the maltster, em+
phatically.
  "O no, father!' said Jacob. "Your turnip-hoeing
were in the summer and your malting in the winter of
the same years, and ye don't ought to count-both halves
father.'
<P 114>
  "Chok' it all! I lived through the summers, didn't
I? That's my question. I suppose ye'll say next I be
no age at all to speak of?'
  "Sure we shan't,' said Gabriel, soothingly.
  "Ye be a very old aged person, malter,' attested Jan
must have a wonderful talented constitution to be able
to live so long, mustn't he, neighbours?'
  "True, true; ye must, malter, wonderful;' said the
meeting unanimously.
  The maltster, being know pacified, was even generous
enough to voluntarily disparage in a slight degree the
virtue of having lived a great many years, by mentioning
that the cup they were drinking out of was three years
older than he.
  While the cup was being examined, the end of
Gabriel Oak's flute became visible over his smock-frock
I seed you blowing into a great flute by now at Caster+
bridge?'
  "You did,' said Gabriel, blushingh faintly. "I've been
in great trouble, neighbours, and was driven to it.
take it careless-like, shepherd and your time will come
tired?'
  "Neither drum nor trumpet have I heard since
Christmas,' said Jan Coggan. "Come, raise a tune,
Master Oak!'
  "That I will,' said Gabriel, pulling out his flute and
putting it together. "A poor tool, neighbours; but
such as I can do ye shall have and welcome.'
  Oak then struck up "Jockey to the Fair,' and played
that sparkling melody three times through accenting the
notes in the third round in a most artistic and lively
manner by bending his body in small jerks and tapping
with his foot to beat time.
  "He can blow the flute very well -- that 'a can,' said
a young married man, who having no individuality worth
mentioning was known as "Susan Tall's husband.' He
continued, "I'd as lief as not be able to blow into a
flute as well-as that.'
<P 115>
  "He's a clever man, and 'tis a true comfort for us to
have such a shepherd,' murmured Joseph Poorgrass, in
a soft cadence. "We ought to feel full o' thanksgiving
that he's not a player of ba'dy songs 'instead of these
merry tunes; for 'twould have been just as easy for God
to have made the shepherd a loose low man -- a man of
iniquity, so to speak it -- as what he is. Yes, for our wives'
and daughters' sakes we should feel real thanks giving.'
  "True, true, -- real thanksgiving!' dashed in Mark
Clark conclusively, not feeling it to be of any conse+
quence to his opinion that he had only heard about a
word and three-quarters of what Joseph had said.
  "Yes,' added Joseph, beginning to feel like a man in
the Bible; "for evil do thrive so in these times that ye
may be as much deceived in the clanest shaved and
whitest shirted man as in the raggedest tramp upon the
turnpike, if I may term it so.'
  "Ay, I can mind yer face now, shepherd,' said
Henery Fray, criticising Gabriel with misty eyes as he
entered upon his second tune. "Yes -- now I see 'ee
blowing into the flute I know 'ee to be the same man
I see play at Casterbridge, for yer mouth were scrimped
up and yer eyes a-staring out like a strangled man's --
just as they be now.'
  "'Tis a pity that playing the flute should make a man
look such a scarecrow,' observed Mr. Mark Clark, with
additional criticism of Gabriel's countenance, the latter
person jerking out, with the ghastly grimace required by
the instrument, the chorus of "Dame Durden!
  "I hope you don't mind that young man's bad
manners in naming your features?' whispered Joseph to
Gabriel.
  "Not at all,' said Mr. Oak.
  "For by nature ye be a very handsome man,
shepherd,' continued Joseph Poorgrass, with winning
sauvity.
  "Ay, that ye be, shepard,' said the company.
  "Thank you very much,' said Oak, in the modest
tone good
<P 116>
manners demanded, thinking, however, that
he would never let Bathsheba see him playing the
flute; in this severe showing s discretion equal to that
related to its sagacious inventress, the divine Minerva
herself.
  "Ah, when I and my wife were married at Norcombe
Church,' said the old maltster, not pleased at finding
himself left out of the subject "we were called the
handsomest couple in the neighbourhood -- everybody
said so.'
  "Danged if ye bain't altered now, malter,' said a voice
with the vigour natural to the enunciation of a remark+
ably evident truism. It came from the old man in the
background, whose offensiveness and spiteful ways were
barely atoned for by the occasional chuckle he con+
tributed to general laughs.
  "O no, no,' said Gabriel.
  "Don't ye play no more shepherd ' said Susan Tall's
husband, the young married man who had spoken once
before. "I must be moving and when there's tunes
going on I seem as if hung in wires. If I thought after
I'd left that music was still playing, and I not there, I
should be quite melancholy-like.'
  "What's yer hurry then, Laban?' inquired Coggan+
"You used to bide as late as the latest.'
  "Well, ye see, neighbours, I was lately married to a
woman, and she's my vocation now, and so ye see --  -- '
The young man hated lamely.
  "New Lords new laws, as the saying is, I suppose,'
remarked Coggan.
  "Ay, 'a b'lieve -- ha, ha!' said Susan Tall's husband,
in a tone intended to imply his habitual reception of
jokes without minding them at all.   The young man
then wished them good-night and withdrew.
  Henery Fray was the first to follow. Then Gabriel
arose and went off with Jan Coggan, who had offered
him a lodging. A few minutes later, when the remaining
ones were on their legs and about to depart, Fray came
back again in a hurry. Flourishing his finger ominously
he threw a gaze teeming with tidings just -- where his eye
alighted by accident, which happened to be in Joseph
Poorgrass's face.
<P 117>
  "O -- what's the matter, what's the matter, Henery?'
said Joseph, starting back.
  "What's a-brewing, Henrey?' asked Jacob and Mark
Clark.
  "Baily Pennyways -- Baily Pennyways -- I said so; yes,
I said so!'
  "What, found out stealing anything?'
  "Stealing it is. The news is, that after Miss
Everdene got home she went out again to see all was
safe, as she usually do, and coming in found Baily
Pennyways creeping down the granary steps with half a
a bushel of barley. She fleed at him  like a cat -- never
such a tomboy as she is -- of course I speak with closed
doors?'
  "You do -- you do, Henery.'
  "She fleed at him, and, to cut a long story short,
he owned to having carried off five sack altogether, upon
her promising not to persecute him. Well, he's turned
out neck and crop, and my question is, who's going to
be baily now?'
  The question was such a profound one that Henery
was obliged to drink there and then from the large
cup till the bottom was distinctly visible inside. Before
he had replaced it on the table, in came the young man,
Susan Tall's husband, in a still greater hurry.
  "Have ye heard the news that's all over parish?'
  "About Baily Pennyways?'
  "But besides that?'
  "No -- not a morsel of it!' they replied, looking into
the very midst of Laban Tall as if to meet his words
half-way down his throat.
  "What a night of horrors!' murmured Joseph Poor+
grass, waving his hands spasmodically. "I've had the
news-bell ringing in my left ear quite bad enough for a
murder, and I've seen a magpie all alone!'
  "Fanny Robin -- Miss everdene's youngest servant --
can't be found. They've been wanting to lock up the
door these two hours, but she isn't come in. And they
don't know what to do about going to hed for fear of
locking her out. They wouldn't be so concerned if she
hadn't been noticed in such low spirits
<P 118>
these last few
days, and Maryann d'think the beginning of a crowner's
inquest has happened to the poor girl.'
  "O -- 'tis burned -- 'tis burned!' came from Joseph
Poorgrass's dry lips.
  "No -- 'tis drowned!' said 'Tall.
  "Or 'tis her father's razor!' suggested Billy Smallbury,
with a vivid sense of detail.
  "Well -- Miss Everdene wants to speak to one or two
of us before we go to bed. What with this trouble about
the baily, and now about the girl, mis'ess is almost wild.'
  They all hastened up the lane to the farmhouse,
excepting the old maltster, whom neither news, fire,
rain, nor thunder could draw from his hole. There, as
the others' footsteps died away he sat down again and
continued gazing as usual into the furnace with his red,
bleared eyes.
  From the bedroom window above their heads Bath+
sheba's head and shoulders, robed in mystic white, were
dimly seen extended into the air.
  "Are any of my men among you?' she said anxiously.
  "Yes, ma'am, several,' said Susan Tall's husband.
  "Tomorrow morning I wish two or three of you to
make inquiries in the villages round if they have seen
such a person as Fanny Robin. Do it quietly; there is
no reason for alarm as yet. She must have left whilst
we were all at the fire.'
  "I beg yer pardon, but had she any young man court+
ing her in the parish, ma'am?" asked Jacob Smallbury.
  "I don't know,' said Bathsheba.
  "I've never heard of any such thing, ma'am,' said
two or three.
  "It is hardly likely, either,' continued Bathsheba.
"For any lover of hers might have come to the house if
he had been a respectable lad. The most mysterious
matter connected with her absence -- indeed, the only
thing which gives me serious alarm -- is that she was
seen to go out of the house by Maryann with only her
indoor working gown on -- not even a bonnet.'
  "And you mean, ma'am, excusing my words, that a
young
<P 119>
woman would hardly go to see her young man
without dressing up,' said Jacob, turning his mental
vision upon past experiences. "That's true -- she would
not, ma'am.'
  "She had, I think, a bundle, though I couldn't see
very well,' said a female voice from another window,
which seemed that of Maryann. "But she had no
young man about here. Hers lives in Casterbridge, and
I believe he's a soldier.'
  "Do you know his name?' Bathsheba said.
  "No, mistress; she was very close about it.'
  "Perhaps I might be able to find out if I went to
Casterbridge barracks,' said William Smallbury.
  "Very well; if she doesn't return tomorrow, mind
you go there and try to discover which man it is, and
see him. I feel more responsible than I should if she
had had any friends or relations alive. I do hope she
has come to no harm through a man of that kind....
And then there's this disgraceful affair of the bailiff --
but I can't speak of him now.'
  Bathsheba had so many reasons for uneasiness that
it seemed she did not think it worth while to dwell
upon any particular one. "Do as I told you, then'
she said in conclusion, closing the casement.
  "Ay, ay, mistress; we will,' they replied, and moved
away.
  That night at Coggan's, Gabriel Oak, beneath the
screen of closed eyelids, was busy with fancies, and full
of movement, like a river flowing rapidly under its ice.
Night had always been the time at which he saw Bath+
sheba most vividly, and through the slow hours of
shadow he tenderly regarded her image now. It is
rarely that the pleasures of the imagination will compen+
sate for the pain of sleeplessness, but they possibly did
with Oak to-night, for the delight of merely seeing her
effaced for the time his perception of the great differ+
ence between seeing and possessing.
  He also thought of Plans for fetching his few utensils
and books from Norcombe. The Young Man's Best
Companion, The Farrier's Sure Guide, The Veterinary
Surgeon, Paradise Lost, The Pilgrim's Progress, Robinson
Crusoe, Ash's Dictionary, the Walkingame's Arithmetic,
constituted his library;
<P 120>
and though a limited series, it was
one from which he had acquired more sound informa+
tion by diligent perusal than many a man of opportunities
has done from a furlong of laden shelves.
<C ix>
<P 121>
THE HOMESTEAD -- A VISITOR -- HALF-CONFIDENCES
By daylight, the Bower of Oak's new-found mistress,
Bathsheba Everdene, presented itself as a hoary build+
ing, of the early stage of Classic Renaissance as regards
its architecture, and of 'a proportion which told at a
glance that, as is so frequently the case, it had once
been the memorial hall upon a small estate around it,
now altogether effaced as a distinct property, and merged
in the vast tract of a non-resident landlord, which com+
prised several such modest demesnes.
  Fluted pilasters, worked from the solid stone,
decorated its front, and above the roof the chimneys
were panelled or columnar, some coped gables with
finials and like features still retaining traces of their
Gothic extraction. Soft Brown mosses, like faded
velveteen, formed cushions upon the stone tiling, and
tufts of the houseleek or sengreen sprouted from the
eaves of the low surrounding buildings. A gravel walk
leading from the door to the road in front was encrusted
at the sides with more moss -- here it was a silver-green
variety, the nut-brown of the gravel being visible to the
width of only a foot or two in the centre. This circum+
stance, and the generally sleepy air of the whole prospect
here, together with the animated and contrasting state
of the reverse facade, suggested to the imagination that
on the adaptation of the building for farming purposes
the vital principle' of the house had turned round inside
its body to face the other way. Reversals of this kind,
strange deformities, tremendous paralyses, are often seen
to be inflicted by trade upon edifices -- either individual
or in the aggregate as streets and towns -- which were
originally planned for pleasure alone.
  Lively voices were heard this morning in the upper
rooms, the main staircase to which was of hard oak, the
balusters, heavy as bed-posts, being turned and moulded
in the quaint
<P 122>
fashion of their century, the handrail as
stout as a parapet-top, and the stairs themselves con+
tinually twisting round like a person trying to look over
his shoulder. Going up, the floors above were found
to have a very irregular surface, rising to ridges, sinking
into valley; and being just then uncarpeted, the face
of the boards was seen to be eaten into innumerable
the opening and shutting of every door a tremble
followed every bustling movement, and a creak accom+
panied a walker about the house like a spirit, wherever+
he went.
  In the room from which the conversation proceeded,
Bathsheba and her servant-companion, Liddy Small+
bury were to be discovered sitting upon the floor, and
sorting a complication of papers, books, bottles, and
rubbish spread out thereon -- remnants from the house+
hold stores of the late occupier. Liddy, the maltster's
great-granddaughter, was about Bathsheba's equal in
age, and her face was a prominent advertisement of the
features' might have lacked in form was amply made up
for by perfection  of hue, which at this winter-time was
the softened ruddiness on a surface of high rotundity
and, like the presentations of those great colourists, it
was a face which kept well back from the boundary
between comeliness and the ideal. Though elastic in
nature she was less daring than Bathsheba, and occa+
sionally showed some earnestness, which consisted half
of genuine feeling, and half of mannerliness superadded
by way of duty.
  Through a partly-opened door the noise of a scrubbing+
brush led up to the charwoman, Maryann Money, a person
who for a face had a circular disc, furrowed less by age
than by long gazes of perplexity at distant objects. To
think of her was to get good-humoured; to speak of
her was to raise the image of a dried Normandy
pippin.
  "Stop your scrubbing a moment,' said Bathsheba
through the door to her. "I hear something.'
  Maryann suspended the brush.
<P 123>
  The tramp of a horse was apparent, approaching the
front of the building. The paces slackened, turned in
at the wicket, and, what was most unusual, came up
the mossy path close to the door. The door was
tapped with the end of a crop or stick.
  "What impertinence!' said Liddy, in a low voice.
"To ride up the footpath like that! Why didn't he
stop at the gate? Lord! "tis a gentleman! I see the
top of his hat.'
  "Be quiet!' said Bathsheba.
  The further expression of Liddy's concern was con+
tinued by aspect instead of narrative.
  "Why doesn't Mrs. Coggan go to the door?' Bath+
sheba continued.
  Rat-tat-tat-tat, resounded more decisively from Bath+
sheba's oak.
  "Maryann, you go!' said she, fluttering under the
onset ot a crowd of romantic possibilities.
  "O ma'am -- see, here's a mess!'
  The argument was unanswerable after a glance at
Maryann.
  "Liddy -- you must,' said Bathsheba.
  Liddy held up her hands and arms, coated with dust
from the rubbish they were sorting, and looked implor+
ingly at her mistress.
  "There -- -Mrs. Coggan is going!' said Bathsheba,
exhaling her relief in the form of a long breath which
had lain in her bosom a minute or more.
  The door opened, and a deep voice said --
  "Is Miss Everdene at home?'
  "I'll see, sir,' said Mrs. Coggan, and in a minute
appeared in the room.
  "Dear, what a thirtover place this world is!' con+
tinued Mrs. Coggan (a wholesome-looking lady who
had a voice for each class of remark according to the
emotion involved; who could toss a pancake or twirl
a mop with the accuracy of pure mathematics, and
who at this moment showed hands shaggy with frag+
ments of dough and arms encrusted with flour). "I
am never up to my elbows, Miss, in making a pudding
but one of two things do happen -- either my nose must
needs begin
<P 124>
tickling, and I can't live without scratching
  A woman's dress being a part of her countenance,
and any disorder in the one being of the same nature
with a malformation or wound in the other, Bathsheba
said at once --
  "I can't see him in this state. Whatever shall I do?'
  Not-at-homes were hardly naturalized in Weatherbury
farmhouses, so Liddy suggested -- "Say you're a fright
with dust, and can't come down.'
  "Yes -- that sounds very well,' said Mrs. Coggan,
critically.
  "Say I can't see him -- that will do.'
  Mrs. Coggan went downstairs, and returned the
answer as requested, adding, however, on her own
responsibility, "Miss is dusting bottles, sir, and is quite
a object -- that's why 'tis.'
  "Oh, very well,' said the deep voice,' indifferently.
"All I wanted to ask was, if anything had been heard
of Fanny Robin?'
  "Nothing, sir -- but we may know to-night. William
Smallbury is gone to Casterbridge, where her young
man lives, as is supposed, and the other men be inquir+
ing about everywhere.'
  The horse's tramp then recommenced and -retreated,
and the door closed.
  "Who is Mr. Boldwood?' said Bathsheba.
  "A gentleman-farmer at Little Weatherbury.'
  "Married?'
  "No, miss.'
  "How old is he?'
  "Forty, I should say -- very handsome -- rather stern+
looking -- and rich.'
  "What a bother this dusting is!  I am always in
some unfortunate plight or other;' Bathsheba said,
complainingly. "Why should he inquire aboat Fanny?'
  "Oh, because, as she had no friends in her childhood,
he took her and put her to school, and got her her
place here under your uncle. He's a very kind man
that way, but Lord -- there!'
  "What?'
  "Never was such a hopeless man for a woman!
He's been
<P 125>
courted by sixes and sevens -- all the girls,
gentle and simple, for miles round, have tried him. Jane
Perkins worked at him for two months like a slave,
and the two Miss Taylors spent a year upon him,
and he cost Farmer Ives's daughter nights of tears
and twenty pounds' worth of new clothes; but Lord --
the money might as well have been thrown out of the
window.'
  A little boy came up at this moment and looked in
upon them. This child was one of the Coggans who,
with the Smallburys, were as common among the
families of this district as the Avons and Derwents
among our rivers. He always had a loosened tooth or
a cut finger to show to particular friends, which he did
with an air of being thereby elevated above the common
herd of afflictionless humanity -- to which exhibition
of congratulation as well as pity.
  "I've got a pen-nee!' said Master Coggan in a
scanning measure.
  "Well -- who gave it you, Teddy?' said Liddy.
  "Mis-terr Bold-wood! He gave it to me for opening
the gate.'
  "What did he say?'
  "He said "Where are you going, my little man?''
and I said, "To Miss Everdene's please;'' and he said,
"She is a staid woman, isn't she, my little man?' and
I said, ""Yes.'''
  "You naughty child! What did you say that for?'
  "Cause he gave me the penny!'
  "What a pucker evrything is in!' said Bathsheba,
discontentedly when the child had gone. 'Get away,
thing! You ought to be married by this time, and not
here troubling me!'
  "Ay, mistress -- so I did. But what between the poor
men I won't have, and the rich men who won't have me,
I stand as a pelicon in the wilderness!'
  "Did anybody ever want to marry you miss?' Liddy
ventured to ask when they were again alone. "Lots of
'em, i daresay.?'
  Bathsheba paused, as if about to refuse a reply, but
the temptation to say yes, since it was really in her
power was irresistible by aspiring virginity, in spite of
her spleen at having been published as old.
<P 126>
  "A man wanted to once,' she said, in a highly experi+
enced tone and the image of Gabriel Oak, as the farmer,
rose before her.
  "How nice it must seem!' said Liddy, with the fixed
features of mental realization. "And you wouldn't have
him?'
  "He wasn't quite good enough for me.'
  "How sweet to be able to disdain, when most of us
are glad to say, ""Thank you!'' I seem I hear it.
""No, sir -- I'm your better,'' or ""Kiss my foot, sir; my
face is for mouths of consequence.'' And did you love
him, miss?'
  "Oh, no. But I rather liked him.'
  "Do you now?'
  "Of course not -- what footsteps are those I hear?'
  Liddy looked from a back window into the courtyard
behind, which was now getting low-toned and dim with
the earliest films of night. A crooked file of men was
approaching the back door. The whole string of trailing
individuals advanced in the completest balance of inten+
tion, like the remarkable creatures known as Chain
Salpae, which, distinctly organized in other respects, have
one will common to a whole family. Some were, as
usual, in snow-white smock-frocks of Russia duck, and
some in whitey-brown ones of drabbet -- marked on the
wrists, breasts, backs, and sleeves with honeycomb-work.
Two or three womcn in pattens brought up the rear.
  "The Philistines be upon us,' said Liddy, making her
nose white against the glass.
  "Oh, very well. Maryann, go down and keep them
in the kitchen till I am dressed, and then show them in
to me in the hall.'
<C x>
<P 127>
HALF-AN-HOUR later Bathsheba, in finished dress,
and followed by Liddy, entered the upper end of the old
hall to find that her men had all deposited themselves on
a long form and a settle at the lower extremity. She sat
down at a table and opened th e time-book, pen in her
hand, with a canvas money-bag beside her. From this
she poured a small heap of coin. Liddy chose a
position at her elbow and began to sew, sometimes
pausing and looking round, or with the air of a privileged
person, taking up one of the half-sovereigns lying before
her and surveying it merely as a work of art, while
strictly preventing her countenance from expressing any
wish to possess it as money.
  "Now before I begin, men,' said Bathsheba, "I have
two matters to speak of. The first is that the bailiff is
dismissed for thieving, and that I have formed a resolu+
tion to have no bailiff at all, but to manage everything
with my own head and hands.'
  The men breathed an audible breath of amazement.
  "The next matter is, have you heard anything of
Fanny?'
  "Nothing, ma'am.
  "Have you done anything?'
  "I met Farmer Boldwood,' said Jacob Smallbury, 'and
I went with him and two of his men, and dragged New+
mill Pond, but we found nothing.'
  "And the new shepherd have been to Buck's Head,
by Yalbury, thinking she had gone there, but nobody
had seed her,' said Laban Tall.
  "Hasn't William Smallbury been to Casterbridge?'
  "Yes, ma'am, but he's not yet come home. He
promised to be back by six.'
  "It wants a quarter to six at present,' said Bathsheba,

<P 128>
looking at her watch. "I daresay he'll be in directly.
Well, now then' -- she looked into the book -- "Joseph
Poorgrass, are you there?'
  "Yes, sir -- ma'am I mane,' said the person addressed.
"I be the personal name of Poorgrass.'
  "And what are you?'
  "Nothing in my own eye. In the eye of other people
 -- well, I don't say it; though public thought will out.'
  "What do you do on the farm?'
  "I do do carting things all the year, and in seed time I
shoots the rooks and sparrows, and helps at pig-killing, sir.'
  "How much to you ?'
  "Please nine and ninepence and a good halfpenny
where 'twas a bad one, sir -- ma'am I mane.'
  "Quite correct. Now here are ten shillings in addi+
tion as a small present, as I am a new comer.'
  Bathsheba blushed slightly at the sense of being
generous in public, and Henery Fray, who had drawn
up towards her chair, lifted his eyebrows and fingers to
express amazement on a small scale.
  "How much do I owe you -- that man in the corner --
what's your name?' continued Bathsheba.
  "Matthew Moon, ma'am,' said a singular framework of
clothes with nothing of any consequence inside them,
which advanced with the toes in no definite direction
forwards, but turned in or out as they chanced to swing.
  "Matthew Mark, did you say? -- speak out -- I shall
not hurt you,' inquired the young farmer, kindly.
  "Matthew Moon mem' said Henery Fray, correct+
ingly, from behind her chair, to which point he had
edged himself.
  "Matthew Moon,' murmured Bathsheba, turning her
bright eyes to the book. "Ten and twopence halfpenny
is the sum put down to you, I see?'
  "Yes, mis'ess,' said Matthew, as the rustle of wind
among dead leaves.
  "Here it is and ten shillings. Now -the next -- Andrew
Randle, you are a new man, I hear. How come you to
leave your last farm?'
<P 129>
  "P-p-p-p-p-pl-pl-pl-pl-l-l-l-l-ease, ma'am, p-p-p-p-pl-pl+
pl-pl-please, ma'am-please'm-please'm --  --  '
  "'A's a stammering man, mem,' said Henery Fray in
an undertone, "and they turned him away because the
only time he ever did speak plain he said his soul was
his own, and other iniquities, to the squire. "A can cuss,
mem, as well as you or I, but 'a can't speak a common
speech to save his life.'
  "Andrew Randle, here's yours -- finish thanking me
in a day or two. Temperance Miller -- oh, here's another,
Soberness -- both women I suppose?'
  "Yes'm. Here we be, 'a b'lieve,' was echoed in shrill
unison.
  "What have you been doing?'
  "Tending thrashing-machine and wimbling haybonds,
and saying ""Hoosh!'' to the cocks and hens when they
go upon your seeds and planting Early Flourballs and
Thompson's Wonderfuls with a dibble.'
  "Yes -- I see. Are they satisfactory women?' she
inquired softly of Henery Fray.
  "O mem -- don't ask me! Yeilding women?' as
scarlet a pair as ever was!' groaned Henery under his
breath.
  "Sit down.
  "Who, mem?'
  "Sit down,'
  Joseph Poorgrass, in the background twitched, and
his lips became dry with fear of some terrible conse+
quences, as he saw Bathsheba summarily speaking, and
Henery slinking off to a corner.
  "Now the next. Laban Tall, you'll stay on working
for me?'
  "For you or anybody that pays me well, ma'am,'
replied the young married man.
  "True -- the man must live!' said a woman in the
back quarter, who had just entered with clicking pattens.
  "What woman is that?" Bathsheba asked.
  "I be his lawful wife!' continued the voice with
greater prominence of manner and tone. This lady
called herself five-and-twenty, looked thirty, passed as
thirty-five, and was forty. She was a woman who never,
like some newly married, showed
<P 130>
conjugal tenderness in
public, perhaps because she had none to show.
  "Oh, you are,' said Bathsheba. "Well, Laban, will
you stay on ?'
  "Yes, he'll stay, ma'am!' said again the shrill tongue
of Laban's lawful wife.
  "Well, he can speak for himself, I suppose.'
  "O Lord, not he, ma'am! A simple tool. Well
enough, but a poor gawkhammer mortal,' the wife replied
  "Heh-heh-heh!' laughed the married man with a
hideous effort of appreciation, for he was as irrepressibly
good-humoured under ghastly snubs as a parliamentary
candidate on the hustings.
  The names remaining were called in the same
manner.
  "Now I think I have done with you,' said Bathsheba,
closing the book and shaking back a stray twine of hair.
"Has William Smallbury returned?'
  "No, ma'am.'
  "The new shepherd will want a man under him,'
suggested Henery Fray, trying to make himself official
again by a sideway approach towards her chair.
  "Oh -- he will. Who can he have?'
  "Young Cain Ball is a very good lad,' Henery said,
"and Shepherd Oak don't mind his youth?' he added,
turning with an apologetic smile to the shepherd, who
had just appeared on the scene, and was now leaning
against the doorpost with his arms folded.
  "No, I don't mind that,' said Gabriel.
  "How did Cain come by such a name?' asked
Bathsheba.
  "Oh you see, mem, his pore mother, not being a
Scripture-read woman made a mistake at his christening,
thinking 'twas Abel killed Cain, and called en Cain,
but 'twas too late, for the name could never be got rid
of in the parish. "Tis very unfortunate for the boy.'
  "It is rather unfortunate.'
  "Yes. However, we soften it down as much as we
can, and call him Cainey. Ah, pore widow-woman!
she cried her heart
<P 131>
out about it almost. She was
brought up by a very heathen father and mother, who
never sent her to church or school, and it shows how
the sins of the parents are visited upon the children,
mem.'
  Mr. Fray here drew up his features to the mild degree
of melancholy required when the persons involved in
the given misfortune do not belong to your own family.
  "Very well then, Cainey Ball to be under-shepherd
And you quite understand your duties? -- you I mean,
Gabriel Oak?'
  "Quite well, I thank you Miss Everdene,' said
Shepard Oak from the doorpost. "If I don't, I'll
inquire.' Gabriel was rather staggered by the remark+
able coolness of her manner. Certainly nobody without
previous information would have dreamt that Oak and
the handsome woman before whom he stood had ever
been other than strangers. But perhaps her air was
the inevitable result of the social rise which had advanced
her from a cottage to a large house and fields. The
case is not unexampled in high places. When, in the
writings of the later poets, Jove and his family are found
to have moved from their cramped quarters on the peak
of Olympus into the wide sky above it, their words show
a proportionate increase of arrogance and reserve.
Footsteps were heard in the passage, combining in
their character the qualities both of weight and measure,
rather at the expense of velocity.
(All.) 'Here's Billy Smallbury come from Caster+
bridge.'
' And what's the news ? ' said Bathsheba, as William,
after marching to the middle of the hall, took a hand+
kerchief from his hat and wiped his forehead from its
centre to its remoter boundaries.
'I should have been sooner, miss,' he said, 'if it
hadn't been for the weather.' He then stamped with
each foot severely, and on looking down his boots were
perceived to be clogged with snow.
'Come at last, is it ?' said Henery.
" Well, what about Fanny ? ' said Bathsheba.
"Well, ma'am, in round numbers, she's run away with
the soldiers,' said William.
<P 132>
" No; not a steady girl like Fanny ! '
"I'll tell ye all particulars. When I got to Caster,
bridge Barracks, they said, " The Eleventh Dragoon+
Guards be gone away, and new troops have come."
The Eleventh left last week for Melchester and onwards.
The Route came from Government like a thief in the
night, as is his nature to, and afore the Eleventh knew
it almost, they wem on the march. They passed near
here.'
Gabriel had listened with interest. 'I saw them go,'
he said.
' Yes,' continued William, ' they pranced down the
street playing "The Girl I Left Behind Me,' so 'tis
said, in glorious notes of triumph. Every looker-on's
inside shook with the blows of the great drum to his
deepest vitals, and there was not a dry eye throughout
the town among the public-house people and the name+
less women !.'
'But they're not gone to any war?'
'No, ma'am; but they be gone to take the places
of them who may, which is very close connected. And
so I said to myself, Fanny's young man was one of the
regiment, and she's gone after him. There, ma'am,
that's it in black and white.'
Gabriel remained musing and said nothing, for he
was in doubt.
'Well, we are not likely to know more to-night, at
any rate,' said Bathsheba. 'But one of you had better
run across to Farmer Boldwood's and tell him that
much.'
She then rose; but before retiring, addressed a few
words to them with a pretty dignity, to which her
mourning dress added a soberness that was hardly to
be found in the words themselves.
'Now mind, you have a mistress instead of a master
I don't yet know my powers or my talents in farming;
but I shall do my best, and if you serve me well, so
shall I serve you. Don't any unfair ones among you
(if there are any such, but I hope not) suppose that
because I'm a woman I don't understand the difference
between bad goings-on and good.'
<P 133>
(All.) 'Nom!.
(Liddy.) 'Excellent well said.'
'I shall be up before you are awake; I shall be
afield before you are up ; and I shall have breakfasted
before you are afield. In short, I shall astonish you all.
(All.) 'Yes'm!'
'And so good-night.'
(All.) 'Good-night, ma'am.'
Then this small-thesmothete stepped from the table,
and surged out of the hall, her black silk dress licking
up a few straws and dragging them along with a scratch+
ing noise upon the floor. biddy, elevating her feelings
to the occasion from a sense of grandeur, floated off
behind Bathsheba with a milder dignity not entirely
free from travesty, and the door was closed.
<C xi>
<P 134>
OUTSIDE THE BARRACKS -- SNOW -- A MEETING
FOR dreariness nothing could surpass a prospect in the
outskirts of a certain town and military station, many
miles north of Weatherbury, at a later hour on this
same snowy evening -- if that may be called a prospect
of which the chief constituent was darkness.
It was a night when sorrow may come to the
brightest without causing any great sense of incongruity :
when, with impressible persons, love becomes solicitous+
ness, hope sinks to misgiving, and faith to hope : when
the exercise of memory does not stir feelings of regret
at opportunities for ambition that have been passed by,
and anticipation does not prompt to enterprise.
The scene was a public path, bordered on the left
hand by a river, behind which rose a high wall. On
the right was a tract of land, partly meadow'and partly
moor, reaching, at its remote verge, to a wide undulating
uplan.
The changes of the seasons are less obtrusive on
spots of this kind than amid woodland scenery. Still,
to a close observer, they are just as perceptible ; the
difference is that their media of manifestation are less
trite and familiar than such well-known ones as the
bursting of the buds or the fall of the leaf. Many are
not so stealthy and gradual as we may be apt to
imagine in considering the general torpidity of a moor
or waste. Winter, in coming to the country hereabout,
advanced in well-marked stages, wherein might have
been successively observed the retreat of the snakes,
the transformation of the ferns, the filling of the pools,
a rising of fogs, the embrowning by frost, the collapse
of the fungi, and an obliteration by snow.
This climax of the series had been reached to-night on
the aforesaid moor, and for the first time in the season
its
<P 135>
irregularities were forms without features ; suggestive
of anything, proclaiming nothing, and without more
character than that of being the limit of something
else -- the lowest layer of a firmament of snow. From
this chaotic skyful of crowding flakes the mead and
moor momentarily received additional clothing, only
to appear momentarily more naked thereby. The vast
arch of cloud above was strangely low, and formed as
it were the roof of a large dark cavern, gradually sinking
in upon its floor; for the instinctive thought was that
the snow lining the heavens and that encrusting the
earth would soon unite into one mass without any
intervening stratum of air at all.
We turn our attention to the left-hand characteristics ;
which were flatness in respect of the river, verticality
in respect of the wall behind it, and darkness as to
both. These features made up the mass. If anything
could be darker than the sky, it was the wall, and if any
thing could be gloomier than the wall it was the river
beneath. The indistinct summit of the facade was
notched and pronged by chimneys here and there, and
upon its face were faintly signified the oblong shapes
of windows, though only in the upper part. Below,
down to the water's edge, the flat was unbroken by
hole or projection.
An indescribable succession of dull blows, perplexing
in their regularity, sent their sound- with difficulty
through the fluffy atmosphere. It was a neighbouring
clock striking ten The bell was in the open air, and
being overlaid with several inches of muffling snow, had
lost its voiee for the time.
About this hour the snow abated : ten flakes fell
where twenty had fallen, then one had the room of
ten. Not long after a form moved by the brink of
the river.
By its outline upon the colourless background, a close
observer might have seen 'that it was small. This was
all that was positively discoverable, though it seemed
human.
The shape went slowly along, but without much
exertion, for the snow, though sudden, was not as yet
more than two inches deep. At this time some words
were spoken aloud : --
' One. Two. 'Three. Four. Five.'
 Between each utterance the little shape advanced
about half a dozen yards. It was evident now that
the windows high
<P 136>
in the wall were being counted.
The word 'Five' represented the fifth window from
the end of the wall.
Here the spot stopped, and dwindled smaller. The
figure was stooping. Then a morsel of snow flew
across the river towards the fifth window. It smacked
against the wall at a point several yards from its mark.
The throw was the idea of a man conjoined with the
execution of a woman. No man who had ever seen bird,
rabbit, or squirrel in his childhood, could possibly have
thrown with such utter imbecility as was shown here.
Another attempt, and another ; till by degrees the
wall must have become pimpled with the adhering
lumps of snow  At last one fragment struck the fifth
window.
The river would have been; seen by day to be of
that deep smooth sort which races middle and' sides
with the same gliding precision, any irregularities of
speed being immediately corrected by a small whirl+
pool. Nothing was heard in reply to the signal but
the gurgle and cluck of one of these invisible wheels --
together with a few small sounds which a sad man
would have called moans, and a happy man laughter --
caused by the flapping of the waters against trifling
objects in other parts of the stream.
The window was struck again in the same manner.
Then a noise was heard, apparently produced by
the opening of the window. This was followed by a
voice from the same quarter.
'Who's there ? '
The tones were masculine, and not those of surprise.
The high wall being that of a barrack, and marriage
being looked upon with disfavour in the army, assigna+
tions and communications had probably been made
across the river before tonight.
"Is it Sergeant Troy?' said the blurred spot in the
snow, tremulously.
This person was so much like a mere shade upon
the earth, and the other speaker so much a part of
the building, that one would have said the wall was
holding a conversation with the snow.
<P 137>
'Yes,' came suspiciously from the shadow. ' What
girl are you ? '
'O, Frank -- don't you know me ?' said the spot.
'Your wife, Fanny Robin.'
' Fanny !.' said the wall, in utter astonishment.
'Yes,' said the girl, with a half-suppressed gasp of
emotion.
There was something in the woman's tone which is
not that of the wife, and there was a mannerin the man
which is rarely a husband's. The dialogue went on:
'How did you come here ?'
'I asked which was your window. Forgive me !. '
"I did not expect you to-night. Indeed, I did not
think you would come at all. It was a wonder you
found me here. I am orderly to-morrow.'
'You said I was to come.'
' Well -- I said that you might.'
'Yes, I mean that I might. You are glad to see me,
Frank ? '
' O yes -- of course.'
' Can you -- come to me !.'
'My dear Fan, no .! The bugle has sounded, the
barrack gates are closed, and I have no leave. We are
all of us as good as in the county gaol till to-morrow
morning.'
' Then I shan't see you till then .! ' The words- were
in a faltering tone of disappointment.
' How did you get here from Weatherbury ? '
'I walked -- some part of the way -- the rest by the
carriers.'
' I am surprised.'
' Yes -- so am I. And Frank, when will it 'be ? '
' What ? '
' That you promised.'
" I don't quite recollect.'
'0 You do! Don't speak like that. It weighs me
to the earth. It makes me say what ought to be said
first by you.'
' Never mind -- say it.'
'0, must I? -- it is, when shall we be married,
Frank ? '
" Oh, I " see. Well --  you have to get proper
clothes.'
"I have money. Will it be by banns or license ?'
<P 138>
" Banns, I should think.'
" And we live in two parishes.'
"Do we ? What then?'
"My lodgings are in St. Mary's, and this is not. So
they will have to be published in both.'
"Is that the law?'
" Yes. O Frank -- you think me forward, I am
afraid .! Don't, dear Frank -- will you -- for I love you so.
And you said lots of times you would marry me, and
and -- I -- I -- I --  -- '
  "Don't cry, now! It is foolish. If i said so, of
course I will.'
'And shall I put up the banns in my parish, and will
you in yours?'
"Yes'
"To-morrow?'
"Not tomorrow. We'll settle in a few days.'
"You have the permission of the officers?'
"No, not yet.'
"O -- how is it? You said you almost had before
you left Casterbridge.'
"The fact is, I forgot to ask. Your coming like this
I'll go away now. Will you qoDe,and seq be to-morroy
is so sudden and unexpected.'
"Yes -- yes -- it is. It was wrong of me to worry you.
I'll go away now. Will you come and see me to-morrow,
at Mrs. Twills's, in North Street? I don't like to come
to the Barracks. There are bad women about, and they
think me one.'
"Quite,so. I'll come to you, my dean Good-night.'
"Good-night, Frank -- good-night!'
And the noise was again heard of a window closing
The little spot moved away. When she passed the
corner a subdued exclamation was heard inside the
wall.
"Ho -- ho -- Sergeant -- ho -- ho!' An expostulation
followed, but it was indistinct; and it became lost amid
a low peal of laughter, which was hardly distinguishable
from the gurgle of the tiny whirlpools outside.
<C xii>
<P 139>
FARMERS -- A RULE -- IN EXCEPTION
THE first public evidence of Bathsheba's decision to
be a farmer in her own person and by proxy no more
was her appearance the following market-day in. the
cornmarket at Casterbridge.
The low though extensive hall, supported by beams
and pillars, and latterly dignified by-the name of Corn Ex+
change, was thronged with hot men who talked among
each other in twos and threes, the speaker of the minute
looking sideways into his auditor's face and concentrating
his argument by a contraction of one eyelid during de+
livery. The greater number carried in their hands
ground-ash saplings, using them partly as walking-sticks
and partly for poking up pigs, sheep, neighbours with
their backs turned, and restful things in general, which
seemed to require such treatment in the course of their
peregrinations. During conversations each subjected
his sapling to great varieties of usage -- bending it round
his back, forming an"arch of it between his two hands,
overweighting it on the ground till it reached nearly a
semicircle; or perhaps it was hastily tucked under the
arm whilst the sample-bag was pulled forth and a hand+
ful of corn poured into the palm, which, after criticism,
was flung upon the floor, an issue of events perfectly
well known to half-a-dozen acute town-bred fowls which
had as usual crept into the building unobserved, and
waited the fulfilment of their anticipations with a high+
stretched neck and oblique eye.
Among these heavy yeomen a feminine figure glided,
the single one of her sex that the room contained. She
was prettily and even daintily dressed. She moved
between them as a chaise between carts, was heard after
them as a romance after sermons, was felt among them
like a breeze among furnaces. It had required a little
determination -- far more than she had at
<P 140>
first imagined
 -- to take up a position here, for at her first entry the
lumbering dialogues had ceased, nearly every face had
been turned towards her, and those that were already
turned rigidly fixed there.
Two or three only of the farmers were personally
known to Bathsheba, and to these she had made her
way. But if she was to be the practical woman she had
intended to show herself, business must be carried on,
introductions or none, and she ultimately acquired con+
fidence enough to speak and reply boldly to men merely
known to her by hearsay. Bathsheba too had her
sample-bags, and by degrees adopted the professional
pour into the hand -- holding up the grains in her narrow
palm for inspection, in perfect Casterbridge manner.
Something in the exact arch of her upper unbroken
row of teeth, and in the keenly pointed corners of her
red mouth when, with parted lips, she somewhat
defiantly turned up her face to argue a point with a
tall man, suggested that there was potentiality enough
in that lithe slip of humanity for alarming exploits of
sex, and daring enough to carry them out. But her eyes
had a softness -- invariably a softness -- which, had they
not been dark, would have seemed mistiness; as they
were, it lowered an expression that might have been
piercing to simple clearness,
Strange to say of a woman in full bloom and vigor,
she always allowed her interlocutors to finish their state+
ments before rejoining with hers. In arguing on prices,
he held to her own firmly, as was natural in a dealer,
and reduced theirs persistently, as was inevitable in a
oman. But there was an elasticity in her firmness
which removed it from obstinacy, as there was a naivete
in her cheapening which saved it from meanness.
Those of the farmers with whom she had no dealings
by far the greater part) were continually asking each
other, "Who is she?' The reply would be --
"Farmer Everdene's niece; took on Weatherbury
Upper Farm; turned away the baily, and swears she'll do
verything herself.'
The other man would then shake his head.
<P 141>
"Yes, 'tis a pity she's so headstrong,' the first would
say. "But we ought to be proud of her here -- she
lightens up the old place. 'Tis such a shapely maid,
however, that she'll soon get picked up.'
It would be ungallant to suggest that the novelty of
her engagement in such an occupation had almost as
much to do with the magnetism as had the beauty of
her face and movements. However, te interest was
eneral, and this Saturday's debut in the forum, whatever
it may have been to Bathsheba as the buying and selling
farmer, was unquestionably a triumph to her as the
maiden. Indeed, the sensation was so pronounced that
her instinct on two or three occasions was merely to
valk as a queen among these gods of the fallow, like a
little sister of a little Jove, and"to neglect closing prices
altogether.
The numerous evidences of-her power to attract were
only thrown into greater relief by a marked exception.
Women seem to have eyes in their ribbons for such
matters as these. Bathsheba, without looking within
a right angle of him, was conscious of a black sheep
among the flock.
It perplexed her first. If there had been a respect+
able minority on either side, the case would have been
most natural. If nobody had regarded her, she would
have -- -taken the matter indifferently -- such cases had
occurred. If eveybody, this man included, she would
have taken it as a matter of course -- people had done
so before. But the smallness of the exception made the
mystery.
She soon knew thus much of the recusant's appear+
ance. He was a gentlemanly man, with full and
distinctly outlined Roman features, the prominences
of which glowed in the sun with a bronze-like richness
of tone. He was erect in attitude, and quiet in
demeanour. One characteristic pre-eminently marked
him -- dignity.
Apparently he had some time ago reached that
entrance to middle age at which a man's aspect naturally
ceases to alter for the term of a dozen years or so; and,
artificially, a woman't does likewise.   Thirty-five and
fifiy were his limits of variation -- he might have been
either, or anywhere between the two.
It may be said that married men of forty are usually
ready
<P 142>
and generous enough to fling passing glances at
any specimen of moderate beauty they may discern by
the way. Probably, as with persons playing whist for
love, the consciousness of a certain immunity under
any circumstances from that worst possible ultimate,
the having to pay, makes them unduly speculative.
Bathsheba was convinced that this unmoved person
was not a married man.
When marketing was over, she rushed off to Liddy,
who was waiting for her -- beside the yellowing in which
they had driven to town. The horse was put in, and
on they trotted Bathsheba's sugar, tea, and drapery
parcels being packed behind, and expeessing in some
indescribable manner, by their colour, shape, and
general lineaments, that they were that youmg lady+
farmer's property, and the grocer's and drapers no
more.
" I've been through it, Liddy, and it is over. I shan't
mind it again, for they will all have grown accustomed
to seeing me there; but this morning it was as bad as
being married -- eyes everywhere!'
"I knowed it would. be,' Liddy said "Men be such
a terrible class of society to look at a body.'
"But there was one man who had more sense than
to waste his time upon me.' The information was put
in this form that Liddy might not for a moment suppose
her mistress was at all piqued. "A very good-looking
man,' she continued, "upright; about forty, I should
think. Do you know at all who he could be?'
Liddy couldn't think.
"Can't you guess at all?' said Bathsheba with some
disappointment.
"I haven't a notion; besides, 'tis no difference, since
he took less notice of you than any of the rest. Now,
if he'd taken more, it would have mattered a great deal.'
Bathsheba was suffering from the reverse feeling just
then, and they bowled along in silence. A low carriage,
bowling along still more rapidly behind a horse of un+
impeachable breed, overtook and passed them.
"Why, there he is!' she said.
Liddy looked. "That! That's Farmer Boldwood --
of course
<P 143>
'tis -- the man you couldn't see the other day
when he called.'
"Oh, Farmer Boldwood,' murmured Bathsheba, and
looked at him as he outstripped them. The farmer had
never turned his head once, but with eyes fixed on the
most advanced point along the road, passed as uncon+
sciously and abstractedly as if Bathshea and her charms
were thin air.
"He's an interesting man -- don't you think so?' she
remarked.
"O yes, very. Everybody owns it,' replied Liddy.
"I wonder why he is so wrapt up and indifferent, and
seemingly so far away from all he sees around him,'
"It is said -- but not known for certain -- that he met
with some bitter disappointment when he was a young
man and merry. A woman jilted him, they say.'
"People always say that -- and we know very well
women scarcely ever jilt men; 'tis the men who jilt us.
I expect it is simply his nature to be so reserved.'
"Simply his nature -- I expect so, miss -- nothing else
in the world.'
"Still, 'tis more romantic to think he has been served
cruelly, poor thing'! Perhaps, after all, he has! I
"Depend upon it he has. O yes, miss, he has!
feel he must have.'
"However, we are very apt to think extremes of
people. I --  shouldn't wonder after all if it wasn't a
little of both -- just between the two -- rather cruelly
used and rather reserved.'
"O dear no, miss -- I can't think it between the
two!'
"That's most likely.'
"Well, yes, so it is. I am convinced it is most likely.
You may --  take my word, miss, that that's what's the
matter with him.'
<C xiii>
<P 144>
SORTES SANCTORUM -- THE VALENTINE
IT was Sunday afternoon in the farmhouse, on the
thirteenth of February. Dinner being over, Bathsheba,
for want of a better companion, had asked Liddy to
come and sit with her. The mouldy pile was dreary
in winter-time before the candles were lighted and the
shutters closed ; the atmosphere of the place seemed
as old as the walls; every nook behind the furniture
had a temperature of its own, for the fire was not
kindled in this part of the house early in the day;
and Bathsheba's new piano, which was an old one
in other annals, looked particularly sloping and out
of level on the warped floor before night threw a
shade over its less prominent angles and hid the
unpleasantness. Liddy, like a little brook, though
shallow, was always rippling; her presence had not so
much weight as to task thought, and yet enough to
exercise it.
On the table lay an old quarto Bible, bound in
leather. Liddy looking at it said, --
"Did you ever find out, miss, who you are going to
marry by means of the Bible and key ?,
"Don't be so foolish, Liddy. As if such things
could be.'
" Well, there's a good deal in it, all the same.'
' Nonsense, child.'
" And it makes your heart beat fearful. Some believe
in it; some don't; I do.'
"Very well, let's try it,' said Bathsheba, bounding
from her seat with that total disregard of consistency
which can be indulged in towards a dependent, and
entering into the spirit of divination at once. 'Go and
get the front door key.'
Liddy fetched it. 'I wish it wasn't Sunday,' she
said, on returning. ' Perhaps 'tis wrong.'
' What's right week days is right Sundays,' replied her
mistress in a tone which was a proof in itself.
<P 145>
The book was opened -- the leaves, drab with age,
being quite worn away at much-read verses by the fore'
fingers "of unpractised readers in former days, where they
were moved along under the line as an aid to the vision.
The special verse in the Book of Ruth was sought out
by Bathsheba, and the sublime words met her eye. They
slightly thrilled and abashed her. It was Wisdom in
the abstract facing Folly in the concrete. Folly in the
concrete blushed, persisted in her intention, and placed
the key on -the book. A rusty patch immediately upon
the verse, caused by previous pressure of an iron
substance thereon, told that this was not the first time
the old volume had been used for the purpose.
'Now keep steady, and be silent,' said Bathsheba.
The 'verse was repeated; the book turned round ;
Bathsheba blushed guiltily.
'Who did you try ?' said Liddy curiously.
'I shall not tell you.'
'Did you notice Mr. Boldwood's doings in church
this morning, miss ? 'Liddy continued, adumbrating by
the remark the track her thoughts had taken.
'No, indeed,' said Bathsheba, with serene indifference
" His pew is exactly opposite yours, miss.'
"I know it.'
"And you did not see his goings on !,'
Certainly I did not, I tell you.'
Liddy assumed a smaller physiognomy, and shut
her lips decisively.
This move was unexpected, and proportionately dis
concerting. " What did he do?' Bathsheba said perforce.
"Didn't turn his head to look at you once all the
service.
"Why should he?' again demanded her mistress,
wearing a nettled look. "I didn't ask him to.
'Oh no. But everybody else was noticing you ; and
it was odd he didn't. There, 'tis like him. Rich and
gentlemanly, what does he care ? '
Bathsheba dropped into a silence intended to ex+
press that she had opinions on the matter too abstruse
for Liddy's comprehension, rather than that she had
nothing to say.
"
<P 146>
Dear me -- I had nearly forgotten the valentine
I bought yesterday,' she exclaimed at length.
"Valentine ! who for, miss ? ' said Liddy. " Farmer
Boldwood ?'
It was the single name among all possible wrong
ones that just at this moment seemed to Bathsheba
more pertinent than the right.
"Well, no. It is only for little Teddy Coggan.
have promised him something, and this will be a pretty
surprise for him. Liddy, you may as well bring me
my desk and I'll direct it at once.'
Bathsheba took from her desk a gorgeously illumin+
ated and embossed design in post-octavo, which had
been "bought on the previous market-day at the chief
stationer's in Casterbridge. In the eentre was a small
oval enclosure ; this was left blank, that the sender
might insert tender words more appropriate to the
special occasion than any generalities by a printer
could possibly be.
" Here's a place for writing,' said Bathsheba. 'What
shall I put ?'
" Something of this sort, I should think', returned
Liddy promptly : --
" The rose is red,
 The violet blue,
 Camation's sweet,
 And so are you.'
" Yes, that shall be it. It just suits itself to a chubby+
faced child like him,' said Bathsheba. She ins.erted the
words in a small though legible handwriting; enelosed
the sheet in an envelope, and dipped her pen for the
direction.
"What fun it would be to send it to the stupid old
Boldwood, and how he would wonder.! ' said the
irrepressible Liddy, lifting her eyebrows, and indulging
in an awful mirth on the verge of fear as she thought
of the moral and social magnitude of the man contem+
plated.
Bathsheba paused to regard the idea at full length.
Boldwood's had begun to be a troublesome image -- a
species of Daniel in her kingdom who persisted in
kneeling eastward
<P 147>
when reason and common sense
said that he might just as well follow suit with the
rest, and afford her the official glance of admiration
which cost nothing at all. She was far from being
seriously concerned about his nonconformity. Still,
it was faintly depressing that the most dignified and
valuable man in the parish should withhold his eyes,
and that a girl like Liddy should talk about it. So
Liddy's idea was at first rather harassing than piquant.
" No, I won't do that. He wouldn't see any humour
in it.'
" He'd worry to death,' said the persistent Liddy.
" Really, I don't care particularly to send it to
Teddy,' remarked her mistress. " He's rather a naughty
child sometimes.'
" Yes -- that he is.'
" Let's toss as men do,' said Bathsheba, idly. 'Now
then, head, Boldwood ; tail, Teddy. No, we won't toss
money on a Sunday that would be tempting the devil
indeed.'
"Toss this hymn-book; there can't be no sinfulness
in that, miss.'
'Very well. Open, Boldwood -- shut, Teddy. No;
it's more likely to fall open. Open, Teddy -- shut,
Boldwood.'
The book went fluttering in the air and came down shut.
Bathsheba, a small yawn upon her mouth, took the
pen, and with off-hand serenity directed the missive to
Boldwood.
'Now light a candle, Liddy. Which seal shall we
use? Here's a unicorn's head --  there's nothing in
that. What's this ? -- two doves -- no. It ought to be
something extraodinary, ought it not, Lidd? Here's
one with a motto -- I remember it is some funny one,
but I can't read it. We'll try this, and if it doen't
do we'll have another.'
A large red seal was duly affixed. Bathsheba looked
closely at the hot wax to discover the words.
'Capital!' she exclaimed, throwing down the letter
frolicsomely. " 'Twould upset the solemnity of a parson

<P 148>
The same evening the letter was sent, and was duly
returned to Weatherbury again in the morning.
Of love as a spectacle Bathsheba had a fair knowledge;
but of love subjectively she knew nothing.
<C xiv>
<P 149>
EFFECT OF THE LETTER -- SUNRISE
AT dusk, on the evening of St. Valentine's Day, Bold+
wood sat down to supper as usual, by a beaming fire
of aged logs. Upon the matel-shelf before him was
a time-piece, surmounted by a spread eagle, and upon
the eagle's wings was the letter Bathsheba had sent.
Here the bachelor's gaze was continually fastening
itself, till the large red seal became as a blot of blood
on the retina of his eye; and as he ate and drank he
still read in fancy the words thereon, although they
were too remote for his sight --
" MARRY ME.'
The pert injunction was like those crystal substances
which, colourless themselves, assume the tone of objects
about them. Here, in the quiet of Boldwood's parlour,
where everything that ,was not grave was extraneous,
and where the atmosphere was that of a Puritan Sunday
lasting all the week, the letter and its dictum changed'
their tenor from the thoughtlessness of their origin to
a deep solemnity, imbibed from their accessories
now.
Since the receipt of the missive in the morning,
Boldwood had felt the symmetry of his existence to
be slowly getting distorted in the direction of an ideal
passion. The disturbance was as the first floating
weed to Columbus -- the eontemptibly little suggesting
possibilities of the infinitely great.
The letter must have had an origin and a motive.
That the latter was of the smallest magnitude com+
patible with its existence at all, Boldwood, of course,
did not know. And such an explanation did not
strike him as a possibility even. It is foreign to a
mystified condition of mind to realize of the mystifier
that the processes of approving a course suggested by
circumstance, and of striking out a course from inner
impulse, would look the same in the result. The vast
difference between
<P 150>
starting a train of events, and direct+
ing into a particular groove a series already started, is
rarely apparent to the person confounded by the
issue.
When Boldwood went to bed he placed the valen+
tine in the corner of the looking-glass. He was
conscious of its presence, even when his back was
turned upon it. It was the first time in Boldwood's
life that such an event had occurred. The same
fascination that caused him to think it an act which had
a deliberate motive prevented him from regarding it as
an impertinence. He looked again at the direction.
The mysterious influences of night invested the writing
with the presence of the unknown writer. Somebody's
some woman's -- hand had travelled softly over the
paper bearing his name ; her unrevealed eyes had
watched every curve as she formed it ; her brain had
seen him in imagination the while. Why should
she have imagined him ? Her mouth -- were the lips
red or pale, plump or creased? -- had curved itself to a
certain expression as the pen went on -- the corners had
moved with all their natural tremulousness : what had
been the expression ?
The vision of the woman writing, as a supplement to
the words written, had no individuality. She was a
misty shape, and well she might be, considering that
her original was at that moment sound asleep and
oblivious of all love and letter-writing under the sky.
Whenever Boldwood dozed she took a form, and com+
paratively ceased to be a vision : when he awoke there
was the letter justifying the dream.
The moon shone to-night, and its light was not of
a customary kind. His window admitted only a
reflection of its rays, and the pale sheen had that
reversed direction which snow gives, coming upward
and lighting up his ceiling in an unnatural way, casting
shadows in strange places, and putting lights where
shadows had used to be.
The substance of the epistle had occupied him but
little in comparison with the fact of its arrival. He
suddenly wondered if anything more might be found in
the envelope than what he had withdrawn. He jumped
out of bed in the weird light, took the letter, pulled out
the flimsy sheet, shook the envelope -- searched it.
Nothing more was there. Boldwood looked, as he
<P 151>
had a hundred times the preceding day, at the insistent red
seal : " Marry me,' he said aloud.
The solemn and reserved yeoman again closed the
letter, and stuck it in the frame of the glass. In doing
so he caught sight of his reflected features, wan in
expression, and insubstantial in form. He saw how
closely compressed was his mouth, and that his eyes
were wide-spread and vacant. Feeling uneasy and dis+
satisfied with himself for this nervous excitability, he
returned to bed.
Then the dawn drew on. The full power of the
clear heaven was not equal to that of a cloudy sky at
noon, when Boldwood arose and dressed himself. He
descended the stairs and went out towards the gate of
a field to the east, leaning over which he paused and
looked around.
It was one of the usual slow sunrises of this time of
the year, and the sky, pure violet in the zenith, was
leaden to the northward, and murky to the east, where,
over the snowy down or ewe-lease on Weatherbury
Upper Farm, and apparently resting upon the ridge, the
only half of the sun yet visible burnt rayless, like a red
and flameless fire shining over a white hearthstone.
The whole effect resembled a sunset as childhood
resembles age.
In other directions, the fields and sky were so much
of one colour by the snow, that it was difficult in a
hasty glance to tell whereabouts the horizon occurred ;
and in general there was here, too, that before-mentioned
preternatural inversion of light and shade which attends
the prospect when the garish brightness commonly in
the sky is found on the earth, and the shades of earth
are in the sky. Over the west hung the wasting moon,
now dull and greenish-yellow, like tarnished brass.
Boldwood was listlessly noting how the frost had
hardened and glazed the surface of the snow, till it
shone in the red eastern light wit-h the polish of marble;
how, in some portions of the slope, withered grass-bents,
encased in icicles, bristled through the smooth wan
coverlet in the twisted and curved shapes of old
Venetian glass; and how the footprints of a few birds,
which had hopped over the snow whilst it lay in the
state of a soft fleece, were now frozen to a short perma+
<P 152>
nency. A half-muffled noise of light wheels interrupted
him. Boldwood turned back into the road. It was
the mail-cart -- a crazy, two-wheeled vehicle, hardly
heavy enough to resist a puff of wind. The driver held
out a letter. Boldwood seized it and opened it, ex+
pecting another anonymous one -- so greatly are people's
ideas of probability a mere sense that precedent will
repeat itself.
"I don't think it is for you, sir,' said the man, when
he saw Boldwood's action. "Though there is no name
I think it is for your shepherd.'
Boldwood looked then at the address --
To the New Shepherd,
Weatherbury Farm,
Near Casterbridge.
"Oh -- what a mistake !. -- it is not mine. Nor is it
for my shepherd. It is for Miss Everdene's.' You had
better take it on to him -- Gabriel Oak -- and say I opencd
it in mistake."
At this moment, on the ridge, up against the blazing
sky, a figure was visible, like the black snuff in the
midst of a candle-flame. Then it moved and began to
bustle about vigorously from place to place, carrying
square skeleton masses, which were riddled by the same
rays. A small figure on all fours followed behind. The
tall form was that of Gabriel Oak ; the small one that
of George ; the articles in course of transit were hurdles.
'Wait, 'said Boldwood. " That's the man on the hill.
I'll take the letter to him myself."
To Boldwood it was now no longer merely a letter to
I another man. It was an opportunity. Exhibiting a
face pregnant with intention, he entered the snowy field.
Gabriel, at that minute, descended the hill towards
the right. The glow stretched down in this direction
now, and touched the distant roof of Warren's Malthouse
whither the shepherd was apparently bent :  Boldwood
followed at a distance.
<C xv>
<P 153>
THE scarlet and orange light outside the malthouse did
not penetrate to its interior, which was, as usual, lighted
by a rival glow of similar hue, radiating from the hearth.
The maltster, after having lain down in his clothes
for a few hours, was now sitting beside a three-leggcd
table, breakfasting of bread and bacon. This was
eaten on the plateless system, which is performed by
placing a slice of bread upon the table, the meat flat
upon the bread, a mustard plaster upon the meat, and
a pinch of salt upon the whole, then cutting them
vertically downwards with a large pocket-knife till wood
is reached, when the severed lamp is impaled on the
knife, elevated, and sent the proper way of food.
The maltster's lack of teeth appeared not to sensibly
diminish his powers as a mill. He had been without
them for so many years that toothlessness was felt less
to be a defect than hard gums an acquisition. Indeed,
he seemed to approach the grave as a hyperbolic curve
approaches a stmight line -- less directly as he got nearer,
till it was doubtful if he would ever reach it at all.
In the ashpit was a heap of potatoes roasting, and a
boiling pipkin of charred bread, callcd 'coffee,' for the
benefit of whomsoever should call, for Warren's was a
sort of clubhouse. used as an alternative to the in!.
"I say, says I, we get a fine day, and then down
comes a snapper at night,' was a remark now suddenly
heard spreading into the malthouse from the door, which
had been opened the previous moment. The form of
Henery Fray advanced to the fire, stamping the snow
from his boots when about half-way there. The speech
and entry had not seemed to be at all an abrupt begin+
ning to the maltster, introductoy matter being often
omitted in this neighbourhood, both from word and
<P 154>
deed, and the maltster having the same latitude allowed
him, did not hurry to reply. He picked up a fragment
of cheese, by pecking upon it with his knife, as a butcher
picks up skewers.
Henery appeared in a drab kerseymere great-coat,
buttoned over his smock-frock, the white skirts of the
latter being visible to the distance of about a foot below
the coat-tails, which, when you got used to the style of
dress, looked natural enough, and even ornamental -- it
certainly was comfortable.
Matthew Moon, Joseph Poorgrass, and other carters
and waggoners followed at his heels, with great lanterns
dangling from their hands, which showed that they had
just come from the cart-horse stables, where they had
been busily engaged since four o'clock that morning.
"And how is she getting on without a baily?' the
maltster inquired.
Henery shook his head, and smiled one of the bitter
smiles, dragging all the flesh of his forehead into a
corrugated heap in the centre.
" She'll rue it -- surely, surely ! ' he said " Benjy
Pennyways were not a true man or an honest baily --
as big a betrayer as Joey Iscariot himself. But to think
she can carr' on alone! ' He allowed his head to swing
laterally three or four times in silence. " Never in all my
creeping up -- never! '
This was recognized by all as the conclusion of some
gloomy speech which had been expressed in thought
alone during the shake of the head; Henery meanwhile
retained several marks of despair upon his face, to
imply that they would be required for use again directly
he should go on speaking.
'All will be ruined, and ourselves too, or there's no
meat in gentlemen's houses!' said Mark Clark.
'A headstrong maid, that's what she is -- and won't
listen to no advice at all. Pride and vanity have ruined
many a cobbler's dog. Dear, dear, when I think o' it,
I sorrows like a man in travel ! '
'True, Henery, you do, I've heard ye,' said Joseph
Poorgrass in a voice of thorough attestation, and with
a wire-drawn smile of misery.
"'Twould do a martel man no harm to have what's
under
<P 155>
her bonnet,' said Billy Smallbury, who had just
entered, bearing his one tooth before him. "She can
spaik real language, and must have some sense some+
where. Do ye foller me ?'
"I do: but no baily -- I deserved that place,' wailed
Henery, signifying wasted genius by gazing blankly at
visions of a high destiny apparently visible to him on
Billy Smallbury's smock-frock. " There, 'twas to be, I
suppose. Your lot is your lot, and Scripture is nothing;
for if you do good you don't get rewarded according to
your works, but be cheated in some mean way out of
your recompense.'
"No, no; I don't agree with'ee there,' said Mark
Clark. God's a perfect gentleman in that respect.'
"Good works good pay, so to speak it,' attested
Joseph Poorgrass.
A short pause ensued, and as a sort of entr'acte
Henery turned and blew out the lanterns, which the
increase of daylight rendered no longer necessary even
in the malthouse, with its one pane of glass.
"I wonder what a farmer-woman can want with a
harpsichord, dulcimer, pianner, or whatever 'tis they d'call
it?' said the maltster. 'Liddy saith she've a new one.'
"Got a pianner?'
"Ay. Seems her old uncle's things were not good
enough for her. She've bought all but everything new.
There's heavy chairs for the stout, weak and wiry ones
for the slender; great watches, getting on to the size
of clocks, to stand upon the chimbley-piece.'
Pictures, for the most part wonderful frames.'
" And long horse-hair settles for the drunk, with horse+
hair pillows at each end,' said Mr. Clark. " Likewise
looking-glasses for the pretty, and lying books for the
wicked.'
A firm loud tread was now heard stamping outside;
the door was opened about six inches, and somebody on
the other side exclaimed --
"Neighbours, have ye got room for a few new-born
lambs?'
" Ay, sure, shepherd,' said the conclave.
The door was flung back till it kicked the wall and
trembled from top to bottom with the blow. Mr.
Oak appeared in the
<P 156>
entry with a steaming face, hay+
bands wound about his ankles to keep out the snow, a
leather strap round his waist outside the smock-frock,
and looking altogether an epitome of the world's health
and vigour. Four lambs hung in various embarrassing
attitudes over his shoulders, and the dog George, whom
Gabriel had contrived to fetch from Norcombe, stalked
solemnly behind.
" Well, Shepherd Oak, and how's lambing this year,
if I mid say it?' inquired Joseph Poorgrass.
"Terrible trying," said Oak. "I've been wet through
twice a-day, either in snow or rain, this last fortnight.
Cainy and I haven't tined our eyes to-night.'
"A good few twins, too, I hear ?'
"Too many by half. Yes ; 'tis a very queer lambing
this year. We shan't have done by Lady Day.'
"And last year 'twer all over by Sexajessamine
Sunday,' Joseph remarked.
"Bring on the rest Cain,' said Gabriel, " and then run
back to the ewes. I'll follow you soon.'
Cainy Ball -- a cheery-faced young lad, with a small
circular orifice by way of mouth, advanced and deposited
two others, and retired as he was bidden. Oak lowered
the lambs from their unnatural elevation, wrapped them
in hay, and placed them round the fire.
" We've no lambing-hut here, as I used to have at
Norcombe,' said Gabriel, " and 'tis such a plague to bring
the weakly ones to a house. If 'twasn't for your place
here, malter, I don't know what I should do! this keen
weather. And how is it with you to-day, malter? '
" Oh, neither sick nor sorry, shepherd ; 'but no
younger.'
" Ay -- I understand.
"Sit down, Shepherd Oak', continued the ancient man
of malt. " And how was the old place at Norcombe,
when ye went for your dog? I should like to see the
old familiar spot ; but faith, I shouldn't" know a soul
there now.'
" I suppose you wouldn't. 'Tis' altered very much.'
"Is it true that Dicky Hill's wooden cider-house is
pulled down?'
<P 157>
" O yes -- years ago, and Dicky's cottage just above it.'
"Well, to be sure!,
" Yes ; and Tompkins's old apple-tree is rooted that
used to bear two hogsheads of cider; and no help from
other trees.'
'Rooted? -- you don't say it! Ah! stirring times we
live in -- stirring times.'
"And you can mind the old well that used to be in
the middle of the place? That's turned into a solid
iron pump with a large stone trough, and all complete.'
"Dear, dear -- how the face of nations alter, and
what we live to see nowadays! Yes -- and 'tis the same
here. They've been talking but now of the mis'ess's
strange doings.'
" What have you been saying about her?' inquired
Oak, sharply turning to the rest, and getting very
warm.
" These middle-aged men have been pulling her over
the coals for pride and vanity,' said Mark Clark; "but
I say, let her have rope enough. Bless her pretty face
shouldn't I like to do so -- upon her cherry lips!'
The gallant Mark Clark here made a peculiar and well
known sound with his own.
" Mark,' said Gabriel, sternly, 'now you mind this !
none of that dalliance-talk -- that smack-and-coddle style
of yours -- about Miss Everdene. I don't allow it. Do
you hear? '
" With all my heart, as I've got no chance,' replied
Mr. Clark, cordially.
' I suppose you've been speaking against her? ' said
Oak, turning to Joseph Poorgrass with a very grim
look.
"No, no -- not a word I -- 'tis a real joyful thing that
she's no worse, that's what I say,' said Joseph, trembling
and blushing with terror. " Matthew just said --  -- '
" Matthew Moon, what have you been saying ? ' asked
Oak.
'I? Why ye know I wouldn't harm a worm -- no,
not one underground worm ?' said Matthew Moon,
looking very uneasy.
"Well, somebody has -- and look here, neighbours.'
Gabriel, though one of the quietest and most gentle
men on earth, rose to the occasion, with martial
promptness and vigour. "That's my fist.' Here he
placed his fist, rather smaller in size than a common
loaf, in the mathemarical centre of the maltster's little
table, and with it gave a bump or two thereon, as if
<P 158>
to ensure that their eyes all thoroughly took in the
idea of fistiness before he went further. "Now -- the
first man in the parish that I hear prophesying bad of
our mistress, why' (here the fist was raised and let fall
as T'hor might have done with his hammer in assaying
it) -- "he'll smell and taste that -- or I'm a Dutchman.'
All earnestly expressed by their features that their
minds did not wander to Holland for a moment on
account of this statement, but were deploring the
difference which gave rise to the figure ; and Mark
Clark cried "Hear, hear; just what I should ha' said.'
The dog George looked up at the same time after the
shepherd's menace, and though he understood English
but imperfectly, began to growl.
" Now, don't ye take on so, shepherd, and sit down!'
said Henery, with a deprecating peacefulness equal to
anything of the kind in Christianity.
"We hear that ye bc a extraordinary good and
clever man, shepherd,' said Joseph Poorgrass with
considerable anxiety from behind the maltster's bed+
stead whither he had retired for safety. "'Tis a great
thing to be clever, I'm sure,' he added, making move+
ments associated with states of mind rather than body ;
" we wish we were, don't we, neighbours ? '
"Ay, that we do, sure,' said Matthew Moon, with
a small anxious laugh towards Oak, to show how very
friendly disposed he was likewise.
" Who's been telling you I'm clever?' said Oak.
"'Tis blowed about from pillar to post quite common,'
said Matthew. " We hear that ye can tell the t1me as
well by the stars as we can by the sun and moon,
shepherd.'
" Yes, I can do a little that way,' said Gabriel, as a
man of medium sentiments on the subject.
names upon their waggons almost like copper-plate,
with beautiful flourishes, and great long tails. A
excellent fine thing for ye to be such a clever man,
shepherd. Joseph Poorgrass used to prent to Farmer
James Everdene's waggons before you came, and 'a
could never mind which way to turn the J's and E's
 -- could ye, Joseph?' Joseph shook his head to express
how absolute was
<P 159>
the fact that he couldn't. "And so
you used to do 'em the wrong way, like this, didn't ye,
Joseph ?' Matthew marked on the dusty floor with his
whip-handle
LAMES
"And how Farmer James would cuss, and call thee a
fool, wouldn't he, Joseph, when 'a seed his name
looking so inside-out-like ?' continued Matthew Moon
with feeling.
'Ay -- 'a would,' said Joseph, meekly. " But, you see,
I wasn't so much to blame, for them J's and E's be
such trying sons o' witches for the memory to mind
whether they face backward or forward ; and I always
had such a forgetful memory, too.'
"'Tis a bad afiction for ye, being such a man of
calamities in other ways.'
" Well, 'tis ; but a happy Providence ordered that it
should be no worse, and I feel my thanks. As to
shepherd, there, I'm sure mis'ess ought to have made
ye her baily -- such a fitting man for't as you be.'
"I don't mind owning that I expected it,' said Oak,
frankly. ' Indeed, I hoped for the place. At the same
time, Miss Everdene has a right to be own baily if
she choose -- and to keep me down to be a common
shepherd only.' Oak drew a slow breath, looked sadly
into the bright ashpit, and seemed lost in thoughts not
of the most hopeful hue.
The genial warmth of the fire now began to stimulate
the nearly lifeless lambs to bleat and move their limbs
briskly upon the hay, and to recognize for the first time
the fact that they were born. Their noise increased to a
chorus of baas, upon which Oak pulled the milk-can from
before the fire, and taking a small tea-pot from the pocket
of his smock-frock, filled it with milk, and taught those of
the helpless creatures which were not to be restored to
their dams how to drink from the spout -- a trick they
acquired with astonishing aptitude.
"And she don't even let ye have the skins of the
dead lambs, I hear?' resumed Joseph Poorgrass, his
eyes lingering on the operations of Oak with the neces+
sary melancholy.
"I don't have them,' said Gabriel.
"Ye be very badly used, shepherd,' hazardcd Joseph
again, in
<P 160>
the hope of getting Oak as an ally in lamenta+
tion after all. "I think she's took against ye -- that
I do.'
'O no -- not at all,' replied Gabriel, hastily, and a
sigh escaped him, which the deprivation of lamb skins
could hardly have caused.
Before any further remark had been added a shade
darkened the door, and Boldwood entered the malthouse,
bestowing upon each a nod of a quality between friendli+
ness and condescension.
"Ah! Oak, I thought you were here,' he said. 'I
met the mail-cart ten minutes ago, and a letter was put
into my hand, which I opened without reading the
address. I believe it is yours. You must excuse the
accident please.'
"O yes -- not a bit of difference, Mr. Boldwood --
not a bit,' said Gabriel, readily. He had not a corre+
spondent on earth, nor was there a possible letter coming
to him whose contents the whole parish would not have
been welcome to persue.
Oak stepped aside, and read the following in an
unknown hand: --
" DEAR FRIEND, -- I do not know your name, but l think
these few lines will reach you, which I wrote to thank you
for your kindness to me the night I left Weatherbury in a
reckless way. I also return the money I owe you, which
you will excuse my not keeping as a gift. All has ended
well, and I am happy to say I am going to be married to
the young man who has courted me for some time -- Sergeant
Troy, of the 11th Dragoon Guards, now quartered in this
town. He would, I know, object to my having received
anything except as a loan, being a man of great respecta+
bility and high honour -- indeed, a nobleman by blood.
 "I should be much obliged to you if you would keep the
contents of this letter a secret for the present, dear friend.
We mean to surprise Weatherbury by coming there soon
as husband and wife, though l blush to state it to one nearly
a strangen The sergeant grew up in Weatherbury. Thank+
ing you again for your kindness,
"I am, your sincere well-wisher,
" FANNV ROBIN.'
' Have you read it, Mr. Boldwood?' said Gabriel;
"if not, you had better do so. I know you are interested
in Fanny Robin.'
<P 161>
Boldwood read the letter and looked grieved.
"Fanny -- poor Fanny! the end she is so confident
of has not yet come, she should remember -- and may
never come. I see she gives no address.'
"What sort of a man is this Sergeant Troy?' said
Gabriel.
"H'm -- I'm afraid not one to build much hope upon
in such a case as this,' the farmer murmured, "though
he's a clever fellow, and up to everything. A slight
romance attaches to him, too. His mother was a French
governess, and it seems that a secret attachment existed
between her and the late Lord Severn. She was married
to a poor medical man, and soon after an infant was
horn; and while money was forthcoming all went on
well. Unfortunately for her boy, his best friends died;
and he got then a situation as second clerk at a lawyer's
in Casterbridge. He stayed there for some time, and
might have worked himself into a dignified position of
some sort had he not indulged in the wild freak of
enlisting. I have much doubt if ever little Fanny will
surprise us in the way she mentions -- very much doubt
A silly girl! -- silly girl!'
The door was hurriedly burst open again, and in
came running Cainy Ball out of breath, his mouth red
and open, like the bell of a penny trumpet, from which
he coughed with noisy vigour and great distension of face.
"Now, Cain Ball,' said Oak, sternly, "why will you
run so fast and lose your breath so? I'm always telling
you of it.'
'Oh -- I -- a puff of mee breath -- went -- the -- wrong
way, please, Mister Oak, and made me cough -- hok --
hok!'
"Well --  what have you come for?'
"I've run to tell ye,' said the junior shepherd,
supporting his exhausted youthful frame against the
doorpost, ' that you must come directly'. Two more ewes
have twinned -- that's what's the matter, Shepherd Oak.'
" Oh, that's it,' said Oak, jumping up, and dimissing
for the present his thoughts on poor Fanny. " You are
a good boy to run and tell me, Cain, and you shall
smell a large plum pudding some day as a treat. But,
before we go, Cainy, bring the tarpot, and we'll mark
this lot and have done with 'em.'
<P 162>
Oak took from his illimitable pockets a marking iron,
dipped it into the pot, and imprintcd on the buttocks
of the infant sheep the initials of her he delighted to
muse on -- "B. E.,' which signified to all the region
round that henceforth the lambs belonged to Farmer
Bathsheba Everdene, and to no one else.
" Now, Cainy, shoulder your two, and off Good
morning, Mr. Boldwood.' The shepherd lifted the
sixteen large legs and four small bodies he had himself
brought, and vanished with them in the direction of
the lambing field hard by -- their frames being now in a
sleek and hopeful state, pleasantly contrasting with their
death's-door plight of hialf an hour before.
Boldwood followed him a little way up the field,
hesitated, and turned back. He followed him again
with a last resolve, annihilating return. On approaching
the nook in which the fold was constructed, the farmer
drew out-his pocket-book, unfastened-it, and allowed it
to lie open on his hand. A letter was revealed -- Bath+
sheba's.
"I was going to ask you, Oak,' he said, with unreal
carelessness, "if you know whose writing this is? '
Oak glanced into the book, and replied instantly,
with a flushed face, " Miss Everdene's.'
Oak had coloured simply at the consciousness of
sounding her name. He now felt a strangely distressing
qualm from a new thought. ' The letter could of course
be no other than anonymous, or the inquiry would not
have been necessary.
Boldwood mistook his confusion : sensitive persons
are always ready with their "Is it I ? ' in prefercnce to
objective reasoning.
" The question was perfectly fair,' he returned -- and
there was something incongruous in the serious eamest+
ness with which he applied himself to an argument on
a valentine. " You know it is always expected that
privy inquiries will be made : that's where the -- fun
lies.' If the word "fun' had been "torture,' it could
not have been uttered with a more constrained and
restless countenance than was Boldwood's then.'
Soon parting from Gabriel, the lonely and reserved
man returned to his house to breakfast -- feeling twinges
of shame and regret at having so far exposed his mood
by those fevered
<P 163>
questions to a stranger. He again
placed the letter on the mantelpiece, and sat down to
think of the circumstances attending it by the light of
Gabriel's information.
ALL SAINTS' AND ALL SOULS"
<C xvi>
<P 164>
ALL SAINTS' AND ALL SOULS'
ON a week-day morning a small congregation, con+
sisting mainly of women and girls, rose from its knees
in the mouldy nave of a church called All Saints', in
the distant barrack-town before mentioned, at the end
of a service without a sermon. They were about to
disperse, when a smart footstep, entering the porch and
coming up the central passage, arrested their attention.
The step echoed with a ring unusual in a church; it
was the clink of spurs. Everybody looked. A young
cavalry soldier in a red uniform, with the three chevrons
of a sergeant upon his sleeve, strode up the aisle, with
an embarrassment which was only the more marked
by the intense vigour of his step, and by the deter+
mination upon his face to show none. A slight flush
had mounted his cheek by the time he had run the
gauntlet between these women ; but, passing on through
the chancel arch, he never paused till he came close
to the altar railing. Here for a moment he stood
alone.
The officiating curate, who had not yet doffed his
surplice, perceived the new-comer, and followed him
to the communion-space. He whispered to the soldier,
and then beckoned to the clerk, who in his turn
whispered to an elderly woman, apparently his wife, and
they also went up the chancel steps.
"'Tis a wedding!' murmured some of the women,
brightening. " Let's wait!'
The majority again sat down.
There was a creaking of machinery behind, and
some of the young ones turned their heads. From the
interior face of the west wall of the tower projected a
little canopy with a quarter-jack and small bcll beneath
it, the automaton being driven by the same clock
machinery that struck the large bell in the tower. Be+
tween the tower and the church was a close sereen, the
door of which was kept shut during services, hiding
this
<P 165>
grotesque clockwork from sight. At present, how+
ever, the door was open, and the egress of the jack, the
blows on the bell, and the mannikin's retreat intc.the
nook again, were visible to many, and audible through+
out the church.
The jack had struck half-past eleven.
" Where's the woman ?" whispered some of the
spectators.
The young sergeant stood still with the abnormal
rigidity of the old pillars around. He faced the south+
east, and was as silent as he was still.
The silence grew to be a noticeable thing as the
minutes went on, and nobody else appeared, and not a
soul moved. The rattle of the quarter-jack again from
its niche, its blows for three-quarters, its fussy retreat,
were almost painfully abrupt, and caused many of the
congregation to start palpably.
"I wonder where the woman is!' a voice whispered
again.
There began now that slight shifting of feet, that
artificial coughing among several, which betrays a
nervous suspense. At length there was a titter. But
the soldier never moved. There he stood, his face to
the south-east, upright as a column, his cap in his hand.
The clock ticked on. The women threw off their
nervousness, and titters and giggling became more
frequent. Then came a dead silence. Every one was
waiting for the end. Some persons may have noticed
how extraordinarily the striking of quarters. seems to
quicken the flight of time. It was hardly credible that
the jack had not got wrong with the minutes when the
rattle began again, the puppet emerged, and the four
quarters were struck fitfully as before: One could al+
most be positive that there was a malicious leer upon
the hideous creature's face, and a mischievous delight
in its twitchings. Then, followed the dull and remote
resonance of the twelve heavy strokes in the tower
above. The women were impressed, and there was no
giggle this time.
The clergyman glided into the vestry, and the clerk
vanished. The sergeant had not yet turned ; every
woman in the church was waiting to see his face, and
he appeared to know it. At last he did turn, and
stalked resolutely down the nave, braving them all,
with a compressed lip. Two bowed and toothless old
<P 166>
almsmen then looked at each other and chuckled,
innocently enough ; but the sound had a strange weird
effect in that place.
Opposite to the church was a paved square, around
which several overhanging wood buildings of old time
cast a picturesque shade. The young man on leaving
the door went to cross the square, when, in the middle,
he met a little woman. The expression of her face,
which had been one of intense anxiety, sank at the
sight of his nearly to terror.
" Well ? ' he said, in a suppressed passion, fixedly
looking at her.
" O, Frank -- I made a mistake! -- I thought that
church with the spire was All Saints', and I was at the
door at half-past eleven to a minute as you said.
waited till a quarter to twelve, and found then that I
was in All Souls'. But I wasn't much frightened, for
I thought it could be to-morrow as well.'
"You fool, for so fooling me! But say no more.'
" Shall it be to-monow, Frank ? ' she asked blankly.
"To-morrow !' and he gave vent to a hoarse laugh.
"I don't go through that experience again for some
time, I warrant you ! '
" But after all,' she expostulated in a trembling voice,
"the mistake was not such a terrible thing! Now, dear
Frank, when shall it be?'
"Ah, when ? God knows !' he said, with a light
irony, and turning from her walked rapidly away.
<C xvii>
<P 167>
IN THE MARKET-PLACE
ON Saturday Boldwood was in Casterbridge market
house as usual, when the disturber of his dreams entered
and became visible to him. Adam had awakened from
his deep sleep, and behold! there was Eve. The
farmer took courage, and for the first time really looked
at her.
Material causes and emotional effects are not to be
arranged in regular equation. The result from capital
employed in the production of any movement of a
mental nature is sometimes as tremendous as the cause
itself is absurdly minute. When women are in a freakish
mood, their usual intuition, either from carelessness or
inherent defect, seemingly fails to teaeh them this, and
hence it was that Bathsheba was fated to be astonished
today.
Boldwood looked at her -- not slily, critically, or
understandingly, but blankly at gaze, in the way a
reaper looks up at a passing train -- as something foreign
to his element, and but dimly understood. To Bold+
wood women had been remote phenomena rather than
necessary complements -- comets of such uncertain
aspeet, movement, and permanence, that whether
their orbits were as geometrical, unchangeable, and
as subject to laws as his own, or as absolutely erratic
as they superficially appeared, he had not deemed it
his duty to consider.
He saw her black hair, her correct facial curves
and profile, and the roundness of her chin and throat.
He saw then the side of her eyelids, eyes, and lashes,
and the shape of her ear. Next he noticed her figure,
her skirt, and the very soles of her shoes.
Boldwood thought her beautiful, but wondered
whether he was right in his thought, for it seemed
impossible that this romance in the flesh, if so sweet
as he imagined, could have
<P 168>
been going on long without
creating a commotion of delight among men, and pro+
voking more inquiry than Bathsheba had done, even
though that was not a little. To the best of his judg+
ment neither nature nor art could improve this perfect
one of an imperfect many. His heart began to move
within him. Boldwood, it must be remembered, though
forty years of age, had never before inspected a woman
with the very centre and force of his glance; they had
struck upon all his senses at wide angles.
Was she really beautiful? He could not assure
himself that his opinion was true even now. He fur+
tively said to a neighbour, 'Is Miss Everdene considered
handsome?'
"0 yes; she was a good deal 'notied the first
time she came, if you remember. A very handsome
girl indeed.'
A man is never more credulous than in receiving
favourable opinions on the beauty of a woman he is
half, or quite, in love with; a mere child's word on the
point has the weight of an R.A.'s. Boldwood was
satisfied now.
And this charming woman had in effect said to
him, "Marry me.' Why should she have done that
strange thing ? Boldwood's blindness to the difference
between approving of what circumstances suggest, and
originating what they do not suggest, was well matched
by Bathsheba's insensibility to the possibly great issues
of little beginnings.
She was at this moment coolly dealing with a dashing
young farmer, adding up accounts with him as indiffer+
ently as if his face had been the pages of a ledger. It
was evident that such a nature as his had no attraction
for a woman of Bathsheba's taste. But Boldwood grew
hot down to his hands with an incipient jealousy; he
trod for the first time the threshold of "the injured
lover's hell.' His first impulse was to go and thrust
himself between them. This could be done, but only
in one way -- by asking to see a sample of her corn.
Boldwood renounced the idea. He could not make
the request; it was debasing loveliness to ask it to
buy and sell, and jarred with his conceptions of her.
All this time Bathsheba was conscious of having
broken into that dignified stronghold at last. His
eyes, she knew, were
<P 169>
following her everywhere. This
was a triumph; and had it come naturally, such a
triumph would have been the sweeter to her for this
piquing delay. But it had been brought about by
misdirected ingenuity, and she valued it only as she
valued an artificial flower or a wax fruit.
Being a woman with some good sense in reasoning
on subjects wherein her heart was not involved, Bath+
sheba genuinely repented that a freak which had owed
its existence as much to Liddy as to herself, should
ever have been undertaken, to disturb the placidity of
a man she respected too highly to deliberately tease.
She that day nearly formed the intention of begging
his pardon on the very next occasion of their meeting.
The worst features of this arrangement were that, if
he thought she ridiculed him, an apology would in+
crease the offence by being disbelieved; and if he
thought she wanted him to woo her, it would read
like additional evidence of her forwardness.
<C xviii>
<P 170>
BOLDWOOD IN MEDITATION -- REGRET
BOLDWOOD was tenant of what was called Little
Weatherbury Farm, and his person was the nearest ap+
proach to aristocracy that this remoter quarter of the
parish could boast of. Genteel strangers, whose god
was their town, who might happen to be compelled to
linger about this nook for a day, heard the sound of
light wheels, and prayed to see good society, to the
degree of a solitary lord, or squire at the very least,
but it was only Mr. Boldwood going out for the day.
They heard the sound of wheels yet once more, and
were re-animated to expectancy : it was only Mr. Bold+
wood coming home again.
His house stood recessed from the road, and the
stables, which are to a farm what a fireplace is to a
room, were behind, their lower portions being lost
amid bushes of laurel. Inside the blue door, open
half-way down, were to be seen at this time the backs
and tails of half-a-dozen warm and contented horses
standing in their stalls; and as thus viewed, they pre+
sented alternations of roan and bay, in shapes like a
Moorish arch, the tail being a streak down the midst
of each. Over these, and lost to the eye gazing in
from the outer light, the mouths of the same animals
could be heard busily sustaining the above-named
warmth and plumpness by quantities of oats and hay.
The restless and shadowy figure of a colt wandered
about a loose-box at the end, whilst the steady grind
of all the eaters was occasionally diversified by the
rattle of a rope or the stamp of a foot.
Pacing up and down at the heels of the animals was
Farmer Boldwood himself. This place was his almonry
and cloister in one : here, after looking to the feeding
of his four-footed dependants, the celibate would walk
and meditate of an evening till the moon's rays streamed
in through the cobwebbed windows, or total darkness
enveloped the scene.
<P 171>
His square-framed perpendicularity showed more fully
now than in the crowd and bustle of the market-house.
In this meditative walk his foot met the floor with heel
and toe simultaneously, and his fine reddish-fleshed face
was bent downwards just enough to render obscure the
still mouth and the well-rounded though rather prominent
and broad chin. A few clear and thread-like horizontal
lines were the only interruption to the otherwise smooth
surface of his large forehead.
The phases of Boldwood's life were ordinary enough,
but his was not an ordinary nature. That stillness,
which struck casual observers more than anything else
in his character and habit, and seemed so precisely
like the rest of inanition, may have been the perfect
balance of enormous antagonistic forces -- positives and
negatives in fine adjustment. His equilibrium disturbed,
he was in extremity at once. If an emotion possessed
him at all, it ruled him; a feeling not mastering him
was entirely latent. Stagnant or rapid, it was never
slow. He was always hit mortally, or he was missed.
He had no light and careless touches in his constitu+
tion, either for good or for evil. Stern in the outlines of
action, mild in the details, he was serious throughout all.
He saw no absurd sides to the follies of life, and thus,
though not quite companionable in the eyes of merry
men and scoffers, and those to whom all things show
life as a jest, he was not intolerable to the earnest and
those acquainted with grief. Being a man -who read
all the dramas of life seriously, if he failed to please
when they were comedies, there was no frivolous treat+
ment to reproach him for when they chanced to end
tragically.
Bathsheba was far from dreaming that the dark and
silent shape upon which she had so carelessly thrown a
seed was a hotbed of tropic intensity. Had she known
Boldwood's moods, her blame would have been fearful,
and the stain upon her heart ineradicable. Moreover,
had she known her present power for good or evil over
this man, she would have trembled at her responsibility.
Luckily for her present, unluckily for her future tran+
quillity, her understanding had not yet told her what
Boldwood was. Nobody knew entirely ; for though it
was possible to form guesses concerning his wild 'capa+
<P 172>
bilities from old floodmarks faintly visible, he had never
been seen at the high tides which caused them.
Farmer Boldwood came to the stable-door and looked
forth across the level fields. Beyond the first enclosure
was a hedge, and on the other side of this a meadow
belonging to Bathsheba's farm.
It was now early spring -- the time of going to grass
with the sheep, when they have the first feed of the
meadows, before these are laid up for mowing. The
wind, which had been blowing east for several weeks,
had veered to the southward, and the middle of spring
had come abruptly -- almost without a beginning. It
was that period in the vernal quarter when we map
suppose the Dryads to be waking for the season. The
vegetable world begins to move and swell and the saps
to rise, till in the completest silence of lone gardens
and trackless plantations, where- everything seems -help+
less and still after the bond and slavery of frost, there
are bustlings, strainings, united thrusts, and pulls-all+
together, in comparison with which the powerful tugs of
cranes and pulleys in a noisy city are but.  pigmy efforts.
"Boldwood, looking into the distant meadows, saw
there three figures. They were those of Miss' Everdene,
Shepherd Oak, and Cainy Ball.
When Bathsheba's figure shone upon the farmer's
eyes it lighted him up as the moon lights up a great
tower. A man's body is as the shell; or the tablet, of
his soul, as he is reserved or ingenuous, overflowing or
self-contained. There was a  change in Boldwood's
exterior from its former impassibleness ; and his face
showed that he was now living outside his defences
for the first time, and with a fearful sense of exposure.
It is the usual experience of strong natures when they
love.
At last he arrived at a conclusion. It was to go
across and inquire boldly of her.
The insulation of his heart by reserve during these
many years, without a channel of any kind for disposable
emotion, had worked its effect. It has been observed
more than once that the causes of love are chiefly
<P 173>
subjective, and Boldwood was a living testimony to
the truth of the proposition. No mother existed to
absorb his devotion, no sister for his tenderness, no
idle ties for sense. He became surcharged with the
compound, which was genuine lover's love.
He approached the gate of the meadow. Beyond
it the ground was melodious with ripples, and the sky
with larks; the low bleating of the flock mingling with
both. Mistress and man were engaged in the operation
of making a lamb "take,' which is performed whenever
an ewe has lost her own offspring, one of the twins of
another ewe being given her as a substitute. Gabriel
had skinned the dead lamb, and was tying the skin
over the body of the live lamb, in the customary manner,
whilst Bathsheba was holding open a little pen of four
hurdles, into which the Mother and foisted lamb were
driven, where they would remain till the old sheep
conceived an affection for the young one.
Bathsheba looked up at the completion of the
manouvre, and saw the farmer by the gate, where he
was overhung by a willow tree in full bloom. Gabriel,
to whom her face was as the uncertain glory of an April
day, was ever regardful of its faintest changes, and
instantly discerned thereon the mark of some influence
from without, in the form of a keenly self-conscious
reddening. He also turned and beheld Boldwood.
At onee connecting these signs with the letter Bold+
wood had shown him, Gabriel suspected her of some
coquettish procedure begun by that means, and carried
on since, he knew not how.
Farmer Boldwood had read the pantomime denoting
that they were aware of his presence, and the perception
was as too much light turned upon his new sensibility.
He was still in the road, and by moving on he hoped
that neither would recognize that he had originally
intended to enter the field. He passed by with an
utter and overwhelming sensation of ignorance, shyness,
and doubt. Perhaps in her manner there were signs
that she wished to see him -- perhaps not -- he could not
read a woman. The cabala of this erotic philosophy
seemed to consist of the subtlest meanings expressed in
misleading ways.
<P 174>
Every turn, look, word, and accent
contained a mystery quite distinct from its obvious
import, and not one had ever been pondered by him
until now.
As for Bathsheba, she was not deceived into the
belief that Farmer Boldwood had walked by on business
or in idleness. She collected the probabilities of the
case, and concluded that she was herself responsible for
Boldwood's appearance there. It troubled her much
to see what a great flame a little Wildfire was likely to
kindle. Bathsheba was no schemer for marriage, nor
was she deliberately a trifler with the affections of men,
and a censor's experience on seeing an actual flirt after
observing her would have been a feeling of surprise
that Bathsheba could be so different from such a one,
and yet so like what a flirt is supposed to be.
She resolved never again, by look or by sign, to
interrupt the steady flow of this man's life. But a
resolution to avoid an evil is seldom framed till the evil
is so far advanced as to make avoidance impossible.
<C xix>
<P 175>
THE SHEEP-WASHING -- THE OFFER
BOLDWOOD did eventually call upon her. She was
not at home. " Of course not,' he murmured. In con+
templating Bathsheba as a woman, he had forgotten the
accidents of her position as an agriculturist -- that being
as much of a farmer, and as extensive a farmer, as
himself, her probable whereabouts was out-of-dooTs at
this time of the year. This, and the other oversights
Boldwood was guilty of, were natural to the mood, and
still more natural to the circumstances. The great aids
to idealization in love were present here : occasional
observation of her from a distance, and the absence of
social intercourse with her -- visual familiarity, oral
strangeness. The smaller human elements were kept
out of sight ; the pettinesses that enter so largely into
all earthly living and doing were disguised by the
accident of lover and loved-one not being on visiting
terms ; and there was hardly awakened a thought in
Boldwood that sorry household realities appertained to
her, or that she, like all others, had moments of
commonplace, when to be least plainly seen was to be
most prettily remembered. Thus a mild sort of
apotheosis took place in his fancy, whilst she still lived
and breathed within his own horizon, a troubled creature
like himself.
It was the end of May when the farmer determined
to be no longer repulsed by trivialities or distracted by
suspense. He had by this time grown used to being in
love; the passion now startled him less even when it
tortured him more, and he felt himself adequate to the
situation. On inquiring for her at her house they had
told him she was at the sheepwashing, and he went off
to seek her there.
The sheep-washing pool was a perfectly circular basin
of brickwork in the meadows, full of the clearest water.
To birds on the wing its glassy surface, reflecting the
light sky, must have been
<P 176>
visible for miles around as a
glistening Cyclops' eye in a green face. The grass
about the margin at this season was a sight to remember
long -- in a minor sort of way. Its activity in sucking
the moisture from the rich damp sod. was almost a pro+
cess observable by the eye. The outskirts of this level
water-meadow were diversified by rounded and hollow
pastures, where just now every flower that was not a
buttercup was a daisy. The river slid along noiselessly
as a shade, the swelling reeds and sedge forming a
flexible palisade upon its moist brink. To the north
of the mead were trees, the leaves of which were new,
soft, and moist, not yet having stiffened and darkened
under summer sun and drought, their colour being
yellow beside a green -- green beside a yellow.
From the recesses of this knot of foliage the loud
notes of three cuckoos were resounding through the
still air.
Boldwood went meditating down the slopes with his
eyes on his boots, which the yellow pollen from the
buttercups had bronzed in artistic gradations. A tribu+
tary of the main stream flowed through the basin of the
pool by an inlet and outlet at opposite points of its
diameter. Shepherd Oak, Jan Coggan, Moon, Poor+
grass, Cain Ball, and several others were assembled
here, all dripping wet to the very roots of their hair,
and Bathsheba was standing by in a new riding-habit --
the most elegant she had ever worn -- the reins of her
horse being looped over her arm. Flagons of cider
were rolling about upon the green. The meek sheep
were pushed into the pool by Coggan and Matthew
Moon, who stood by the lower hatch, immersed to their
waists; then Gabriel, who stood on the brink, thrust
them under as they swam along, with an instrument
like a crutch, formed for the purpose, and also for
assisting the exhausted animals when the wool became
saturated and they began to sink. They were let out
against the stream, and through the upper opening, all
impurities flowing away below. Cainy Ball and Joseph,
who performed this latter operation, were if possible
wetter than the rest ; they resembled dolphins under a
fountain, every protuberance and angle of their clothes
dribbling forth a small rill.
<P 177>
Boldwood came close and bade her good-morning, with
such constraint that she could not but think he had
stepped across to the washing for its own sake, hoping
not to find her there ; more, she fancied his brow severe
and his eye slighting. Bathsheba immediately contrived
to withdraw, and glided along by the river till she was
a stone's throw off. She heard footsteps brushing the
grass, and had a consciousness that love was encircling
her like a perfume. Instead of turning or waiting,
Bathsheba went further among the high sedges, but
Boldwood seemed determined, and pressed on till they
were completely past the bend of the river. Here,
without being seen, they could hear the splashing and
shouts of the washers above.
"Miss Everdene!' said the farmer.
She trembled, turned, and said 'Good morning.'
His tone was so utterly removed from all she had
expected as a beginning. It was lowness and quiet
accentuated : an emphasis of deep meanings, their form,
at the same time, being scarcely expressed. Silence
has sometimes a remarkable power of showing itself as
the disembodied soul of feeling wandering without its
carcase, and it is then more impressive than speech.
In the same way, to say a little is often to tell more
than to say a great deal. Boldwood told everything in
that word.
As the conseiousness expands on learning that what
was fancied to be the rumble of wheels is the reverbera+
tion of thunder, so did Bathsheba's at her intuitive
conviction.
'I feel -- almost too much -- to think,' he said, with a
solemn simplicity. "I have come to speak to you with+
out preface. My life is not my own since I have beheld
you clearly, Miss Everdene -- I come to make you an
offer of marriage.'
Bathsheba tried to preserve an absolutely neutral
countenance, and all the motion she made was that of
closing lips which had previously been a little parted.
"I am now forty-one years old,' he went on. "I may
have been called a confirmed bachelor, and I was a
confirmed bachelor. I had never any views of myself
as a husband in my earlier days, nor have I made any
calculation on the subject since I have been older.
But we all change, and my change, in this matter,
<P 178>
came
with seeing you. I have felt lately, more and more,
that my present way of living is bad in every respect.
Beyond all things, I want you as my wife.'
"I feel, Mr. Boldwood, that though I respect you
much, I do not feel -- what would justify me to -- in
accepting your offer,' she stammered.
This giving back of dignity for dignity seemed to
open the sluices of feeling that Boldwood had as yet
kept closed.
" My life is a burden without you,' he exclaimed, in
a low voice. "I want you -- I want you to let me say
I love you again and again!'
Bathsheba answered nothing, and the mare upon
her arm seemed so impressed that instead of cropping
the herbage she looked up.
"I think and hope you care enough for me to listen
to what I have to tell!"
   Bathsheba's momentary impulse at hearing this was
to ask why he thought that, till she remembered that,
far from being a conceited assumption on Boldwood's
part, it was but the natural conclusion of serious reflec+
tion based on deceptive premises of her own offering.
"I wish I could say courteous flatteries to you,' the
farmer continued in an easier tone, " and put my rugged
feeling into a graceful shape: but I have neither power
nor patience to learn such things. I want you for my
wife -- so wildly that no other feeling can abide in me;
but I should not have spoken out had I not been led
to hope.'
"The valentine again! O that valentine!' she
said to herself, but not a word to him.
  "If you can love me say so, Miss Everdene. If not
 -- don't say no!'
  "Mr. Boldwood, it is painful to have to say I am
surprised, so that I don't know how to answer you with
propriety and respect -- but am only just able to speak
out my feeling -- I mean my meaning; that I am afraid
I can't marry you, much as I respect you. You are too
dignified for me to suit you, sir.'
  "But, Miss Everdene!'
"I -- I didn't -- I know I ought never to have dreamt
of sending
<P 179>
that valentine -- forgive me, sir -- it was a
wanton thing which no woman with any self-respect
should have done. If you will only pardon my thought+
lessness, I promise never to --  -- '
" No, no, no. Don't say thoughtlessness! Make me
think it was something more -- that it was a sort of
prophetic instinct -- the beginning of a feeling that you
would like me. You torture me to say it was done in
thoughtlessness -- I never thought of it in that light, and
I can't endure it. Ah ! I wish I knew how to win you!
but that I can't do -- I can only ask if I have already got
you. If I have not, and it is not true that you have
come unwittingly to me as I have to you, I can say no
more.'
  "I have not fallen in love with you, Mr. Boldwood --
certainly I must say that.' She allowed a very small
smile to creep for the first time over her serious face in
saying this, and the white row of upper teeth, and keenly+
cut lips already noticed, suggested an idea of heartless+
ness, which was immediately contradicted by the pleasant
eyes.
"But you will just think -- in kindness and conde+
scension think -- if you cannot bear with me as a husband!
I fear I am too old for you, but believe me I will take
more care of you than would many a man of your own
age. I will protect and cherish you with all my strength
 -- I will indeed! You shall have no cares -- be worried
by no household affairs, and live quite at ease, Miss
Everdene. The dairy superintendence shall be done by
a man -- I can afford it will -- you shall never have so
much as to look out of doors at haymaking time, or to
think of weather in the harvest. I rather cling; to the
chaise, because it is he same my poor father and mother
drove, but if you don't like it I will sell it, and you shall
have a pony-carriage of your own. I cannot say how
far above every other idea and object on earth you seem
to me -- nobody knows -- God only knows -- how much
you are to me!'
Bathsheba's heart was young, and it swelled with
sympathy for the deep-natured man who spoke so
simply.
  "Don't say it! don't! I cannot bear you to feel so
much, and me to feel nothing. And I am afraid they
will notice us, Mr. Boldwood. Will you let the matter
rest now? I cannot think
<P 180>
collectedly. I did not know
you were going to say this to me. 0, I am wicked to
have made you suffer so!' She was frightened as well
as agitated at his vehemence.
  "Say then, that you don't absolutely refuse. Do not
quite refuse?'
"I can do nothing. I cannot answer.'
"I may speak to you again on the subject?'
"Yes.'
"I may think of you?'
"Yes, I suppose you may think of me.'
"And hope to obtain you?'
"No -- do not hope! Let us go on.'
"I will call upon you again to-morrow.'
"No -- please not. Give me time.'
"Yes -- I will give you any time,' he said earnestly and
gratefully. "I am happier now.'
"No -- I beg you! Don't be happier if happiness
only comes from my agreeing. Be neutral, Mr. Bold+
wood! I must think.'
"I will wait,' he said.
And then she turned away. Boldwood dropped his
gaze to the ground, and stood long like a man who did not
know where he was. Realities then returned upon him
like the pain of a wound received in an excitement
which eclipses it, and he, too, then went on.
<C xx>
<P 181>
PERPLEXITy -- GRINDING THE SHEARS -- A QUARREL
"HE is so disinterested and kind to offer me all that I
can desire,' Bathsheba mused.
Yet Farmer Boldwood, whether by nature kind or
the reverse to kind, did not exercise kindness, here.
The rarest offerings of the purest loves are but a self+
indulgence, and no generosity at all.
Bathsheba, not being the least in love with him, was
eventually able to look calmly at his offer. It was one
which many women of her own station in the neighbour+
hood, and not a few of higher rank, would have been
wild to accept and proud to publish. In every point of
view, ranging from politic to passionate, it was desirable
that she, a lonely girl, should marry, and marry this
earnest, well-to-do, and respected man. He was close
to her doors: his standing was sufficient: his qualities
were even supererogatory. Had she felt, which she did
not, any wish whatever for the married state in the
abstract, she could not reasonably have rejected him,
being a woman who frequently appealed to her under,
standing for deliverance from her whims. Boldwood as
a means to marriage was unexceptionable: she esteemed
and liked him, yet she did not want him. It appears
that ordinary men take wives because possession is not
possible without marriage, and that ordinary women
accept husbands because marriage is not possible with,
out possession; with totally differing aims the method is
the same on both sides. But the understood incentive
on the woman's part was wanting here. Besides, Bath+
sheba's position as absolute mistress of a farm and house
was a novel one, and the novelty had not yet begun to
wear off.
But a disquiet filled her which was somewhat to her
credit, for it would have affected few. Beyond the men+
tioned reasons with which she combated her objections,
she had a strong
<P 182>
feeling that, having been the one who
began the game, she ought in honesty to accept the conse,
quences. Still the reluctance remained. She said in the
same breath that it would be ungenerous not to marry
Boldwood, and that she couldn't do it to save her life.
Bathsheba's was an impulsive nature under a delibera,
tive aspect.  An Elizabeth in brain and a Mary Stuart
in spirit, she often performed actions of the greatest
temerity with a manner of extreme discretion. Many of
her thoughts were perfect syllogisms; unluckily they
always remained thoughts. Only a few were irrational
assumptions; but, unfortunately, they were the ones
which most frequently grew into deeds.
  The next day to that of the declaration she found
Gabriel Oak at the bottom of her garden, grinding his
shears for the sheep-shearing. All the surrounding
cottages were more or less scenes of the same operation;
the scurr of whetting spread into the sky from all parts
of the village as from an armury previous to a campaign.
Peace and war kiss each other at their hours of prepara+
tion -- sickles, scythes, shears, and pruning-hooks, ranking
with swords, bayonets, and lances, in their common
necessity for point and edge.
Cainy Ball turned the handle of Gabriel's grinstone,
his head performing a melancoly see-saw up and down
with each turn of the wheel. Oak stood somewhat as
Eros is represented when in the act of sharpening his
arrows: his figure slightly bent, the weight of his body
thrown over on the shears, and his head balanced side+
ways, with a critical compression of the lips and contrac+
tion of the eyelids to crown the attitude.
His mistress came up and looked upon them in
silence for a minute or two; then she said --
"Cain, go to the lower mead and catch the bay mare.
I'll turn the winch of the grindstone. I want to speak
to you, Gabriel.
Cain departed, and Bathsheba took the handle.
Gabriel had glanced up in intense surprise, quelled its
expression, and looked down again. Bathsheba turned
the winch, and Gabriel applied the shears.
The peculiar motion involved in turning a wheel
has a wonderful tendency to benumb the mind. It
is a sort of
<P 183>
attenuated variety of Ixion's punishment,
and contributes a dismal chapter to the history of
heavy, and the body's centre of gravity seems to
settle by degrees in a leaden lump somewhere be+
tween the eyebrows and the crown. Bathsheba felt
the unpleasant symptoms after two or three dozen
turns.
  "Will you turn, Gabriel, and let me hold the shears?"
she said. "My head is in a'whirl, and I can't talk.
Gabriel turned. Bathsheba then began, with some
awkwardness, allowing her thoughts to stray occasion+
ally from her story to attend to the shears, which
required a little nicety in sharpening.
  "I wanted to ask you if the men made any observa+
tions on my going behind the sedge with Mr. Boldwood
yesterday?'
  "Yes, they did,' said Gabriel. "You don't hold
the shears right, miss -- I knew you wouldn't know the
way -- hold like this.'
He relinquished the winch, and inclosing her two
hands completely i his own (taking each as we some+
times slasp a child's hand in teaching him to write),
grasped the shears with her. "Incline the edge so,'
he said.
  Hands and shears were inclined to suit the words,
and held thus for a peculiarly long time by the in+
structor as he spoke.
  "That will do,' exclaimed Bathsheba. "Loose my
hands. I won't have them held! Turn the winch.'
Gabriel freed her hands quietly, retired to his
handle, and the grinding went on.
  "Did the men think it odd?' she said again.
"Odd was not the idea, miss.'
"What did they say?'
"That Farmer Boldwood's name and your own
were likely to be flung over pulpit together before the
year was out.'
"I thought so by the look of them! Why, there's
nothing in it. A more foolish remark was never made,
and I want you to contradict it! that's what I came for.'
  Gabriel looked incredulous and sad, but between
his moments of incredulity, relieved.
"They must have heard our conversation,' she
continued.
<P 184>
"Well, then, Bathsheba!' said Oak, stopping the
handle, and gazing into her face with astonishment.
  "Miss Everdene, you mean," she said, with dignity.
  "I mean this, that if Mr. Boldwood really spoke of
marriage, I bain't going to tell a story and say he
didn't to please you. I have already tried to please
you too much for my own good!'
Hathsheba regarded him with round-eyed perplexity.
She did not know whether to pity him for disappointed
love of her, or to be angry with him for having got
over it -- his tone being ambiguous.
  "I said I wanted you just to mention that it was
not true I was going to be married to him,' she mur+
mured, with a slight decline in her assurance.
"I can say that to them if you wish, Miss Everdene.
And I could likewise give an opinion to 'ee on what
you have done.'
"I daresay. But I don't want your opinion.'
"I suppose not,' said Gabriel bitterly, and going on
with his turning, his words rising and falling in a
regular swell and cadence as he stooped or rose with
the winch, which directed them, according to his
position, perpendiculary into the earth, or horizontally
along the garden, his eyes being fixed on a leaf upon
the ground.
  With Bathsheba a hastened act was a rash act;
but, as does not always happen, time gained was
prudence insured. It must be added, however, that
time was very seldom gained. At this period the
single opinion in the parish on herself and her doings
that she valued as sounder than her own was Gabriel
Oak's. And the outspoken honesty of his character
was such- that on any subject even that of her love
for, or marriage with, another man, the same disinter+
estedness of opinion might be calculated on, and be
had for the asking. Thoroughly convinced of the
impossibility of his own suit, a high resolve constrained
him not to injure that of another. This is a lover's
most stoical virtue, as the lack of it is a lover's most
venial sin. Hnowing he would reply truly, she asked
the question, painful as she must have known the sub+
ject would be. Such is the selfishness of some charm+
ing women. Perhaps it was some excuse for her thus
torturing honesty to her own advantage, that she had
<P 185>
absolutely no other sound judgment within easy reach.
"Well, what is your opinion of my conduct,' she
said, quietly.
"That it is unworthy of any thoughtful, and meek,
and comely woman.'
In an instant Bathsheba's face coloured with the
angry crimson of a danby sunset. But she forbore
to utter this feeling, and the reticence of her tongue
only made the loquacity of her face the more notice+
able.
The next thing Gabriel did was to make a mistake.
"Perhaps you don't like the rudeness of my repri+
manding you, for I know it is rudeness; but I thought
it would do good.'
She instantly replied sarcastically --
"On the contrary, my opinion of you is so low, that
I see in your abuse the praise of discerning people!'
"I am glad you don't mind it, for I said it honestly
and with every serious meaning.'
  "I see. But, unfortunately, when you try not to
speak in jest you are amusing -- just as when you wish
to avoid seriousness you sometimes say a sensible word
It was a hard hit, but Bathsheba had unmistakably
lost her temper, and on that account Gabriel had
never in his life kept his own better. He said nothing.
She then broke out --
  "I may ask, I suppose, where in particular my
unworthiness lies? In my not marrying you, perhaps!
"Not by any means,' said Gabriel quietly. "I have
long given up thinking of that matter.'
"Or wishing it, I suppose,' she said; and it was
apparent that she expected an unhesitating denial of
this supposition.
Whatever Gabriel felt, he coolly echoed her words --
"Or wishing it either.'
  A woman may be treated with a bitterness which
is sweet to her, and with a rudeness which is not
offensive. Bathsheba would have submitted to an
indignant chastisement for her levity had Gabriel pro+
tested that he was loving her at the same time; the
impetuosity of passion unrequited is bearable, even if
it stings and anathematizes there is a triumph in the
humiliation, and a tenderness in the strife. This was
what she had been expecting, and what she had not
got. To be lectured
<P 186>
because the lecturer saw her in
the cold morning light of open-shuttered disillusion
was exasperating. He had not finished, either. He
continued in a more agitated voice: --
"My opinion is (since you ask it) that you are
greatly to blame for playing pranks upon a man like
Mr. Boldwood, merely as a pastime. Leading on a
man you don't care for is not a praiseworthy action.
And even, Miss Everdene, if you seriously inclined
towards him, you might have let him find it out in
some way of true loving-kindness, and not by sending
him a valentine's letter.'
Bathsheba laid down the shears.
 "I cannot allow any man to -- to criticise my private
Conduct!' she exclaimed. "Nor will I for a minute.
So you'll please leave the farm at the end of the week!'
It may have been a peculiarity -- at any rate it was
a fact -- that when Bathsheba was swayed by an emotion
of an earthly sort her lower lip trembled: when by a
refined emotion, her upper or heavenward one. Her
nether lip quivered now.
"Very well, so I will,' said Gabriel calmly. He had
been held to her by a beautiful thread which it pained
him to spoil by breaking, rather than by a chain he
could not break. "I should be even better pleased to
go at once,' he added.
"Go at once then, in Heaven's name!' said she,her
eyes flashing at his, though never meeting them.
"Don't let me see your face any more.'
"Very well, Miss Everdene -- so it shall be.'
And he took his shears and went away from her in
placid dignity, as Moses left the presence of Pharaoh.
<C xxi>
<P 187>
TROUBLES IN THE FOLD -- A MESSAGE
GABRIEL OAK had ceased to feed the Weatherbury
flock for about four-and-twenty hours, when on Sunday
afternoon the elderly gentlemen Joseph Poorgrass,
Matthew Moon, Fray, and half-a-dozen others, came
running up to the house of the mistress of the Upper
Farm.
 "Whatever is the matter, men?' she said, meeting
them at the door just as she was coming out on her
way to church, and ceasing in a moment from the close
compression of her two red lips, with which she had
accompanied the exertion of pelling on a tight glove.
"Sixty!' said Joseph Poorgrass.
"Seventy!' said Moon.
"Fifty-nine!' said Susan Tall's husband.
" -- Sheep have broke fence,' said Fray.
" -- And got into a field of young clover,' said Tall.
" -- Young clover!' said Moon.
" -- Clover!' said Joseph Poorgrass.
"And they be getting blasted,' said Henery Fray.
"That they be,' said Joseph.
"And will all die as dead as nits, if they bain't got
out and cured!'said Tall.
Joseph's countenance was drawn into lines and
puckers by his concern. Fray's forehead was wrinkled
both perpendicularly and crosswise, after the pattern of
a portcullis, expressive of a double despair. Laban
Tall's lips were thin, and his face were rigid. Matthew's
jaws sank, and his eyes turned whichever way the
strongest muscle happened to pull them.
  "Yes,' said Joseph, "and I was sitting at home,
looking for Ephesians, and says I to myself, "'Tis
nothing but Corinthians and Thessalonians in this
danged Testament,'' when
<P 188>
who should come in but
Henery there: ""Joseph,'' he said, ""the sheep have
With Bathsheba it was a moment when thought was
blasted theirselves -- -'''
  With Bathsheba it was a moment when thought was
speech and speech exclamation. Moreover, she had
hardly recovered her equanimity since the disturbance
which she had suffered from Oak's remarks.
'Thats enought -- that's enough! -- oh, you fools!'
she cried, throwing the parasol and Prayer-book into
the passage, and running out of doors in the direction
signified. "To come to me, and not go and get them
out directly! Oh, the stupid numskulls!'
Her eyes were at their darkest and brightest now.
Bathsheba's beauty belonged rather to the demonian
than to the angelic school, she never looked so well as
when she was angry -- and particularly when the effect
was heightened by a rather dashing velvet dress, care+
fully put on before a glass.
All the ancient men ran in a jumbled throng after
her to the clover-field, Joseph sinking down in the
midst when about half-way, like an individual withering
in a world which was more and more insupportable.
Having once received the stimulus that her presence
always gave them they went round among the sheep
with a will. The majority of the afflicted animals were
lying down, and could not be stirred. These were
bodily lifted out, and the others driven into the adjoining
field. Here, after the lapse of a few minutes, several
more fell down, and lay helpless and livid as the rest.
Bathsheba, with a sad, bursting heart, looked at these
primest specimens of her prime flock as they rolled
there --
Swoln with wind and the rank mist they drew.
Many of them foamed at the mouth, their breathing
being quick and short, whilst the bodies of all were
fearfully distended.
"O, what can I do, what can I do!' said Bathsheba,
helplessly. "Sheep are such unfortunate animals! --
there's always something happening to them! I never
knew a flock pass a year without getting into some scrape
or other.'
"There's only one way of saving them,' said Tall.
<P 189>
"What way? Tell me quick!'
"They must be pierced in the side with a thing made
on purpose.'
"Can you do it? Can I?'
"No, ma'am. We can't, nor you neither. It must
be done in a particular spot. If ye go to the right or
left but an inch you stab the ewe and kill her. Not
even a shepherd can do it, as a rule.'
"Then they must die,' she said, in a resigned tone.
"Only one man in the neighbourhood knows the way,'
said Joseph, now just come up. "He could cure 'em
all if he were here.'
"Who is he? Let's get him!'
"Shepherd Oak," said Matthew. "Ah, he's a clever
man in talents!'
"Ah, that he is so!' said Joseph Poorgrass.
"True -- he's the man,' said Laban Tall.
"How dare you name that man in my presence!' she
said excitedly. "I told you never to allude to him, nor
shall you if you stay with me. Ah!' she added, brighten+
ing, "Farmer Boldwood knows!'
  "0 no, ma'am' said Matthew. "Two of his store
ewes got into some vetches t'other day, and were just
like these. He sent a man on horseback here post-haste
for Gable, and Gable went and saved 'em, Farmer
Boldwood hev got the thing they do it with. 'Tis a
holler pipe, with a sharp pricker inside. Isn't it,
Joseph?'
  "Ay -- a holler pipe,' echoed Joseph. "That's what
'tis.'
"Ay, sure -- that's the machine,' chimed in Henery
Fray, reflectively, with an Oriental indifference to the
flight of time.
"Well," burst out Bathsheba, "don't stand there with
your ""ayes'' and your ""sures,'' talking at me! Get
somebody to cure the sheep instantly!'
  All then stalked or in eonsternation, to get some+
body as directed, without any idea of who it was to be.
In a minute they had vanished through the gate,.and
she stood alone with the dying flock.
"Never will I send for him never!' she said firmly.
<P 190>
One of the ewes here contracted its muscles horribly,
extended itself, and jumped high into the air. The
leap was an astonishing one. The ewe fell heavily, and
lay still.
Bathsheba went up to it. The sheep was dead.
"O, what shall I do -- what shall I do!' she again
exclaimed, wringing her hands. "I won't send for him.
No, I won't!'
The most vigorous expression of a resolution does
not always coinicide with the greatest vigour of the
resolution itself. It is often flung out as a sort of prop
to support a decaying conviction which, whilst strong,
required no enunciation to prove it so. The "No, I
won't' of Bathsheba meant virtually, "I think I must.'
She followed her assistants through the gate, and
lifted her hand to one of them. Laban answered to her
signal.
"Where is Oak staying?'
"Across the valley at Nest Cottage!'
"Jump on the bay mare, and ride across, and say he
must return instantly -- that I say so.'
Tall scrambled off to the field, and in two minutes
was on Poll, the bay, bare-backed, and with only a
halter by way of rein. He diminished down the
hill.
Bathsheba watched. So did all the rest. Tall
cantered along the bridle-path through Sixteen Acres,
Sheeplands, Middle Field The Flats, Cappel's Piece,
shrank almost to a point, crossed the bridge, and
ascended from the valley through Springmead and
Whitepits on the other side. The cottage to which
Gabriel had retired before taking his final departure
from the locality was visible as a white spot on the
opposite hill, backed by blue firs. Bathsheba walked
up and down. The men entered the field and
endeavoured to ease the anguish of the dumb creatures
by rubbing them. Nothing availed.
Bathsheba continued walking. The horse was seen
descending the hill, and the wearisome series had to be
repeated in reverse order: Whitepits, Springmead,
Cappel's Piece, The Flats, Middle Field, Sheeplands,
Sixteen Acres. She hoped Tall had had presence of
mind enough to give the mare up to Gabriel, and return
himself on foot. The rider neared them. It was Tall.
<P 191>
"O, what folly!' said Bathsheba.
Gabriel was not visible anywhere.
"Perhaps he is already gone!' she said.
Tall came into the inclosure, and leapt off, his face
tragic as Morton's after the battle of Shrewsbury.
"Well?' said Bathsheba, unwilling to believe that
her verbal lettre-de-cachet could possibly have miscarried.
"He says beggars mustn't be choosers,' replied Laban.
"What!' said the young farmer, opening her eyes
and drawing in her breath for an outburst. Joseph
Poorgrass retired a few steps behind a hurdle.
"He says he shall not come onless you request en
to come civilly and in a proper manner, as becomes any
'ooman begging a favour.'
"Oh, oh, that's his answer! Where does he get his
airs? Who am I, then, to be treated like that? Shall
I beg to a man who has begged to me?'
Another of the flock sprang into the air, and fell
dead.
The men looked grave, as if they suppressed opinion.
Bathsheba turned aside, her eyes full of tears. The
strait she was in through pride and shrewishness could
not be disguised longer: she burst out crying bitterly;
they all saw it; and she attempted no further concealment.
"I wouldn't cry about it, miss,' said William Small+
bury, compassionately. "Why not ask him softer like?
I'm sure he'd come then. Gable is a true man in that
way.'
Bathsheba checked her grief and wiped her eyes.
"O, it is a wicked cruelty to me -- it is -- it is!' she
murmured. "And he drives me to do what I wouldn't;
yes, he does ! -- Tall, come indoors.'
After this collapse, not very dignified for the head
of an establishment, she went into the house, Tall at
her heels. Here she sat down and hastily scribbled a
note between the small convulsive sobs of convalescence
which follow a fit of crying as a ground-swell follows a
storm. The note was none the less polite for being
written in a hurry. She held it at a distance, was
about to fold it, then added these words at the
bottom: --
"Do not desert me, Gabriel!'
<P 193>
She looked a little redder in refolding it, and closed
her lips, as if thereby to suspend till too late the action
of conscience in examining whether such strategy were
justifiable. The note was despatched as the message
had been, and Bathsheba waited indoors for the result.
It was an anxious quarter of an hour that intervened
between the messenger's departure and the sound of the
horse's tramp again outside. She- could not watch this
time, but, leaning over the old bureau at which she had
written the letter, closed her eyes, as if to keep out both
hope and fear.
  The case, however, was a promising one. Gabriel
was not angry: he was simply neutral, although her first
command had been so haughty. Such imperiousness
would have damned a little less beauty; and on the
other hand, such beauty would have redeemed a little
less imperiousness.
She went out when the horse was heard, and looked
up. A mounted figure passed between her and the
sky, and drew on towards the fleld of sheep, the rider
turning his face in receding. Gabriel looked at her.
It was a moment when a woman's eyes and tongue tell
distinctly opposite tales. Bathsheba looked full of
gratitude, and she said: --
  "O, Gabriel, how could you serve me so unkindly!'
Such a tenderly-shaped reproach for his previous
delay was the one speech in the language that he could
pardon for not being commendation of his readiness
now.
Gabriel murmured a confused reply, and hastened
on. She knew from the look which sentence in her
note had brought him. Bathsheba followed to the
field.
Gabriel was already among the turgid, prostrate forms.
He had flung off his coat, rolled up his shirt-sleeves,
and taken from his pocket the instrument of salvation.
It was a small tube or trochar, with a lance passing
down the inside; and Gabriel began to use it with a
dexterity that would have graced a hospital surgeon.
Passing his hand over the sheep's left flank, and
selecting the proper point, he punctured the skin and
rumen with the lance as it stood in the tube; then he
suddenly withdrew the lance, retaining the tube in its
place. A current of air rushed up the tube, forcible
enough to have extinguished a candle held at the
orifice.
It has been said that mere ease after torment is de+
light for a time; and the countenances of these poor
creatures expressed it now. Forty-nine operations were
successfully performed. Owing to the great hurry
necessitated by the far-gone state of some of the flock,
Gabriel missed his aim in one case, and in one only --
striking wide of the mark, and inflicting a mortal blow
at once upon the suffering ewe. Four had died; three
recovered without an operation. The total number of
sheep which had thus strayed and injured themselves
so dangerously was fifty-seven.
When the love-led man had ceased from his labours,
Bathsheba came and looked him in the face.
"Gabriel, will you stay on with me?' she, said,
smiling winningly, and not troubling to bring her lips
quite together again at the end, because there was going
to be another smile soon.
"I will,' said Gabriel.
And she smiled on him again.
<C xxii>
<P 194>
THE GREAT BARN AnD THE SHEEP-SHEARERS
MEN thin away to insignificance and oblivion quite as
often by not making the most of good spirits when they
have them as by lacking good spirits when they are
indispensable. Gabriel lately, for the first time since
his prostration by misfortune, had been independent in
thought and vigorous in action to a marked extent --
conditions which, powerless without an opportunity as
an opportunity without them is barren, would have
given him a sure lift upwards when the favourable-con+
junction should have occurred. But this incurable
loitering beside Bathsheba Everdene stole his time
ruinously. The spring tides were going by without
floating him off, and the neap might soon come which
could not.
It was the first day of June, and the sheep-shearing
season culminated, the landscape, even to the leanest
pasture, being all health and colour. Every green was
young, every pore was open, and every stalk was swollen
with racing currents of juice. God was palpably present
in the country, and the devil had gone with the world
to town. Flossy catkins of the later kinds, fern-sprouts
like bishops' croziers, the square-headed moschatel, the
odd cuckoo-pint, -- like an apoplectic saint in a niche
of malachite, -- snow-white ladies'-smocks, the toothwort,
approximating to human flesh, the enchanter's night+
shade, and the black-petaled doleful-bells, were among
the quainter objects of the vegetable world in and about
Weatherbury at this teeming time; and of the animal,
the metamorphosed figures of Mr. Jan Coggan, the
master-shearer; the second and third shearers, who
travelled in the exercise of their calling, and do not re+
quire definition by name; Henery Fray the fourth
shearer, Susan Tall's husband the fifth, Joseph Poorgrass
the sixth, young Cain Ball as assistant-shearer, and
Gabriel Oak as general supervisor. None of these were
clothed
<P 195>
to any extent worth mentioning, each appearing
to have hit in the matter of raiment the decent mean
between a high and low caste Hindoo. An angularity
of lineament, and a fixity of facial machinery in general,
proclaimed that serious work was the order of the day.
They sheared in the great barn, called for the nonce
the Shearing-barn, which on ground-plan resembled a
church with transepts. It not only emulated the form
of the neighbouring church of the parish, but vied with
it in antiquity. Whether the barn had ever formed one
of a group of conventual buildings nobody seemed to be
aware; no trace of such surroundings remained. The
vast porches at the sides, lofty enough to admit a waggon
laden to its highest with corn in the sheaf, were spanned
by heavy-pointed arches of stone, broadly and boldly cut,
whose very simplicity was the origin of a grandeur not
apparent in erections where more ornament has been
attempted. The dusky, filmed, chestnut roof, braced
and tied in by huge collars, curves, and diagonals, was
far nobler in design, because more wealthy in material,
than nine-tenths of those in our modern churches.
Along each side wall was a range of striding buttresses,
throwing deep shadows on the spaces between them,
which were perforated by lancet openings, combining
in their proportions the precise requirements both of
beauty and ventilation.
One could say about this barn, what could hardly
be said of either the church or the castle, akin to it in
age and style, that the purpose which had dictated its
original erection was the same with that to which it
was still applied. Unlike and superior to either of
those two typical remnants of mediaevalism, the old
barn embodied practices which had suffered no mutila+
tion at the hands of time. Here at least the spirit of
the ancient builders was at one with the spirit of the
modern beholder. Standing before this abraded pile,
the eye regarded its present usage, the mind-dwelt upon
its past history, with a satisfied sense of functional
continuity throughout -- a feeling almost of gratitude,
and quite of pride, at the permanence of the idea
which had heaped it up. The fact that four centuries
had neither proved it to be founded on a mistake,
<P 196>
inspired any hatred of its purpose, nor given rise to
any reaction that had battered it down, invested this
simple grey effort of old minds with a repose, if not a
grandeur, which a too curious reflection was apt to
disturb in its ecclesiastical and military compeers. For
once medievalism and modernism had a common stand+
point. The lanccolate windows, the time-eaten arch+
stones and chamfers, the orientation of the axis, the
misty chestnut work of the rafters, referred to no exploded
fortifying art or worn-out religious creed. The defence
and salvation of the body by daily bread is still a study,
a religion, and a desire.
To-day the large side doors were thrown open
towards the sun to admit a bountiful light to the
immediate spot of the shearers' operations, which was
the wood threshing-floor in the centre, formed of thick
oak, black with age and polished by the beating of flails
for many generations, till it had grown as slippery and
as rich in hue as the state-room floors of an Elizabethan
mansion. Here the shearers knelt, the sun slanting in
upon their bleached shirts, tanned arms, and the polished
shears they flourished, causing these to bristle with a
thousand rays strong enough to blind a weak-eyed man.
Beneath them a captive sheep lay panting, quickening
its pants as misgiving merged in terror, till it quivered
like the hot landscape outside.
This picture of to-day in its frame of four hundred
years ago did not produce that marked contrast between
ancient and modern which is implied by the contrast
of date. In comparison with cities, Weatherbury was
immutable. The citizen's Then is the rustic's Now.
In London, twenty or thirty-years ago are old times;
in Paris ten years, or five; in Weatherbury three or
four score years were included in the mere present,
and nothing less than a century set a mark on its
face or tone. Five decades hardly modified the cut of
a gaiter, the embroidery of a smock-frock, by the breadth
of a hair. Ten generations failed to alter the turn of
a single phrase. In these Wessex nooks the busy out+
sider's ancient times are only old; his old times are still
new; his present is futurity.
So the barn was natural to the shearers, and the
shearers were in harmony with the barn.
The spacious ends of the building, answering ecclesi+
astically
<P 197>
to nave and chancel extremities, were fenced
off with hurdles, the sheep being all collected in a crowd
within these two enclosures; and in one angle a catching+
pen was formed, in which three or four sheep were
continuously kept ready for the shearers to seize without
loss of time. In the background, mellowed by tawny
shade, were the three women, Maryann Money, and
Temperance and Soberness Miller, gathering up the
fleeces and twisting ropes of wool with a wimble for
tying them round. They were indifferently well assisted
by the old maltster, who, when the malting season from
October to April had passed, made himself useful upon
any of the bordering farmsteads.
"Behind all was Bathsheba, carefully watching the
men to see that there was no cutting or wounding
through carelessness, and that the animals were shorn
close. Gabriel, who flitted and hovered under her
bright eyes like a moth, did not shear continuously,
half his time being spent in attending to the others
and selecting the sheep for them. At the present
moment he was engaged in handing round a mug of
mild liquor, supplied from a barrel in the corner,
and cut pieces of bread and cheese.
Bathsheba, after throwing a glance here, a caution
there, and lecturing one of the younger operators who
had allowed his last finished sheep to go off among
the flock without re-stamping it with her initials, came
again to Gabriel, as he put down the luncheon to drag
a frightened ewe to his shear-station, flinging it over
upon its back with a dexterous twist of the arm
He lopped off the tresses about its head, and opened
up the neck and collar, his mistress quietly looking
on:
"She blushes at the insult,' murmured Bathsheba,
watching the pink flush which arose and overspread
the neck and shoulders of the ewe where they were
left bare by the clicking shears -- a flush which was
enviable, for its delicacy, by many queens of coteries,
and would have been creditable, for its promptness, to
any woman in the world.
Poor Gabriel's soul was fed with a luxury of content
by having her over him, her eyes critically regarding
his skilful shears, which apparently were going to gather
up a piece of the flesh at every close, and yet never did
so. Like Guildenstern,
<P 198>
Oak was happy in that he was
not over happy. He had no wish to converse with her:
that his bright lady and himself formed one group,
exclusively their own, and containing no others in the
world, was enough.
So the chatter was all on her side. There is a
loquacity that tells nothing, which was Bathsheba's;
and there is a silence which says much: that was
Gabriel's. Full of this dim and temperate bliss, he
went on to fling the ewe over upon her other side,
covering her head with his knee, gradually running
the shears line after line round her dewlap; thence
about her flank and back, and finishing over the tail.
"Well done, and done quickly!' said Bathsheba,
looking at her watch as the last snip resounded.
"How long, miss?' said Gabriel, wiping his brow.
"Three-and-twenty minutes and a half since you took
the first lock from its forehead. It is the first time that
I have ever seen one done in less than half an hour.'
The clean, sleek creature arose from its fleece -- how
perfectly like Aphrodite rising from the foam should
have been seen to be realized -- looking startled and
shy at the loss of its garment, which lay on the floor
in one soft cloud, united throughout, the portion visible
being the inner surface only, which, never before exposed,
was white as snow, and without flaw or blemish of the
minutest kind.
"Cain Ball!'
"Yes, Mister Oak; here I be!'
Cainy now runs forward with the tar-pot. "B. E.' is
newly stamped upon the shorn skin, and away the simplc
dam lcaps, panting, over the board into the shirtless
flock outside. Then up comes Maryann; throws the
loose locks into the middle of the fleece, rolls it up,
and carries it into the background as three-and-a-half
pounds of unadulterated warmth for the winter enjoy+
ment of persons unknown and far away, who will,
however, never experience the superlative comfort
derivable from the wool as it here exists, new and pure
 -- before the unctuousness of its nature whilst in a
living state has dried, stiffened, and been washed out
 -- rendering it just now as superior to anything woollen
as cream is superior to milk-and-water.
<P 199>
But heartless circumstance could not leave entire
Gabriel's happiness of this morning. The rams, old
ewes, and two-shear ewes had duly undergone their
stripping, and the men were proceeding with the shear+
lings and hogs, when Oak's belief that she was going to
stand pleasantly by and time him through another
performance was painfully interrupted by Farmer Bold+
wood's appearance in the extremest corner of the barn.
Nobody seemed to have perceived his entry, but there
he certainly was. Boldwood always carried with him a
social atmosphere of his own, which everybody felt who
came near him; and the talk, which Bathsheba's
presence had somewhat suppressed, was now totally
suspended.
  He crossed over rowards Bathsheba, who turned to
greet him with a carriage of perfect ease. He spoke to
her in low tones, and she instinctively modulated her
own to the same pitch, and her voice ultimately even
caught the inflection of his. She was far from having
a wish to appear mysteriously connected with him; but
woman at the impressionable age gravitates to the larger
body not only in her choice of words, which is apparent
every day, but even in her shades of tone and humour,
when the influence is great.
  What they conversed about was not audible to
Gabriel, who was too independent to get near, though
too concerned to disregard. The issue of their dialogue
was the taking of her hand by the courteous farmer to
help her over the spreading-board into the bright June
sunlight outside. Standing beside the sheep already
shorn, they went on talking again. Concerning the
flock? Apparently not. Gabriel theorized, not without
truth, that in quiet discussion of any matter within reach
of the speakers' eyes, these are usually fixed upon it.
Bathsheba demurely regarded a contemptible straw lying
upon the ground, in a way which suggested less ovine
criticism than womanly embarrassment. She became
more or less red in the cheek, the blood wavering in
uncertain flux and reflux over the sensitive space between
ebb and flood. Gabriel sheared on, constrained and
sad.
She left Boldwood's side, and he walked up and
down alone for nearly a quarter of an hour. Then she
reappeared in her
<P 200>
new riding-habit of myrtle-green, which
fitted her to the waist as a rind fits its fruit; and young
Bob Coggan led -on -her mare, Boldwood fetching his
own horse from the tree under which it had been tied.
  Oak's eyes could not forsake them; and in en+
deavouring to continue his shearing at the same time
that he watched Boldwood's manner, he snipped the
sheep in the groin. The animal plunged; Bathsheba
instantly gazed towards it, and saw the blood.
"O, Gabriel!' she exclaimed, with severe remon+
strance you who are so strict with the other men -- see
what you are doing yourself!'
To an outsider there was not much to complain of
in this remark ; but to Oak, who "knew Bathsheba to be
well aware that she herself was the cause of the poor
ewe's wound, because she had wounded the ewe's shearer
in a -- still more vital part, it had a sting which the abiding
sense of his inferiority to both herself and Boldwood was
not calculated to heal. But a manly resolve to recognize
boldly that he had no longer a lover's interest in her,
helped him oceasionally to conceal a feeling.
" Bottle .! ' he shouted, in an unmoved voice of routine.
Cainy Ball ran up, the wound was anointed, and the
shearing continued.
Boldwood gently tossed Bathsheba into the saddle,
and before they turned away she again spoke out to Oak
with the same dominative and tantalizing graciousness.
"I am going now to see Mr. Boldwood's Leicesters.
Take my place in the barn, Gabriel, and keep the men
carefully to their work.'
The horses' heads were put about, and they trotted
away.
Boldwood's deep attachment was a matter of great
interest among all around him ; but, after having been
pointed out for so many years as the perfect exemplar
of thriving bachelorship, his lapse was an anticlimax
somewhat resembling that of St. John Long's death by
consumption in the midst of his proofs that it was not
a fatal disease.
<P 201>
" That means matrimony,' said Temperance Miller,
following them out of sight with her eyes.
"I reckon that's the size o't,' said Coggan, working
along without looking up.
" Well, better wed over the mixen than over the moor,'
said Laban Tall, turning his sheep.
Henery Fray spoke, exhibiting miserable eyes at the
same time: "I don't see why a maid should take a
husband when she's bold enough to fight her own
battles, and don't want a home ; for 'tis keeping another
woman out. But let it be, for 'tis a pity he and she
should trouble two houses.'
As usual with decided characters, Bathsheba invari+
ably provoked the criticism of individuals like Henery
Fray. Her emblazoned fault was to be too pronounced
in her objections, and not sufficiently overt in her
likings. We learn that it is not the rays which bodies
absorb, but those which they reject, that give them the
colours they are known by ; and win the same way people
are specialized by their dislikes and antagonisms, whilst
their goodwill is looked upon as no attribute at all.
Henery continued in a more complaisant mood : "I
once hinted my mind to her on a few things, as nearly
as a battered frame dared to do 'so to such a froward
piece. You all know, neighbours, what a man I be,
and how I come down with my powerful words when
my pride is boiling wi' scarn ?'
" We do, we do, Henery.'
" So I said, "" Mistress Everdene, there's places empty,
and there's gifted men willing ; but the spite '' -- no. not
the spite -- I didn't say spite -- ""but the villainy of the
contrarikind,'' I said (meaning womankind), "" keeps 'em
out.'' That wasn't too strong for her, say ? '
" Passably well put.'
"Yes; and I would have said it, had death and
salvation overtook me for it. Such is my spirit when I
have a mind.'
"A true man, and proud as a lucifer.'
"You see the artfulness ? Why, 'twas about being
baily really; but I didn't put it so plain that she could
understand my meaning, so I could lay it on all the
<P 202>
stronger. That was my depth .! ... However, let her
marry an she will. Perhaps 'tis high time. I believe
Farmer Boldwood kissed her behind the spear-bed at the
sheep-washing t'other day -- that I do.'
" What a lie !.' said Gabriel.
" Ah, neighbour Oak -- how'st know ? ' said, Henery,
mildly.
" Because she told me all that passed,' said Oak, with
a pharisaical sense that he was not as other shearers in
this matter.
"Ye have a right to believe it,' said Henery, with
dudgeon; "a very true right. But I mid see a little
distance into things !. To be long-headed enough for a
baily's place is a poor mere trifle -- yet a trifle more than
nothing. However, I look round upon life quite cool.
Do you heed me, neighbours ? My words, though made
as simple as I can, mid be rather deep for some heads.'
" O yes, Henery, we quite heed ye.'
" A strange old piece, goodmen -- whirled about from
here to yonder, as if I were nothing ! A little warped,
too. But I have my depths; ha, and even my great
depths ! I might gird at a certain shepherd, brain to
brain. But no -- O no !.'
" A strange old piece, ye say .! ' interposed the maltster,
in a querulous voice. "At the same time ye be no old
man worth naming -- no old man at all. Yer teeth
bain't  half  gone  yet ; and what's a old  man's standing
if se be his teeth bain't gone? Weren't I stale in
wedlock afore ye were out  of arms ? 'Tis a poor thing
to be sixty, when there's people far past four-score -- a
boast'weak as water.'
It was the unvaying custom in Weatherbury to
sink minor differences when the maltster had to be
pacified.
" Weak as-water .! yes,' said Jan Coggan.- "Malter,
we feel ye to be a wonderful veteran man, and nobody
can gainsay it.'
" Nobody,' said Joseph Poorgrass. "Ye be a very
rare old  spectacle, malter, and we all admire ye for that
gift. '
"Ay, and as a young man, when my senses were in
prosperity, I was likewise liked by a good-few who
knowed me,' said the maltster.
" 'Ithout doubt you was -- 'ithout doubt.'
The bent and hoary 'man was satisfied, and so
apparently was Henery Frag. That matters should
continue pleasant Maryann
<P 203>
spoke, who, what with her
brown complexion, and the working wrapper of rusty
linsey, had at present the mellow hue of an old sketch
in oils -- notably some of Nicholas Poussin's: --
" Do anybody know of a crooked man, or a lame, or
any second-hand fellow at all that would do for poor
me ?' said Maryann. "A perfect one I don't expect to
 at my time of life. If I could hear of such a thing
twould do me more good thantoast and ale.'
 Coggan furnished a suitable reply. Oak went on
with his shearing, and said not another word. Pestilent
moods had come, and teased away his quiet. Bathsheba
had shown indications of anointing him above his
fellows by installing him as the bailiff that the farm
imperatively required. He did not covet the post
relatively to the farm : in relation to herself, as beloved
by him and unmarried to another, he had coveted it.
His readings of her seemed now to be vapoury and
indistinct. His lecture to her was, he thought, one of
the absurdest mistakes. Far from coquetting with
Boldwood, she had trifled with himself in thus feigning
that she had trifled with another. He was inwardly
convinced that, in accordance with the anticipations of
his easy-going and worse-educated comrades, that day
would see Boldwood the accepted husband of Miss
Everdene. Gabriel at this time of his life had out+
grown the instinctive dislike which every Christian
boy has for reading the Bible, perusing it now quite
frequently, and he inwardly said, " ''I find more bitter
than death the woman whose heart is snares and
nets .! '' ' This was mere exclamation -- the froth of the
storm. He adored Bathsheba just the same.
" We workfolk shall have some lordly- junketing
to-night,' said Cainy Ball, casting forth his thoughts in
a new direction. "This morning I see'em making the
great puddens in the milking-pails -- lumps of fat as big
as yer thumb, Mister Oak ! I've never seed such
splendid large knobs of fat before in the days of my
life -- they never used to be bigger then a horse-bean.
And there was a great black crock upon the brandise
with his legs a-sticking out, but I dont know what was
in within."
'And there's two bushels of biffins for apple-pies,'
said Maryann.
<P 204>
"Well, I hope to do my duty by it all,' said Joseph
Poorgrass, in a pleasant, masticating manner of anticipa+
tion. " Yes ; victuals and drink is a cheerful thing,
and gives nerves to the nerveless, if the form of words
may be used. 'Tis the gospel of the body, without
which we perish, so to speak it.'
<C xxiii>
<P 205>
EVENTIDE -- A SECOND DECLARATION
FOR the shearing-supper a long table was placed on the
grass-plot beside the house, the end of the table being
thrust over the sill of the wide parlour window and a
foot or two into the room. Miss Everdene sat inside
the window, facing down the table. She was thus at
the head without mingling with the men.
This evening Bathsheba was unusually excited, her
red cheeks and lips contrasting lustrously with the mazy
skeins of her shadowy hair. She seemed to expect
assistance, and the seat at the bottom of the table was
at her request left vacant until after they had begun
and the duties appertaining to that end, which he did
with great readiness.
At this moment Mr. Boldwood came in at the gate,
and crossed the green to Bathsheba at the window.
He apologized for his lateness : his arrival was evidently
by arrangement.
" Gabriel,' said she, " will you move again, please,
and let Mr. Boldwood come there ?'
Oak moved in silence back to his original seat.
The gentleman-farmer was dressed in cheerful style,
in a new coat and white waistcoat, quite contrasting
with his usual sober suits of grey. Inwardy, too, he
was blithe, and consequently chatty to an exceptional
degree. So also was Bathsheba now that he had come,
though the uninvited presence of Pennyways, the bailiff
who had been dismissed for theft, disturbed her equan+
imity for a while.
Supper being ended, Coggan began on his own
private account, without reference to listeners : --
l've lost my love and l care not,
I've lost my love, and l care not;
I shall soon have another
<P 206>
That's better than t'other!
I've lost my love, and I care not.
This lyric, when concluded, was received with a
silently appreciative gaze at the table, implying that the
performance, like a work by those established authors
who are independent of notices in the papers, was a
well-known delight which required no applause.
"Now, Master Poorgass, your song!' said Coggan.
"I be all but in liquor, and the gift is wanting in
me,' said Joseph, diminishing himself.
"Nonsense; wou'st never be so ungrateful, Joseph --
never!' said Coggan, expressing hurt feelings by an
inflection of voice. "And mistress is looking hard at
ye, as much as to say, ""Sing at once, Joseph Poor+
grass.'' '
"Faith, so she is; well, I must suffer it! ... Just
eye my features, and see if the tell-tale blood overheats
me much, neighbours?'
"No, yer blushes be quite reasonable,' said Coggan.
"I always tries to keep my colours from rising when
a beauty's eyes get fixed on me,' said Joseph, differently;
"but if so be 'tis willed they do, they must.'
"Now, Joseph, your song, please,' said Bathsheba,
from the window.
"Well, really, ma'am,' he replied, in a yielding tone,
"I don't know what to say. It would be a poor plain
ballet of my own composure.'
'Hear, hear! ' said the supper-party.
Poorgrass, thus assured, trilled forth a flickering yet
commendable piece of sentiment, the tune of which
consisted of the key-note and another, the latter being
the sound chiefly dwelt upon. This was so successful
that he rashly plunged into a second in the same
breath, after a few false starts : --
I sow'-ed th'-e
I sow'-ed
I sow'-ed the'-e seeds' of love',
I-it was' all' i'-in the'-e spring',
I-in A'-pril', Ma'-ay, a'-nd sun'-ny' June',
When sma'-all bi'-irds they' do' sing.
<P 207>
" Well put out of hand,' said Coggan, at the end of the
verse. ' "" They do sing '' was a very taking paragraph.'
"Ay; and there was a pretty place at "seeds of
love,'' and 'twas well heaved out. Though "love '' is
a nasty high corner when a man's voice is getting
crazed. Next verse, Master Poorgrass.'
But during this rendering young Bob Coggan ex+
hibited one of those anomalies which will afflict little
people when other persons are particularly serious : in
trying to check his laughter, he pushed down his throat
as much of the tablecloth as he could get hold of, when,
after continuing hermetically sealed for a short time, his
mirth burst out through his nose. Joseph perceived it,
and with hectic cheeks of indignation instantly ceased
singing. Coggan boxed Bob's ears immediately.
"Go on, Joseph -- go on, and never mind the young
scamp,' said Coggan. "'Tis a very catching ballet.
Now then again -- the next bar; I'll help ye to flourish
up the shrill notes where yer wind is rather wheezy : --
O the wi'-il-lo'-ow tree' will' twist',
And the wil'-low' tre'-ee wi'ill twine'.
But the singer could not be set going again. Bob
Coggan was sent home for his ill manners, and tran+
quility was restored by Jacob Smallbury, who volunteered
a ballad as inclusive and interminable as that with which
the worthy toper old Silenus amused on a similar occasion
the swains Chromis and Mnasylus, and other jolly dogs
of his day.
It' was still the beaming time .of evening, though
night was stealthily making itself visible low down upon
the ground, the western lines of light taking the earth
without alighting upon it to any extent, or illuminating
the dead levels at all. The sun had crept round the
tree as a last effort before death, and then began to
sink, the shearers' lower parts becoming steeped in
embrowning twilight, whilst their heads and shoulders
were still enjoying day, touched with a yellow of self+
sustained brilliancy that seemed inherent rather than
acquired.
The sun went down in an ochreous mist; but they
sat, and
<P 208>
talked on, and grew as merry as the gods in
Homer's heaven. Bathsheba still remained enthroned
inside the window, and occupied herself in knitting,
from which she sometimes looked up to view the fading
scene outside. The slow twilight expanded and enveloped
them completely before the signs of moving were shown.
Gabriel suddenly missed Farmer Boldwood from his
place at the bottom of the table. How long he had
been gone Oak did not know; but he had apparently
withdrawn into the eneircling dusk. Whilst he was
thinking of this, Liddy brought candles into the back
part of the room overlooking the shearers, and their
lively new flames shone down the table and over the
men, and dispersed among the green shadows behind.
Bathsheba's form, still in its original position, was now
again distinct between their eyes and the light, which
revealed that Boldwood had gone inside the room, and
was sitting near her.
Next came the question of the evening. Would Miss
Everdene sing to them the song she always sang so
charmingly -- " The Banks of Allan Water ' -- before they
went home ?
After a moment's consideration Bathsheba assented,
beckoning to Gabriel, who hastened up into the coveted
atmosphere.
" Have you brought your flute ? " she whispered.
" Yes, miss.'
" Play to my singing, then.'
She stood up in the window-opening, facing the
men, the candles behind her, Gabriel on her right hand,
immediately outside the sash-frame. Boldwood had
drawn up on her left, within the room. Her singing
was soft and rather tremulous at first, but it soon swelled
to a steady clearness. Subsequent events caused one
of the verses to be remembered for many months, and
even years, by more than one of those who were gathered
there : --
For his bride a soldier sought her,
And a winning tongue had he :
On the banks of Allan Water
None was gay as she !.
<P 209>
In addition to the dulcet piping of Gabriel's flute,
Boldwood supplied a bass in his customary profound
voice, uttering his notes so softly, however, as to abstain
entirely from making anything like an ordinary duet of
the song ; they rather formed a rich unexplored shadow,
which threw her tones into relief. The shearers reclined
against each other as at suppers in the early ages of the
world, and so silent and absorbed were they that her
breathing could almost be heard between the bars ; and
at the end of the ballad, when the last tone loitered on
to an inexpressible close, there arose that buzz of
pleasure which is the attar of applause.
It is scarcely necessary to state that Gabriel could
not avoid noting the farmer's bearing to-night towards
their entertainer. Yet there was nothing exceptional in
his actions beyond what appertained to his time of
performing them. It was when the rest were all looking
away that Boldwood observed her ; when they regarded
her he turned aside; when they thanked or praised he
was silent; when they were inattentive he murmured
his thanks. The meaning lay in the difference between
actions, none of which had any meaning of itself;
and the necessity of being jealous, which lovers are
troubled with, did not lead Oak to underestimate these
signs.
Bathsheba then wished them good-night, withdrew
from the window, and retired to the back part of the
room, Boldwood thereupon closing the sash and the
shutters, and remaining inside with her. Oak wandered
away under the quiet and scented trees. Recovering
from the softer impressions produced by Bathsheba's
voice, the shearers rose to leave, Coggan turning to
Pennyways as he pushed back the bench to pass out : --
"I like to give praise where praise is due, and the
man deserves it -- that 'a do so,' he remarked, looking at
the worthy thief, as if he were the masterpiece of some
world-renowned artist.
<P 210>
"I'm sure I should never have believed it if we hadn t
proved it, so to allude,' hiccupped Joseph Poorgrass, " that
every cup, every one of the best knives and forks, and
every empty bottle be in their place as perfect now as
at the beginning, and not one stole at all.
"I'm sure I don't deserve half the praise you give
me,' said the virtuous thief, grimly.
" Well, I'll say this for Pennyways,' added Coggan,
"that whenever he do really make up his mind to do a
noble thing in the shape of a good action, as I could
see by his face he. did to-night afore sitting down, he's
generally able to carry it out. Yes, I'm proud to say.
neighbours, that he's stole nothing at all.
"Well,' -- 'tis an honest deed, and we thank ye for it,
Pennyways,' said Joseph; to which opinion the remainder
of the company subscribed unanimously.
  At this time of departure, when nothing more was
visible of the inside of the parlour than a thin and still
chink of light between the shutters, a passionate scene
was in eourse of enactment there.'
Miss Everdene and Boldwood were alone. Her
cheeks had lost a great deal of their healthful fire from
the very seriousness of her position ; but her eye was
bright with the excitement of a triumph -- though it was
a triumph which had rather been contemplated than
desired.
She was standing behind a low arm-chair, from which
she had just risen, and he was kneeling in it -- inclining
himself over its back towards her, and holding her hand
in both his own. His body moved restlessly, and it was
with what Keats daintily calls a too happy happiness.
This unwonted abstraction by love of all dignity from
a man of whom it had ever seemed the chief component,
was, in its distressing incongruity, a pain to her which
quenched much of the pleasure she derived from the
proof that she was idolized.
" I will try to love you,' she was saying, in a trembling
voice quite unlike her usual self-confidence. " And if I
can believe in any way that I shall make you a good
wife I shall indeed be willing to marry you. But, Mr.
Boldwood, hesitation on so high a matter is honourable
in any woman, and I don't want to give a solemn
promise to-night. I would rather ask you to wait a few
weeks till I can see my situation better.'
"But you have every reason to believe that then --  -- '
'I have every reason to hope that at the end of the
five or
<P 211>
six weeks, between this time and harvest, that
you say you are going to be away from home, I shall be
able to promise to be your wife,' she said, firmly. "But
remember this distinctly, I don't promise yet.'
"It is enough I don't ask more. I can wait on
those dear words. And now, Miss Everdene, good+
night!'
" Good-night,' she said, graciously -- almost tenderly;
and Boldwood withdrew with a serene smile.
Bathsheba knew more of him now ; he had entirely
bared his heart before her, even until he had almost
worn in her eyes the sorry look of a grand bird without
the feathers that make it grand. She had been awe+
struck at her past temerity, and was struggling to make
amends without thinking whether the sin quite deserved
the penalty she was schooling herself to pay. To have
brought all this about her ears was terrible; but after a
while the situation was not without a fearful joy. The
facility with which even the most timid woman some+
times acquire a relish for the dreadful when that is
amalgamated with a little triumph, is marvellous.
<C xxiv>
<P 212>
THE SAME NIGHT -- THE FIR PLANTATION
AMONG the multifarious duties which Bathsheba had
voluntarily imposed upon herself by dispensing with the
services of a bailiff, was the particular one of looking
round the homestead before going to bed, to see that
all was right and safe for the night. Gabriel had almost
constantly preceded her in this tour every evening,
watching her affairs as carefully as any specially appointed
officer of surveillance could have done; but this tender
devotion was to a great extent unknown to his mistress,
and as much as was known was somewhat thanklessly
received. Women are never tired of bewailing man's
fickleness in love, but they only seem to snub his con+
stancy.
As watching is best done invisibly, she usually carried
a dark lantern in her hand, and every now and then
turned on the light to examine nooks and corners with
the coolness of a metropolitan policeman. This cool+
ness may have owed its existence not so much to her
fearlessness of expected danger as to her freedom from
the suspicion of any; her worst anticipated discovery
being that a horse might not be well bedded, the fowls
not all in, or a door not closed.
This night the buildings were inspected as usual,
and she went round to the farm paddock. Here the
only sounds disturbing the stillness were steady munch+
ings of many mouths, and stentorian breathings from all
but invisible noses, ending in snores and puffs like the
blowing of bellows slowly. Then the munching would
recommence, when the lively imagination might assist
the eye to discern a group of pink-white nostrils, shaped
as caverns, and very clammy and humid on their sur+
faces, not exactly pleasant to the touch until one got
used to them; the mouths beneath having a great
partiality for closing upon any loose end of Bathsheba's
apparel which came within
<P 213>
reach of their tongues.
Above each of these a still keener vision suggested a
brown forehead and two staring though not unfriendly
eyes, and above all a pair of whitish crescent-shaped
horns like two particularly new moons, an occasional
stolid " moo!' proclaiming beyond the shade of a doubt
that these phenomena were the features and persons of
Daisy, Whitefoot, Bonny-lass, Jolly-O, Spot, Twinkle-eye,
etc., etc. -- the respectable dairy of Devon cows belonging
to Bathsheba aforesaid.
Her way back to the house was by a path through a
young plantation of tapering firs, which had been planted
some years earlier to shelter the premises from the north
wind. By reason of the density of the interwoven foliage
overhead, it was gloomy there at cloudless noontide,
twilight in the evening, dark as midnight at dusk, and
black as the ninth plague of Egypt at midnight. To
describe the spot is to call it a vast, low, naturally formed
hall, the plumy ceiling of which was supported by slender
pillars of living wood, the floor being covered with a soft
dun carpet of dead spikelets and mildewed cones, with
a tuft of grass-blades here and there.
This bit of the path was always the crux of the
night's ramble, though, before starting, her apprehen+
sions of danger were not vivid enough to lead her to
take a companion. Slipping along here covertly as
Time, Bathsheba fancied she could hear footsteps enter+
ing the track at the opposite end. It was certainly a
rustle of footsteps. Her own instantly fell as gently as
snowflakes. She reassured herself by a remembrance
that the path was public, and that the traveller was
probably some villager returning home ; regetting, at
the same time, that the meeting should be about to
occur in' the darkest point of her route, even though
only just outside her own door.
The noise approached, came close, and a figure was
apparently on the point of gliding past her when some+
thing tugged at her skirt and pinned it forcibly to the
ground. The instantaneous check nearly threw Bath+
sheba off her balance. In recovering she struck against
warm clothes and buttons.
'A rum start, upon my soul!' said a masculine voice,
a foot or so above her head. 'Have I hurt you, mate?'
"No,' said Bathsheba, attempting to shrink a way.
<P 214>
" We have got hitched together somehow, I think.'
" Yes.'
"Are you a woman ?'
'Yes.'
"A lady, I should have said.'
"It doesn't matter.'
"I am a man.'
"Oh!'
Bathsheba softly tugged again, but to no purpose.
"Is that a dark lantern you have ? I fancy so,' said
the man.
'Yes.'
"If you'll allow me I'll open it, and set you free.'
A hand seized the lantern, the door was opened, the
rays burst out from their prison, and Bathsheba beheld
her position with astonishment.
The man to whom she was hooked was brilliant in
brass and scarlet. He was a soldier. His sudden
appearance was to darkness what the sound of a trumpet
is to silense. Gloom, the genius loci at all times hitherto,
was now totally overthrown, less by the lantern-light
than by what the lantern lighted. The contrast of this
revelation with her anticipations of some sinister figure
in sombre garb was so great that it had upon her the
effect of a fairy transformation.
It was immediately apparent that the military man's
spur had become entangled in the gimp which decorated
the skirt of her dress. He caught a view of her face.
"I'll unfasten you in one moment, miss,' he said,
with new-born gallantry.
" O no -- I can do it, thank you,' she hastily replied,
and stooped for the performance.
The unfastening was not such a trifling affair. The
rowel of the spur had so wound itself among the gimp
cords in those few moments, that separation was likely
to be a matter of time.
He too stooped, and the lantern standing on the
ground betwixt them threw the gleam from its open side
among the fir-tree needles and the blades of long damp
grass with the effect of a large glowworm. It radiated
upwards into their
<P 215>
faces, and sent over half the planta+
tion gigantic shadows of both man and woman, each
dusky shape becoming distorted and mangled upon the
tree-trunks till it wasted to nothing.
He looked hard into her eyes when she raised them
for a moment; Bathsheba looked down again, for his
gaze was too strong to be received point-blank with her
own. But she had obliquely noticed that he was young
and slim, and that he wore three chevrons upon his
sleeve.
Bathsheba pulled again.
" You are a prisoner, miss; it is no use blinking the
matter,' said the soldier, drily. " I must cut your dress
if you are in such a hurry.'
" Yes -- please do!' she exclaimed, helplessly. '
"It wouldn't be necessary if you could wait a
moment;' and he unwound a cord from the little
wheel. She withdrew her own hand, but, whether by
accident or design, he touched it. Bathsheba was
vexed; she hardly knew why.
His unravelling went on, but it nevertheless seemed
coming to no end. She looked at him again.
'Thank you for the sight of such a beautiful face!'
said the young sergeant, without ceremony.
She coloured with embarrassment. "'Twas un+
willingly shown,' she replied, stiffly, and with as much
dignity -- which was very little -- as she could infuse into
a position of captivity
"I like you the better for that incivility, miss,' he
said.
" I should have liked -- I wish -- you had never shown
yourself to me by intruding here!' She pulled again,
and the gathers of her dress began to give way like
liliputian musketry.
" I deserve the chastisement your words give me.
But why should such a fair and dutiful girl have such
an aversion to her father's sex ? '
"Go on your way, please.'
' What, Beauty, and drag you after me ? Do but
look; I never saw such a tangle!'
'O, 'tis shameful of you ; you have been making
it worse on purpose to keep me here -- you have ! '
"Indeed, I don't think so,' said the sergeant, with a
merry twinkle.
<P 216>
"I tell you you have!' she exclaimed, in high
temper. I insist upon undoing it. Now, allow me!'
"Certainly, miss; I am not of steel.' He added a
sigh which had as much archness in it as a sigh could
possess without losing its nature altogether. 'I am
thankful for beauty, even when 'tis thrown to me like
a bone to a dog. These moments will be over too
soon!'
She closed her lips in a determined silence.
Bathsheba was revolving in her mind whether by a
bold and desperate rush she could free herself at the
risk of leaving her skirt bodily behind her. The
thought was too dreadful. The dress -- which she had
put on to appear stately at the supper -- was the head
and front of her wardrobe ; not another in her stock
became her so well. What woman in Bathsheba's
position, not naturally timid, and within call of her
retainers, would have bought escape from a dashing
soldier at so dear a price ?
"All in good time ; it will soon be done, I perceive,'
said her cool friend.
" This trifling provokes, and -- and --  -- '
" Not too cruel!'
" --  Insults me.!'
"It is done in order that I may have the pleasure
of apologizing to so charming a woman, which I
straightway do most humbly, madam,' he said, bowing
low.
Bathsheba really knew not what to say.
"I've seen a good many women in my time,
continued the young man in a murmur, and more
thoughtfully than hitherto, critically regarding her bent
head at the same time; "but I've never seen a woman
so beautiful as you. Take it or leave it -- be offended
or like it -- I don't care.'
" Who are you, then, who can so well afford to
despise opinion ? '
" No stranger. Sergeant Troy. I am staying in
this place. -- There ! it is undone at last, you see.
Your light fingers were more eager than mine. I wish it
had been the knot of knots, which there's no untying !. '
This was worse and worse. She started up, and so
did he.
<P 217>
How to decently get away from him -- that
was her difficulty now. She sidled off inch by inch,
the lantern in her hand, till she could see the redness
of his coat no longer.
" Ah, Beauty ; good-bye !. ' he said.
She made no reply, and, reaching a distance of
twenty or thirty yards, turned about, and ran indoors.
Liddy had just retired to rest. In ascending to her
own chamber, Bathsheba opened the girl's door an
inch or two, and, panting, said --
" Liddy, is any soldier staying in the village --
sergeant somebody -- rather gentlemanly for a sergeant,
and good looking -- a red coat with blue facings ?'
'No, miss ... No, I say; but really it might be
Sergeant Troy home on furlough, though I have not
seen him. He was here once in that way when the
regiment was at Casterbridge.'
" Yes; that's the name. Had he a moustache -- no
whiskers or beard ?'
" He had.'
" What kind of a person is he ?'
"O ! miss -- I blush to name it -- a gay man! But
I know him to be very quick and trim, who might have
made his thousands, like a squire. Such a clever
young dand as he is! He's a doctor's son by name,
which is a great deal; and he's an earl's son by
nature!'
" Which is a great deal more. Fancy! Is it true ? '
" Yes. And, he was brought up so well, and sent to
Casterbridge Grammar School for years and years.
Learnt all languages while he was there ; and it was
said he got on so far that he could take down Chinese
in shorthand ; but that I don't answer for, as it was
only reported. However, he wasted his gifted lot,
and listed a soldier; but even then he rose to be a
sergeant without trying at all. Ah! such a blessing it
is to be high-born ; nobility of blood will shine out even
in the ranks and files. And is he really come home,
miss ?"
' I believe so. Good-night, Liddy.'
After all, how could a cheerful wearer of skirts
be permanently offended with the man ? There are
occasions when girls like Bathsheba will put up with
a great deal of
<P 218>
unconventional behaviour. When they
want to be praised, which is often, when they want to
be mastered, which is sometimes ; and when they want
no nonsense, which is seldom. Just now the first
feeling was in the ascendant with Bathsheba, with a dash
of the second. Moreover, by chance or by devilry, the
ministrant was antecedently made interesting by being
a handsome stranger who had evidently seen better
days.
So she could not clearly decide whether it was her
opinion that he had insulted her or not. '
"Was ever anything so odd! ' she at last exclaimed
to herself, in her own room. "And was ever anything
so meanly done as what I did to to sulk away like that
from a man who was only civil and kind!' Clearly she
did not think his barefaced praise of her person an
insult now.
It was a fatal omission of Boldwood's that he had
never once told her she was beautiful.
<C xxv>
<P 219>
THE NEW ACQUAINTANCE DESCRIBED
IDIOSYNCRASY and vicissitude had combined to
stamp Sergeant Troy as an exceptional being.
He was a man to whom memories were an in+
cumbrance, and anticipations a superfluity. Simply
feeling, considering, and caring for what was before his
eyes, he was vulnerable only in the present. His out+
look upon time was as a transient flash of the eye now
and then : that projection of consciousness into days
gone by and to come, which makes the past a synonym
for the pathetic and the future a word for circum+
spection, was foreign to Troy. With him the past
was yesterday ; the future, to-morrow ; never, the day
after.
On this account he might, in certain lights, have
been regarded as one of the most fortunate of his
order. For it may be argued with great plausibility
that reminiscence is less an endowment than a disease,
and that expectation in its only comfortable form -- that
of absolute faith -- is practically an impossibility; whilst
in the form of hope and the secondary compounds,
patience, impatience, resolve, curiosity, it is a constant
fluctuation between pleasure and pain.
Sergeant Troy, being entirely innocent of the
practice of expectation, was never disappointed. To
set against this negative gain there may have been
some positive losses from a certain narrowing of the
higher tastes and sensations which it entailed. But
limitation of the capacity is never recognized as a loss
by the loser therefrom : in this attribute moral or
aesthetic poverty contrasts plausibly with material, since
those who suffer do not mind it, whilst those who mind
it soon cease to suffer. It is not a denial of anything
to have been always without it, and what Troy had
never enjoyed he did not miss; but, being fully
conscious that what sober
<P 220>
people missed he enjoyed,
his capacity, though really less, seemed greater than
theirs.
He was moderately truthful towards men, but to
women lied like a Cretan -- a system of ethics above all
others calculated to win popularity at the first flush of
admission into lively society ; and the possibility of the
favour gained being transitory had reference only to
the future.
He never passed the line which divides the spruce
vices from the ugly ; and hence, though his morals had
hardly been applauded, disapproval of them" had fre+
quently been tempered with a smile. This treatment
had led to his becoming a sort of regrater of other
men's gallantries, to his own aggrandizement as a
Corinthian, rather than to the moral profit of his
hearers.
His reason and his propensities had seldom any
reciprocating influence, having separated by mutual
consent long ago : thence it sometimes happened that,
while his intentions were as honourable as could be
wished, any particular deed formed a dark background
which threw them into fine relief. The sergeant's
vicious phases being the offspring of impulse, and
his virtuous phases of cool meditation, the latter
had a modest tendency to be oftener heard of than
seen.
Troy was full of activity, but his activities were less of
a locomotive than a vegetative nature ; and, never being
based upon any original choice of foundation or direc+
tion, they were exercised on whatever object chance
might place in their way. Hence, whilst he sometimes
reached the brilliant in speech because that -was
spontaneous, he fell below the commonplace in action,
from inability to guide incipient effort. He had a
quick comprehension and considerable force of char+
acter ; but, being without the power to combine them,
the comprehension became engaged with trivialities
whilst waiting for the will to direct it, and the force
wasted itself in useless grooves through unheeding the
comprehension.
He was a fairly well-educated man for one of middle
class -- exceptionally well educated for a common soldier.
He spoke fluently and unceasingly. He could in this
way be one thing and seem another : for instance, he
could speak of love and
<P 221>
think of dinner; call on the
intend to owe.
The wondrous power of flattery in passados at woman
is a perception so universal as to be remarked upon by
many people almost as automatically as they repeat a
proverb, or say that they are Christians and the like,
without thinking much of the enormous corollaries
which spring from the proposition. Still less is it acted
upon for the good of the complemental being alluded
to. With the majority such an opinion is shelved with
all those trite aphorisms which require some catastrophe
to bring their tremendous meanings thoroughly home.
When expressed with some amount of reflectiveness it
seems co-ordinate with a belief that this flattery must
be reasonable to be effective. It is to the credit of
men that few attempt to settle the question by experi+
ment, and it is for their happiness, perhaps, that accident
has never settled it for them. Nevertheless, that a
male dissembler who by deluging her with untenable
fictions charms the female wisely, may acquire powers
reaching to the extremity of perdition, is a truth taught
to many by unsought and wringing occurrences. And
some profess to have attained to the same knowledge
by experiment as aforesaid, and jauntily continue their
indulgence in such experiments with terrible effect.
Sergeant Troy was one.
He had been known to observe casually that in
dealing with womankind the only alternative to flattery
was cursing and swearing. There was no third method.
" Treat them fairly, and you are a lost man,' he would
say.
This philosopher's public appearance in Weatherbury
promptly followed his arrival there. A week or two
after the shearing, Bathsheba, feeling a nameless relief
of spirits on account of Boldwood's absence, approached
her hayfields and looked over the hedge towards the
haymakers. They consisted in about equal proportions
of gnarled and flexuous forms, the former being the
men, the latter the women, who wore tilt bonnets
covered with nankeen, which hung in a curtain upon
their shoulders. Coggan and Mark Clark were mowing
in a less forward meadow, Clark humming a tune to
the strokes of his
<P 222>
scythe, to which Jan made no attempt
to keep time with his. In the first mead they were
already loading hay, the women raking it into cocks
and windrows, and the men tossing it upon the
waggon.
From behind the waggon a bright scarlet spot
emerged, and went on loading unconcernedly with the
rest. It was the gallant sergeant, who had come hay+
making for pleasure ; and nobody could deny that he
was doing the mistress of the farm real knight-service
by this voluntary contribution of his labour at a busy
time.
As soon as she had entered the field Troy saw her,
and sticking his pitchfork into the ground and picking
up his crop or cane, he came forward. Bathsheba
blushed with half-angry embarrassment, and adjusted
her eyes as well as her feet to the direct line of her
path.
<C xxvi>
<P 223>
SCENE ON THE VERGE OF THE HAY-MEAD
'AH, Miss Everdene!' said the sergeant, touching his
diminutive cap. "Little did I think it was you I was
speaking to the other night. And yet, if I had reflected,
the "Queen of the Corn-market" (truth is truth at any
hour of the day or night, and I heard you so named in
Casterbridge yesterday), the "Queen of the Corn-market,''
I say, could be no other woman. I step across now to
beg your forgiveness a thousand times for having been
led by my feelings to express myself too strongly for a
stranger. To be sure I am no stranger to the place --
I am Sergeant Troy, as I told you, and I have assisted
your uncle in these fields no end of times when I was a
lad. I have been doing the same for you today.'
"I suppose I must thank you for that, Sergeant
Troy,' said the Queen of the Corn-market, in an in+
differently grateful tone.
The sergeant looked hurt and sad. "Indeed you
must not, Miss Everdene,' he said. " Why could you
think such a thing necessary ? '
"I am glad it is not.'
" Why ? if I may ask without offence.'
" Because I don't much want to thank you for any"
thing.'
"I am afraid I have made a hole with my tongue
that my heart will never mend. O these intolerable
times: that ill-luck should follow a man for honestly
telling a woman she is beautiful.! 'Twas the most I
said -- you must own that; and the least I could say --
that I own myself.'
'There is some talk I could do without more easily
than money.'
"Indeed. That remark is a sort of digression.'
" No. It means that I would rather have your room
than your company.'
<P 224>
"And I would rather have curses from you than
kisses from any other woman ; so I'll stay here.'
Bathsheba was absolutely speechless. And yet she
could not help feeling that the assistance he was render+
ing forbade a harsh repulse.
" Well,' continued Troy, "I suppose there is a praise
which is rudeness, and that may be mine. At the
same time there is a treatment which is injustice, and
that may be yours. Because a plain blunt man, who
has never been taught concealment, speaks out his
mind without exactly intending it, he's to be snapped
off like the son of a sinner.'
"Indeed there's no such case between us,' she said,
turning away. "I don't allow strangers to be bold and
impudent -- even in praise of me.'
" Ah -- it is not the fact but the method which offends
you,' he said, carelessly. "But I have the sad satis+
faction of knowing that my words, whether pleasing or
offensive, are unmistakably true. Would you have had
me look at you, and tell my acquaintance that you are
quite a common-place woman, to save you the embar+
rassment of being stared at if they come near you ?
Not I. I couldn't tell any such ridiculous lie about
a beauty to encourage a single woman in England in
too excessive a modesty.'
"It is all pretence -- what you are saying!' exclaimed
Bathsheba, laughing in spite of herself at the sergeant's
sly method. " You have a rare invention, Sergeant
Troy. Why couldn't you have passed by me that
night, and said nothing ? -- that was all I meant to
reproach you for.'
"Because I wasn't going to. Half the pleasure of
a feeling lies in being able to express it on the spur of
the moment, and I let out mine. It would have been
just the same if you had been the reverse person -- ugly
and old -- I should have exclaimed about it in the same
way. '
" How long is it since you have been so afflicted with
strong feeling, then ? '
" Oh, ever since I was big enough to know loveliness
from deformity.'
<P 225>
"'Tis to be hoped your sense of the difference you
speak of doesn't stop at faces, but extends to morals as
well. '
'I won't speak of morals or religion -- my own or
anybody else's. Though perhaps I should have been a
very good Christian if you pretty women hadn't made
me an idolater.'
Bathsheba moved on to hide the irrepressible dimp+
lings of merriment. Troy followed, whirling his crop.
'But -- Miss Everdene -- you do forgive me ? '
" Hardly. '
"Why ?'
" You say such things.'
"I said you were beautiful, and I'll say so still; for,
by --  so you are !. The most beautiful ever I saw, or
may I fall dead this instant! Why, upon my --  -- '
" Don't -- don't! I won't listen to you -- you are so
profane!' she said, in a restless state between distress
at hearing him and a penchant to hear more.
"I again say you are a most fascinating woman.
There's nothing remarkable in my saying so, is there?
I'm sure the fact is evident enough. Miss Everdene,
my opinion may be too forcibly let out to please you,
and, for the matter of that, too insignificant to convince
you, but surely it is honest, and why can't it be ex+
cused? '
"Because it -- it isn't a correct one,' she femininely
murmured.
" 0, fie -- fie-! Am I any worse for breaking the
third of that Terrible Ten than you for breaking the
ninth ?"
"Well, it doesn't seem quite true to me that I am
fascinating,' she replied evasively.
' Not so to you : then I say with all respect that, if
so, it is owing to your modesty, Miss Everdene. But
surely you must have been told by everybody of what
everybody notices ? and you should take their words
for it.'
" They don't say so exactly.'
" O yes, they must!'
"Well, I mean to my face, as you do,' she went on,
allowing
<P 226>
herself to be further lured into a conversation
that intention had rigorously forbidden.
"But you know they think so ?'
"No -- that is -- I certainly have heard Liddy say
they do, but --  -- ' She paused.
Capitulation -- that was the purport of the simple
reply, guarded as it was -- capitulation, unknown to her+
self. Never did a fragile tailless sentence convey a
more perfect meaning. The careless sergeant smiled
within himself, and probably too the devil smiled from
a loop-hole in Tophet, for the moment was the turning+
point of a career. Her tone and mien signified beyond
mistake that the seed which was to lift the foundation
had taken root in the chink : the remainder was a mere
question of time and natural changes.
"There the truth comes out ! ' said the soldier, in
reply. "Never tell me that a young lady can live in a
buzz of admiration without knowing something about it.
Ah,' well, Miss Everdene, you are -- pardon my blunt
way -- you are rather an injury to our race than other+
wise.
" How -- indeed ? ' she said, opening her eyes.
"O, it is true enough. I may as well be hung for
a sheep as a lamb (an old country saying, not of much
account, but it will do for a rough soldier), and so I
will speak my mind, regardless of your pleasure, and
without hoping or intending to get your pardon. Why,
Miss Everdene, it is in this manner that your good
looks may do more. harm than good in the world.'
The sergeant looked down the mead in critical abstrac+
ion. " Probably some one man on an average falls in'
love, with each ordinary woman. She can marry him :
he is content, and leads a useful life. Such women as
you a hundred men always covet -- your eyes will be+
witch scores on scores into an unavailing fancy for you
you can only marry one of that many. Out of these
say twenty will endeavour to. drown the bitterness of
espised love in drink ; twenty more will mope away
their lives without a wish or attempt to make a mark in
he world, because they have no ambition apart from
their attachment to you ; twenty more -- the susceptible
person
<P 227>
myself possibly among them -- will be always
draggling after you, getting where they may just see
you, doing desperate things. Men are such constant
fools! The rest may try to get over their passion with
more or less success. But all these men will be
saddened. And not only those ninety-nine men, but
the ninety-nine women they might have married are
saddened with them. There's my tale. That's why I
say that a woman so charming as yourself, Miss Ever+
dene, is hardly a blessing to her race.'
The handsome sergeant's features were during this
speech as rigid and stern as John Knox's in addressing
his gay young queen.
Seeing she made no reply, he said, "Do you read
French ? '
"No; I began, but when I got to the verbs, father
died,' she said simply.
'I do -- -when I have an opportunity, which latterly
has not been often (my mother was a Parisienne) -- -and
there's a proverb they have, Qui aime bien chatie bien
 -- "He chastens who loves well." Do you understand
me?
'Ah!' she replied, and there was even a little tremu+
lousness in the usually cool girl's voice; 'if you can
only fight half as winningly as you can talk, you are
able to make a pleasure of a bayonet wound!' And
then poor Bathsheba instanly perceived her slip in
making this admission: in hastily trying to retrieve it,
she went from bad to worse. 'Don't, however, suppose
that I derive any pleasure from what you tell me.'
'I know you do not -- -I know it perfectly,' said Troy,
with much hearty conviction on the exterior of his face:
and altering the expression to moodiness; 'when a
dozen men arfe ready to speak tenderly to you, and
give the admiration you deserve without adding the
warning you need, it stands to reason that my poor
rough-and-ready mixture of praise and blame cannot
convey much pleasure. Fool as I may be, I am not so
conceited as to suppose that!'
'I think you -- -are conceited, nevertheless,' said
Bathsheba, looking askance at a reed she was fitfully
pulling with one hand, having lately grown feverish
under the soldier's
<P 228>
system of procedure -- not because
the nature of his cajolery was entirely unperceived, but
because its vigour was overwelming.
'I would not own it to anybody esle -- nor do I
exactly to you. Still, there might have been some self+
conceit in my foolish supposition the other night. I
knew that what I said in admiration might be an
opinion too often forced upon you to give any pleasure
but I certainly did think that the kindness of your
nature might prevent you judging an uncontrolled
tongue harshly -- which you have done -- and thinking
badly of me and wounding me this morning, when I
am working hard to save your hay.'
'Well, you need not think more of that: perhaps you
did not mean to be rude to me by speaking out your
mind: indeed, I believe you did not,' said the shrewd
woman, in painfully innocent earnest. 'And I thank
you for giving help here. But -- -but mind you don't
speak to me again in that way, or in any other, unless
I speak to you.'
'O, Miss Bathsheba! That is to hard!'
'No, it isn't. Why is it?'
'You will never speak to me; for I shall not be
here long. I am soon going back again to the miser+
able monotony of drill -- and perhaps our regiment will
be ordered out soon. And yet you take away the one
little ewe-lamb of plaesure that I have in this dull life
of mine. Well, perhaps generosity is not a woman's
most marked characteristic.'
'When are you going from here?' she asked, with
some interest.
'In a month.'
'But how can it give you pleasure to speak to me?'
'Can you ask Miss Everdene -- knowing as you do
 -- what my offence is based on?'
'I you do care so much for a silly trifle of that
kind, then, I don't mind doing it,' she uncertainly and
doubtingly answered. 'But you can't really care for a
word from me? you only say so -- I think you only
say so.'
'that's unjust -- but I won't repeat the remark. I
am too
<P 229>
gratified to get such a mark of your friendship
at any price to cavil at the tone. I do Miss Everdene,
care for it. You may think a man foolish to want a
mere word --  just a good morning. Perhaps he is -- I
don't know. But you have never been a man looking
upon a woman, and that woman yourself.'
" Well.'
" Then you know nothing of what such an experience
is like -- and Heaven forbid that you ever should!'
"Nonsense, flatterer! What is it like? I am
interested in knowing."
"Put shortly, it is not being able to think, hear, or
look in any direction except one without wretchedness,
nor there without torture.'
" Ah, sergeant, it won't do -- you are pretending ! ' she
said, shaking her head. ' Your words are too dashing
to be true.'
"I am not, upon the honour of a soldier'
"But why is it so? -- Of course I ask for mere pas+
time.'
" Because you are so distracting -- and I am so
distracted. '
" You look like it.'
" I am indeed.'
" Why, you only saw me the other night!'
" That makes no difference. The lightning works in+
stantaneously. I loved you then, at once -- as I do now.'
Bathsheba surveyed him curiously, from the feet
upward, as high as she liked to venture her glance,
which was not quite so high as his eyes.
" You cannot and you don"t,' she said demurely.
"There is-no such sudden feeling in people. I won't
listen to you any longer. Hear me, I wish I knew what
o'clock it is -- I am going -- I have wasted too much time
here already!"
The sergeant looked at his watch and told her.
" What, haven't you a watch, miss?' he inquired.
"I have not just at present -- I am about to get a
new one.'
"No. You shall be given one. Yes -- you  shall.
A gift, Miss Everdene -- a gift."
And before she knew what the young -- man was
intending, a heavy gold watch was in her hand.
<P 230>
"It is an unusually good one for a man like me to
possess,' he quietly said. "That watch has a history.
Press the spring and open the back.'
She did so.
'What do you see?'
'A crest and a motto.'
" A coronet with five points, and beneath, Cedit amor
rebus -- "Love yields to circumstance." It's the motto
of the Earls of Severn. That watch belonged to the
last lord, and was given to my mother's husband, a
medical man, for his use till I came of age, when it was
to be given to me. It was all the fortune that ever I
inherited. That watch has regulated imperial interests
in its time -- the stately ceremonial, the courtly assigna+
tion, pompous travels, and lordly sleeps. Now it is
yours.
" But, Sergeant Troy, I cannot take this -- I cannot ! '
she exclaimed, with round-eyed wonder. " A gold watch !
What are you doing? Don't be such a dissembler!"
The sergeant retreated to avoid receiving back his
gift, which she held out persistently towards him.
Bathsheba followed as he retired.
"Keep it -- do, Miss Everdene -- keep it !' said the
erratic child of impulse. " The fact of your possessing
it makes it worth ten times as much to me. A more
plebeian one will answer my purpose just as well, and
the pleasure of knowing whose heart my old one beats
against -- well, I won't speak of that. It is in far
worthier hands than ever it has been in before.'
"But indeed I can't have it!' she said, in a perfect
simmer of distress. " O, how can you do such a thing ;
that is if you really mean it! Give me your dead
father's watch, and such a valuable one! You should
not be so reckless, indeed, Sergeant Troy!'
"I loved my father: good; but better, I love you
more. That's how I can do it,' said the sergeant, with
an intonation of such exquisite fidelity to nature that it.
was evidently not all acted now. Her beauty, which,
whilst it had been quiescent, he had praised in jest,
had in its animated phases moved him to
<P 231>
earnest; and
though his seriousness was less than she imagined, it
was probably more than he imagined himself.
Bathsheba was brimming with agitated bewilderment,
and she said, in half-suspicious accents of feeling, "Can
it be! 0, how can it be, that you care for me, and
so suddenly,! You have seen so little of me: I may
not be really so -- so nice-looking as I seem to you.
Please, do take it ; O, do! I cannot and will not have
it. Believe me, your generosity is too great. I have
never done you a single kindness, and why should you
be so kind to me?'
A factitious reply had been again upon his lips, but
it was again suspended, and he looked at her with an
arrested eye. The truth was, that as she now stood --
excited, wild, and honest as the day --  her alluring
beauty bore out so fully the epithets he had bestowed
upon it that he was quite startled at his temerity in
advancing them as false. He said mechanically, "Ah,
why ?' and continued to look at her.
"And my workfolk see me following you about the
field, and are wondering. O, this is dreadful!' she
went on, unconscious of the transmutation she was
effecting.
"I did not quite mean you to accept it at first, for it
as my one poor patent of nobility,' he broke out,
bluntly; "but, upon my soul, I wish you would now.
Without any shamming, come! Don't deny me the
happiness of wearing it for my sake ? But you are too
lovely even to care to be kind as others are.'
" No, no ; don"t say so !. I have reasons for reserve
which I cannot explain.'
" bet it be, then, let it be,' he said, receiving back
the watch at last; "I must be leaving you now. And
will you speak to me for these few weeks of my stay ? '
'Indeed I will. Yet, I don't know if I will! O,
why did you come and disturb me so !'
"Perhaps in setting a gin, I have caught myself.
Such things have happened. Well, will you let me
work in your fields ? ' he coaxed.
" Yes, I suppose so ; if it is any pleasure to you.'
" Miss Everdene, I thank you.
" No, no.'
<P 232>
'Good-bye!'
The sergeant brought his hand to the cap on the
slope of his head, saluted, and returned to the distant
group of haymakers.
Bathsheba could not face the haymakers now. Her
heart erratically flitting hither and thither from per+
plexed excitement, hot, and almost tearful, she retreated
homeward, murmuring, O, what have I done ! What
does it mean ! I wish I knew how much of it was
true!
<C xxvii>
<P 233>
HIVING THE BEES
THE Weatherbury bees were late in their swarming this
year. It was in the latter part of June, and the day after
the interview with Troy in the hayfield, that Bathsheba
was standing in her garden, watching a swarm in the
air and guessing their probable settling place. Not only
were they late this year, but unruly. Sometimes through+
out a whole season all the swarms would alight on the
lowest attainable bough -- such as part of a currant-bush
or espalier apple-tree ; next year they would, with just
the same unanimity, make straight off to the uppermost
member of some tall, gaunt costard, or quarrenden,
and there defy all invaders who did not come armed
with ladders and staves to take them.
This was the case at present. Bathsheba's eyes,
shaded by one hand, were following the ascending
multitude against the unexplorable stretch of blue till
they ultimately halted by one of the unwieldy trees
spoken of. A process somewhat analogous to that of
alleged formations of the universe, time and times ago,
was observable. The bustling swarm had swept the sky
in a scattered and uniform haze, which now thickened to
a nebulous centre: this glided on to a bough and grew
still denser, till it formed a solid black spot upon the
light.
The men and women being all busily engaged in
saving the hay -- even Liddy had left the house for the
purpose of lending a hand -- Bathsheba resolved to hive
the bees herself, if possible. She had dressed the hive
with herbs and honey, fetched a ladder, brush, and
crook, made herself impregnable with armour of leather
gloves, straw hat, and large gauze veil -- once green but
now faded to snuff colour -- and ascended a dozen rungs
of the ladder. At once she heard, not ten yards off,
a voice that was beginning to have a strange power in
agitating her.
<P 234>
"Miss Everdene, let me assist you ; you should not
attempt such a thing alone.'
Troy was just opening the garden gate.
Bathsheba flung down the brush, crook, and empty
hive, pulled the skirt of her dress tightly round her
ankles in a tremendous flurry, and as well as she could
slid down the ladder. By the time she reached the
bottom Troy was there also, and he stooped to pick
up the hive.
"How fortunate I am to have dropped in at this
moment!' exclaimed the sergeant.
She found her voice in a minute. "What! and will
you shake them in for me?' she asked, in what, for a
defiant girl, was a faltering way; though, for a timid
girl, it would have seemed a brave way enough.
" Will I ! ' said Troy. " Why, of course I will. How
blooming you are to-day ! ' Troy flung down his cane
and put his foot on the ladder to ascend.
"But you must have on the veil and gloves, or you'll
be stung fearfully!'
"Ah, yes. I must put on the veil and gloves. Will
you kindly show me how to fix them properly?'
'And you must have the broad-brimmed hat, too ;, for
your cap has no brim to keep the veil off, and they'd
reach your face.'
" The broad-brimmed hat, too, by all means.'
So a whimsical fate ordered that her hat should be
taken off -- veil and all attached -- and placed upon his
head, Troy tossing his own into a gooseberry bush.
Then the veil had to be tied at its lower edge round
his collar and the gloves put on him.
He looked such an extraordinary object in this guise
that, flurried as she was, she could not avoid laughing
outright. It was the removal of yet another stake from
the palisade of cold manners which had kept him off
Bathsheba looked on from the g:-ound whilst he was
busy sweeping and shaking the bees from the tree,
holding up the hive with the other hand for them to
fall into. She made use of an unobserved minute
whilst his attention was absorbed in the
<P 235>
operation to
arrange her plumes a little. He came down holding
the hive at arm's length, behind which trailed a cloud
of bees.
' Upon my life,' said Troy, through the veil, ' holding
up this hive makes one"s arm ache worse than a week
of sword-exercise.' When the manoeuvre was complete
he approached her. 'Would you be good enough to
untie me and let me out? I am nearly stifled inside
this silk cage.'
To hide her embarrassment during the unwonted
process of untying the string about his neck, she said : --
'I have never seen that you spoke of.'
'What ?'
'The sword-exercise.'
'Ah ! would you like to ?' said Troy.
Bathsheba hesitated. She had heard wondrous
reports from time to time by dwellers in Weatherbury,
who had by chance sojourned awhile in Casterbridge,
near the barracks, of this strange and glorious perform+
ance, tlie sword-exercise. Men and boys who had
peeped through chinks or over walls into the barrack+
yard returned with accounts of its being the most
flashing affair conceivable ; accoutrements and weapons
glistening like stars-here,there,around-yet all by rule
and compass. So she said mildly what she felt strongly.
'Yes ; I should like to see it very much.'
'And so you shall; you shall see me go through it.'
'No! How?'
'Let me consider.'
'Not with a walking-stick -- I don't care to see that.
lt must be a real sword.'
'Yes, I know; and I have no sword here; but I
think I could get one by the evening. Now, will you
do this?'
'O no, indeed !' said Bathsheba, blushing. ' Thank
you very much, but I couldn't on any account.
'Surely you might? Nobody would know.'
She shook her head, but with a weakened negation.
' If I were to,' she said, 'I must bring Liddy too. Might
I not?'
<P 236>
Troy looked far away. 'I don't see why you want
to bring her,' he said coldly.
An unconscious look of assent in Bathsheba's eyes
betrayed that something more than his coldness had
made her also feel that Liddy Would be superfluous in
the suggested scene. She had felt it, even whilst making
the proposal.
'Well, I won't bring Liddy -- and I'll come. But
only for a very short time,' she added; 'a very short
time.'
'It will not take five minutes,' said Troy.
<P 237>
<C xxviii>
THE HOLLOW AMID THE FERNS
THE hill opposite Bathsheba's dwelling extended, a
mile off, into an uncultivated tract of land, dotted at
this season with tall thickets of brake fern, plump and
diaphanous from recent rapid growth, and radiant in
hues of clear and untainted green.
At eight o'clock this midsummer evening, whilst the
bristling ball of gold in the west still swept the tips of
the ferns with its long, luxuriant rays, a soft brushing+
by of garments might have been heard among them,
and Bathsheba appeared in their midst, their soft,
feathery arms caressing her up to her shoulders. She
paused, turned, went back over the hill and half-way
to her own door, whence she cast a farewell glance upon
the spot she had just left, having resolved not to remain
near the place after all.
She saw a dim spot of artificial red moving round
the shoulder of the rise. It disappeared on the other
side.
She waited one minute -- two minutes -- thought of
Troy's disappointment at her non-fulfilment of a promised
engagement, till she again ran along the field, clambered
over the bank, and followed the original direction. She
was now literally trembling and panting at this her
temerity in such an errant undertaking; her breath
came and went quickly, and her eyes shone with an in+
frequent light. Yet go she must. She reached the
verge of a pit in the middle of the ferns. Troy stood
in the bottom, looking up towards her.
'I heard you rustling through the fern before I saw
you,' he said, coming up and giving her his hand to help
her down the slope.
The pit was a saucer-shaped concave, naturally
formed, with a top diameter of about thirty feet, and
shallow enough to allow the sunshine to reach their
heads. Standing in the
<P 238>
centre, the sky overhead was
met by a circular horizon of fern : this grew nearly to
the bottom of the slope and then abruptly ceased. The
middle within the belt of verdure was floored with a
thick flossy carpet of moss and grass intermingled, so
yielding that the foot was half-buried within it.
'Now,' said 'Troy, producing the sword, which, as he
raised it into the sunlight, gleamed a sort of greeting,
like a living thing, 'first, we have four right and four
left cuts; four right and four left thrusts. Infantry cuts
and guards are more interesting than ours, to my mind;
but they are not so swashing. They have seven cuts
and three thrusts. So much as a preliminary. Well,
next, our cut one is as if you were sowing your corn --
so.' Bathsheba saw a sort of rainbow, upside down in
the air, and Troy's arm was still again. 'Cut two, as if
you were hedging -- so. Three, as if you were reaping
 -- so.' Four, as if you were threshing -- in that way.
'Then the same on the left. The thrusts are these : one,
two, three, four, right ; one, two, three, four, left.' He
repeated them. 'Have 'em again ?' he said. 'One,
two --  -- '
She hurriedly interrupted : 'I'd rather not; though
I don't mind your twos and fours; but your ones and
threes are terrible !'
'Very well. I'll let you off the ones and threes.
Next, cuts, points and guards altogether.' Troy duly
exhibited them. 'Then there's pursuing practice, in
this way.' He gave the movements as before. 'There,
those are the stereotyped forms. The infantry have
two most diabolical upward cuts, which we are too
humane to use. Like this -- three, four.'
'How murderous and bloodthirsty !'
'They are rather deathy. Now I'll be more inter+
esting, and let you see some loose play -- giving all the
cuts and points, infantry and cavalry, quicker than
lightning, and as promiscuously -- with just enough rule
to regulate instinct and yet not to fetter it. You are
my antagonist, with this difference from real warfare,
that I shall miss you every time by one hair's breadth,
or perhaps two. Mind you don't flinch, whatever you
do.'
<P 239>
'I'll be sure not to!' she said invincibly.
He pointed to about a yard in front of him.
Bathsheba's adventurous spirit was beginning to find
some grains of relish in these highly novel proceedings.
She took up her position as directed, facing Troy.
'Now just to learn whether you have pluck enough
to let me do what I wish, I'll give you a preliminary
test.'
He flourished the sword by way of introduction
number two, and the next thing of which she was
conscious was that the point and blade of the sword
were darting with a gleam towards her left side, just
above her hip; then of their reappearance on her right
side, emerging as it were from between her ribs, having
apparently passed through her body. The third item
of consciousness was that of seeing the same sword,
perfectly clean and free from blood held vertically in
Troy's hand (in the position technically called 'recover
swords'). All was as quick as electricity.
'Oh!' she cried out in affright, pressing her hand to
her side. ' Have you run me through ? -- no, you have
not! Whatever have you done!'
'I have not touched you,' said Troy, quietly. 'It
was mere sleight of hand. The sword passed behind
you. Now you are not afraid, are you ? Because if
you are l can't perform. I give my word that l will
not only not hurt you, but not once touch you.'
'I don't think I am afraid. You are quite sure you
will not hurt me ?'
'Quite sure.'
"Is the sWord very sharp ?'
'O no -- only stand as still as a statue. Now !'
In an instant the atmosphere was transformed to
Bathsheba's eyes. Beams of light caught from the low
sun's rays, above, around, in front of her, well-nigh shut
out earth and heaven -- all emitted in the marvellous
evolutions of Troy's reflecting blade, which seemed
everywhere at once, and yet nowherre specially. These
circling gleams were accompanied by a keen rush that
was almost a whistling -- also springing
<P 240>
from all sides of
her at once. In short, she was enclosed in a firmament
of light, and of sharp hisses, resembling a sky-full of
meteors close at hand.
Never since the broadsword became the national
weapon had there been more dexterity shown in its
management than by the hands of Sergeant Troy, and
never had he been in such splendid temper for the
performance as now in the evening sunshine among the
ferns with Bathsheba. It may safely be asserted with
respect to the closeness of his cuts, that had it been
possible for the edge of the sword to leave in the air a
permanent substance wherever it flew past, the space
left untouched would have been almost a mould of
Bathsheba's figure.
Behind the luminous streams of this aurora militaris,
she could see the hue of Troy's sword arm, spread in a
scarlet haze over the space covered by its motions, like
a twanged harpstring, and behind all Troy himself,
mostly facing her; sometimes, to show the rear cuts,
half turned away, his eye nevertheless always keenly
measuring her breadth and outline, and his lips tightly
closed in sustained effort. Next, his movements lapsed
slower, and she could see them individually. The
hissing of the sword had ceased, and he stopped
entirely.
'That outer loose lock of hair wants tidying, he
said, before she had moved or spoken. 'Wait: I'll do
it for you.'
An arc of silver shone on her right side: the sword
had descended. The lock droped to the ground.
'Bravely borne!' said Troy. 'You didn't flinch a
shade's thickness. Wonderful in a woman!'
'It was because I didn't expect it. O, you have
spoilt my hair!'
'Only once more.'
'No -- no! I am afraid of you -- indeed I am !' she
cried.
'I won't touch you at all -- not even your hair. I
am only going to kill that caterpillar settling on you.
Now: still!'
It appeared that a caterpillar had come from the
fern and chosen the front of her bodice as his resting
place. She saw the point glisten towards her bosom,
and seemingly enter it. Bathsheba closed her eyes in
the full persuasion that she was
<P 241>
killed at last. How+
ever, feeling just as usual, she opened them again.
'There it is, look,' said the sargeant, holding his
sword before her eyes.
The caterpillar was spitted upon its point.
'Why, it is magic!' said Bathsheba, amazed.
'O no -- dexterity. I merely gave point to your
bosom where the caterpillar was, and instead of running
you through checked the extension a thousandth of an
inch short of your surface.'
'But how could you chop off a curl of my hair with
a sword that has no edge?'
THE HOLLOW AMID THE FERNS
"No edge .! This sword will shave like a razor.
Look here.'
He touched the palm of his hand with the blade,
and then, lifting it, showed her a thin shaving of scarf+
skin dangling therefrom.
" But you said before beginning that it was blunt and
couldn't cut me .!'
'That was to get you to stand still, and so make sure
of your safety. The risk of injuring you through your
moving was too great not to force me to tell you a
fib to escape it.'
She shuddered. 'I have been within an inch of my
life, and didn't know it! '
'More precisely speaking, you have been within half
an inch of being pared alive two hundred and ninety-five
tinies.'
" Cruel, cruel, 'tis of you !. '
" You have been perfectly safe, nevertheless. My
sword never errs.' And Troy returned the weapon to
the scabbard.
Bathsheba, overcome by a hundred tumultuous feel'
ings resulting from the scene, abstractedly sat down on
a tuft of heather.
'I must leave you now,' said Troy, softly. " And I'll
venture to take and keep this in remembrance of you.'
She saw him stoop to the grass, pick up the winding
lock which he had severcd from her manifold tresses,
twist it round his fingers, unfasten a button in the hreast
of his coat, and carefully put it inside. She felt power+
less to withstand or deny him. He was altogether too
much for her, and Bathsheba
<P 242>
seemed as one who, facing
a reviving wind, finds it blow so strongly that it stops
the breath.
He drew near and said, 'I must be leaving you.'
He drew nearer still. A minute later and she saw his
scarlet form disappear amid the ferny thicket, almost in
a flash, like a brand swiftly waved.
That minute's interval had brought the blood beating
into her face, set her stinging as if aflame to the very
hollows oi her feet, and enlarged emotion to a compass
which quite swamped thought. It had brought upon
her a stroke resulting, as did that of Moses in Horeh, in
a liquid stream -- here a stream of tears. She felt like
one who has sinned a great sin.
The circumstance had been the gentle dip of Troy's
mouth downwards upon her own. He had kissed her,
PARTICULARS OF A TWILIGHT WALK
<C xxix>
<P 243>
PARTICULARS OF A TWILIGHT WALK
WE now see the element of folly distinctly mingling
with the many varying particulars which made up the
character of Bathsheba Everdene. It was almost foreign
to her intrinsic nature. Introduced as lymph on the
dart of Eros, it eventually permeated and coloured
her whole constitution. Bathsheba, though she had too
much understanding to be entirely governed by her
womanliness, had too much womanliness to use her
understanding to the best advantage. Perhaps in no
minor point does woman astonish her helpmate more
than in the strange power she possesses of believing
cajoleries that she knows to be false -- except, indeed, in
that of being utterly sceptical on strictures that she
knows to be true.
Bathsheba loved Troy in the way that only self-reliant
women love when they abandon their self-reliance.
When a strong woman recklessly throws away her
strength she is worse than a weak woman who has never
had any strength to throw away. One source of her
inadequacy is the novelty of the occasion. She has
never had practice in making the best of such a
condition. Weakness is doubly weak by being new.
Bathsheba was not conscious of guile in this matter.
Though in one sense a woman of the world, it was, after
all, that world of daylight coteries and green carpets
wherein cattle form the passing crowd and winds the
busy hum ; where a quiet family of rabbits or hares lives
on the other side of your party-wall, where your neigh+
bour is everybody in the tything, and where calculation
formulated self-indulgence of bad, nothing at all. Had
her utmost thoughts in this direction been distinctly
worded (and by herself they never were), they would
<P 244>
only have amounted to such a matter as that she felt
her impulses to be pleasanter guides than her discretion .
Her love was entire as a child's, and though warm as
summer it was fresh as spring. Her culpability lay in
her making no attempt to control feeling by subtle and
careful inquiry into consuences. She could show others
the steep and thorny way, but 'reck'd not her own rede,'
And Troy's deformities lay deep down from a
woman's vision, whilst his embellishments were upon
the verysurface; thus contrasting with homely Oak,
whose defects were patent to the blindest, and whose
vertues were as metals in a mine.
The difference between love and respect was mark+
edly shown in her conduct. Bathsheba had spoken of
her interest in Boldwood with the greatest freedom to
Liddy, but she had only communed with her own heart
concerning 'Troy'.
All this infatuation Gabriel saw, and was troubled
thereby from the time of his daily journey a-field to the
time of his return, and on to the small hours of many a
night. That he was not beloved had hitherto been his
great that Bathsheba was getting into the toils
was now a sorrow greater than the first, and one which
nearly olbscured it. It was a result which paralleled
the oft-quoted observation of Hippocrates concerning
physical pains.
That is a noble though perhaps an unpromising love
PARTICULARS OF A TWILlGHT WALK
which not even the fear of breeding aversion in the
bosom of the one beloved can deter from combating his
or her errors. Oak determined to speak to his mistress.
He would base his appeal on what he considered her
unfair treatment of Farmer Boldwood, now absent from
home.
An opportunity occurred one evening when she had
gone for a short walk by a path through the neighbour+
ing cornfields. It was dusk when Oak, who had not
been far a-field that day, took the same path and met
her returning, quite pensively, as he thought.
The wheat was now tall, and the path was narrow;
thus the way was quite a sunken groove between the
embowing thicket on either side. Two persons could
not walk abreast
<P 245>
without damaging the crop, and Oak
stood aside to let her pass.
'Oh, is it Gabriel?' she said. 'You are taking a
walk too. Good-night.'
"I thought I would come to meet you, as it is rather
late," said Oak, turning and following at her heels when
she had brushed somewhat quickly by him.
"Thank you, indeed, but I am not very fearful.'
" O no ; but there are bad characters about.'
"I never meet them.'
Now Oak, with marvellous ingenuity, had been going
to introduce the gallant sergeant through the channel of
"bad characters.' But all at once the scheme broke
down, it suddenly occurring to him that this was rather a
clumsy way, and too barefaced to begin with. He tried
another preamble.
"And as the man who would naturally come to meet
you is away from home, too -- I mean Farmer Boldwood
 -- why, thinks I, I'll go,' he said.
"Ah, yes.' She walked on without turning her head,
and for many steps nothing further was heard from her
quarter than the rustle of her dress against the heavy
corn-ears. Then she resumed rather tartly --
'I don't quite understand what you meant by saying
that Mr. Boldwood would naturally come to meet me.'
I meant on account of the wedding which they say
is likely to take place between you and him, miss. For+
give my speaking plainly.'
"They say what is not true,' she returned quickly.
No marriage is likely to take place between us.'
Gabriel now put forth his unobscured opinion, for
the moment had come. " Well, Miss Everdene,' he
said, "putting aside what people say, I never in my life
saw any courting if his is not a courting of you."
Bathsheba would probably have terminated the con'
versation there and then by flatly forbidding the subject,
had not her conscious weakness of position allured her
to palter and argue in endeavours to better it.
<P 246>
"Since this subject has been mentioned,' she said
very emphatically, 'I am glad of the opportunity of
clearing up a mistake which is very common and very
provoking. I didn't definitely promise Mr. Boldwood
anything. I have never cared for him. I respect him,
and he has urged me to marry him. But I have given
him no distinct answer. As soon as he returns I shall
do so; and the answer will be that I cannot think of
marrying him.'
'People are full of mistakes, seemingly.'
' They are.'
The other day they said you were trifling with him,
and you almost proved that you were not; lately they
have said that you be not, and you straightway begin
to show --  -- '
That I am, I suppose you mean.'
' Well, I hope they speak the truth.'
They do, but wrongly applied. I don't trifle with
him ; but then, I have nothing to do with him.'
Oak was unfortunately led on to speak of Boldwood's
rival in a wrong tone to her after all. 'I wish you had
never met that young Sergeant Troy, miss,' he sighed.
PARTlCULARS OF A TWILIGHT WALK
Bathsheba's steps became faintly spasmodic. " Why?'
she asked.
' He is not good enough for 'ee.'
"Did any one tell you to speak to me like this ?'
" Nobody at all.'
"Then it appears to me that Sergeant Troy does not
concern us here,' she said, intractably. ' Yet I must say
that Sergeant 'Troy is an educated man, and quite worthy
of any woman. He is well born.'
"His being higher in learning and birth than the
ruck o' soldiers is anything but a proof of his worth. It
show's his course to be down'ard.'
"I cannot see what this has to do with our conversa+
tion. Mr. Troy's course is not by any means downward;
and his superiority <1is>1 a proof of his worth .! '
"I believe him to have no conscience at all. And I
cannot help begging you, miss, to have nothing to do
with him. Listen to me this once -- only this once !.
I don't say he's such
<P 247>
a bad man as I have fancied -- I
pray to God he is not. But since we don't exactly
know what he is, why not behave as if he <1might>1 be bad,
simply for your own safety ? Don't trust him, mistress;
I ask you not to trust him so.'
" Why, pray ? '
"I like soldiers, but this one I do not like,' he said,
sturdily. " His cleverness in his calling may have
tempted him astray, and what is mirth to the neighbours
is ruin to the woman. When he tries to talk to 'ee again,
why not turn away with a short 'Good day' ; and when
you see him coming one way, turn the other. When
he says anything laughable, fail to see the point
and don't smile, and speak of him before those who will
report your talk as "that fantastical man,' or " that
Sergeant What's-his-name." "That man of a family
that has come to the dogs.' Don't be unmannerly
towards en, but harmless-uncivil, and so get rid of the
man.'
No Christmas robin detained by a window-pane ever
pulsed as did Bathsheba now.
I say -- I say again -- that it doesn't become you to
talk about him. Why he should be mentioned passes
me quite . she exclaimed desperately. " I know this,
th-th-that he is a thoroughly conscientious man -- blunt
sometimes even to rudeness -- but always speaking his
mind about you plain to your face .! '
"Oh.'
"He is as good as anybody in this parish.! He is
very particular, too, about going to church -- yes, he
is.!'
'I am afraid nobody saw him there. I never
did certainly.'
' The reason of that is,' she said eagerly, " that he goes
in privately by the old tower door, just when the service
commences, and sits at the back of the gallery. He
told me so.'
This supreme instance of Troy's goodness fell upon
Gabriel ears like the thirteenth stroke of crazy clock.
It was not only received with utter incredulity as re+
garded itself, but threw a doubt on all the assurances
that had preceded it.
Oak was grieved to find how entirely she trusted him.
He brimmed with deep feeling as he replied in a steady
voice, the
<P 248>
steadiness of which was spoilt by the palpable+
ness of his great effort to keep it so : --
' You know, mistress, that I love you, and shall love
you always. I only mention this to bring to your mind
that at any rate I would wish to do you no harm :
beyond that I put it aside. I have lost in the race for
money and good things, and I am not such a fool as to
pretend to 'ee now I am poor, and you have got alto+
gether above me. But Bathsheba, dear mistress, this
I beg you to consider -- that, both to keep yourself well
honoured among the workfolk, and in common generosity
to an honourable man who loves you as well as I, you
PARTICULARS OF A TWILIGHT WALK
should be more discreet in your bearing towards this
soldier.'
" Don't, don't, don't !. ' she exclaimed, in a choking
voice.
"Are ye not more to me than my own affairs, and
even life .! ' he went on. "Come, listen to me.! I am
six years older than you, and Mr. Boldwood is ten years
older than I, and consider -- I do beg of 'ee to consider
before it is too late -- how safe you would be in his
hands .! '
Oak's allusion to his own love for her lessened, to
some extent, her anger at his interference ; but she
could not really forgive him for letting his wish to marry
her be eclipsed by his wish to do her good, any more
than for his slighting treatment of Troy.
"I wish you to go elsewhere,' she commanded, a
paleness of face invisible to the eye being suggested by
the trembling words. " Do not remain on this farm any
longer. I don't want you -- I beg you to go !.'
"That's nonsense,' said Oak, calmly. " This is the
second time you have pretended to dismiss me; and
what's the use o' it?'
" Pretended !. You shall go, sir -- your lecturing I
will not hear .! I am mistress here.'
" Go, indeed -- what folly will you say next ? Treating
me like Dick, Tom and Harry when you know that a
short time ago my position was as good as yours !. Upon
my life, Bathsheba, it is too barefaced. You know, too,
that I can't go without putting things in such a strait as
you wouldn't get out of
<P 249>
I can't tell when. Unless, indeed,
you'll promise to have an understanding man as bailiff,
or manager, or something. I'll go at once if you'll
promise that.'
'I shall have no bailiff; I shall continue to be my
own manager,' she said decisively.
"Very well, then ; you should be thankful to me for
biding. How would the farm go on with nobody to
mind it but a woman? But mind this, I don't wish
'ee to feel you owe me anything. Not I. What I do,
I do. Sometimes I say I should be as glad as a bird to
leave the place -- for don't suppose I'm content to be a
nobody. I was made for better things. However, I
don't like to see your concerns going to ruin, as they
must if you keep in this mind.... I hate taking my
own measure so plain, but, upon my life, your provok+
ing ways make a man say what he wouldn't dream of
at other times ! I own to being rather interfering. But
you know well enough how it is, and who she is that I
like too well, and feel too much like a fool about to be
civil to her ! '
It is more than probable that she privately and un+
consciously respected him a little for this grim fidelity,
which had been shown in his tone even more than in
his words. At any rate she murmured something to the
effect that he might stay if he wished. She said more
distinctly, " Will you leave me alone now? I don't
order it as a mistress -- I ask it as a woman, and I
expect you not to be so uncourteous as to refuse.'
" Certainly I will, Miss Everdene,' said Gabriel, gently.
He wondered that the request should have come at this
moment, for the strife was over, and they were on a
most desolate hill, far from every human habitation, and
the hour was getting late. He stood still and allowed
her to get far ahead of him till he could only see her
form upon the sky.
A distressing explanation of this anxiety to be rid of
him at that point now ensued. A figure apparently rose
from the earth beside her. The shape beyond all doubt
was Troy's. Oak would not be even a possible listener,
and at once turned back till a good two hundred yards
were between the lovers and himself.
<P 250>
Gabriel went home by way of the churchyard. In
passing the tower he thought of what she had said about
the sergeant's virtuous habit of entering the church un+
PARTICULARS OF A TWILIGHT WALK
perceived at the beginning of service. Believing that
the little gallery door alluded to was quite disused, he
ascended the external flight of steps at the top of which
it stood, and examined it. The pale lustre yet hanging
in the north-western heaven was sufficient to show that
a sprig of ivy had grown from the wall across the door
to a length of more than a foot, delicately tying the
panel to the stone jamb. It was a decisive proof that
the door had not been opened at least since Troy came
back to Weatherbury.
<C xxx>
<P 251>
HOT CHEEKS AND TEARFUL EYES
HALF an hour later Bathsheba entered her own house.
There burnt upon her face when she met the light of
the candles the flush and excitement which were little
less than chronic with her now. The farewell words of
Troy, who had accompanied her to the very door, still
lingered in her ears. He had bidden her adieu for two
days, which were so he stated, to be spent at Bath in
visiting some friends. He had also kissed her a second
time.
It is only fair to Bathsheba to explain here a little
fact which did not come to light till a long time after+
wards : that Troy's presentation of himself so aptly at
the roadside this evening was not by any distinctly pre+
concerted arrangement. He had hinted -- she had
forbidden; and it was only on the chance of his still
coming that she had dismissed Oak, fearing a meeting
between them just then.
She now sank down into a chair, wild and perturbed
by all these new and fevering sequences. Then she
jumped up with a manner of decision, and fetched her
desk from a side tahle.
In three minutes, without pause or modification, she
had written a letter to Boldwood, at his address beyond
Casterbridge, saying mildly but firmly that she had well
HOT CHEEKS AND TEARFUL EYES
considered the whole subject he had brought before her
and kindly given her time to decide upon; that her
final decision was that she could not marry him. She
had expressed to Oak an intention to wait till Boldwood
came home before communicating to him her conclusive
reply. But Bathsheba found that she could not wait.
It was impossible to send this letter till the next day;
yet to quell her uneasiness by getting it out of her hands,
and so, as it were, setting the act in motion at once, she
arose to take it to any one of the women who might be
in the kitchen.
<P 252>
She paused in the passage. A dialogue was going
on in the kitchen, and Bathsheba and Troy were the
subject of it.
"If he marry her, she'll gie up farming.'
"Twill be a gallant life, but may bring some trouble
between the mirth -- so say I.'
"Well, I wish I had half such a husband.'
Bathsheba had too much sense to mind seriously
what her servitors said about her ; but too much womanly
redundance of speech to leave alone what was said till
it died the natural death of unminded things. She
burst in upon them.
"Who are you speaking of? ' she asked.
There was a pause before anybody replied. At last
Liddy said frankly, ' What was passing was a bit of a
word about yourself, miss.'
"I thought so .! Maryann and Liddy and Temper+
ance -- now I forbid you to suppose such things. You
know I don't care the least for Mr. Troy -- not I. Every+
body knows how much I hate him. -- Yes,' repeated the
froward young person, "<1hate>1 him .! '
" We know you do, miss,' said Liddy; "and so do we
all.'
" I hate him too,' said Maryann.
" Maryann -- O you perjured woman !. How can you
speak that wicked story ! ' said Bathsheba, excitedly.
"You admired him from your heart only this morning
in the very world, you did. Yes, Maryann, you know it ! '
'Yes, miss, but so did you. He is a wild scamp
now, and you are right to hate him."
"He's <1not>1 a wild scamp.! How dare you to my face !.
I have no right to hate him, nor you, nor anybody.
But I am a silly woman.! What is it to me what he is ?
You know it is nothing. I don't care for him ; I don"t
mean to defend his good name, not I. Mind this, if
any of you say a word against him you'll be dismissed
instantly !. '
She flung down the letter and surged back into the
parlour, with a big heart and tearful eyes, Liddy following
her.
'O miss.!' said mild Liddy, looking pitifully into
Bathsheba's face. "I am sorry we mistook you so .!
did think you cared for him; but I see you don't now.'
" Shut the door, Liddy.'
<P 253>
Liddy closed the door, and went on : ' People always
say such foolery, miss. I'll make answer hencefor'ard,
"Of course a lady like Miss Everdene can't love him;'
I'll say it out in plain black and white.'
Bathsheba burst out : 'O Liddy, are you such a
simpleton ? Can't you read riddles ? Can't you see?
Are you a woman yourself ? '
Liddy's clear eyes rounded with wonderment.
' Yes; you must be a blind thing, Liddy .! ' she said,
in reckless abandonment and grief. "O, I love him
to very distraction and misery and agony .! Don't be
frightened at me, though perhaps I am enough to frighten
any innocent woman. Come closer -- closer.' She put
her arms round Liddy's neck. "I must let it out to
somebody; it is wearing me away !. Don't you yet know
enough of me to see through that miserable denial of
mine? O God, what a lie it was !. Heaven and my
Love forgive me. And don't you know that a woman
who loves at all thinks nothing of perjury when it is
HOT CHEEKS AND TEARFUL EYES
balanced against her love ? There, go out of the room ;
I want to be quite alone.'
Liddy went towards the door.
' Liddy, come here. Solemnly swear to me that he's
not a fast man; that it is all lies they say about him !.'
'Put, miss, how can I say he is not if --  -- '
"You graceless girl.! How can you have the cruel
heart to repeat what they say? Unfeeling thing that
you are.... But <1I'll>1 see if you or anybody else in the
village, or town either, dare do such a thing .! ' She
started off, pacing from fireplace to door, and back
again.
"No, miss. I don't -- I know it is not true !. ' said
Liddy, frightened at Bathsheba's unwonted vehemence.
I suppose you only agree with me like that to please
me. But, Liddy, he <1cannot be>1 had, as is said. Do you
hear? "
' Yes, miss, yes.'
"And you don't believe he is?"
'I don't know what to say, miss,' said Liddy, be+
ginning to cry. "If I say No, you don"t believe me;
and if I say Yes, you rage at me ! '
" Say you don't believe it -- say you don't ! '
<P 254>
'I don't believe him to be so had as they make out.'
"He is not had at all.... My poor life and heart,
how weak I am .! ' she moaned, in a relaxed, desultory
way, heedless of Liddy's presence. "O, how I wish I
had never seen him.! Loving is misery for women
always. I shall never forgive God for making me a
woman, and dearly am I beginning to pay for the honour
of owning a pretty face.' She freshened and turned to
Liddy suddenly. " Mind this, Lydia Smallbury, if you
repeat anywhere a single word of what l have said to
you inside this closed door, I'll never trust you, or love
you, or have you with me a moment longer -- not a
moment ! '
" I don't want to repeat anything,' said Liddy, with
womanly dignity of a diminutive order; "but I don't
wish to stay with you. And, if you please, I'll go at the
end of the harvest, or this week, or to-day.... I don't
see that I deserve to be put upon and stormed at for
nothing ! ' concluded the small woman, bigly.
" No, no, Liddy ; you must stay ! ' said Bathsheba,
dropping from haughtiness to entreaty with capricious
inconsequence. "You must not notice my being in a
taking just now. You are not as a servant -- -you are a
companion to me. Dear, dear -- I don't know what I
am doing since this miserable ache o'! my heart has
weighted and worn upon me so .! What shall I come
to ! I suppose I shall get further and further into
troubles. I wonder sometimes if I am doomed to die
in the Union. I am friendless enough, God knows .! '
'I won't notice anything, nor will I leave you ! " sobbed
Liddy, impulsively putting up her lips to Bathsheba's,
and kissing her.
Then Bathsheba kissed Liddy, and all was smooth
again.
"I don't often cry, do I, Lidd ? but you have made
tears come into my eyes,' she said, a smile shining
through the moisture. "Try to think him a good man,
won't you, dear Liddy ? '
"I will, miss, indeed.'
"He is a sort of steady man in a wild way, you know.
way. I am afraid that's how I am. And promise me
to keep my secret -- do, Liddy.! And do not let them
know that I have been crying
<P 255>
about him, because it will
be dreadful for me, and no good to him, poor thing .!'
"Death's head himself shan't wring it from me, mistress,
if I've a mind to keep anything; and I'll always be your
friend,' replied Liddy, emphatically, at the same time
bringing a few more tears into her own eyes, not from
any particular necessity, but from an artistic sense of
making herself in keeping with the remainder of the
HOT CHEEKS AND TEARFUL EYES
picture, which seems to influence women at such times.
"I think God likes us to be good friends, don't you ?'
"Indeed I do.'
"And, dear miss, you won"t harry me and storm at
me, will you ? because you seem to swell so tall as a
lion then, and it frightens me !. Do you know, I fancy
you would be a match for any man when you are in one
0' your takings.'
"Never.! do you ? ' said Bathsheba, slightly laughing,
though somewhat seriously alarmed by this Amazonian
picture of herself. "I hope I am not a bold sort of
maid -- mannish ? ' she continued with some anxiety.
"O no, not mannish; but so almighty womanish
that 'tis getting on that way sometimes. Ah ! miss,' she
said, after having drawn her breath very sadly in and
sent it very sadly out, "I wish I had half your failing
that way. 'Tis a great protection to a poor maid in
these illegit'mate days !. '
<C xxxi>
<P 256>
BLAME -- FURY
THE next evening Bathsheba, with the idea of getting
out of the way of Mr. Boldwood in the event of his
returning to answer her note in person, proceeded to
fulfil an engagement made with Liddy some few hours
earlier. Bathsheba's companion, as a gage of their
reconciliation, had heen granted a week's holiday to
visit her sister, who was married to a thriving hurdler
and cattle-crib-maker living in a delightful labyrinth of
hazel copse not far beyond Yalbury. The arrangement
was that Miss Everdene should honour them by coming
there for a day or two to inspect some ingenious con+
tnvances which this man of the woods had introduced
into his wares.
Leaving her instructions with Gabriel and Maryann,
that they were to see everything carefully locked up for
the night, she went out of the house just at the close of
a timely thunder-shower, which had refined the air, and
daintily bathed the coat of the land, though all beneath
was dry as ever. Freshness was exhaled in an essence
from the varied contours of bank and hollow, as if the
earth breathed maiden breath; and the pleased birds
were hymning to the scene. Before her, among the
clouds, there was a contrast in the shape of lairs of
fierce light which showed themselves in the neighbour+
hood of a hidden sun, lingering on to the farthest north+
west corner of the heavens that this midsummer season
allowed.
She had walked nearly two miles of her journey,
watching how the day was retreating, and thinking how
the time of deeds was quietly melting into the time of
thought, to give place in its turn to the time of prayer
and sleep, when she beheld advancing over Yalbury hill
the very man she sought so anxiously to elude. Boldwood
was stepping on, not with that quiet tread of reserved
strength which was his customary
<P 257>
gait, in which he
always seemed to be balancing two thoughts. His
manner was stunned and sluggish now.
Boldwood had for the first time been awakened to
woman's privileges in tergiversation even when it involves
another person's possible blight. That Bathsheba was
a firm and positive girl, far less inconsequent than her
fellows, had been the very lung of his hope ; for he had
held that these qualities would lead her to adhere to a
straight course for consistency's sake, and accept him,
though her fancy might not flood him with the iridescent
hues of uncritical love. But the argument now came
back as sorry gleams from a broken mirror. The dis+
covery was no less a scourge than a surprise.
He came on looking upon the ground, and did not
see Bathsheba till they were less than a stone's throw
apart. He looked up at the sound of her pit-pat, and
his changed appearance sufficiently denoted to her the
depth and strength of the feelings paralyzed by her
letter.
" Oh ; is it you, Mr. Boldwood ? ' she faltered, a guilty
warmth pulsing in her face.
Those who have the power of reproaching in silence
may find it a means more effective than words. There
are accents in the eye which are not on the tongue, and
more tales come from pale lips than can enter an ear.
It is both the grandeur and the pain of the remoter
moods that they avoid the pathway of sound. Bold+
wood's look was unanswerable.
Seeing she turned a little aside, he said, 'What, are
you afraid of me?'
" Why should you say that ? ' said Bathsheba.
"I fancied you looked so,' said he. 'And it is most
strange, because of its contrast with my feeling for you.
She regained self-possession, fixed her eyes calmly,
and waited.
" You know what that feeling is,' continued Boldwood,
deliberately. "A thing strong as death. No dismissal
by a hasty letter affects that.'
'I wish you did not feel so strongly about me,' she
murmured. "It is generous of you, and more than I
deserve, but I must not hear it now.'
<P 258>
"Hear it? What do you think I have to say, then ?
I am not to marry you, and thats enough. Your letter
was excellently plain. I want you to hear nothing --
not I.'
Bathsheba was unable to direct her will into any
definite groove for freeing herself from this fearfully
and was moving on. Boldwood walked up to her heavily
and dully.
"Bathsheba -- -darling -- -is it final indeed?'
"Indeed it is.'
"O, Bathsheba -- -have pity upon me!' Boldwood
burst out. "God's sake, yes -- I am come to that low,
lowest stage -- -to ask a woman for pity! Still, she is
you -- -she is you.'
Bathsheba commanded herself well. But she could
hardly get a clear voice for what came instinctively to
her lips: "There is little honour to the woman in that
speech.' It was only whispered, for something unutter+
ably mournful no less than distressing in this spectacle
of a man showing himself to be so entirely the vane of a
passion enervated the feminine instinct for punctilios.
BLAME
"I am beyond myself about this, and am mad,' he
said. "I am no stoic at all to he supplicating here ; but
I do supplicate to you. I wish you knew what is in
me of devotion to you ; but it is impossible, that. In
bare human mercy to a lonely man, don't throw me off
now !'
'I don't throw you off -- indeed, how can I ? I never
had you.' In her noon-clear sense that she had never
loved him she forgot for a moment her thoughtless angle
on that day in February.
'But there was a time when you turned to me,
before I thought of you ! I don't reproach you, for
even now I feel that the ignorant and cold darkness
that I should have lived in if you had not attracted me
by that letter -- valentine you call it -- would have becn
worse than my knowledge of you, though it has brought
this misery. But, I say, there was a time when I knew
nothing of you, and cared nothing for you, and yet you
drew me on. And if you say you gave me no en+
couragement, I cannot but contradict you.'
<P 259>
"What you call encouragement was the childish
game of an idle minute. I have bitterly repented of it
 -- ay, bitterly, and in tears. Can you still go on re+
minding me ?'
'I don't accuse you of it -- I deplore it. I took for
earnest what you insist was jest, and now this that I
pray to be jest you say is awful, wretched earnest. Our
moods meet at wrong places. I wish your feeling was
more like mine, or my feeling more like yours.! O,
could I but have foreseen the torture that trifling trick
was going to lead me into, how I should have cursed
you ; but only having been able to see it since, I cannot
do that, for I love you too well.! But it is weak, idle
drivelling to go on like this.... Bathsheba, you are
the first woman of any shade or nature that I have ever
looked at to love, and it is the having been so near
claiming you for my own that makes this denial so hard
to bear. How nearly you promised me ! But I don't
speak now to move your heart, and make you grieve
because of my pain ; it is no use, that. I must bear it;
my pain would get no less by paining you.'
"But I do pity you -- deeply -- O so deeply .!' she
earnestly said.
"Do no such thing -- do no such thing. Your dear
love, Bathsheba, is such a vast thing beside your pity,
that the loss of your pity as well as your love is no great
addition to my sorrow, nor does the gain of your pity
make it sensibly less. O sweet -- how dearly you
spoke to me behind the spear-bed at the washing-pool,
and in the barn at the shearing, and that dearest last
time in the evening at your home.! Where are your
pleasant words all gone -- your earnest hope to be able
to love me? Where is your firm conviction that you
would get to care for me very much ? Really forgotten ?
 -- really ? '
She checked emotion, looked him quietly and clearly
in the face, and said in her low, firm voice, " Mr. Bold+
wood, I promised you nothing. Would you have had
me a woman of clay when you paid me that furthest,
highest compliment a man can pay a woman -- telling
her he loves her? I was bound to show some feeling,
if l would not be a graceless shrew. Yet each of those
pleasures was just for the day -- the day just for the
<P 260>
pleasure. How was I to know that what is a pastime
to all other men was death to you ? Have reason, do,
and think more kindly of me !'
'Well, never mind arguing -- never mind. One
thing is sure: you were all but mine, and now you are
not nearly mine. Everything is changed, and that by
you alone, remember. You were nothing to me once,
and I was contented; you are now nothing to me again,
and how different the second nothing is from the first .!
Would to God you had never taken me up, since it was
only to throw me down .! '
FURY
Bathsheba, in spite of her mettle, began to feel un+
mistakable signs that she was inherently the weaker
vessel. She strove miserably against this feminity
which would insist upon supplying unbidden emotions
in stronger and stronger current. She had tried to
elude agitation by fixing her mind on the trees, sky, any
trivial object before her eyes, whilst his reproaches fell,
but ingenuity could not save her now.
"I did not take you up -- -surely I did not!' she
answered as heroically as she could. " But don't be in
this mood with me. I can endure being told I am in
the wrong, if you will only tell it me gently! O sir,
will you not kindly forgive me, and look at it
cheerfully ? '
"Cheerfully! Can a man fooled to utter heart+
burning find a reason for being merry> If I have lost,
how can I be as if I had won? Heavens you must be
heartless quite ! Had I known what a fearfully bitter
sweet this was to be, how would I have avoided you,
and never seen you, and been deaf of you. I tell you
all this, but what do you care! You don't care.'
She returned silent and weak denials to his charges,
and swayed her head desperately, as if to thrust away
the words as they came showering ahout her ears from
the lips of the trembling man in the climax of life, with
his bronzed Roman face and fine frame.
"Dearest, dearest, I am wavering even now between
the two opposites of recklessly renouncing you, and
labouring humbly for you again. Forget that you have
said No, and let it be as it was !. Say, Bathsheba, that
you only wrote that refusal to me in fun -- -come, say it
to me!'
<P 261>
" It would be untrue, and painful to both of us. You
overrate my capacity for love. I don't possess half
the warmth of nature you believe me to have. An un+
protected childhood in a cold world has beaten gentle+
ness out of me.'
He immediately said with more resentment: "That
may be true, somewhat ; but ah, Miss Everdene, it won't
do as a reason! You are not the cold woman you
would have me believe. No, no .! It isn't because you
have no feeling in you that you don't love me. You
naturally would have me think so -- -you would hide from
that you have a burning heart like mine. You have
love enough, but it is turned into a new channel. I
know where.'
The swift music of her heart became hubbub now,
and she throbbed to extremity. He was coming to
Troy. He did then know what had occurred .! And
the name fell from his lips the next moment.
"Why did Troy not leave my treasure alone?' he
asked, fiercely. "When I had no thought of injuring
him, why did he force himself upon your notice.!
Before he worried you your inclination was to have me;
when next I should have come to you your answer
would have been Yes. Can you deny it -- -I ask, can
you deny it?'
She delayed the reply, but was to honest to with
hold it. ' I cannot,' she whispered.
"I know you cannot. But he stole in in my absence
and robbed me. Why did't he win you away before,
when nobody would have been grieved? -- -when nobody
would have been set tale-bearing. Now the people
sneer at me -- -the very hills and sky seem to laugh at
me till I blush shamefuly for my folly. I have lost my
respect, my good name, my standing -- -lost it, never to
get it again. Go and marry your man -- go on .! '
"O sir -- -Mr. Boldwood!'
" You may as well. I have no further claim upon you.
As for me, I had better go somewhere alone, and hide --
and pray. I loved a woman once. I am now ashamed.
When I am dead they'll say, Miserable love-sick man
that he was. Heaven -- -heaven -- -if I had got jilted
secretly, and the dishonour not known, and my position
FURY
kept.! But no matter, it is
<P 262>
gone, and the woman not
gained. Shame upon him -- shame .! '
His unreasonable anger terrified her, and she glided
from him, without obviously moving, as she said, "I am
only a girl -- do not speak to me so.!'
"All the time you knew -- how very well you knew --
that your new freak was my misery. Dazzled by brass
and scarlet -- O, Bathsheba -- this is woman's folly
indeed .! '
She fired up at once. "You are taking too much
upon yourself .! ' she said, veheniently. " Everybody is
upon me  -- everybody. It is unmanly to attack a
woman so ! I have nobody in the world to fight my
battles for me; but no mercy is shown. Yet if a
thousand of you sneer and say things against me, I <1will>1
<1not>1 be put down !."
" You'll chatter with him doubtless about me. Say to
him, "Boldwood would have died for me.' Yes, and
you have given way to him, knowing him to be not the
man for you. He has kissed you -- claimed you as his.
Do you hear -- he has kissed you. Deny it .! '
The most tragic woman is cowed by a tragic man,
and although Boldwood was, in vehemence and glow,
nearly her own self rendered into another sex,
Bathsheba's cheek quivered. She gasped, ' Leave me,
sir -- leave me !. I am nothing to you. Let me go on !.'
"Deny that he has kissed you.'
"I shall not.'
" Ha -- then he has ! ' came hoarsely from the farmer.
"He has," she said, slowly, and, in spite of her fear,
defiantly. 'I am not ashamed to speak the truth.'
"Then curse him; and curse him !. ' said Boldwood,
breaking into a whispered fury. ' Whilst I would have
given worlds to touch your hand, you have let a rake come
in without right or ceremony and -- kiss you .! Heaven's
mercy -- kiss you ! ... Ah, a time of his life shall come
when he will have to repent, and think wretchedly of
the pain he has caused another man ; and then may he
ache, and wish, and curse, and yearn -- as I do now .! "
'Don't, don't, O, don't pray down evil upon him.! '
she
<P 263>
implored in a miserable cry. "Anything but that --
anything. O, be kind to him, sir, for I love him true .'
Boldwood's ideas had reached that point of fusion at
which outline and consistency entirely disappear. The
impending night appeared to concentrate in his eye.
He did not hear her at all now.
"I'll punish him -- -by my soul, that will I.! I'll meet
him, soldier or no, and I'll horsewhip the untimely
stripling for this reckless theft of my one delight. If he
were a hundred men I'd horsewhip him --  -- ' He
dropped his voice suddenly and unnaturally. "Bath+
sheba, sweet, lost coquette, pardon me .! I've been
blaming you, threatening you, behaving like a churl to
you, when he's the greatest sinner. He stole your dear
heart away with his unfathomable lies.! ... lt is a
fortunate thing for him that he's gone back to his
regiment -- -that he's away up the country, and not here!
I hope he may not return here just yet. I pray God
he may not come into my sight, for I may be tempted
beyond myself. O, Bathsheba, keep him away -- yes,
keep him away from me.!"
For a moment Boldwood stood so inertly after this
that his soul seemed to have been entirely exhaled with
the breath of his passionate words. He turned his face
away, and withdrew, and his form was soon covered over
by the twilight as his footsteps mixed in with the low
hiss of the leafy trees.
Bathsheba, who had been standing motionless as a
model all this latter time, flung her hands to her face,
and wildly attempted to ponder on the exhibition which
had just passed away. Such astounding wells of fevered
feeling in a still man like Mr. Boldwood were incompre+
hensible, dreadful. Instead of being a man trained to
repression he was -- what she had seen him.
The force of the farmer's threats lay in their relation to a
circumstance known at present only to herself: her lover was
coming back to Weatherby in the course of the very next
day or two. Troy had not returned to his distant barracks as
Boldwood and others supposed, but had merely gone to visit
<P 264>
some acquaintance in Bath, and had yet a wek or more
remaining to his furlough.
 She felt wretchedly certain that if he revisited her just at
this nick of time, and came into contact with Boldwood,a
fierce quarrel would be the consequence. She panted with
solicitude when she thought of possible injury to Troy. The
least spark would kindle the farmer's swift feelings of rage
and jealousy; he would lose his self-mastery as he had this
evening; Troy's blitheness might become aggressive; it might
take the direction of derision, and Boldwood's anger might
then take the direction of revenge.
 With almost a morbid dread of being thought a gushing
girl, this guideless woman too well concealed from the world
under a manner of carelessness the warm depths of her strong
emotions. But now there was no reserve. In fer

her distraction,instead of advancing further she
walked up and down,beating
the air with her fingers,pressing on her brow, and sobbing
brokenly to herself. Then she sat down on a heap of stones by
the wayside to think. There she remained long. Above the
dark margin of the earth appeared foreshores and promontor+
ies of coppery cloud,bounding a green and pellucid expanse
in the western sky. Amaranthine glosses came over them then,
and the unresting world wheeled her round to a contrasting
prospect eastward, in the shape of indecisive and palpitating
stars. She gazed upon their silent throes amid the shades of
space, but realised none at all. Her troubled spirit was far
away with Troy.
<C xxxii>
<P 265>
NIGHT -- HORSES TRAMPING
THE village of Weatherbury was quiet as the graveyard
in its midst, and the living were lying welinigh as still
as the dead. The church clock struck eleven. The
air was so empty of other sounds that the whirr of the
clock-work immediately before the strokes was distinct,
and so was also the click of the same at their close.
The notes flew forth with the usual blind obtuseness
of inanimate things -- flapping and rebounding among
walls, undulating against the scattered clouds, spreading
through their interstices into unexplored miles of space.
Bathsheba's crannied and mouldy halls were to-night
occupied only by Maryann, Liddy being, as was stated,
with her sister, whom Bathsheba had set out to visit.
A few minutes after eleven had struck, Maryann turned
in her bed with a sense of being disturbed. She was
totally unconscious of the nature of the interruption to
her sleep. It led to a dream, and the dream to an
awakening, with an uneasy sensation that something
had happened. She left her bed and looked out of
the window. The paddock abutted on this end of the
building, and in the paddock she could just discern by
the uncertain gray a moving figure approaching the
horse that was feeding there. The figure seized the
horse by the forelock, and led it to the corner of the
field. Here she could see some object which circum+
stances proved to be a vehicle for after a few minutes
the horse down the road, mingled with the sound of
light wheels.
Two varieties only of humanity could have entered
the paddock with the ghostiike glide of that mysterious
figure. They were a woman and a gipsy man. A woman
was out of the question in such an occupation at this
hour, and the comer could be no less than a thief, who
might probably have known the weakness of the house+
hold on this particular night, and have
<P 266>
chosen it on
that account for his daring attempt. Moreover, to
raise suspicion to conviction itself, there were gipsies in !
Weatherbury Bottom.
Maryann, who had been afraid to shout in the robber's
presence, having seen him depart had no fear. She
hastily slipped on her clothes, stumped down the dis+
jointed staircase with its hundred creaks, ran to Coggan's,
the nearest house, and raised an alarm. Coggan called
Gabriel, who now again lodged in his house as at first,
and together they went to the paddock. Beyond all
doubt the horse was gone.
" Hark .! ' said Gabriel.
They listened. Distinct upon the stagnant air came
the sounds of a trotting horse passing up Longpuddle
Lane -- just beyond the gipsies' encampment in Weather+
bury Bottom.
" That's our Dainty-i'll swear to her step,' said Jan.
" Mighty me ! Won't mis'ess storm and call us stupids
wen she comes back ! ' moaned Maryann. "How I
wish it had happened when she was at home, and none
of us had been answerable .! '
" We must ride after,' said Gabriel, decisively.
be responsible to Miss Everdene for what we do. Yes,
we'll follow. '
" Faith, I don't see how,' said Coggan. " All our
horses are too heavy for that trick except little Poppet,
and what's she between two of us?-if we only had that
" pair over the hedge we might do something.'
'Which pair ? '
'Mr Boldwood's Tidy and Moll.'
" Then wait here till I come hither again,' said Gabriel.
He ran down the hill towards Farmer Boldwood's.
" Farmer Boldwood is not at home,' said Maryann.
",All the better,' said Coggan. "I know what he's
gone for.'
Less than five minutes brought up Oak again, running
at the same pace, with two halters dangling from his hand,
"Where did you find 'em ?" said Coggan, turning
round and leaping upon the hedge without waiting for
an answer.
"Under the eaves. I knew where they were kept,'
said Gabriel, following him. "Coggan, you can ride
bare-backed ? there's no time to look for saddles.'
<P 267>
" Like a hero .! ' said Jan.
'Maryann, you go to hed,' Gabriel shouted to her
from the top of the hedge.
Springing down into Boldwood's pastures, each
pocketed his halter to hide it from the horses, who,
seeing the men empty-handed, docilely allowed them+
selves to he seized by the mane, when the halters
were dexterously slipped on. Having neither bit nor
bridle, Oak and Coggan extemporized the former by
passing the rope in each case through the animal's
mouth and looping it on the other side. Oak vaulted
astride, and Coggan clambered up by aid of the hank,
when they ascended to the gate and galloped off in the
direction taken by Bathsheha's horse and the robber.
Whose vehicle the horse had been harnessed to was a
matter of some uncertainty.
Weatherbury Bottom was reached in three or four
minutes. They scanned the shady green patch by the
roadside. The gipsies were gone.
"The villains .! ' said Gabriel. 'Which way have they
gone, I wonder ? '
'Straight on, as sure as God made little apples,'
said Jan.
" Very well; we are better mounted, and must over+
discovered. The road-metal grew softer and more
rain had wetted its surface to a somewhat plastic, but
not muddy state. They came to cross-roads. Coggan
suddenly pulled up Moll and slipped off.
" What"s the matter ? ' said Gabriel.
"We must try to track 'em, since we can't hear 'em,'
said Jan, fumbling in his pockets. He struck a light,
and held the match to the ground. The rain had been
heavier here, and all foot and horse tracks made previous
to the storm had been abraded and blurred by the drops,
and they were now so many little scoops of water, which
reflected the flame of the match like eyes. One set of
tracks was fresh and had no water in them; one pair of
ruts was also empty, and not small canals, like the cthers.
The footprints forming this recent impression were full
<P 268>
of information as to pace ; they were in equidistant pairs,
three or four feet apart, the right and left foot of each
pair being exactly opposite one another.
"Straight on !. ' Jan exclaimed. "Tracks like that
mean a stiff gallop. No wonder we don't hear him.
And the horse is harnessed-iook at the ruts. Ay,
'How do you know ?'
"Old Jimmy Harris only shoed her last week, and
I'd swear to his make among ten thousand.'
"The rest of the gipsies must ha" gone on earlier,
or some other way,' said Oak. " 'You saw there were
no other tracks ? '
"True.' They rode along silently for a long weary
time. Coggan carried an old pinchbeck repeater which
he had inherited from some genius in his family; and
it now struck one. He lighted another match, and ex+
amined the ground again.
"'Tis a canter now,' he said, throwing away the light.
'A twisty', rickety pace for a gig. The fact is, they over+
drove her at starting ; we shall catch "em yet.'
Again they hastened on, and entered Blackmore
Vale. Coggan's watch struck one. When they looked
again the hoof-marks were so spaced as to form a sort
of zigzag if united, like the lamps along a street.
" That's a trot, I know,' said Gabriel.
"Only a trot now,' said Coggan, cheerfully. "We
shall overtake him in time.'
They pushed rapidly on for yet two or three miles.
"Ah .! a moment,' said Jan. 'Let's see how she was
driven up this hill. "Twill help us,' A light was
promptly struck upon his gaiters as before, and the ex+
amination made,
" Hurrah .! ' said Coggan. "She walked up here --
and well she might. We shall get them in two miles,
for a crown.'
They rode three, and listened. No sound was to be
heard save a milipond trickling hoarsely through a
hatch, and suggesting gloomy possibilities of drowning
by juraping in. Gabriel dismounted when they came
to a turning. The tracks were ahsolutely the only guide
as to the direction that they now had, and great caution
was necessary to avoid confusing them
<P 269>
with some others
which had made their appearance lately.
"What does this mean ? -- though I guess,' said
Gabriel, looking up at Coggan as he moved the match
over the ground about the turning. Coggan, who, no
less than the panting horses, had latterly shown signs
of weariness, again scrutinized the mystic characters.
This time only three were of the regular horseshoe
shape. Every fourth was a dot.
HORSES TRAMPING
He screwed up his face and emitted a long
" whew-w-w !. '
" Lame,' said Oak.
" Yes Dainty is lamed ; the near-foot-afore,' said
Coggan slowly staring still at the footprints.
" We'll push on,' said Gabriel, remounting his humid
steed.
Although the road along its greater part had been as
good as any turnpike-road in the country, it was nomin+
ally only a byway. The last turning had brought them
into the high road leading to Bath. Coggan recollected
himself.
"We shall have him now ! ' he exclaimed.
" Where ? "
' Sherton Turnpike. The keeper of that gate is the
sleepiest man between here and London -- Dan Randall.
that's his name -- knowed en for years, when he was at
Casterbridge gate. Between the lameness and the gate
'tis a done job.'
was said until, against a shady background of foliage,
five white bars were visible, crossing their route a little
way ahead.
" Hush -- we are almost close !. ' said Gabriel.
"Amble on upon the grass,' said Coggan.
The white bars were blotted out in the midst by a
dark shape in front of them. The silence of this lonely
time was pierced by an exclamation from that quarter.
" Hoy-a-hoy ! Gate .! '
It appeared that there had been a previous call which
they had not noticed, for on their close approach the
door of the turnpike-house opened, and the keeper
came out half-dressed, with a candle in his hand. The
rays illumined the whole group.
" Keep the gate close .! ' shouted Gabriel. " He has
stolen the horse !. '
<P 270>
" Who ? ' said the turnpike-man.
Gabriel looked at the driver of the gig, and saw a
woman -- Bathsheba, his mistress.
On hearing his voice she had turned her face away
from the light. Coggan had, however, caught sight of
her in the meanwhile.
"Why, 'tis mistress-i'll take my oath .! ' he said,
amazed.
Bathsheba it certainly was, and she had by this time
done the trick she could do so well in crises not of love,
namely, mask a surprise by coolness of manner.
' Well, Gabriel,' she inquired quietly, ' where are you
going ? '
' We thought --  -- ' began Gabriel.
Bath,' she said, taking for her own
use the assurance that Gahriel lacked. 'An important
matter made it necessary for me to give up my visit to
liddy, and go off at once. What, then, were you
following me ?'
' We thought the horse was stole.'
" Weli-what a thing .! How very foolish of you not
to know that I had taken the trap and horse. I could
neither wake Maryann nor get into the house, though
I hammered for ten minutes against her window-sill.
Fortunately, I could get the key of the coach-house, so
I troubled no one further. Didn't you think it might
be me?"
' Why should we, miss ? '
" Perhaps not Why, those are never Farmer Bold+
wood's horses .! Goodness mercy .! what have you been
" doing bringing trouble upon me in this way? What.!
mustn't a lady move an inch from her door without being
dogged like a thief?'
'But how was we to know, if you left no account of
your doings ? ' expostulated Coggan, "and ladies don't
" drive at these hours, miss, as a jineral rule of society.'
"I did leave an account -- and you would have seen
it in the morning. I wrote in chalk on the coach-house
doors that I had come back for the horse and gig, and
driven off; that I could arouse nobody, and should
return soon.'
" But you'll consider, ma'am, that we couldn't see
that till it got daylight.'
'True,' she said, and though vexed at first she had
too much
<P 271>
sense to blame them long or seriously for a
devotion to her that was as valuable as it was rare.
She added with a very pretty grace, ' Well, I really thank
you heartily for taking all this trouble; but I wish you
had borrowed anybody's horses but Mr. Boldwood's.'
'Dainty is lame, miss,' said Coggan. 'Can ye go
on?'
'lt was only a stone in her shoe. I got down and
pulled it out a hundred yards back. I can manage
very well, thank you. I shall be in Bath by daylight.
Will you now return, please?'
She turned her head -- the gateman's candle
shimmering upon her quick, clear eyes as she did so --
passed through the gate, and was soon wrapped in the
embowering shades of mysterious summer boughs.
Coggan and Gabriel put about their horses, and, fanned
by the velvety air of this July night, retraced the road
by which they had come.
'A strange vagary, this of hers, isn't it, Oak?' said
Coggan, curiously.
'Yes,' said Gabriel, shortly.
'She won't be in Bath by no daylight!.'
'Coggan, suppose we keep this night's work as quiet
as we can?'
'I am of one and the same mind.'
'Very well. We shall be home by three o'clock or
so, and can creep into the parish like lambs.'
Bathsheba's perturbed meditations by the roadside
had ultimately evolved a conclusion that there were only
two remedies for the present desperate state of affairs.
The first was merely to keep Troy away from Weather+
bury till Boldwood's indignation had cooled; the second
to listen to Oak's entreaties, and Boldwood's denuncia+
tions, and give up Troy altogether.
Alas! Could she give up this new love -- induce
him to renounce her by saying she did not like him --
could no more speak to him, and beg him, for her good,
to end his furlough in Bath, and see her and Weather'
bury no niore?
It was a picture full of misery, but for a while she
contemplated it firmly, allowing herself, nevertheless,
as girls will, to
<P 272>
dwell upon the happy life she would
have enjoyed had Troy been Boldwood, and the path
of love the path of duty -- inflicting upon herself gratuit+
ous tortures by imagining him the lover of another
woman after forgetting her; for she had penetrated
Troy's nature so far as to estimate his tendencies pretty
accurately, hut unfortunately loved him no less in
thinking that he might soon cease to love her -- indeed,
considerably more.
She jumped to her feet. She would see him at once.
Yes, she would implore him by word of mouth to assist
her in this dilemma. A letter to keep him away could
not reach him in time, even if he should be disposed to
listen to it.
Was Bathsheba altogether blind to the obvious fact
that the support of a lover's arms is not of a kind best
calculated to assist a resolve to renounce him? Or was
she sophistically sensible, with a thrill of pleasure, that
by adopting this course for getting rid of him she was
ensuring a meeting with him, at any rate, once more?
It was now dark, and the hour must have been nearly
ten. The only way to accomplish her purpose was to
give up her idea of visiting Liddy at Yalbury, return to
Weatherbury Farm, put the horse into the gig, and drive
at once to Bath. The scheme seemed at first impossible :
the journey was a fearfully heavy one, even for a strong
horse, at her own estimate; and she much underrated
the distance. It was most venturesome for a woman,
at night, and alone.
But could she go on to Liddy's and leave things to
take their course? No, no; anything but that. Bath+
sheba was full of a stimulating turbulence, beside which
caution vainly' prayed for a hearing. she turned back
towards the village.
Her walk was slow, for she wished not to enter
Weatherbury till the cottagers were in bed, and, par+
ticularly, till Boldwood was secure. Her plan was now
to drive to Bath during the night, see Sergeant 'Troy in
the morning before he set out to come to her, bid him
farewell, and dismiss him: then to rest the horse
thoroughly (herself to weep the while, she thought),
starting early the next morning on her return journey.
By this arrangement she could trot Dainty gently all
the day, reach
<P 273>
Liddy at Yalbury in the evening, and
come home to Weatherbury with her whenever they
chose -- so nobody would know she had been to Bath
at all.
Such was Bathsheba's scheme. But in her topo+
graphical ignorance as a late comer to the place, slie
misreckoned the distance of her journey as not much
more than half what it really was. Her idea, however,
she proceeded to carry out, with what initial success we
have already seen.
<C xxxiii>
<P 274>
IN THE SUN -- A HARBINGER
A WEEK passed, and there were no tidings of Bath+
sheba; nor was there any explanation of her Gilpin's
rig.
Then a note came for Maryann, stating that the
business which had called her mistress to Bath still
detained her there; but that she hoped to return
in the course of another week.
Another week passed. The oat-harvest began, and
all the men were a-field under a monochromatic Lammas
sky, amid the trembling air and short shadows of noon.
Indoors nothing was to be heard save the droning of
blue-bottle flies; out-of-doors the whetting of scythes
and the hiss of tressy oat-ears rubbing together as their
perpendicular stalks of amber-yellow fell heavily to each
swath. Every drop of moisture not in the men's bottles
and flagons in the form of cider was raining as perspira+
tion from their foreheads and cheeks. Drought was
everywhere else.
They were about to withdraw for a while into the
charitable shade of a tree in the fence, when Coggan
saw a figure in a blue coat and brass buttons running
to them across the field.
'I wonder who that is?' he said.
'I hope nothing is wrong about mistress,' said
Maryann, who with some other women was tying the
bundles (oats being always sheafed on this farm), 'but
an unlucky token came to me indoors this morning.
l went to unlock the door and dropped the key, and it
fell upon the stone floor and broke into two pieces.
Breaking a key is a dreadful bodement. I wish mis'ess
was home.'
''Tis Cain Ball,' said Gabriel, pausing from whetting
his reaphook.
Oak was not bound by his agreement to assist in the
corn-field; but the harvest month is an anxious time for
<P 275>
a farmer, and the corn was Bathsheba's, so he lent a
hand.
'He's dressed up in his best clothes,' said Matthew
Moon. 'He hev been away from home for a few days,
since he's had that felon upon his finger; for 'a said,
since I can't work I'll have a hollerday.'
  'A good time for one -- a" excellent time,' said Joseph
Poorgrass, straightening his back; for he, like some of
the others, had a way of resting a while from his labour
on such hot days for reasons preternaturally small; of
which Cain Pall's advent on a week-day in his Sunday+
clothes was one of the first magnitude. ''Twas a bad leg
allowed me to read the Pilgrim's Progress, and Mark
Clark learnt AliFours in a whitlow.'
'Ay, and my father put his arm out of joint to have
time to go courting,' said Jan Coggan, in an eclipsing
tone, wiping his face with his shirt-sleeve and thrusting
back his hat upon the nape of his neck.
By this time Cainy was nearing the group of harvesters,
and was perceived to be carrying a large slice of bread
and ham in one hand, from which he took mouthfuls
as he ran, the other being wrapped in a bandage.
When he came close, his mouth assumed the bell shape,
and he began to cough violently.
   'Now, Cainy!.' said Gabriel, sternly.  'How many
more times must I tell you to keep from running so fast
when you be eating? You'll choke yourself some day,
that's what you'll do, Cain Ball.'
 'Hok-hok-hok.!  'replied Cain. 'A crumb of my
victuals went the wrong way -- hok-hok!, That's what
'tis, Mister Oak.! And I've been visiting to Bath
because I had a felon on my thumb; yes, and l've
seen -- ahok-hok!'
Directly Cain mentioned Bath, they all threw down
their hooks and forks and drew round him. Un+
fortunately the erratic crumb did not improve his
narrative powers, and a supplementary hindrance was
that of a sneeze, jerking from his pocket his rather large
watch, which dangled in front of the young man
pendulum-wise.
<P 276>
 'Yes,' he continued, directing his thoughts to Bath
and letting his eyes follow, 'l've seed the world at last
 -- yes -- and I've seed our mis'ess -- ahok-hok-hok ! '
' Bother the boy! ' said Gabriel. ' Something is
always going the wrong way down your throat, so that
you can't tell what's necessary to be told.'
"Ahok !. there ! Please, Mister Oak, a gnat have
just fleed into my stomach and brought the cough on
again !. '
'Yes, that's just it. Your mouth is always open, you
young rascal .! '
''Tis terrible bad to have a gnat fly down yer throat,
pore boy !. ' said Matthew Moon.
' Well, at Bath you saw --  -- ' prompted Gabriel.
'I saw our mistress,' continued the junior shepherd,
'and a sojer, walking along. And bymeby they got
closer and closer, and then they went arm-in-crook, like
courting complete -- hok-hok ! like courting complete --
hok .! -- courting complete --  -- " Losing the thread of his
narrative at this point simultaneously with his loss of
breath, their informant looked up and down the field
apparently for some clue to it. 'Well, I see our mis'ess
and a soldier -- a-ha-a-wk .! '
A HARBlNGER
!Damn the boy !' said Gabriel.
!'Tis only my manner, Mister Oak, if ye'll excuse it,'
said Cain Ball, looking reproachfully at Oak, with eyes
drenched in their own dew.
!Here's some cider for him -- that'll cure his throat,'
said Jan Coggan, lifting a flagon of cider, pulling out
the cork, and applying the hole to Cainy's mouth;
Joseph Poorgrass in the meantime beginning to think
apprehensively of the serious consequences that would
follow Cainy Ball's strangulation in his cough, and the
history of his Bath adventures dying with him.
"For my poor self, I always say "please God ' afore
I do anything,' said Joseph, in an unboastful voice ; " and
so should you, Cain Ball. "Tis a great safeguard, and
might perhaps save you from being choked to death
some day.'
Mr. Coggan poured the liquor with unstinted liber+
ality at the suffering Cain's circular mouth; half of it
running down the
<P 277>
side of the flagon, and half of what
reached his mouth running down outside his throat,
and half of what ran in going the wrong way, and being
coughed and sneezed around the persons of the gathered
reapers in the form of a cider fog, which for a moment
hung in the sunny air like a small exhalation.
"There's a great clumsy sneeze ! Why can't ye have
better manners, you young dog ! ' said Coggan, with+
drawing the flagon.
"The cider went up my nose ! ' cried Cainy, as soon
as he could speak; "and now 'tis gone down my neck,
and into my poor dumb felon, and over my shiny
buttons and all my best cloze ! '
"The poor lad's cough is terrible onfortunate,' said
Matthew Moon. 'And a great history on hand, too.
Bump his back, shepherd.'
"'Tis my nater,' mourned Cain. "Mother says I
always was so excitable when my feelings were worked
up to a point!'
" True, true,' said Joseph Poorgrass. "The Balls
were always a very excitable family. I knowed the
boy's grandfather -- a truly nervous and modest man,
even to genteel refinery. 'Twas blush, blush with him,
almost as much as 'tis with me -- not but that 'tis a
fault in me !'
"Not at all, Master Poorgrass,' said Coggan. " 'Tis
a very noble quality in ye.'
"Heh-heh ! well, I wish to noise nothing abroad --
nothing at all,' murmured Poorgrass, diffidently. " But
we be born to things -- that's true. Yet I would rather
my trifle were hid ; though, perhaps, a high nater is a
little high, and at my birth all things were possible to
my Maker, and he may have begrudged no gifts....
But under your bushel, Joseph ! under your bushel with
'ee ! A strange desire, neighbours, this desire to hide,
and no praise due. Yet there is a Sermon on the
Mount with a calendar of the blessed at the head, and
certain meek men may be named therein.'
"Cainy's grandfather was a very clever man,' said
Matthew Moon. "Invented a' apple-tree out of his own
head, which is called by his name to this day -- the Early
Ball. You know 'em,
<P 278>
Jan ? A Quarrenden grafted on
a Tom Putt, and a Rathe-ripe upon top o' that again.
'Tis trew 'a used to bide about in a public-house wi' a
'ooman in a way he had no business to by rights, but
there -- 'a were a clever man in the sense of the term.'
" Now then,' said Gabriel, impatiently, " what did you
see, Cain ? '
"I seed our mis'ess go into a sort of a park place,
where there's seats, and shrubs and flowers, arm-in-crook
with a sojer,' continued Cainy, firmly, and with a dim
sense that his words were very effective as regarded
Gabriel's emotions. "And I think the sojer was
Sergeant Troy. And they sat there together for more
than half-an-hour, talking moving things, and she once
was crying a'most to death. And when they came out
her eyes were shining and she was as white as a lily;
and they looked into one another's faces, as far-gone
friendly as a man and woman can be.'
Gabriel's features seemed to get thinner. " Well,
what did you see besides ? '
" Oh, all sorts."
"White as a lily? You are sure 'twas she?
" Yes."
" Well, what besides ? '
"Great glass windows to the shops, and great clouds
in the sky, full of rain, and old wooden trees in the
country round.'
" You stun-poll! What will ye say next?' said
Coggan.
" Let en alone,' interposed Joseph Poorgrass. "The
boy's maning is that the sky and the earth in the
kingdom of Bath is not altogether different from ours
here. 'Tis for our good to gain knowledge of strange
cities, and as such the boy's words should be suffered,
so to speak it.'
" And the people of Bath,' continued Cain, "never
need to light their fires except as a luxury, for the
water springs up out of the earth ready boiled for
use.'
" 'Tis true as the light,' testified Matthew Moon. ' I've
heard other navigators say the same thing.'
" They drink nothing else there,' said Cain, ' and seem
to enjoy it, to see how they swaller it down.'
<P 279>
"Well, it seems a barbarian practice enough to us,
but I daresay the natives think nothing o' it,' said
Matthew.
"And don't victuals spring up as well as drink?'
asked Coggan, twirling his eye.
"No-i own to a blot there in Bath -- a true blot.
God didn't proride 'em with victuals as well as (+
and 'twas a drawback I couldn't get over at all.'
" Well, 'tis a curious place, to say the least,' observed
Moon; "and it must be a curious people that live
therein. '
"Miss Everdene and the soldier were walking about
together, you say ? ' said Gabriel, returning to the
group.
"Ay, and she wore a beautiful gold-colour silk
gown, trimmed with black lace, that would have stood
alone 'ithout legs inside if required. 'Twas a very
winsome sight; and her hair was brushed splendid.
And when the sun shone upon the bright gown and his
red coat -- my ! how handsome they looked. You
could see 'em all the length of the street.'
" And what then ? ' murmured Gabriel.
"And then I went into Griffin's to hae my boots
hobbed, and then I went to Riggs's batty-cake shop,
and asked 'em for a penneth of the cheapest and nicest
stales, that were all but blue-mouldy, but not quite.
And whilst I was chawing 'em down I walked on and
seed a clock with a face as big as a baking trendle --  -- '
"But that's nothing to do with mistress ! '
"I'm coming to that, if you'll leave me alone, Mister
Oak ! ' remonstrated Cainy. "If you excites me,
perhaps you'll bring on my cough, and then I shan't be
able to tell ye nothing.'
" Yes-iet him tell it his own way,' said Coggan.
Gabriel settled into a despairing attitude of patience,
and Cainy went on : --
"And there were great large houses, and more
people all the week long than at Weatherbury club+
walking on White Tuesdays. And I went to grand
churches and chapels. And how the parson would pray !
Yes; he would kneel down and put up his hands
together, and make the holy gold rings on his fingers
gleam and twinkle in yer eyes, that he'd earned
by praying so excellent well ! -- Ah yes, I wish I lived
there.'
<P 280>
"Our poor Parson Thirdly can't get no money to
buy such rings,' said  Matthew Moon, thoughtfully.
"And as good a man as ever walked. I don't believe
poor Thirdly have a single one, even of humblest tin or
copper. Such a great ornament as they'd be to him on
a dull a'ternoon, when he's up in the pulpit lighted by
the wax candles ! But 'tis impossible, poor man. Ah,
to think how unequal things be.'
"Perhaps he's made of different stuff than to wear
'em,' said Gabriel, grimly. ' Well, that's enough of this.
Go on, Cainy -- quick.'
' Oh -- and the new style of pa'sons wear moustaches
and long beards,' continued the illustrious traveller,
'and look like Moses and Aaron complete, and make
we fokes in the congregation feel all over like the
children of Israel.'
"A very right feeling -- very,' said Joseph Poorgrass.
"And there's two religions going on in the nation
now -- High Church and High Chapel. And, thinks I,
I'll play fair; so I went to High Church in the morning,
and High Chapel in the afternoon.'
' A right and proper boy,' said Joseph Poorgrass.
"Well, at High Church they pray singing, and worship
all the colours of the rainbow; and at High Chapel they
pray preaching, and worship drab and whitewash only.
And then-i didn't see no more of Miss Everdene at
all.'
'Why didn't you say so afore, then ? ' exclaimed Oak,
with much disappointment.
' Ah,' said Matthew Moon, 'she'll wish her cake
dough if so be she's over intimate with that man.'
'She's not over intimate with him,' said Gabriel,
indignantly.
'She would know better,' said Coggan. "Our
mis'ess has too much sense under they knots of black
hair to do such a mad thing.'
"You see, he's not a coarse, ignorant man, for he
was well brought up,' said Matthew, dubiously. " 'Twas
only wildness that made him a soldier, and maids rather
like your man of sin.'
"Now, Cain Ball,' said Gabriel restlessly, "can you
swear in the most
<P 281>
awful form that the woman you saw
was Miss Everdene ? '
'Cain Ball, you be no longer a babe and suckling,'
said Joseph in the sepulchral tone the circumstances
demanded, "and you know what taking an oath is.
'Tis a horrible testament mind ye, which you say and
seal with your blood-stone, and the prophet Matthew
tells us that on whomsoever it shall fall it will grind
him to powder. Now, before all the work-folk here
assembled, can you swear to your words as the shep+
herd asks ye ?'
" Please no, Mister Oak ! ' said Cainy, looking from
one to the other with great uneasiness at the spiritual
magnitude of the position. "I don't mind saying 'tis
true, but I don't like to say 'tis damn true, if that's
what you mane.'
'Cain, Cain, how can you ! ' asked Joseph sternly.
"You be asked to swear in a holy manner, and you
swear like wicked Shimei, the son of Gera, who cursed
as he came. Young man, fie ! '
"No, I don't ! 'Tis you want to squander a pore
boy's soul, Joseph Poorgrass -- that's what 'tis ! ' said
Cain, beginning to cry. "All I mane is that in common
truth 'twas Miss Everdene and Sergeant Troy, but in
the horrible so-help-me truth that ye want to make of
it perhaps 'twas somebody else ! '
'There's no getting at the rights of it,' said Gabriel,
turning to his work.
"Cain Ball, you'll come to a bit of bread ! ' groaned
Joseph Poorgrass.
Then the reapers' hooks were flourished again, and
the old sounds went on. Gabriel, without making any
pretence of being lively, did nothing to show that he
was particularly dull. However, Coggan knew pretty
nearly how the land lay, and when they were in a nook
together he said --
' Don't take on about her, Gabriel. What difference
does it make whose sweetheart she is, since she can't be
yours ? '
"That's the very thing I say to myself,' said Gabriel.
 <C xxxiv>
<P 282>
HOME AGAIN -- A TRICKSTER
THAT same evening at dusk Gabriel was leaning over
Coggan's garden-gate, taking an up-and-down survey
before retiring to rest.
A vehicle of some kind was softly creeping along
the grassy margin of the lane. From it spread the
tones of two women talking. The tones were natural
and not at all suppressed. Oak instantly knew the
voices to he those of Bathsheba and Liddy.
The carriage came opposite and passed by. It was
Miss Everdene's gig, and Liddy and her mistress were
the only occupants of the seat. Liddy was asking
questions about the city of Bath, and her companion
was answering them listlessly and unconcernedly. Both
Bathsheba and the horse seemed weary.
The exquisite relief of finding that she was here
again, safe and sound, overpowered all reflection, and
Oak could only luxuriate in the sense of it. All grave
reports were forgotten.
He lingered and lingered on, till there was no
difference between the eastern and western expanses
of sky, and the timid hares began to limp courageously
round the dim hillocks. Gabriel might have been
there an additional half-hour when a dark form walked
slowly by. " Good-night, Gabriel,' the passer said.
It was Boldwood. " Good-night, sir,' said Gabriel.
Boldwood likewise vanished up the road, and Oak
shortly afterwards turned indoors to bed.
Farmer Boldwood went on towards Miss Everdene's
house. He reached the front, and approaching the
entrance, saw a light in the parlour. The blind was
not drawn down, and inside the room was Bathsheba,
looking over some papers or letters. Her back was
towards Boldwood. He went to the door,
<P 283>
knocked,
and waited with tense muscles and an aching brow.
Boldwood had not been outside his garden since
his meeting with Bathsheba in the road to Yalbury.
Silent and alone, he had remained in moody medita+
tion on woman's ways, deeming as essentials of the
whole sex the accidents of the single one of their
number he had ever closely beheld. By degrees a
more charitable temper had pervaded him, and this
was the reason of his sally to-night. He had come to
apologize and beg forgiveness of Bathsheba with some+
thing like a sense of shame at his violence, having but
just now learnt that she had returned -- only from a
visit to Liddy, as he supposed, the Bath escapade
being quite unknown to him.
He inquired for Miss Everdene. Liddy's manner
was odd, but he did not notice it. She went in, leaving
him standing there, and in her absence the blind of the
room containing Bathsheba was pulled down. Bold+
wood augured ill from that sign. Liddy came out.
"My mistress cannot see you, sir,' she said.
The farmer instantly went out by the gate. He
as unforgiven -- that was the issue of it all. He had
seen her who was to him simultaneously a delight and
a torture, sitting in the room he had shared with her
as a peculiarly privileged guest only a little earlier in
he summer, and she had denied him an entrance
there now.
Boldwood did not hurry homeward. It was ten
o'clock at least, when, walking deliberately through the
lower part of Weatherbury, he heard the carrier's spring
van entering the village. The van ran to and from a
town in a northern direction, and it was owned and
driven by a Weatherbury man, at the door of whose
house it now pulled up. The lamp fixed to the head
of the hood illuminated a scarlet and gilded form, who
was the first to alight.
'Ah ! ' said Boldwood to himself, "come to see her
again.'
Troy entered the carrier's house, which had been
the place of his lodging on his last visit to his native
place. Boldwood was moved by a sudden determina+
tion. He hastened home. In ten minutes he was
back again, and made as if he were going to call upon
Troy at the carrier's. But as he approached, some
<P 284>
one opened the door and came out. He heard this
person say " Good-night ' to the inmates, and the voice
was Troy's. 'This was strange, coming so immediately
after his arrival. Boldwood, however, hastened up
to him. Troy had what appeared to be a carpet-bag
in his hand -- the same that he had brought with him.
It seemed as if he were going to leave again this very
night.
Troy turned up the hill and quickened his pace.
Boldwood stepped forward.
" Sergeant Troy ? '
" Yes-i'm Sergeant Troy.'
" Just arrived from up the country, I think ?'
" Just arrived from Bath.'
" I am William Boldwood.'
" Indeed.'
The tone in which this word was uttered was all
that had been wanted to bring Boldwood to the
point.
" I wish to speak a word with you,' he said.
" What about ? '
" About her who lives just ahead there -- and about
a woman you have wronged.'
" I wonder at your impertinence,' said Troy, moving
on.
" Now look here,' said Boldwood, standing in front
of him, " wonder or not, you are going to hold a conver+
sation with me.'
Troy heard the dull determination in Boldwood's
voice, looked at his stalwart frame, then at the thick
cudgel he carried in his hand. He remembered it was
past ten o'clock. It seemed worth while to be civil to
Boldwood.
" Very well, I'll listen with pleasure,' said Troy,
placing his bag on the ground, "only speak low, for
somebody or other may overhear us in the farmhouse
there.'
" Well then -- I know a good deal concerning your
Fanny Robin's attachment to you. I may say, too, that
I believe I am the only person in the village, excepting
Gabriel Oak, who does know it. You ought to marry
her.'
" I suppose I ought. Indeed, l wish to, but I
cannot.'
" Why ? '
Troy was about to utter something hastily; he then
checked
<P 285>
himself and said, "I am too poor.' His voice
was changed. Previously it had had a deviimay-care
tone. It was the voice of a trickster now.
Boldwood's present mood was not critical enough to
notice tones. He continued, "I may as well speak
plainly; and understand, I don't wish to enter into the
questions of right or wrong, woman's honour and shame,
or to express any opinion on your conduct. I intend a
business transaction with you.'
" I see,' said Troy. " Suppose we sit down here.'
An old tree trunk lay under the hedge immediately
opposite, and they sat down.
The tone in which this word was uttered was all
Troy heard the dull determination in Boldwood's
voice, looked at his stalwart frame, then at the thick
plainly ; and understand, I don't wish to enter into the
" I was engaged to be married to Miss Everdene,'
said Boldwood, "but you came and --  -- '
" Not engaged,' said Troy.
" As good as engaged.'
" If I had not turned up she might have become en+
gaged to you.'
" Hang might ! '
" Would, then.'
" If you had not come I should certainly -- yes,
certainly -- have been accepted by this time. If you had
not seen her you might have been married to Fanny.
Well, there's too much difference between Miss Ever+
dene's station and your own for this flirtation with her
ever to benefit you by ending in marriage. So all I ask
is, don't molest her any more. Marry Fanny.
make it worth your while.'
" How will you ?'
" I'll pay you well now, I'll settle a sum of money
upon her, and I'll see that you don't suffer from poverty
in the future. I'll put it clearly. Bathsheba is only
playing with you: you are too poor for her as I said;
so give up wasting your time about a great match you'll
never make for a moderate and rightful match you may
make to-morrow; take up your carpet-bag, turn about,
leave Weatherbury now, this night, and you shall take
fifty pounds with you. Fanny shall have fifty to enable
her to prepare for the wedding, when you have told me
where she is living, and she shall have five hundred
paid down on her wedding-day.'
<P 286>
In making this statement Boldwood's voice revealed
only too clearly a consciousness of the weakness of his
position, his aims, and his method. His manner had
lapsed quite from that of the firm and dignified Bold+
wood of former times; and such a scheme as he had
now engaged in he would have condemned as childishly
imbecile only a few months ago. We discern a grand
force in the lover which helacks whilst a free man; but
there is a breadth of vision in the free man which in
the lover we vainly seek. Where there is much bias
there must be some narrowness, and love, though added
emotion, is subtracted capacity. Boldwood exemplified
this to an abnormal degree: he knew nothing of Fanny
Robin's circumstances or whereabouts, he knew nothing
of Troy's possibilities, yet that was what he said.
" I like Fanny best,' said Troy; "and if, as you say,
Miss Everdene is out of my reach, why I have all to
gain by accepting your money, and marrying Fan. But
she's only a servant.'
" Never mind -- do you agree to my arrangement ?'
" I do.'
" Ah ! ' said Boldwood, in a more elastic voice. "O,
Troy, if you like her best, why then did you step in here
and injure my happiness ? '
" I love Fanny best now,' said Troy. "But
Bathsh --  -- Miss Everdene inflamed me, and displaced
Fanny for a time. It is over now.'
" Why should it be over so soon? And why then
did you come here again ? '
" There are weighty reasons. Fifty pounds at once,
you said !'
" I did,' said Boldwood, " and here they are -- fifty
sovereigns.' He handed Troy a small packet.
" You have everything ready -- it seems that you
calculated on my accepting them,' said the sergeant,
taking the packet.
" I thought you might accept them,' said Boldwood.
" You've only my word that the programme shall be
adhered to, whilst I at any rate have fifty pounds.'
" l had thought of that, and l have considered that
if I can't appeal to your honour I can trust to your --
well, shrewdness we'll call it -- not to lose five hundred
pounds in prospect, and
<P 287>
also make a bitter enemy of a
man who is willing to be an extremely useful friend.'
" Stop, listen ! ' said Troy in a whisper.
A light pit-pat was audible upon the road just above
them.
'By George -- 'tis she,' he continued. 'I must go
on and meet her.'
'She -- who ? '
'Bathsheba.'
'Bathsheba -- out alone at this time o' night .! ' said
Boldwood in amazement, and starting up. ' Why must
you meet her ?'
'She was expecting me to-night -- and I must now
speak to her, and wish her good-bye, according to your
wish. '
'I don't see the necessity of speaking.'
'It can do no harm -- and she'll be wandering about
looking for me if I don't. You shall hear all I say to her.
It will help you in your love-making when I am gone.'
'Your tone is mocking.'
'O no. And renaember this, if she does not know
what has become of me, she will think more about me
than if I tell her flatly I have come to give her up.'
'Will you confine your words to that one point ? -- +
Shall I hear every word you say ? '
'Every word. Now sit still there, and hold my'
carpet bag for me, and mark what you hear.'
The light footstep came closer, halting occasionally,
as if the walker listened for a sound. Troy whistled a
double note in a soft, fluty tone.
'Come to that, is it ! ' murmured Boldwood, uneasily.
'You promised silence,' said Troy.
'I promise again.'
Troy stepped forward.
'Frank, dearest, is that you ? ' The tones were
Bathsheba's.
'O God .! ' said Boldwood.
'Yes,' said Troy to her.
'How late you are,' she continued, tenderly. 'Did
you come by the carrier ? I listened and heard his
wheels entering the village, but it was some time ago,
and I had almost given you up, Frank.'
<P 288>
'I was sure to come,' said Frank. 'You knew I
should, did you not ? '
'Well, I thought you would,' she said, playfully ;
'and, Frank, it is so lucky .! There's not a soul in my
house but me to-night. I've packed them all off so
nobody on earth will know of your visit to your lady's
bower. Liddy wanted to go to her grandfather's to
tell him about her holiday, and I said she might stay
with them till to-morrow -- when you'll be gone again.'
'Capital,' said Troy. ' But, dear me, I. had better
go back for my bag, because my slippers and brush and
comb are in it; you run home whilst I fetch it, and I'll
promise to be in your parlour in ten minutes.'
'Yes.' She turned and tripped up the hill again.
During the progress of this dialogue there was a
nervous twitching of Boldwood's tightly closed lips, and
his face became bathed in a clammy dew. He now
started forward towards Troy. Troy turned to him and
took up the bag.
'Shall I tell her I have come to give her up and
cannot marry her ? ' said the soldier, mockingly.
'No, no; wait a minute. I want to say more to
you -- more to you !. ' said Boldwood, in a hoarse whisper.
'Now,' said Troy, ' you see my dilemma. Perhaps
I am a bad man -- the victim of my impulses -- led away
to do what I ought to leave undone. I can't, however,
marry them both. And I have two reasons for- choosing
Fanny. First, I like her best upon the whole, and
second, you make it worth my while.'
At the same instant Boldwood sprang upon him, and
held him by the neck. Troy felt Boldwood's grasp slowly
tightening. The move was absolutely unexpected.
'A moment,' he gasped. 'You are injuring her you
love .! '
'Well, what do you mean ? ' said the farmer.
Give me breath,' said Troy.
Boldwood loosened his hand, saying, 'By Heaven,
I've a mind to kill you .!'
'And ruin her.'
'Save her.'
'Oh, how can she be saved now, unless I marry her ? '
<P 289>
Boldwood groaned. He reluctantly released the
soldier, and flung him back against the hedge. 'Devil,
you torture me .! ' said he.
Troy rebounded like a ball, and was about to make
a dash at the farmer; but he checked himself, saying
lightly --
'It is not worth while to measure my strength with
you. Indeed it is a barbarous way of settling a quarrel.
I shall shortly leave the army because of the same
conviction. Now after that revelation of how the land
lies with Bathsheba, 'twould be a mistake to kill me,
would it not?'
''Twould be a mistake to kill you,' repeated Boldwood,
mechanically, with a bowed head.
'Better kill yourself.'
' Far better.'
'I'm glad you see it.'
'Troy, make her your wife, and don't act upon what
I arranged just now. The alternative is dreadful, but
take Bathsheba; I give her up .! She must love you
indeed to sell soul and body to you so utterly as she
has done. Wretched woman -- deluded woman -- you
are, Bathsheba .! '
'But about Fanny ? '
'Bathsheba is a woman well to do,' continued Bold+
wood, in nervous anxiety, 'and, Troy, she will make a
good wife ; and, indeed, she is worth your hastening
on your marriage with her .! '
'But she has a wili-not to say a temper, and I shall
be a mere slave to her. I could do anything with poor
Fanny Robin.'
'Troy,' said Boldwood, imploringly, ' I'll do anything
for you, only don't desert her; pray don't desert her,
Troy.'
'Which, poor Fanny ? '
'No ; Bathsheba Everdene. Love her best .! Love
her tenderly !. How shall I get you to see how advan+
tageous it will be to you to secure her at once ?'
'I don't wish to secure her in any new way.'
Boldwood's arm moved spasmodically towards Troy's
person again. He repressed the instinct, and his form
drooped as with pain.
Troy went on --
<P 290>
"I shall soon purchase my discharge, and then --  -- '
'But I wish you to hasten on this marriage !. It will
be better for you both. You love each other, and you
must let me help you to do it.'
'How ? '
'Why, by settling the five hundred on Bathsheba
instead of Fanny, to enable you to marry at once.
No ; she wouldn't have it of me. I'll pay it down to
you on the wedding-day.'
Troy paused in secret amazement at Boldwood's
wild infatuation. He carelessly said, 'And am I to
have anything now ? '
'Yes, if you wish to. But I have not much additional
money with me. I did not expect this; but all I have
is yours.'
Boldwood, more like a somnambulist than a wakeful
man, pulled out the large canvas bag he carried by way
of a purse, and searched it.
'I have twenty-one pounds more with me,' he said.
'Two notes and a sovereign. But before I leave you
I must have a paper signed --  -- '
'Pay me the money, and we'll go straight to her
parlour, and make any arrangement you please to secure
my compliance with your wishes. But she must know
nothing of this cash business.'
' Nothing, nothing,' said Boldwood, hastily. 'Here
is the sum, and if you'll come to my house we'll write
out the agreement for the remainder, and the terms
also.'
' First we'll call upon her.'
'But why? Come with me to-night, and go with
me to-morrow to the surrogate's.'
'But she must be consulted; at any rate informed.'
'Very well; go on.'
They went up the hill to Bathsheba's house. When
they stood at the entrance, Troy said, 'Wait here a
moment.' Opening the door, he glided inside, leaving
the door ajar.
Boldwood waited. In two minutes a light appeared
in the passage. Boldwood then saw that the chain
had been fastened across the door. Troy appeared
inside, carrying a bedroom candlestick.
<P 291>
'What, did you think I should break in ?' said
Boldwood, contemptuously.
'Oh, no; it is merely my humour to secure things.
Will you read this a moment ? I'll hold the light.'
Troy handed a folded newspaper through the slit
between door and doorpost, and put the candle close.
'That's the paragraph,' he said, placing his finger on
a line.
Boldwood looked and read --
'MARRIAGES.
'On the 17th inst., at St. Ambrose's Church, Bath,
by the Rev. G. Mincing, B.A., Francis Troy, only son
of the late Edward Troy, Esq., H.D., of Weatherbury,
and sergeant iith Dragoon Guards, to Bathsheba, only
surviving daughter of the late Mr, John Everdene, of
Casterbridge.'
'This may be called Fort meeting Feeble, hey,
Boldwood ?' said Troy. A low gurgle of derisive
laughter followed the words.
The paper fell from Boldwood's hands. Troy
continued --
'Fifty pounds to marry Fanny, Good. Twenty-+
one pounds not to marry Fanny, but Bathsheba. Good.
Finale : already Bathsheba's husband. Now, Boldwood,
yours is the ridiculous fate which always attends inter+
ference between a man and his wife. And another
word. Bad as I am, I am not such a villain as to
make the marriage or misery of any woman a matter
of huckster and sale. Fanny has long ago left me.
don't know where she is. I have searched everywhere.
Another word yet. You say you love Bathsheba ; yet
on the merest apparent evidence you instantly believe
in her dishonour. A fig for such love !. Now that I've
taught you a lesson, take your money back again.'
'I will not ; I will not !. ' said Boldwood, in a hiss.
'Anyhow I won't have it,' said Troy, contemptuously.
He wrapped the packet of gold in the notes, and threw
the whole into the road.
Boldwood shook his clenched fist at him. 'You
juggler of Satan .! You black hound .! But I'll punish
you yet ; mark me, I'll punish you yet !. '
<P 292>
Another peal of laughter. Troy then closed the
door, and locked himself in.
Throughout the whole of that night Boldwood's dark
downs of Weatherbury like an unhappy Shade in the
Mournful Fields by Acheron.
<C xxxv>
<P 293>
CHAPTER XXXV
AT AN UPPER WINDOW
IT was very early the next morning -- a time of sun and
dew. The confused beginnings of many birds' songs
spread into the healthy air, and the wan blue of the
heaven was here and there coated with thin webs of
incorporeal cloud which were of no efect in obscuring
day. All the lights in the scene were yellow as to
colour, and all the shadows were attenuated as to form.
The creeping plants about the old manor-house were
bowed with rows of heavy water drops, which had upon
objects behind them the effect of minute lenses of high
magnifying power.
Just before the clock struck five Gabriel Oak and
Coggan passed the village cross, and went on together
to the fields. They were yet barely in view of their
mistress"s house, when Oak fancied he saw the opening
of a casement in one of the upper windows. The two
men were at this moment partially screened by an elder
bush, now beginning to be enriched with black bunches
of fruit, and they paused before emerging from its
shade.
A handsome man leaned idly from the lattice. He
looked east and then west, in the manner of one who
makes a first morning survey. The man was Sergeant
Troy. His red jacket was loosely thrown on, but not
buttoned, and he had altogether the relaxed bearing of
a soldier taking his ease.
Coggan spoke first, looking quietly at the window.
'She has married him ! ' he said.
Gabriel had previously beheld the sight, and he now
stood with his back turned, making no reply.
'I fancied we should know something to-day,' con+
tinued Coggan. 'I heard wheels pass my door just
after dark -- you were out somewhere.'He glanced
round upon Gabriel. 'Good
<P 294>
heavens above us, Oak,
how white your face is; you look like a corpse !.'
'Do I?' said Oak, with a faint smile.
'Lean on the gate: I'll wait a bit.'
',All right, all right. '
They stood by the gate awhile, Gabriel listlessly
staring at the ground. His mind sped into the future,
and saw there enacted in years of leisure the scenes o
repentance that would ensue from this work of haste
That they were married he had instantly decided. Why
had it been so mysteriously managed ? It had become
known that she had had a fearful journey to Bath, owing
to her miscalculating the distance : that the horse had
broken down, and that she had been more than two
days getting there. It was not Bathsheba's way to do
things furtively. With all her faults, she was candour
itself. Could she have been entrapped ? The union
was not only an unutterable grief to him: it amazed
him, notwithstanding that he had passed the preceding
week in a suspicion that such might be the issue of
Troy's meeting her away from home. Her quiet return
with liddy had to some extent dispersed the dread.
Just as that imperceptible motion which appears like
stillness is infinitely divided in its properties from stili
ness itself, so had his hope undistinguishable from
despair differed from despair indeed.
In a few minutes they moved on again towards the
house. The sergeant still looked from the window.
'Morning, comrades .! ' he shouted, in a cheery voice,
when they came up.
Coggan replied to the greeting. ' Bain't ye going to
answer the man ?' he then said to Gabriel. 'I'd say
good morning -- you needn't spend a hapeth of meaning
upon it, and yet keep the man civil.'
Gabriel soon decided too that, since the deed was
done, to put the best face upon the matter would be the
greatest kindness to her he loved.
'Good morning, Sergeant Troy,' he returned, in a
ghastly voice.
'A rambling, gloomy house this,' said Troy, smiling.
<P 295>
' Why -- they may not be married .! ' suggested Coggan.
' Perhaps she's not there.'
Gabriel shook his head. The soldier turned a little
towards the east, and the sun kindled his scarlet coat
to an orange glow.
'But it is a nice old house,' responded Gabriel.
'Yes-i suppose so; but I feel like new wine in an
old bottle here. My notion is that sash-windows should
be put throughout, and these old wainscoted walls
brightened up a bit ; or the oak cleared quite away, and
the walls papered.'
'It would be a pity, I think.'
'Well, no. A philosopher once said in my hearing
that the old builders, who worked when art was a living
thing, had no respect for the work of builders who went
before them, but pulled down and altered as they
thought fit; and why shouldn't we ? ''Creation and
preservation don't do well together,'' says he, ''and a
million of antiquarians can't invent a style.'' My mind
exactly. I am for niaking this place more modern, that
we may be cheerful whilst we can.'
The military man turned and surveyed the interior
of the room, to assist his ideas of improvement in this
direction. Gabriel and Coggan began to move on.
' Oh, Coggan,' said Troy, as if inspired by a recollec+
tion ' do you know if insanity has ever appeared in Mr.
Boldwood's family ? '
Jan reflected for a moment.
'I once heard that an uncle of his was queer in his
head, but I don't know the rights o't,' he said.
'It is of no importance,' said Troy, lightly. 'Well,
I shall be down in the fields with you some time this
week ; but I have a few matters to attend to first. So
good-day to you. We shall, of course, keep on just as
friendly terms as usual. I'm not a proud man : nobody
is ever able to say that of Sergeant Troy. However,
what is must be, and here's half-a-crown to drink my
health, men.'
Troy threw the coin dexterously across the front plot
and over the fence towards Gabriel, who shunned it in
its fall, his face turning to an angry red. Coggan
twirled his eye, edged
<P 296>
forward, and caught the money
in its ricochet upon the road.
' very weli-you keep it, Coggan,' said Gabriel with
disdain and almost fiercely. 'As for me, I'll do with+
out gifts from him !'
'Don't show it too much,' said Coggan, musingly.
'For if he's married to her, mark my words, he'll buy
his discharge and be our master here. Therefore 'tis
well to say '' Friend '' outwardly, though you say
''Troublehouse '' within. '
' Weli-perhaps it is best to be silent; but I can't
go further than that. I can't flatter, and if my place
here is only to be kept by smoothing him down, my
place must be lost.'
A horseman, whom they had for some time seen in
the distance, now appeared close beside them.
' There's Mr. Boldwood,' said Oak. ' I wonder what
Troy meant by his question.'
Coggan and Oak nodded respectfully to the farmer,
just checked their paces to discover if they were wanted,
and finding they were not stood back to let him pass on.
The only signs of the terrible sorrow Boldwood had
been combating through the night, and was combating
now, were the want of colour in his welidefined face,
the enlarged appearance of the veins in his forehead
and temples, and the sharper lines about his mouth.
The horse bore him away, and the very step of the
animal seemed significant of dogged despair. Gabriel, for
a minute, rose above his own grief in noticing Boldwood's.
He saw the square figure sitting erect upon the horse,
the head turned to neither side, the elbows steady by
the hips, the brim of the hat level and undisturbed in
its onward glide, until the keen edges of Boldwood's
shape sank by degrees over the hill. To one who knew
the man and his story there was something more striking
in this immobility than in a collapse. The clash of
discord between mood and matter here was forced
painfully home to the heart ; and, as in laughter there are
more dreadful phases than in tears, so was there in the
steadiness of this agonized man an expression deeper
than a cry.
<C xxxvi>
<P 297>
WEALTH IN JEOPARDY -- THE RVEEL
ONE night, at the end of August, when Bathsheba's
experiences as a married woman were still new, and
when the weather was yet dry and sultry, a man stood
motionless in the stackyard of Weatherbury Upper
Farm, looking at the moon and sky.
The night had a sinister aspect. A heated breeze
from the south slowly fanned the summits of lofty
objects, and in the sky dashes of buoyant cloud were
sailing in a course at right angles to that of another
stratum, neither of them in the direction of the breeze
below. The moon, as seen through these films, had
a lurid metallic look. The fields were sallow with the
impure light, and all were tinged in monochrome, as
if beheld through stained glass. The same evening
the sheep had trailed homeward head to tail, the
behaviour of the rooks had heen confused, and the
horses had moved with timidity and caution.
Thunder was imminent, and, taking some secondary
appearances into consideration, it was likely to be
followed by one of the lengthened rains which mark
the close of dry weather for the season. Before twelve
hours had passed a harvest atmosphere would be a
bygone thing.
Oak gazed with misgiving at eight naked and un'
protected ricks, massive and heavy with the rich
produce of one-half the farm for that year. He went
on to the barn.
This was the night which had been selected by
Sergeant Troy -- ruling now in the room of his wife --
for giving the harvest supper and dance. As Oak
approached the building the sound of violins and a
tambourine, and the regular jigging of many feet, grew
more distinct. He came close to the large doors, one
of which stood slightly ajar, and looked in.
The central space, together with the recess at one
end, was
<P 298>
emptied of all incumbrances, and this area,
covering about two-thirds of the whole, was appropriated
for the gathering, the remaining end, which was piled
to the ceiling with oats, being screened off with sail'
cloth. Tufts and garlands of green foliage decomted
the walls, beams, and extemporized chandeliers, and
immediately opposite to Oak a rostrum had been
erected, bearing a table and chairs. Here sat three
fiddlers, and beside them stood a frantic man with his
hair on end, perspiration streaming down his cheeks,
and a tanabourine quivering in his hand.
The dance ended, and on the black oak floor in the
midst a new row of couples formed for another.
'Now, ma'am, and no offence I hope, I ask what
dance you would like next ?' said the first violin.
'Really, it makes no difference,' said the clear voice
of Bathsheba, who stood at the inner end of the build+
ing, observing the scene from behind a table covered
with cups and viands. Troy was lolling beside her.
'Then,' said the fiddler, 'I'll venture to name that
the right and proper thing is ''The Soldier's Joy'' --
there being a gallant soldier married into the farm --
hey, my sonnies, and gentlemen all ? '
'It shall be ''The Soldier's Joy,''' exclaimed a
chorus.
'Thanks for the compliment,' said the sergeant
THE REVEL
gaily, taking Bathsheba by the hand and leading her
to the top of the dance. 'For though I have pur+
chased my discharge from Her Most Gracious Majesty's
regiment of cavalry the 11th Dragoon Guards, to attend
to the new duties awaiting me here, I shall continue a
soldier in spirit and feeling as long as I live.'
So the dance began. As to the merits of 'The
Soldier's Joy,' there cannot be, and never were, two
opinions. It has been observed in the musical circles
of Weatherbury and its vicinity that this melody, at
the end of three-quarters of an hour of thunderous
footing, still possesses more stimulative properties for
the heel and toe than the majority of other dances at
their first opening. 'The Soldier's Joy' has, too, an
additional charm, in being so admirably adapted to
the tambourine aforesaid -- no mean instrument in the
hands of a performer
<P 299>
who understands the proper
convulsions, spasms, St. vitus's dances, and fearful
frenzies necessary when exhibiting its tones in their
highest perfection.
The immortal tune ended, a fine DD rolling forth
from the bass-viol with the sonorousness of a cannonade,
and Gabriel delayed his entry no longer. He avoided
Bathsheba, and got as near as possible to the platform,
where Sergeant Troy was now seated, drinking brandy+
and-water, though the others drank without exception
cider and ale. Gabriel could not easily thrust himself
within speaking distance of the sergeant, and he sent
a message, asking him to come down for a moment.
'The sergeant said he could not attend.
'Will you tell him, then,' said Gabriel, 'that I only
stepped ath'art to say that a heavy rain is sure to fall
soon, and that something should be done to protect
the ricks ?'
'M. Troy says it will not rain,' returned the
messenger, 'and he cannot stop to talk to you about
such fidgets.'
In Juxtaposition with Troy, Oak had a melancholy
tendency to look like a candle beside gas, and ill at
ease, he went out again, thinking he would go home ;
for, under the circumstances, he had no heart for the
scene in the barn. At the door he paused for a
moment : Troy was speaking.
'Friends, it is not only the harvest home that we
are celebrating to-night; but this is also a Wedding
Feast. A short time ago I had the happiness to lead
to the altar this lady, your mistress, and not until now
have we been able to give any public flourish to the
event in Weatherbury. That it may be thoroughly
well done, and that every man may go happy to bed,
I have ordered to be brought here some bottles of
brandy and kettles of hot water. A treble-strong
goblet will he handed round to each guest.'
Bathsheba put her hand upon his arm, and, with
upturned pale face, said imploringly, ' No -- don't give
it to them -- pray don't, Frank .! It will only do them
harm : they have had enough of everything.'
'True -- we don't wish for no more, thank ye,' said
one or two.
'Pooh .! ' said the sergeant contemptuously, and
raised his
<P 300>
voice as if lighted up by a new idea.
' Friends,' he said, ' we'll send the women-folk home .!
'Tis time they were in bed. Then we cockbirds will
have a jolly carouse to ourselves .! If any of the men
show the white feather, let them look elsewhere for a
winter's work.'
Bathsheba indignantly left the barn, followed by
all the women and children. The musicians, not
looking upon themselves as ' company,' slipped quietly
away to their spring waggon and put in the horse.
Thus Troy and the men on the farm were left sole
occupants of the place. Oak, not to appear unneces+
sarily disagreeable, stayed a little while ; then he, too,
arose and quietly took his departure, followed by a
friendly oath from the sergeant for not staying to a
second round of grog.
Gabriel proceeded towards his home. In approach+
ing the door, his toe kicked something which felt and
sounded soft, leathery, and distended, like a boxing+
glove. It was a large toad humbly travelling across
the path. Oak took it up, thinking it might be better
to kill the creature to save it from pain; but finding
it uninjured, he placed it again among the grass. He
knew what this direct message from the Great Mother
meant. And soon came another.
When he struck a light indoors there appeared upon
the table a thin glistening streak, as if a brush of varnish
had been lightly dragged across it. Oak's eyes followed
the serpentine sheen to the other side, where it led up
to a huge brown garden-slug, which had come indoors
to-night for reasons of its own. It was Nature's second
way of hinting to him that he was to prepare for foul
weather.
Oak sat down meditating for nearly an hour.
During this time two black spiders, of the kind common
in thatched houses, promenaded the ceiling, ultimately
dropping to the floor. This reminded him that if there
was one class of manifestation on this matter that he
thoroughly understood, it was the instincts of sheep.
He left the room, ran across two or three fields towards
the flock, got upon a hedge, and looked over among
them.
They were crowded close together on the other side
around some
<P 301>
furze bushes, and the first peculiarity ob+
servable was that, on the sudden appearance of Oak's
head over the fence, they did not stir or run away.
They had now a terror of something greater than their
terror of man. But this was not the most noteworthy
feature : they were all grouped in such a way that their
tails, without a single exception, were towards that half
of the horizon from which the storm threatened. There
was an inner circle closely huddled, and outside these
they radiated wider apart, the pattern formed by the
flock as a whole not being unlike a vandyked lace
collar, to which the clump of furze-bushes stood in the
position of a wearer's neck.
opinion. He knew now that he was right, and that
Troy was wrong. Every voice in nature was unanimous
in bespeaking change. But two distinct translations
attached to these dumb expressions. Apparently there
was to be a thunder-storm, and afterwards a cold con+
tinuous rain. The creeping things seemed to know all
about the later rain, hut little of the interpolated
thunder-storm ; whilst the sheep knew all about the
thunder-storm and nothing of the later rain.
This complication of weathers being uncommon,
was all the more to be feared. Oak returned to the
stack-yard. All was silent here, and the conical tips of
the ricks jutted darkly into the sky. There were five
wheat-ricks in this yard, and three stacks of barley.
The wheat when threshed would average about thirty
quarters to each stack ; the barley, at least forty. Their
value to Bathsheba, and indeed to anybody, Oak
mentally estimated by the following simple calcula+
tion : --
5 x 30 = 150 quarters= 500fl.
3 x 40=120 quarters= 250l.
Total . . 750l.
Seven hundred and fifty pounds in the divinest form
that money can wear -- that of necessary food for man
and beast : should the risk be run cf deteriorating this
bulk of corn to less than half its value, because of the
instability of a woman ? 'Never, if I can prevent it.! '
said Gabriel.
<P 302>
Such was the argument that Oak set outwardly before
him. But man, even to himself, is a palimpsest, having
an ostensible writing, and another beneath the lines.
It is possible that there was this golden legend under
the utilitarian one: 'I will help to my last effort the
woman I have loved so dearly.'
He went back to the barn to endeavour to obtain
assistance for covering the ricks that very
<P 303>
night. All
was silent within, and he would have passed on in the
belief that the party had broken up, had not a dim
light, yellow as saffron by contrast with the greenish
whiteness outside, streamed through a knot-hole in the
folding doors.
Gabriel looked in. An unusual picture met his
eye.
The candles suspended among the evergreens had
burnt down to their sockets, and in some cases the
leaves tied about them were scorched. Many of the
lights had quite gone out, others smoked and stank,
grease dropping from them upon the floor. Here,
under the table, and leaning against forms and chairs
in every conceivable attitude except the perpendicular, !'
were the wretched persons of all the work-folk, the hair
of their heads at such low levels being suggestive of
mops and brooms. In the midst of these shone red
and distinct the figure of Sergeant Troy, leaning back
in a chair. Coggan was on his back, with his mouth
open, huzzing forth snores, as were several others ; the
united breathings of the horizonal assemblage forming
a subdued roar like London from a distance. Joseph
Poorgrass was curled round in the fashion of a hedge+
hog, apparently in attempts to present the least possible
portion of his surface to the air; and behind him was
dimly visible an unimportant remnant of William Smali
bury. The glasses and cups still stood upon the table,
a water-jug being overturned, from which a small rill,
after tracing its course with marvellous precision down
the centre of the long table, fell into the neck of the
unconscious Mark Clark, in a steady, monotonous drip,
like the dripping of a stalactite in a cave.
Gabriel glanced hopelessly at the group, which, with
one or two exceptions, composed all the able-bodied
men upon the farm. He saw at once that if the ricks
were to be saved that night, or even the next morning,
he must save them with his own hands.
A faint ' ting-ting ' resounded from under Coggan's
waistcoat. It was Coggan's watch striking the hour of
two.
Oak went to the recumbent form of Matthew Moon,
who usually undertook the rough thatching of the home+
stead, and shook him. The shaking was without effect.
Gabriel shouted in his ear, ' where's your thatching+
beetle and rick-stick and spars ? '
' Under the staddles,' said Moon, mechanically, with
the unconscious promptness of a medium.
Gabriel let go his head, and it dropped upon the
floor like a bowl. He then went to Susan Tall's
husband.
' where's the key of the granary ? '
No answer. The question was repeated, with the
same result. To be shouted to at night was evidently
less of a novelty to Susan Tall's husband than to
Matthew Moon. Oak flung down Tall's head into the
corner again and turned away.
To be just, the men were not greatly to blame for
this painful and demoralizing termination to the
evening's entertainment. Sergeant Troy had so strenu+
ously insisted, glass in hand, that drinking should be
the bond of their union, that those who wished to refuse
hardly liked to be so unmannerly under the circum+
stances. Having from their youth up been entirely un+
accustomed to any liquor stronger than cider or mild
ale, it was no wonder that they had succumbed, one
and all, with extraordinary uniformity, after the lapse of
about an hour.
Gabriel was greatly depressed. This debauch boded
ill for that wilful and fascinating mistress whom the
faithful man even now felt within him as the embodi+
ment of all that was sweet and bright and hopeless.
He put out the expiring lights, that the barn might
not be endangered, closed the door upon the men in
their deep and oblivious sleep, and went again into the
lone night. A hot breeze, as if breathed from the
parted lips of some dragon about to swallow the globe,
fanned him from the south, while directly opposite in
the north rose a grim misshapen body of
<P 304>
cloud, in the
very teeth of the wind. So unnaturally did it rise that
one could fancy it to be lifted by machinery from below.
Meanwhile the faint cloudlets had flown back into the
south-east corner of the sky, as if in terror of the large
cloud, like a young brood gazed in upon by some
monster.
Going on to the village, Oak flung a small stone
against the window of Laban Tall's bedroom, expecting
Susan to open it ; but nobody stirred. He went round
to the back door, which had been left unfastened for
Laban's entry, and passed in to the foot of the stair+
case.
'Mrs. Tall, I've come for the key of the granary,
to get at the rick-cloths,' said Oak, in a stentorian
voice.
'Is that you ? ' said Mrs. Susan Tall, half awake.
' Yes,' said Gabriel.
'Come along to bed, do, you drawlatching rogue --
keeping a body awake like this .'
'It isn't Laban -- 'tis Gabriel Oak. I want the key
of the granary.'
'Gabriel. what in the name of fortune did you
pretend to be Laban for ?'
' I didn't. I thought you meant --  -- '
'yes you did !. what do you want here ?'
'The key of the granary.'
"Take it then. 'Tis on the nail. People coming
disturbing women at this time of night ought --  -- '
Gabriel took the key, without waiting to hear the
conclusion of the tirade. Ten minutes later his lonely
figure might have been seen dragging four large water+
proof coverings across the yard, and soon two of these
heaps of treasure in grain were covered snug -- two cloths
to each. Two hundred pounds were secured. Three
wheat-stacks remained open, and there were no more
cloths. Oak looked under the staddles and found a
fork. He mounted the third pile of wealth and began
operating, adopting the plan of sloping the upper
sheaves one over the other; and, in addition, filling
the interstices with the material of some untied sheaves.
So far all was well. By this hurried contrivance
Bathsheba's
<P 305>
property in wheat was safe for at any rate
a week or two, provided always that there was not
much wind.
Next came the barley. This it was only possible to
protect by systematic thatching. Time went on, and
the moon vanished not to reappear. It was the
farewell of the ambassador previous to war. The
night had a haggard look, like a sick thing; and there
came finally an utter expiration of air from the whole
heaven in the form of a slow breeze, which might have
been likened to a death. And now nothing was heard
in the yard but the dull thuds of the beetle which drove
in the spars, and the rustle of thatch in the intervals.
THE STORM
<C xxxvii>
<P 306>
THE STORM -- THE TWO TOGETHER
A LIGHT flapped over the scene, as if reflected from
phosphorescent wings crossing the sky, and a rumble
filled the air. It was the first move of the approaching
storm.
The second peal was noisy, with comparatively little
visible lightning. Gabriel saw a candle shining in Bath+
sheba's bedroom, and soon a shadow swept to and fro
upon the blind.
Then there came a third flash. Manoeuvres of a
most extraordinary kind were going on in the vast
firmamental hollows overhead. The lightning now was
the colour of silver, and gleamed in the heavens like a
mailed army. Rumbles became rattles. Gabriel from
his elevated position could see over the landscape at
least half-a-dozen miles in front. Every hedge, bush,
and tree was distinct as in a line engraving. In a
paddock in the same direction was a herd of heifers,
and the forms of these were visible at this moment in
the act of galloping about in the wildest and maddest
confusion, flinging their heels and tails high into the air,
their heads to earth. A poplar in the immediate fore+
ground was like an ink stroke on burnished tin. Then
the picture vanished, leaving the darkness so intense
that Gabriel worked entirely by feeling with his hands.
He had stuck his ricking-rod, or poniard, as it was
indifferently called -- a long iron lance, polished by
handling -- into the stack, used to support the sheaves
instead of the support called a groom used on houses,
A blue light appeared in the zenith, and in some in+
describable manner flickered down near the top of the
rod. It was the fourth of the larger flashes. A moment
later and there was a smack -- smart, clear, and short,
Gabriel felt his position to be anything but a safe one,
and he resolved to descend.
Not a drop of rain had fallen as yet. He wiped his
weary brow, and looked again at the black forms of
the unprotected
<P 307>
stacks. Was his life so valuable to
him after all? What were his prospects that he
should be so chary of running risk, when important
and urgent labour could not be carried on without
such risk ? He resolved to stick to the stack. How+
ever, he took a precaution. Under the staddles was
a long tethering chain, used to prevent the escape of
errant horses. This he carried up the ladder, and
sticking his rod through the clog at one end, allowed
the other end of the chain to trail upon the ground
The spike attached to it he drove in. Under the
shadow of this extemporized lightning-conductor he
felt himself comparatively safe.
Before Oak had laid his hands upon his tools again
out leapt the fifth flash, with the spring of a serpent
and the shout of a fiend. It was green as an
emerald, and the reverberation was stunning. What
was this the light revealed to him? In the open
ground before him, as he looked over the ridge of
the rick, was a dark and apparently female form.
Could it be that of the only venturesome woman in
the parish -- Bathsheba ? The form moved on a step :
then he could see no more.
"Is that you, ma'am ? ' said Gabriel to the darkness.
"Who is there ?' said the voice of Bathsheba,
THE TWO TOGETHER
"Gabriel. I am on the rick, thatching.'
"O, Gabriel ! -- and are you ? I have come about
them. The weather awoke me, and I thought of the
corn. I am so distressed about it -- can we save it any+
how ? I cannot find my husband. Is he with you ?'
"He is not here.'
"Do you know where he is ?'
"Asleep in the barn.'
"He promised that the stacks should be seen to,
and now they are all neglected ! Can I do anything
to help ? Liddy is afraid to come out. Fancy finding
you here at such an hour ! Surely I can do something ? '
"You can bring up some reed-sheaves to me, one by
one, ma'am; if you are not afraid to come up the ladder
in the dark,' said Gabriel. "Every moment is precious
now, and that would save a good deal of time. It is
not very dark when the lightning has been gone a bit.'
<P 308>
"I'll do anything ! ' she said, resolutely. She instantly
took a sheaf upon her shoulder, clambered up close to
his heels, placed it behind the rod, and descended for
another. At her third ascent the rick suddenly brightened
with the brazen glare of shining majolica -- every knot
in every straw was visible. On the slope in front of him
appeared two human shapes, black as jet. The rick
lost its sheen -- -the shapes vanished. Gabriel turned his
head. It had been the sixth flash which had come from
the east behind him, and the two dark forms on the
slope had been the shadows of himself and Bathsheba.
Then came the peal. It hardly was credible that
such a heavenly light could be the parent of such a
diabolical sound.
"How terrible ! ' she exclaimed, and clutched him by
the sleeve. Gabriel turned, and steadied her on her
aerial perch by holding her arm. At the same moment,
while he was still reversed in his attitude, there was
more light, and he saw, as it were, a copy of the tall
poplar tree on the hill drawn in black on the wall of
the barn. It was the shadow of that tree, thrown across
by a secondary flash in the west.
The next flare came. Bathsheba was on the ground
now, shouldering another sheaf, and she bore its dazzle
without flinching -- thunder and ali-and again ascended
with the load. There was then a silence everywhere
for four or five minutes, and the crunch of the spars,
as Gabriel hastily drove them in, could again be distinctly
heard. He thought the crisis of the storm had passed.
But there came a burst of light.
"Hold on ! ' said Gabriel, taking the sheaf from her
shoulder, and grasping her arm again.
Heaven opened then, indeed. The flash was almost
too novel for its inexpressibly dangerous nature to be
at once realized, and they could only comprehend the
magnificence of its beauty. It sprang from east, west,
north, south, and was a perfect dance of death. The
forms of skeletons appeared in the air, shaped with
blue fire for bones -- dancing, leaping, striding, racing
around, and mingling altogether in unparalleled con+
fusion. With these were intertwined undulating snakes of
green, and behind these was a broad mass of lesser light.
Simultaneously came from every part of the tumbling
<P 309>
sky what may be called a shout ; since, though no shout
ever came near it, it was more of the nature of a shout
than of anything eise earthly. In the meantime one of
the grisly forms had alighted upon the point of Gabriel's
rod, to run invisibly down it, down the chain, and into
the earth. Gabriel was almost blinded, and he could
feel Bathsheba's warm arm tremble in his hand -- a
sensation novel and thrilling enough ; but love, life,
everything human, seemed small and trifling in such
close juxtaposition with an infuriated universe.
Oak had hardly time to gather up these impressions
into a thought, and to see how strangely the red feather
of her hat shone in this light, when the tall tree on the
hill before mentioned seemed on fire to a white heat,
and a new one among these terrible voices mingled with
the last crash of those preceding. It was a stupefying
blast, harsh and pitiless, and it fell upon their ears in a
dead, flat blow, without that reverberation which lends
the tones of a drum to more distant thunder. By the
lustre reflected from every part of the earth and from the
wide domical scoop above it, he saw that the tree was
sliced down the whole length of its tall, straight stem, a
huge riband of bark being apparently flung off. The
other portion remained erect, and revealed the bared
surface as a strip of white down the front. The
lightning had struck the tree. A sulphurous smell
filled the air; then all was silent, and black as a cave
in Hinnom.
" We had a narrow escape ! ' said Gabriel, hurriedly.
" You had better go down.'
Bathsheba said nothing ; but he could distinctly hear
her rhythmical pants, and the recurrent rustle of the
sheaf beside her in response to her frightened pulsations.
She descended the ladder, and, on second thoughts, he
followed her. The darkness was now impenetrable by
the sharpest vision. They both stood still at the
bottom, side by side. Bathsheba appeared to think
only of the weather -- Oak thought only of her just then.
At last he said --
"The storm seems to have passed now, at any
rate.'
" I think so too,' said Bathsheba. " Though there
are multitudes of gleams, look ! '
<P 310>
The sky was now filled with an incessant light,
frequent repetition melting into complete continuity, as
an unbroken sound results from the successive strokes
on a gong.
" Nothing serious,' said he. " I cannot understand
no rain falling. But Heaven be praised, it is all the
better for us. I am now going up again.'
" Gabriel, you are kinder than I deserve ! I will stay
and help you yet. O, why are not some of the others
here ! '
" They would have been here if they could,' said Oak,
in a hesitating way.
'O, I know it ali-all,' she said, adding slowly :
" They are all asleep in the barn, in a drunken sleep, and
my husband among them. That's it, is it not ? Don't
think I am a timid woman and can't endure things.'
"I am not certain,' said Gabriel. 'I will go and see,'
He crossed to the barn, leaving her there alone. He
looked through the chinks of the door. All was in
total darkness, as he had left it, and there still arose, as
at the former time, the steady buzz of many snores.
He felt a zephyr curling about his cheek, and turned.
It was Bathsheba's breath -- she had followed him, and
was looking into the same chink.
He endeavoured to put off the immediate and pain+
ful subject of their thoughts by remarking gently, "lf
you'll come back again, miss -- ma'am, and hand up a
few more; it would save much time.'
Then Oak went back again, ascended to the top,
stepped off the ladder for greater expedition, and went
on thatching. She followed, but without a sheaf
" Gabriel,' she said, in a strange and impressive voice.
Oak looked up at her. She had not spoken since
he left the barn. The soft and continual shimmer of
the dying lightning showed a marble face high against
the black sky of the opposite quarter. Bathsheba was
sitting almost on the apex of the stack, her feet gathered
up beneath her, and resting on the top round of the
ladder.
" Yes, mistress,' he said.
<P 311>
"I suppose you thought that when I galloped away
to Bath that night it was on purpose to be married ?"
'I did at last -- not at first,' he answered, somewhat
surprised at the abruptness with which this new subject
was broached.
" And others thought so, too ? '
" Yes.'
"And you blamed me for it ?'
" Weli-a little.'
"I thought so. Now, I care a little for your good
opinion, and I want to explain something-i have
longed to do it ever since I returned, and you looked so
gravely at me. For if I were to die -- and I may die
soon -- it would be dreadful that you should always think
mistakenly of me. Now, listen.'
Gabriel ceased his rustling.
'I went to Bath that night in the full intention of
breaking off my engagement to Mr. Troy. It was owing
to circumstances which occurred after I got there that
 -- that we were married. Now, do you see the matter
in a new light?'
" I do -- somewhat.'
" I must, I suppose, say more, now that I have
begun. And perhaps it's no harm, for you are certainly
under no delusion that I ever loved you, or that I can
have any object in speaking, more than that object I
have mentioned. Well, I was alone in a strange city,
and the horse was lame. And at last I didn't know
what to do. I saw, when it was too late, that scandal
might seize hold of me for meeting him alone in that
way. But I was coming away, when he suddenly said
he had that day seen a woman more beautiful than I,
and that his constancy could not be counted on unless
I at once became his.... And I was grieved and
troubled --  -- ' She cleared her voice, and waited a
moment, as if to gather breath. " And then, between
jealousy and distraction, I married him ! ' she whispered
with desperate impetuosity.
Gabriel made no reply.
"He was not to blame, for it was perfectly true about
 -- about his seeing somebody else,' she quickly added.
"And now I don't wish for a single remark from you
upon the subject --
<P 312>
indeed, I forbid it. I only wanted
you to know that misunderstood bit of my history before
a time comes when you could never know it. -- You want
some more sheaves ? '
She went down the ladder, and the work proceeded.
Gabriel soon perceived a languor in the movements of
his mistress up and down, and he said to her, gently as
a mother --
"I think you had better go indoors now, you are
tired. I can finish the rest alone. If the wind does
not change the rain is likely to keep off.'
"If I am useless I will go,' said Bathsheba, in a
flagging cadence. 'But O, if your life should be lost !'
" You are not useless; but I would rather not tire
you longer. You have done well.'
"And you better ! ' she said, gratefully. ! Thank you
for your devotion, a thousand times, Gabriel ! Good+
night-i know you are doing your very best for me.'
She diminished in the gloom, and vanished, and he
heard the latch of the gate fall as she passed through.
He worked in a reverie now, musing upon her story, and
upon the contradictoriness of that feminine heart which
had caused her to speak more warmly to him to-night
than she ever had done whilst unmarried and free to
speak as warmly as she chose.
He was disturbed in his meditation by a grating
noise from the coach-house. It was the vane on the
roof turning round, and this change in the wind was the
signal for a disastrous rain.
RAIN
<C xxxviii>
<P 313>
RAIN -- ONE SOLITARY MEETS ANOTHER
IT was now five o'clock, and the dawn was promising
to break in hues of drab and ash.
The air changed its temperature and stirred itself
more vigorously. Cool breezes coursed in transparent
eddies round Oak's face. The wind shifted yet a point
or two and blew stronger. In ten minutes every wind
of heaven seemed to be roaming at large. Some of the
thatching on the wheat-stacks was now whirled fantas+
tically aloft, and had to be replaced and weighted with
some rails that lay near at hand. This done, Oak slaved
away again at the barley. A huge drop of rain smote
his face, the wind snarled round every corner, the trees
rocked to the bases of their trunks, and the twigs clashed
in strife. Driving in spars at any point and on any
system, inch by inch he covered more and more safely
from ruin this distracting impersonation of seven hundred
pounds. 'The rain came on in earnest, and Oak soon felt
the water to be tracking cold and clammy routes down
his back. Ultimately he was reduced welinigh to a
homogeneous sop, and the dyes of his clothes trickled
down and stood in a pool at the foot of the ladder.
The rain stretched obliquely through the dull atmo+
sphere in liquid spines, unbroken in continuity between
their beginnings in the clouds and their points in him.
Oak suddenly remembered that eight months before
this time he had been fighting against fire in the same
spot as desperately as he was fighting against water
now -- and for a futile love of the same woman. As for
her --  --  But Oak was generous and true, and dis+
missed his reflections.
It was about seven o'clock in the dark leaden
morning when Gabriel came down from the last stack,
and thankfully exclaimed, "It is done .! ' He was
<P 314>
drenched, weary, and sad, and yet not so sad as drenched
and weary, for he was cheered by a sense of success in
a good cause.
Faint sounds came from the barn, and he looked
that way. Figures stepped singly and in pairs through
the doors -- all walking awkwardly, and abashed, save
the foremost, who wore a red jacket, and advanced
with his hands in his pockets, whistling. The others
shambled after with a conscience-stricken air : the whole
procession was not unlike Flaxman's group of the suitors
tottering on towards the infernal regions under the
conduct of Mercury. The gnarled shapes passed into
the village, Troy, their leader, entering the farmhouse.
Not a single one of them had turned his face to the
ricks, or apparently bestowed one thought upon their
condition.
Soon Oak too went homeward, by a different route
from theirs. In front of him against the wet glazed
surface of the lane he saw a person walking yet more
slowly than himself under an umbrella. The man
turned and plainly started; he was Boldwood.
" How are you this morning, sir ?' said Oak.
"Yes, it is a wet day. -- Oh, I am well, very well, I
thank you ; quite well.'
"I am glad to hear it, sir.'
Boldwood seemed to awake to the present by degrees.
" You look tired and ill, Oak,' he said then, desultorily
regarding his companion.
" I am tired. You look strangely altered, sir.'
"I? Not a bit of it : I am well enough. What put
that into your head ?'
"I thought you didn't look quite so topping as you
used to, that was all.'
" Indeed, then you are mistaken,' said Boldwood,
shortly. "Nothing hurts me. My constitution is an
iron one.'
"I've been working hard to get our ricks covered,
and was barely in time. Never had such a struggle in
my life.... Yours of course are safe, sir.'
" O yes.' Boldwood added, after an interval of
silence : " What did you ask, Oak ? '
" Your ricks are all covered before this time ? '
<P 315>
"No.'
" At any rate, the large ones upon the stone staddles ?'
" They are not.'
"Them under the hedge ?'
" No. I forgot to tell the thatcher to set about it.'
" Nor the little one by the stile ?'
"Nor the little one by the stile. I overlooked the
ricks this year.'
'Then not a tenth of your corn will come to measure,
sir.'
" Possibly not.
" Overlooked them,' repeated Gabriel slowly to him+
self. It is difficult to describe the intensely dramatic
effect that announcement had upon Oak at such a
moment. All the night he had been feeling that the
neglect he was labouring to repair was abnormal and
isolated -- the only instance of the kind within the circuit
of the county. Yet at this very time, within the same
parish, a greater waste had been going on, uncomplained
of and disregarded. A few months earlier Boldwood's
forgetting his husbandry would have been as preposter+
ous an idea as a sailor forgetting he was in a ship. Oak
was just thinking that whatever he himself might have
suffered from Bathsheba's marriage, here was a man
who had suffered more, when Boldwood spoke in a
changed voice -- that of one who yearned to make a
confidence and relieve his heart by an outpouring.
"Oak, you know as well as I that things have gone
wrong with me lately. I may as well own it. I was
going to get a little settled in life; but in some way my
plan has come to nothing.'
"I thought my mistress would have married you,'
said Gabriel, not knowing enough of the full depths of
Boldwood's love to keep silence on the farmer's account,
and determined not to evade discipline by doing so on
his own. 'However, it is so sometimes, and nothing
happens that we expect,' he added, with the repose of
a man whom misfortune had inured rather than sub+
dued.
'I daresay I am a joke about the parish,' said Bold+
wood, as if the subject came irresistibly to his tongue,
and with a miserable lightness meant to express his
indifference.
<P 316>
" O no -- I don't think that.'
 -- But the real truth of the matter is that there was
not, as some fancy, any jilting on -- her part. No
engagement ever existed between me and Miss Ever+
dene. People say so, but it is untrue: she never
promised me .! ' Boldwood stood still now and turned
his wild face to Oak. 'O, Gabriel,' he continued, "I
am weak and foolish, and I don't know what, and I
can't fend off my miserable grief ! ... I had some faint
belief in the mercy of God till I lost that woman. Yes,
He prepared a gourd to shade me, and like the prophet
I thanked Him and was glad. But the next day He
prepared a worm to smite the gourd and wither it; and
I feel it is better to die than to live.!"
A silence followed. Boldwood aroused himself from
the momentary mood of confidence into which he had
drifted, and walked on again, resuming his usual reserve,
" No, Gabriel,' he resumed, with a carelessness which
was like the smile on the countenance of a skull: "it
was made more of by other people than ever it was by
us. I do feel a little regret occasionally, but no woman
ever had power over me for any length of time. Well,
good morning ; I can trust you not to mention to others
what has passed between us two here.'
<C xxxix>
<P 317>
COMING HOME -- A CRY
ON the turnpke road, between Casterbridge and
Weatherbury, and about three miles from the former
which pervade the highways of this undulating part of
South Wessex. I returning from market it is usual
for the farmers and other gig-gentry to alight at the
bottom and walk up.
One Saturday evening in the month of October
Bathsheba's vehicle was duly creeping up this incline.
She was sitting listlessly in the second seat of the gig,
whilst walking beside her in farmer's marketing suit
of unusually fashionable cut was an erect, welimade
young man. Though on foot, he held the reins and
whip, and occasionally aimed light cuts at the horse's
ear with the end of the lash, as a recreation. This
man was her husband, formerly Sergeant Troy, who,
having bought his discharge with Bathsheba's money,
was gradually transforming himself into a farmer of a
spirited and very modern school. People of unalter+
able ideas still insisted upon calling him 'Sergeant'
when they met him, which was in some degree owing
to his having still retained the welishaped moustache
of his military days, and the soldierly bearing insepar+
able from his form and training.
"Yes, if it hadn't been for that wretched rain I
should have cleared two hundred as easy as looking,
my love,' he was saying. "Don't you see, it altered
all the chances? To speak like a book I once read,
wet weather is the narrative, and fine days are the
episodes, of our country's history; now, isn't that
true?'
' But the time of year is come for changeable weather.'
"Well, yes. The fact is, these autumn races are the
ruin of everybody. Never did I see such a day as 'twas .!
'Tis a wild open place, just out of Budmouth, and a
drab sea rolled in
<P 318>
towards us like liquid misery. Wind
and rain -- good Lord !. Dark ? Why, 'twas as black
as my hat before the last race was run. 'Twas five
o'clock, and you couldn't see the horses till they were
almost in, leave alone colours. The ground was as
heavy as lead, and all judgment from a fellow's experi+
ence went for nothing. Horses, riders, people, were
all blown about like ships at sea. Three booths were
blown over, and the wretched folk inside crawled out
upon their hands and knees; and in the next field
were as many as a dozen hats at one time. Aye,
Pimpernel regularly stuck fast, when about sixty yards
off, and when I saw Policy stepping on, it did knock
my heart against the lining of my ribs, I assure you,
my love.!'
" And you mean, Frank,' said Bathsheba, sadly --
her voice was painfully lowered from the fulness and
vivacity of the previous summer -- "that you have lost
more than a hundred pounds in a month by this
dreadful horse-racing ? O, Frank, it is cruel; it is
foolish of you to take away my money so. We shall
have to leave the farm; that will be the end of it !.'
' Humbug about cruel. Now, there 'tis again --
turn on the waterworks ; that's just like you.'
"But you'll promise me not to go to Budmouth
second meeting, won't you ? ' she implored. Bathsheba
was at the full depth for tears, but she maintained a
dry eye.
"I don't see why I should; in fact, if it turns out to
be a fine day, I was thinking of taking you.'
"Never, never.! I'll go a hundred miles the other
way first. I hate the sound of the very word.!'
"But the question of going to see the race or staying
at home has very little to do with the matter. Bets are
all booked safely enough before the race begins, you
may depend. Whether it is a bad race for me or a
good one, will have very little to do with our going
there next Monday.'
"But you don't mean to say that you have risked
anything on this one too .! ' she exclaimed, with an
agonized look.
"There now, don't you be a little fool. Wait till you
are told. Why, Bathsheba, you have lost all the pluck
and sauciness you formerly had, and upon my life if I
had known what a
<P 319>
chicken-hearted creature you were
under all your boldness, I'd never have-i know what.'
A flash of indignation might have been seen in
Bathsheba's dark eyes as she looked resolutely ahead
after this reply. They moved on without further
speech, some early-withered leaves from the trees which
hooded the road at this spot occasionally spinning
downward across their path to the earth.
A woman appeared on the brow of the hill. The
ridge was in a cutting, so that she was very near the
husband and wife before she became visible. Troy had
turned towards the gig to remount, and whilst putting
his foot on the step-the woman passed behind him.
Though the overshadowing trees and the approach
of eventide enveloped them in gloom, Bathsheba could
see plainly enough to discern the extreme poverty of
the woman's garb, and the sadness of her face.
"Please, sir, do you know at what time Casterbridge
Union-house closes at night ? '
A CRY
The woman said these words to Troy over his
shoulder.
Troy started visibly at the sound of the voice; yet
he seemed to recover presence of mind sufficient to
prevent himself from giving way to his impulse to
suddenly turn and face her. He said, slowly --
" I don't know."
The woman, on hearing him speak, quickly looked
up, examined the side of his face, and recognized the
soldier under the yeoman's garb. Her face was drawn
into an expression which had gladness and agony both
among its elements. She uttered an hysterical cry,
and fell down.
" O, poor thing.!' exclaimed Bathsheba, instantly
preparing to alight.
"Stay where you are, and attend to the horse!'
said Troy, peremptorily throwing her the reins and
the whip. "Walk the horse to the top: I'll see to
the woman.'
" But i -- -'
" Do you hear? Clk -- Poppet.!'
<P 320>
The horse, gig, and Bathsheba moved on.
"How on earth did you come here? I thought
you were miles away, or dead.! Why didn't you
write to me?' said Troy to the woman, in a strangely
gentle, yet hurried voice, as he lifted her up.
" I feared to."
'Have you any money?'
"None."
"Good Heaven -- I wish I had more to give you!.
Here's  --  wretched  --  the merest trifle. It is every
farthing I have left. I have none but what my wife
gives me, you know, and I can't ask her now.'
The woman made no answer.
"I have only another moment,' continued Troy;
'and now listen. Where are you going to-night?
Casterbridge Union?'
"Yes; I thought to go there.'
" You shan't go there; yet, wait. Yes, perhaps for
to-night ; I can do nothing better -- worse luck.! Sleep
there to-night, and stay there to-morrow. Monday is
the first free day I have; and on Monday morning,
at ten exactly, meet me on Grey's Bridge just out of the
town. I'll bring all the money I can muster. You
shan't want-i'll see that, Fanny; then I'll get you a
lodging somewhere. Good-bye till then. I am a brute
 -- but good-bye.!'
After advancing the distance which completed the
ascent of the hill, Bathsheba turned her head. The
woman was upon her feet, and Bathsheba saw her
withdrawing from Troy, and going feebly down the
hill by the third milestone from Casterbridge. Troy
then came on towards his wife, stepped into the gig,
took the reins from her hand, and without making any
observation whipped the horse into a trot. He was
rather agitated.
"Do you know who that woman was?' said Bath+
sheba, looking searchingly into his face.
"I do,' he said, looking boldly back into hers.
"I thought you did,' said she, with angry hauteur,
and still regarding him. " Who is she?'
<P 321>
He suddenly seemed to think that frankness would
benefit neither of the women.
'Nothing to either of us,' he said. "I know her
by sight."
'What is her name?'
"How should I know her name ?'
"I think you do.'
"Think if you will, and be --  -- " The sentence was
completed by a smart cut of the whip round Poppet's
flank, which caused the animal to start forward at a
wild pace. No more was said.
ON CASTERBRIDGE HIGHWAY
<C xl>
<P 322>
FOR a considerable time the woman walked on. Her
steps became feebler, and she strained her eyes to look
afar upon the naked road, now indistinct amid the
penumbrae of night. At length her onward walk
dwindled to the merest totter, and she opened a gate
within which was a haystack. Underneath this she sat
down and presently slept.
When the woman awoke it was to find herself in the
depths of a moonless and starless night. A heavy un+
broken crust of cloud stretched across the sky, shutting
out every speck of heaven ; and a distant halo which
hung over the town of Casterbridge was visible against
the black concave, the luminosity appearing the
brighter by its great contrast with the circumscribing
darkness. Towards this weak, soft glow the woman
turned her eyes.
"If I could only get there.!' she said. "Meet him
the day after to-morrow: God help me! Perhaps I
shall be in my grave before then.'
A manor-house clock from the far depths of shadow
struck the hour, one, in a small, attenuated tone. After
midnight the voice of a clock seems to lose in breadth
as much as in length, and to diminish its sonorousness
to a thin falsetto.
Afterwards a light -- two lights -- arose frona the re+
mote shade, and grew larger. A carriage rolled along
the toad, and passed the gate. It probably contained
some late diners-out. The beams from one lamp shone
for a moment upon the crouching woman, and threw
her face into vivid relieff. The face was young in the
groundwork, old in the finish ; the general contours
were flexuous and childlike, but the finer lineaments
had begun to be sharp and thin.
The pedestrian stood up, apparently with revived
determination, and looked around. The road appeared
to be
<P 323>
familiar to her, and she carefully scanned the fence
as she slowly walked along. Presently there became
visible a dim white shape; it was another milestone.
She drew her fingers across its face to feel the marks.
"Two more!' she said.
She leant against the stone as a means of rest for a
 short interval, then bestirred herself, and again pursued
her way. For a slight distance she bore up bravely,
afterwards flagging as before. This was beside a lone
copsewood, wherein heaps of white chips strewn upon
the leafy ground showed that woodmen had been
faggoting and making hurdles during the day. Now
there was not a rustle, not a breeze, not the faintest
clash of twigs to keep her company. The woman
looked over the gat, opened it, and went in. Close
to the entrance stood a row of faggots, bound and un+
bound, together with stakes of all sizes.
For a few seconds the wayfarer stood with that tense
stillness which signifies itself to be not the end but
merely the suspension, of a previous motion. Her
attitude was that of a person who listens, either to the
external world of sound, or to the imagined discourse of
thought. A close criticism might have detected signs
proving that she was intent on the latter alternative.
Moreover, as was shown by what followed, she was
oddly exercising the faculty of invention upon the spe+
ciality of the clever Jacquet Droz, the designer of auto+
matic substitutes for human limbs.
By the aid of the Casterbridge aurora, and by feeling
with her hands, the woman selected two sticks from the
heaps. These sticks were nearly straight to the height
of three or four feet, where each branched into a fork
like the letter Y. She sat down, snapped off the small
upper twigs, and carried the remainder with her into
the road. She placed one of these forks under each
arm as a crutch, tested them, timidly threw her whole
weight upon them -- so little that it was -- and swung
herself forward. The girl had made for herself a
material aid.
The crutches answered well. The pat of her feet,
and the tap of her sticks upon the highway, were all the
sounds that
<P 324>
came from the traveller now. She had
passed the last milestone by a good long distance, and
began to look wistfully towards the bank as if calculating
upon another milestone soon. The crutches, though
so very useful, had their limits of power. Mechanism
only transfers labour, being powerless to supersede it,
and the original amount of exertion was not cleared
away; it was thrown into the body and arms. She was
exhausted, and each swing forward became fainter. At
last she swayed sideways, and fell.
Here she lay, a shapeless heap, for ten minutes and
more. The morning wind began to boom dully over
the flats, and to move afresh dead leaves which had
lain still since yesterday. The woman desperately
turned round upon her knees, and next rose to her
feet. Steadying herself by the help of one crutch, she
essayed a step, then another, then a third, using the
crutches now as walking-sticks only. Thus she pro+
gressed till descending Mellstock Hill another milestone
appeared, and soon the beginning of an iron-railed fence
came into view. She staggered across to the first post,
clung to it, and looked around.
The Casterbridge lights were now individually visible,
It was getting towards morning, and vehicles might be
hoped for, if not expected soon. She listened. There
was not a sound of life save that acme and sublimation
of all dismal sounds, the hark of a fox, its three hollow
notes being rendered at intervals of a minute with the
precision of a funeral bell.
Less than a mile.!' the woman murmured. "No;
more,' she added, after a pause. 'The mile is to the
county hall, and my resting-place is on the other side
Casterbridge. A little over a mile, and there I am! '
After an interval she again spoke. "Five or six steps to
a yard -- six perhaps. I have to go seventeen hundred
yards. A hundred times six, six hundred. Seventeen
times that. O pity me, Lord.!'
Holding to the rails, she advanced, thrusting one
hand forward upon the rail, then the other, then leaning
over it whilst she dragged her feet on beneath.
This woman was not given to soliloquy; but ex,
tremity of feeling lessens the individuality of the weak,
as it increases
<P 325>
that of the strong. She said again in the
same tone, "I'll believe that the end lies five posts for+
ward, and no further, and so get strength to pass them.'
This was a practical application of the principle that
a half-feigned and fictitious faith is better than no faith
at all.
She passed five posts and held on to the fifth.
"I'll pass five more by believing my longed-for spot
is at the next fifth. I can do it.'
she passed five more.
"It lies only five further.'
she passed five more.
"But it is five further.'
She passed them.
'That stone bridge is the end of my journey,' she
said, when the bridge over the Froom was in view.
She crawled to the bridge. During the effort each
breath of the woman went into the air as if never to
return again.
"Now for the truth of the matter,' she said, sitting
down. "The truth is, that I have less than half a mile.'
Self-beguilement with what she had known all the time
to be false had given her strength to come over half
a mile that she would have been powerless to face in
the lump. The artifice showed that the woman, by
some mysterious intuition, had grasped the paradoxical
truth that blindness may operate more vigorously than
prescience, and the short-sighted effect more than the
far-seeing ; that limitation, and not comprehensiveness,
is needed for striking a blow.
The half-mile stood now before the sick and weary
woman like a stolid Juggernaut. It was an impassive
King of her world. The road here ran across Durnover
Moor, open to the road on either side. She surveyed
the wide space, the lights, herself, sighed, and lay down
against a guard-stone of the bridge.
Never was ingenuity exercised so sorely as the
traveller here exercised hers. Every conceivable aid,
m&thod, stratagem, mechanism, by which these last
desperate eight hundred yards could be overpasscd by a
human being unperceived, was revolved in her busy
brain, and dismissed as impracticable. She thought of
<P 326>
sticks, wheels, crawling -- she even thought of rolling.
But the exertion demanded by either of these latter two
was greater than to walk erect. The faculty of con+
trivance was worn out, Hopelessness had come at
last.
" No further.!' she whispered, and closed her eyes.
From the stripe of shadow on the opposite side of
the bridge a portion of shade seemed to detach itself
and move into isolation upon the pale white of the road.
It glided noiselessly towards the recumbent woman.
She became conscious of something touching her
hand; it was softness and it was warmth. She
opened her eye's, and the substance touched her face.
A dog was licking her cheek.
He was huge, heavy, and quiet creature, standing
darkly against the low horizon, and at least two feet
higher than the present position of her eyes. Whether
Newfoundland, mastiff, bloodhound, or what not, it was
impossible to say. He seemed to be of too strange and
mysterious a nature to belong to any variety among those
of popular nomenclature. Being thus assignable to no
breed, he was the ideal embodiment of canine greatness
 -- a generalization from what was common to all. Night,
in its sad, solemn, and benevolent aspect, apart from its
stealthy and cruel side, was personified in this form
Darkness endows the small and ordinary ones among
mankind with poetical power, and even the suffering
woman threw her idea nto figure.
In her reclining position she looked up to him just
as in earlier times she had, when standing, looked up
to a man. The animal, who was as homeless as she,
respectfully withdrew a step or two when the woman
moved, and, seeing that she did not repulse him, he
licked her hand again.
A thought moved within her like lightning. "Perhaps
I can make use of him-i might do it then!'
She pointed in the direction of Casterbridge, and
the dog seemed to misunderstand : he trotted on. Then,
finding she could not follow, he came back and whined.
The ultimate and saddest singularity of woman's effort
and invention was reached when, with a quickened breath+
ing, she rose to a stooping posture, and, resting her two
little arms
<P 327>
upon the shoulders of the dog, leant firmly
thereon, and murmured stimulating words. Whilst she
sorrowed in her heart she cheered with her voice, and
what was stranger than that the strong should need
encouragement from the weak was that cheerfulness
should be so well stimulated by such utter dejection.
Her friend moved forward slowly, and she with small
mincing steps moved forward beside him, half her
weight being thrown upon the animal. Sometimes
she sank as she had sunk from walking erect, from
the crutches, from the rails. The dog, who now
thoroughly understood her desire and her incapacity,
was frantic in his distress on these occasions ; he would
tug at her dress and run forward. She always called
him back, and it was now to be observed that the
woman listened for human sounds only to avoid them.
It was evident that she had an object in keeping her
presence on the road and her forlorn state unknown.
Their progress was necessarily very slow. They
reached the bottom of the town, and the Casterbridge
lamps lay before them like fallen Pleiads as they turned
to the left into the dense shade of a deserted avenue of
chestnuts, and so skirted the borough. Thus the town
was passed, and the goal was reached.
On this much-desired spot outside the town rose a
picturesque building. Originally it had been a mere
case to hold people. The shell had been so thin, so
devoid of excrescence, and so closely drawn over the
accommodation granted, that the grim character of
what was beneath showed through it, as the shape of
a body is visible under a winding-sheet.
Then Nature, as if offended, lent a hand. Masses
of ivy grew up, completely covering the walls, till the
place looked like an abbey; and it was discovered that
the view from the front, over the Casterbridge chimneys,
was one of the most magnificent in the county. A
neighbouring earl once said that he would give up a
year's rental to have at his own door the view enjoyed
by the inmates from theirs -- and very probably the
inmates would have given up the view for his year's
rental.
This stone edifice consisted of a central mass and
<P 328>
two wings, whereon stood as sentinels a few slim
chimneys, now gurgling sorrowfully to the slow wind.
In the wall was a gate, and by the gate a belipull
formed of a hanging wire. The woman raised herself
as high as possible upon her knees, and could just
reach the handle. She moved it and fell forwards in
a bowed attitude, her face upon her bosom.
It was getting on towards six o'clock, and sounds of
movement were to be heard inside the building which
was the haven of rest to this wearied soul. A little door
by the large one was opened, and a man appeared inside.
He discerned the panting heap of clothes, went back
for a light, and came again. He entered a second
time, and returned with two women.
These lifted the prostrate figure and assisted her in
through the doorway. The man then closed the door.
How did she get here ?" said one of the women.
"The Lord knows,' said the other.
There is a dog outside," murmured the overcome
traveller. " Where is he gone ? He helped me.'
I stoned him away,' said the man.
The little procession then moved forward -- the man
in front bearing the light, the two bony women next,
supporting between them the small and supple one.
Thus they entered the house and disappeared.
SUSPICION
<C xli>
<P 329>
SUSPICION -- FANNY IS SENT FOR
BATHSHEBA said very little to her husband all that
evening of their return from market, and he was not
disposed to say much to her. He exhibited the un+
pleasant combination of a restless condition with a
silent tongue. The next day, which was Sunday, passed
nearly in the same manner as regarded their taciturnity,
Bathsheba going to church both morning and afternoon.
This was the day before the Budmouth races. In the
evening Troy said, suddenly --
" Bathsheba, could you let me have twenty pounds ?"
Her countenance instantly sank. ' Twenty pounds ?
she said.
'The fact is, I want it badly.' The anxiety upon
Troy's face was unusual and very marked. lt was a
culmination of the mood he had been in all the day.
"Ah !. for those races to-morrow.'
Troy for the moment made no reply. Her mistake
had its advantages to a man who shrank from having
his mind inspected as he did now. "Well, suppose I
do want it for races ?' he said, at last.
"O, Frank.!' Bathsheba replied, and there was such
a volume of entreaty in the words. "Only such a few
weeks ago you said that I was far sweeter than all your
other pleasures put together, and that you would give
them all up for me; and now, won't you give up this
one, which is more a worry than a pleasure? Do,
Frank. Come, let me fascinate you by all I can do
 -- by pretty words and pretty looks, and everything I
can think of -- to stay at home. Say yes to your wife --
say yes.!'
The tenderest and softest phases of Bathsheba's
nature were prominent now -- advanced impulsively for
his acceptance, without any of the disguises and defences
which the wariness of her character when she was cool
too frequently threw
<P 330>
over them. Few men could have
resisted the arch yet dignified entreaty of the beautiful
face, thrown a little back and sideways in the weli
known attitude that expresses more than the words it
accompanies, and which seems to have heen designed
for these special occasions. Had the woman not been
his wife, Troy would have succumbed instantly ; as it
was, he thought he would not deceive her longer.
"The money is not wanted for racing debts at all,'
he said.
" What is it for ?' she asked. " You worry me a great
deal by these mysterious responsibilities, Frank."
Troy hesitated. He did not now love her enough
to allow himself to be carried too far by her ways. Yet
it was necessary to be civil. "You wrong me by such
a suspicious manner, he said. " Such strait-waistcoating
as you treat me to is not becoming in you at so early a
date.'
"I think that I have a right to grumble a little if I
pay,' she said, with features between a smile and a
pout.
Exactly; and, the former being done, suppose we
proceed to the latter. Bathsheba, fun is all very well,
but don't go too far, or you may have cause to regret
something.'
She reddened. " I do that already,' she said, quickly
" What do you regret ? '
SUSPICION
"That my romance has come to an end.'
" All romances end at marriage.'
'I wish you wouldn't talk like that. You grieve me
to my soul by being smart at my expense.'
" You are dull enough at mine. I believe you hate
me.'
" Not you -- only your faults. I do hate them.'
"'Twould be much more becoming if you set your+
self to cure them. Come, let's strike a balance with
the twenty pounds, and be friends.'
She gave a sigh of resignation. 'I have about that
sum here for household expenses. If you must have it,
take it.'
"Very good. Thank you. I expect I shall have
gone away before you are in to breakfast to-morrow.'
"And must you go ? Ah !. there was a time, Frank,
when it would have taken a good many promises to
other people to drag you away from me. You used to
call me darling, then.
<P 331>
But it doesn't matter to you how
my days are passed now.'
"I must go, in spite of sentiment.' Troy, as he
spoke, looked at his watch, and, apparently actuated by
<1non lucendo>1 principles, opened the case at the back,
revealing, snugly stowed within it, a small coil of hair.
Bathsheba's eyes had been accidentally lifted at that
moment, and she saw the action and saw the hair. She
flushed in pain and surprise, and some words escaped
her before she had thought whether or not it was wise
to utter them. "A woman's curl of hair !' she said.
"O, Frank, whose is that ?'
Troy had instantly closed his watch. He carelessly
replied, as one who cloaked some feelings that the sight
had stirred. ' Why, yours, of course. Whose should it
be ? I had quite forgotten that I had it.'
' What a dreadful fib, Frank.!'
" I tell you I had forgotten it.!' he said, loudly.
'I don't mean that -- it was yellow hair.'
"Nonsense.'
"That's insulting me. I know it was yellow. Now
whose was it ? I want to know.'
"Very welii'll tell you, so make no more ado. It
is the hair of a young woman I was going to marry
before I knew you.'
" You ought to tell me her name, then.'
"I cannot do that.'
"Is she married yet?'
"No.'
"Is she alive?'
" Yes.'
"Is she pretty ?'
" Yes.'
'It is wonderful how she can be, poor thing, under
such an awful affliction!'
" Affliction -- what affliction ? ' he inquired, quickly.
" Having hair of that dreadful colour.'
" Oh -- ho-i like that.!' said Troy, recovering him+
self. "Why, her hair has been admired by everybody
who has seen her since she has worn it loose, which has
not been long. It is
<P 332>
beautiful hair. People used to
turn their heads to look at it, poor girl.!'
"Pooh! that's nothing -- that's nothing!' she ex+
claimed, in incipient accents of pique. 'If I cared for
your love as much as I used to I could say people had
turned to look at mine.'
"Bathsheba, don't be so fitful and jealous. You
knew what married life would be like, and shouldn't
have entered it if you feared these contingencies.'
Troy had by this time driven her to bitterness: her
heart was big in her throat, and the ducts to her eyes
were painfully full. Ashamed as she was to show
emotion, at last she burst out: --
"This is all I get for loving you so well! Ah! when
I married you your life was dearer to me than my own.
I would have died for you -- how truly I can say that I
would have died for you.! And now you sneer at my
foolishness in marrying you. O! is it kind to me to
throw my mistake in my face ? Whatever opinion you
may have of my wisdom, you should not tell me of it so
mercilessly, now that I am in your power.'
" I can't help how things fall out,' said Troy; "upon
my heart, women will be the death of me.!'
"Well you shouldn't keep people's hair. You'll
burn it, won't you, Frank?'
Frank went on as if he had not heard her. "There
are considerations even before my consideration for you;
reparations to be made -- ties you know nothing of If
you repent of marrying, so do I.'
Trembling now, she put her hand upon his arm,
saying, in mingled tones of wretchedness and coaxing,
"I only repent it if you don't love me better than any
woman in the world.! I don't otherwise, Frank. You
don't repent because you already love somebody better
than you love me, do you ?'
"I don't know. Why do you say that?'
"You won't burn that curl. You like the woman
who owns that pretty hair -- yes; it is pretty -- more
beautiful than my miserable black mane! Well, it is
no use; I can't help being ugly. You must like her
best, if you will!'
"Until to-day, when I took it from a drawer, I have
<P 333>
never looked upon that bit of hair for several months --
that I am ready to swear.'
"But just now you said "ties;" and then -- that
woman we met?'
"'Twas the meeting with her that reminded me of
the hair.'
"Is it hers, then ?'
"Yes. There, now that you have wormed it out of
me, I hope you are content.'
"And what are the ties ?'
"Oh! that meant nothing -- a mere jest.'
"A mere jest ! ' she said, in mournful astonishment.
"Can you jest when I am so wretchedly in earnest ?
Tell me the truth, Frank. I am not a fool, you know,
although I am a woman, and have my woman's moments.
Come! treat me fairly,' she said, looking honestly and
fearlessly into his face. "I don't want much; bare
justice -- that's all! Ah! once I felt I could be content
with nothing less than the highest homage from the
husband I should choose. Now, anything short of
cruelty will content me. Yes! the independent and
spirited Bathsheba is come to this.!'
"For Heaven's sake don't be so desperate! "Troy
said, snappishly, rising as he did so, and leaving the
room.
Directly he had gone, Bathsheba burst into great
sobs -- dry-eyed sobs, which cut as they came, without
any softening by tears. But she determined to repress
all evidences of feeling. She was conquered; but she
would never own it as long as she lived. Her pride
was indeed brought low by despairing discoveries of her
spoliation by marriage with a less pure nature than her
own. She chafed to and fro in rebelliousness, like a
caged leopard; her whole soul was in arms, and the
blood fired her face. Until she had met Troy, Bath+
sheba had heen proud of her position as a woman; it
had been a glory to her to know that her lips had been
touched hy no man's on earth -- that her waist had
never been encircled by a lover's arm. She hated
herself now. In those earlier days she had always
nourished a secret contempt for girls who were the
slaves of the first goodiooking young fellow who should
choose to salute them. She had never taken kindly to
the idea of
<P 334>
marriage in the abstract as did the majority
of women she saw about her. In the turmoil of her
anxiety for her lover she had agreed to marry him; but
the perception that had accompanied her happiest hours
on this account was rather that of self-sacrifice than of
promotion and honour. Although she scarcely knew
the divinity's name, Diana was the goddess whom
Bathsheba instinctively adored. That she had never,
by look, word, or sign, encouraged a man to approach
her -- that she had felt herself sufficient to herself, and
had in the independence of her girlish heart fancied
there was a certain degradation in renouncing the
simplicity of a maiden existence to become the humbler
half of an indifferent matrimonial whole -- were facts
now bitterly remembered. O, if she had never
stooped to folly of this kind, respectable as it was, and
could only stand again, as she had stood on the hill at
Norcombe, and dare Troy or any other man to pollute
a hair of her head by his interference!.
The next morning she rose earlier than usual, and
had the horse saddled for her ride round the farm in
the customary way. When she came in at half-past
eight -- their usual hour for breakfasting -- she was in+
formed that her husband had risen, taken his breakfast,
and driven off to Casterbridge with the gig and Poppet.
After breakfast she was cool and collected -- quite
herself in fact -- and she rambled to the gate, intending
to walk to another quarter of the farm, which she still
personally superintended as well as her duties in the
house would permit, continually, however, finding her+
self preceded in forethought by Gabriel Oak, for whom
she began to entertain the genuine friendship of a sister.
Of course, she sometimes thought of him in the light of
an old lover, and had momentary imaginings of what
life with him as a husband would have been like; also
of life with Boldwood under the same conditions. But
Bathsheba, though she could feel, was not much given
to futile dreaming, and her musings under this head
were short and entirely confined to the times when
Troy's neglect was more than ordinarily evident.
She saw coming up the road a man like Mr. Boldwood.
<P 335>
It was Mr. Boldwood. Bathsheba blushed painfully,
and watched. The farmer stopped when still a long
way off, and held up his hand to Gabriel Oak, who was
in a footpath across the field. The two men then
approached each other and seemed to engage in
earnest conversation.
Thus they continued for a long time. Joseph Poor+
grass now passed near them, wheeling a barrow of apples
up the hill to Bathsheba's residence. Boldwood and
Gabriel called to him, spoke to him for a few minutes,
and then all three parted, Joseph immediately coming
up the hill with his barrow.
Bathsheba, who had seen this pantomime with some
surprise, experienced great relief when Boldwood turned
back again. 'Well, what's the message, Joseph ? ' she
said.
He set down his barrow, and, putting upon himself
the refined aspect that a conversation with a lady re+
quired, spoke to Bathsheba over the gate.
"You'll never see Fanny Robin no more -- use nor
principai-ma'am.'
" Why ?'
"Because she's dead in the Union.'
" Fanny dead -- never.!'
" Yes, ma'am.'
" What did she die from ?"
"I don't know for certain; but I should be inclined
to think it was from general neshness of constitution.
She was such a limber maid that 'a could stand no
hardship, even when I knowed her, and 'a went like a
candle-snoff, so 'tis said. She was took bad in the
morning, and, being quite feeble and worn out, she
died in the evening. She belongs by law to our parish;
and Mr. Boldwood is going to send a waggon at three
this afternoon to fetch her home here and bury her.'
"Indeed I shall not let Mr. Boldwood do any such
thing-i shall do it! Fanny was my uncle's servant,
and, although I only knew her for a couple of days,
FANNY IS SENT FOR
she belongs to me. How very, very sad this is.! --
the idea of Fanny being in a workhouse.' Bathsheba
had begun to know what suffering was, and she spoke
with real feeling.... "Send across to Mr. Boldwood's,
and say that Mrs. Troy will take upon herself the duty
<P 336>
of fetching an old servant of the family.... We
ought not to put her in a waggon; we'll get a hearse.'
" There will hardly be time, ma'am, will there?'
" Perhaps not,' she said, musingly. " When did you
say we must be at the door -- three o'clock?'
" Three o'clock this afternoon, ma'am, so to speak it.'
"Very weli-you go with it. A pretty waggon is
better than an ugly hearse, after all. Joseph, have the
new spring waggon with the blue body and red wheels,
and wash it very clean. And, Joseph --  -- '
" Yes, ma'am.'
' Carry with you some evergreens and flowers to put
upon her coffin  -- indeed, gather a great many, and
completely bury her in them. Get some boughs of
laurustinus, and variegated box, and yew, and boy'siove;
ay, and some hunches of chrysanthemum. And let old
Pleasant draw her, because she knew him so well.'
'I will, ma'am. I ought to have said that the
Union, in the form of four labouring men, will meet me
when I gets to our churchyard gate, and take her and
bury her according to the rites of the Board of Guardians,
as by law ordained.'
" Dear me -- Casterbridge Union -- and is Fanny come
to this?' said Bathsheba, musing. "I wish I had known
of it sooner. I thought she was far away. How long
has she lived there?'
"On'y been there a day or two.'
"Oh.! -- then she has not been staying there as a
regular inmate?'
" No. She first went to live in a garrison-town t'other
side o' Wessex, and since then she's been picking up a
living at seampstering in Melchester for several months,
at the house of a very respectable widow-woman who
takes in work of that sort. She only got handy the
Union-house on Sunday morning 'a b'lieve, and 'tis sup+
posed here and there that she had traipsed every step
of the way from Melchester. Why she left her place,
I can't say, for I don't know; and as to a lie, why, I
wouldn't tell it. That's the short of the story, ma'am.'
"Ah-h .! '
<P 337>
No gem ever flashed from a rosy ray to a white one
more rapidly than changed the young wife's counten+
ance whilst this word came from her in a long-drawn
breath. "Did she walk along our turnpike-road?' she
said, in a suddenly restless and eager voice.
"I believe she did.... Ma'am, shall I call Liddy?
You bain't well, ma'am, surely ? You look like a lily --
so pale and fainty.!'
"No; don't call her; it is nothing. When did she
pass Weatherbury?'
"Last Saturday night.'
"That will do, Joseph; now you may go.'
" Certainly, ma'am.'
" Joseph, come hither a moment. What was the
colour of Fanny Robin's hair?'
"Really, mistress, now that 'tis put to me so judge+
and-jury like, I can't call to mind, if ye'll believe me.!'
"Never mind; go on and do what I told you. Stop
 -- well no, go on.'
She turned herself away from him, that he might no
longer notice the mood which had set its sign so visibly
upon her, and went indoors with a distress:ng sense of
faintness and a beating brow. About an hour after, she
heard the noise of the waggon and went out, still with a
painful consciousness of her bewildered and troubled
look. Joseph, dressed in his best suit of clothes, was
putting in the horse to start. The shrubs and flowers
were all piled in the waggon, as she had directed
Bathsheba hardly saw them now.
" Whose sweetheart did you say, Joseph?'
'I don't know, ma'am.'
"Are you quite sure?'
" Yes, ma'am, quite sure.'
"Sure of what?'
"I'm sure that all I know is that she arrived in the
morning and died in the evening without further parley.
What Oak and Mr. Boldwood told me was only these
few words. "Little Fanny Robin is dead, Joseph,'
Gabriel said, looking in my face in his steady old way.
I was very sorry, and I said, "Ah!. -- and how did she
<P 338>
come to die?' "Well, she's dead in Casterhridge
Union," he said; "and perhaps 'tisn't much matter
about how she came to die. She reached the Union
early Sunday morning, and died in the afternoon -- that's
clear enough." Then I asked what she'd been doing
lately, and Mr. Boldwood turned round to me then, and
left off spitting a thistle with the end of his stick. He
told me about her having lived by seampstering in
Melchester, as I mentioned to you, and that she walked
therefrom at the end of last week, passing near here
Saturday night in the dusk. They then said I had
better just name a hent of her death to you, and away
they went. Her death might have been brought on by
biding in the night wind, you know, ma'am; for people
used to say she'd go off in a decline: she used to cough
a good deal in winter time. However, 'tisn't much
odds to us about that now, for 'tis all over.'
"Have you heard a different story at all?' She
looked at him so intently that Joseph's eyes quailed.
"Not a word, mistress, I assure 'ee.!" he said.
"Hardly anybody in the parish knows the news yet.'
"I wonder why Gabriel didn't bring the message to
me himself. He mostly makes a point of seeing me
upon the most trifling errand.' These words were
merely murmured, and she was looking upon the ground.
"Perhaps he was busy, ma'am,' Joseph suggested.
"And sometimes he seems to suffer from things upon
his mind, connected with the time when he was better
off than 'a is now. 'A's rather a curious item, but a
very understanding shepherd, and learned in books.'
'Did anything seem upon his mind whilst he was
speaking to you about this?'
'I cannot but say that there did, ma'am. He was
terrible down, and so was Farmer Boldwood.'
'Thank you, Joseph. That will do. Go on now,
or you'll be late.'
Bathsheba, still unhappy, went indoors again. In
the course of the afternoon she said to Liddy, Who had
been informed of the occurrence, " What was the colour
<P 339>
of poor Fanny Robin's hair? Do you know? I cannot
recollect-i only saw her for a day or two.'
"It was light, ma'am; but she wore it rather short,
and packed away under her cap, so that you would
hardly notice it. But I have seen her let it down when
she was going to bed, and it looked beautiful then.
Real golden hair.'
" Her young man was a soldier, was he not?'
"Yes. In the same regiment as Mr. Troy. He says
he knew him very well.'
" What, Mr. Troy says so? How came he to say
that?'
"One day I just named it to him, and asked him if
he knew Fanny's young man. He said, "O yes, he
knew the young man as well as he knew himself, and
that there wasn't a man in the regiment he liked
better."'
"Ah! Said that, did he ?'
"Yes; and he said there was a strong likeness be+
tween himself and the other young man, so that some+
times people mistook them --  -- '
' Liddy, for Heaven's sake stop your talking.!' said
Bathsheba, with the nervous petulance that comes from
worrying perceptions.
JOSEPH AND HIS BURDEN
<P 340>
<C xlii>
JOSEPH AND HIS BURDEN -- BUCK'S HEAD
A WALL bounded the site of Casterbridge Union+
house, except along a portion of the end. Here a high
gable stood prominent, and it was covered like the front
with a mat of ivy. In this gable was no window,
chimney, ornament, or protuberance of any kind. The
single feature appertaining to it, beyond the expanse of
dark green leaves, was a small door.
The situation of the door was peculiar. The sill
was three or four feet above the ground, and for a
moment one was at a loss for an explanation of this
exceptional altitude, till ruts immediately beneath sug+
gested that the door was used solely for the passage of
articles and persons to and from the level of a vehicle
standing on the outside. Upon the whole, the door
seemed to advertise itself as a species of Traitor's Gate
translated to another sphere. That entry and exit
hereby was only at rare intervals became apparent on
noting that tufts of grass were allowed to flourish undis+
turbed in the chinks of the sill.
As the clock over the South-street Alms-house pointed
to five minutes to three, a blue spring waggon, picked
out with red, and containing boughs and flowers, passed
the end of the street, and up towards this side of the
building. Whilst the chimes were yet stammering out
a shattered form of "Malbrook,' Joseph Poorgrass rang
the bell, and received directions to back his waggon
against the high door under the gable. The door then
opened, and a plain elm coffin was slowly thrust forth,
and laid by two men in fustian along the middle of the
vehicle.
One of the men then stepped up beside it, took from
his pocket a lump of chalk, and wrote upon the cover
the name and a few other words in a large scrawling
hand. (We believe that they do these things more
tenderly now, and provide a
<P 341>
plate.) He covered the
whole with a black cloth, threadbare, but decent, the
taiiboard of the waggon was returned to its place, one
of the men handed a certificate of registry to Poorgrass,
and both entered the door, closing it hehind them.
Their connection with her, short as it had been, was
over for ever.
Joseph then placed the flowers as enjoined, and the
evergreens around the flowers, till it was difficult to
divine what the waggon contained; he smacked his
whip, and the rather pleasing funeral car crept down
the hill, and along the road to Weatherbury.
The afternoon drew on apace, and, looking to the
right towards the sea as he walked beside the horse, Poor+
grass saw strange clouds and scrolls of mist rolling over
the long ridges which girt the landscape in that quarter.
They came in yet greater volumes, and indolently crept
across the intervening valleys, and around the withered
papery flags of the moor and river brinks. Then their
dank spongy forms closed in upon the sky. It was
a sudden overgrowth of atmospheric fungi which had
their roots in the neighbouring sea, and by the time
that horse, man, and corpse entered Yalbury Great
Wood, these silent workings of an invisible hand had
reached them, and they were completely enveloped,
this being the first arrival of the autumn fogs, and the
first fog of the series.
The air was as an eye suddenly struck blind. The
waggon and its load rolled no longer on the horizontal
division between clearness and opacity, but were
imbedded in an elastic body of a monotonous pallor
throughout. There was no perceptible motion in the
air, not a visible drop of water fell upon a leaf of the
beeches, birches, and firs composing the wood on either
side. The trees stood in an attitude of intentness, as if
they waited longingly for a wind to come and rock
them. A startling quiet overhung all surrounding things
 -- so completely, that the crunching of the waggon+
wheels was as a great noise, and small rustles, which
had never ohtained a hearing except by night, were dis+
tinctly individualized.
Joseph Poorgrass looked round upon his sad burden
as it loomed faintly through the flowering laurustinus,
then at the
<P 342>
unfathomable gloom amid the high trees on
each hand, indistinct, shadowless, and spectreiike in
their monochrome of grey. He felt anything but cheer+
ful, and wished he had the company even of a child or
dog. Stopping the home, he listened. Not a footstep
or wheel was audible anywhere around, and the dead
silence was broken only by a heavy particle falling from
a tree through the evergreens and alighting with a smart
rap upon the coffin of poor Fanny. The fog had by
this time saturated the trees, and this was the first
dropping of water from the overbrimming leaves. The
hollow echo of its fall reminded the waggoner painfully
of the grim Leveller. Then hard by came down another
drop, then two or three. Presently there was a continual
tapping of these heavy drops upon the dead leaves, the
road, and the travellers. The nearer boughs were beadcd
with the mist to the greyness of aged men, and the rusty+
red leaves of the beeches were hung with similar drops,
like diamonds on auburn hair.
At the roadside hamlet called Roy-Town, just beyond
this wood, was the old inn Buck's Head. It was about
a mile and a half from Weatherbury, and in the meridian
times of stage-coach travelling had been the place
where many coaches changed and kept their relays
of horses. All the old stabling was now pulled down,
and little remained besides the habitable inn itself,
which, standing a little way back from the road, sig+
nified its existence to people far up and down the
highway by a sign hanging from the horizontal bough
of an elm on the opposite side of the way.
Travellers  -- for the variety <1tourist>1 had hardly
developed into a distinct species at this date -- some+
times said in passing, when they cast their eyes up to
the sign-bearing tree, that artists were fond of repre+
senting the signboard hanging thus, but that they
themselves had never before noticed so perfect an
instance in actual working order. It was near this tree
that the waggon was standing into which Gabriel Oak
crept on his first journey to Weatherbury; but, owing
to the darkness, the sign and the inn had been un+
observed.
The manners of the inn were of the old-established
<P 343>
type. Indeed, in the minds of its frequenters they
existed as unalterable formule : <1e.g.>1 --
Rap with the bottom of your pint for more liquor.
For tobacco, shout.
In calling for the girl in waiting, say, "Maid.!'
Ditto for the landlady, 'Old Soul.!' etc., etc.
It was a relief to Joseph's heart when the friendly
signboard came in view, and, stopping his horse
immediately beneath it, he proceeded to fulfil an
intention made a long time before. His spirits were
oozing out of him quite. He turned the horse's head
to the green bank, and entered the hostel for a mug
of ale.
Going down into the kitchen of the inn, the floor
of which was a step below the passage, which in its
BUCK'S HEAD
turn was a step below the road outside, what should
Joseph see to gladden his eyes but two copper-coloured
discs, in the form of the countenances of Mr. Jan
Coggan and Mr. Mark Clark. These owners of the
two most appreciative throats in the neighbourhood,
within the pale of respectability, were now sitting face
to face over a threeiegged circular table, having an
iron rim to keep cups and pots from being accidentally
elbowed off; they might have been said to resemble
the setting sun and the full moon shining <1vis-a*-vis>1
across the globe.
" Why, 'tis neighbour Poorgrass.!' said Mark Clark.
"I'm sure your face don't praise your mistress's table,
Joseph.'
"I've had a very pale companion for the last four
miles,' said Joseph, indulging in a shudder toned
down by resignation. 'And to speak the truth, 'twas
beginning to tell upon me. I assure ye, I ha'n't seed
the colour of victuals or drink since breakfast time
this morning, and that was no more than a dew-bit
afield.'
"Then drink, Joseph, and don't restrain yourself!.'
said Coggan, handing him a hooped mug three+
quarters full.
Joseph drank for a moderately long time, then for
a longer time, saying, as he lowered the jug, "'Tis
pretty drinking -- very
<P 344>
pretty drinking, and is more
than cheerful on my melancholy errand, so to speak it.'
"True, drink is a pleasant delight,' said Jan, as one
who repeated a truism so familiar to his brain that he
hardly noticed its passage over his tongue ; and,
lifting the cup, Coggan tilted his head gradually
backwards, with closed eyes, that his expectant soul
might not be diverted for one instant from its bliss
by irrelevant surroundings.
"Well, I must be on again,' said Poorgmss. "Not
but that I should like another nip with ye; but the
parish might lose confidence in me if I was seed
here.'
" Where be ye trading o't to to-day, then, Joseph ?'
"Back to Weatherbury. I've got poor little Fanny
Robin in my waggon outside, and I must be at the
churchyard gates at a quarter to five with her.'
'Ay-i've heard of it. And so she's nailed up in
parish boards after all, and nobody to pay the bell
shilling and the grave half-crown.'
"The parish pays the grave half-crown, but not the
bell shilling, because the bell's a luxery: but 'a can
hardly do without the grave, poor body. However, I
expect our mistress will pay all.'
"A pretty maid as ever I see.! But what's yer hurry,
Joseph ? The pore woman's dead, and you can't bring
her to life, and you may as well sit down comfortable,
and finish another with us.'
"I don't mind taking just the least thimbleful ye
can dream of more with ye, sonnies. But only a few
minutes, because 'tis as 'tis.'
"Of course, you'll have another drop. A man's
twice the man afterwards. You feel so warm and
glorious, and you whop and slap at your work without
any trouble, and everything goes on like sticks a+
breaking. Too much liquor is bad, and leads us to
that horned man in the smoky house ; but after all,
many people haven't the gift of enjoying a wet, and
since we be highly favoured with a power that way,
we should make the most o't.'
"True,' said Mark Clark. "'Tis a talent the Lord
<P 345>
has mercifully bestowed upon us, and we ought not
to neglect it. But, what with the parsons and clerks
and schooipeople and serious tea-parties, the merry
old ways of good life have gone to the dogs -- upon
my carcase, they have.!'
" Well, really, I must be onward again now,' said
Joseph.
'Now, now, Joseph; nonsense.! The poor woman
is dead, isn't she, and what's your hurry?'
"Well, I hope Providence won't be in a way with
me for my doings,' said Joseph, again sitting down.
'I've been troubled with weak moments lately, 'tis
true. I've been drinky once this month already, and
I did not go to church a-Sunday, and I dropped a
curse or two yesterday; so I don't want to go too far
for my safety. Your next world is your next world,
and not to be squandered offhand.'
'I believe ye to be a chapeimember, Joseph. That
I do.'
'Oh, no, no.! I don't go so far as that.'
" For my part,' said Coggan, "I'm staunch Church
of England.'
" Ay, and faith, so be I,' said Mark Clark.
"I won't say much for myself; I don't wish to,'
Coggan continued, with that tendency to talk on
principles which is characteristic of the barley-corn.
"But I've never changed a single doctrine : I've stuck
like a plaster to the old faith I was born in. Yes;
there's this to be said for the Church, a man can
belong to the Church and bide in his cheerful old
inn, and never trouble or worry his mind about
doctrines at all. But to be a meetinger, you must
go to chapel in all winds and weathers, and make
yerself as frantic as a skit. Not but that chapei
members be clever chaps enough in their way. They
can lift up beautiful prayers out of their own heads, all
about their families and shipwmcks in the newspaper.'
"They can -- they can,' said Mark Clark, with cor+
roborative feeling ; "but we Churchmen, you see, must
have it all printed aforehand, or, dang it all, we should
no more know what to say to a great gaffer like the
Lord than babes unborn,'
" Chapeifolk be more hand-in-glove with them above
than we,' said Joseph, thoughtfully.
" Yes,' said Coggan. " We know very well that if
anybody do go to heaven, they will. They've worked
hard for it, and they
<P 346>
deserve to have it, such as 'tis.
I bain't such a fool as to pretend that we who stick
to the Church have the same chance as they, because
we know we have not. But I hate a feller who'll
change his old ancient doctrines for the sake of getting
to heaven. I'd as soon turn king's-evidence for the
few pounds you get. Why, neighbours, when every
one of my taties were frosted, our Parson Thirdly
were the man who gave me a sack for seed, though
he hardly had one for his own use, and no money to
buy 'em. If it hadn't been for him, I shouldn't hae
had a tatie to put in my garden. D'ye think I'd
turn after that? No, I'll stick to my side; and if we
be in the wrong, so be it : I'll fall with the fallen .! '
" Well said -- very well said,' observed Joseph. --
" However, folks, I must be moving now: upon my life
I must. Pa'son Thirdly will be waiting at the church
gates, and there's the woman a-biding outside in the
waggon.'
" Joseph Poorgmss, don't be so miserable.! Pa'son
Thirdly won't mind. He's a generous man ; he's found
me in tracts for years, and I've consumed a good many
in the course of a long and shady life; but he's never
been the man to cry out at the expense. Sit down.'
The longer Joseph Poorgrass remained, the less his
spirit was troubled by the duties which devolved upon
him this afternoon. The minutes glided by uncounted,
until the evening shades began perceptibly to deepen,
and the eyes of the three were but sparkling points
on the surface of darkness. Coggan's repeater struck
six from his pocket in the usual still small tones.
At that moment hasty steps were heard in the entry,
and the door opened to admit the figure of Gabriel Oak,
followed by the maid of the inn bearing a candle. He
stared sternly at the one lengthy and two round faces
of the sitters, which confronted him with the expressions
of a fiddle and a couple of warming-pans. Joseph Poor+
grass blinked, and shrank several inches into the back+
ground.
' Upon my soul, I'm ashamed of you ; 'tis disgraceful,
Joseph, disgraceful!. " said Gabriel, indignantly. " Coggan,
you call yourself a man, and don't know better than this.'
<P 347>
Coggan looked up indefinitely at Oak, one or other
of his eyes occasionally opening and closing of its own
accord, as if it were not a member, but a dozy individual
with a distinct personality.
" Don't take on so, shepherd!' said Mark Clark,
looking reproachfully at the candle, which appeared
to possess special features of interest for his eyes.
'Nobody can hurt a dead woman,' at length said
Coggan, with the precision of a machine. "All that
could be done for her is done -- she's beyond us : and
why should a man put himself in a tearing hurry for
lifeless clay that can neither feel nor see, and don't
know what you do with her at all? If she'd been
alive, I would have been the first to help her. If she
now wanted victuals and drink, I'd pay for it, money
down. But she's dead, and no speed of ours will
bring her to life. The woman's past us -- time spent
upon her is throwed away: why should we hurry to
do what's not required ? Drink, shepherd, and be
friends, for to-morrow we may be like her.'
" We may,' added Mark Clark, emphatically, at once
drinking himself, to run no further risk of losing his
chance by the event alluded to, Jan meanwhile merging
his additional thoughts of to-morrow in a song : --
To-mor-row, to-mor-row !
And while peace and plen-ty I find at my board,
With a heart free from sick-ness and sor-row,
With my friends will I share what to-day may af-ford,
And let them spread the ta-ble to-mor-row.
To-mor -- row', to-mor -- +
"Do hold thy horning, Jan.!' said Oak; and turning
upon Poorgrass, " as for you, Joseph, who do your wicked
deeds in such confoundedly holy ways, you are as drunk
as you can stand.'
"No, Shepherd Oak, no! Listen to reason, shepherd.
All that's the matter with me is the affliction called a
multiplying eye, and that's how it is I look double to
you-i mean, you look double to me.'
A multiplying eye is a very bad thing,' said Mark
Clark.
<P 348>
It always comes on when I have been in a public --
house a little time,' said Joseph Poorgrass, meekly.
"Yes; I see two of every sort, as if I were some holy
man living in the times of King Noah and entering
into the ark.... Y-y-y-yes,' he added, becoming much
affected by the picture of himself as a person thrown
away, and shedding tears; "I feel too good for England :
I ought to have lived in Genesis by rights, like the other
men of sacrifice, and then I shouldn't have b-b-been
called a d-d-drunkard in such a way.!'
"I wish you'd show yourself a man of spirit, and not
sit whining there.!'
"Show myself a man of spirit ? ... Ah, well! let
me take the name of drunkard humbly-iet me be a
man of contrite knees-iet it be .! l know that I always
do say "Please God' afore I do anything, from my
getting up to my going down of the same, and I be
willing to take as much disgrace as there is in that
holy act. Hah, yes.! ... But not a man of spirit ?
Have I ever allowed the toe of pride to be lifted
against my hinder parts without groaning manfully that
I question the right to do so? I inquire that query
boldly?'
" We can't say that you have, Hero Poorgrass,'
admitted Jan.
"Never have I allowed such treatment to pass un+
questioned!. Yet the shepherd says in the face of that
rich testimony that I be not a man of spirit! Well,
let it pass by, and death is a kind friend !.'
Gabriel, seeing that neither of the three was in a fit
state to Cake charge of the waggon for the remainder of
the journey, made no reply, but, closing the door again
upon them, went across to where the vehicle stood, now
getting indistinct in the fog and gloom of this mildewy
time. He pulled the horse's head from the large patch
of turf it had eaten bare, readjusted the boughs over
the coffin, and drove along through the unwholesome
night.
It had gradually become rumoured in the village
that the body to be brought and buried that day was
all that was left of the unfortunate Fanny Robin who
had followed the Eleventh from Casterbridge through
Melchester and onwards. But,
<P 349>
thanks to Boldwood's
reticence and Oak's generosity, the lover she had followed
had never been individualized as Troy. Gabriel hoped
that the whole truth of the matter might not be published
till at any rate the girl had been in her grave for a few
days, when the interposing barriers of earth and time,
and a sense that the events had been somewhat shut
into oblivion, would deaden the sting that revelation and
invidious remark would have for Bathsheba just now.
By the time that Gabriel reached the old manor+
house, her residence, which lay in his way to the church,
it was quite dark. A man came from the gate and said
through the fog, which hung between them like blown
flour --
"Is that Poorgrass with the corpse?'
Gabriel recognized the voice as that of the parson.
" The corpse is here, sir,' said Gabriel.
"I have just been to inquire of Mrs. Troy if she could
tell me the reason of the delay. I am afraid it is too
late now for the funeral to be performed with proper
decency. Have you the registrar's certificate ? '
" No,' said Gabriel. "I expect Poorgrass has that ;
and he's at the Buck's Head. I forgot to ask him
for it.'
"Then that settles the matter. We'll put off the
funeral till to-morrow morning. The body may be
brought on to the church, or it may be left here at
the farm and fetched by the bearers in the morning.
They waited more than an hour, and have now gone
home.'
Gabriel had his reasons for thinking the latter a
most objectionable plan, notwithstanding that Fanny
had been an inmate of the farm-house for several years
in the lifetime of Bathsheba's uncle. Visions of several
unhappy contingencies which might arise from this delay
flitted before him. But his will was not law, and he
went indoors to inquire of his mistress what were her
wishes on the subject. He found her in an unusual
mood : her eyes as she looked up to him were suspicious
and perplexed as with some antecedent thought. Troy
had not yet returned. At first Bathsheba assented with
a mien of indifference to his proposition that they should
go on to the church at once with their burden; but
immediately
<P 350>
afterwards, following Gabriel to the gate,
she swerved to the extreme of solicitousness on Fanny's
account, and desired that the girl might be brought into
the house. Oak argued upon the convenience of leaving
her in the waggon, just as she lay now, with her flowers
and green leaves about her, merely wheeling the vehicle
into the coach-house till the morning, but to no purpose,
"It is unkind and unchristian,' she said, 'to leave the
poor thing in a coach-house all night.'
Very well, then,' said the parson. "And I will
arrange that the funeral shall take place early to+
morrow. Perhaps Mrs. Troy is right in feeling that we
cannot treat a dead fellow-creature too thoughtfully
We must remember that though she may have erred
grievously in leaving her home, she is still our sister :
and it is to be believed that God's uncovenanted
mercies are extended towards her, and that she is a
member of the flock of Christ.'
The parson's words spread into the heavy air with a
sad yet unperturbed cadence, and Gabriel shed an
honest tear. Bathsheba seemed unmoved. Mr.
Thirdly then left them, and Gabriel lighted a lantern.
Fetching three other men to assist him, they bore the
unconscious truant indoors, placing the coffin on two
benches in the middle of a little sitting-room next the
hall, as Bathsheba directed.
Every one except Gabriel Oak then left the room.
He still indecisively lingered beside the body. He was
deeply troubled at the wretchedly ironical aspect that
circumstances were putting on with regard to Troy's
wife, and at his own powerlessness to counteract them,
(n spite of his careful manoeuvring all this day, the very
worst event that could in any way have happened in
connection with the burial had happened now. Oak
imagined a terrible discovery resulting from this after+
noon's work that might cast over Bathsheba's life a shade
which the interposition of many lapsing years might but
indifferently lighten, and which nothing at all might
altogether remove.
Suddenly, as in a last attempt to save Bathsheba
from, at any rate, immediate anguish, he looked again,
as he had looked before, at the chalk writing upon the
<P 351>
coffinlid. The scrawl was this simple one, " Fanny
Robin and child.' Gabriel took his handkerchief and
carefully rubbed out the two latter words, leaving visible
the inscription " Fanny' Robin ' only. He then left the
room, and went out quietly by the front door.
<C xliii>
<P 352>
FANNY'S REVENGE
! DO you want me any longer ma'am ? " inquired Liddy,
at a later hour the same evening, standing by the door
with a chamber candlestick in her hand and addressing
Bathsheba, who sat cheerless and alone in the large
parlour beside the first fire of the season.
" No more to-night, Liddy.'
"l'll sit up for master if you like, ma'am. I am not
at all afraid of Fanny, if I may sit in my own room and '
have a candle. She was such a childlike, nesh young
thing that her spirit couldn't appear to anybody if it
tried, I'm quite sure.'
"O no, no! You go to bed. I'll sit up for him
myself till twelve o'clock, and if he has not arrived by
that time, I shall give him up and go to bed too.'
It is half-past ten now.'
'Oh! is it?'
Why don't you sit upstairs, ma'am ? '
" Why don't I ? ' said Bathsheba, desultorily. 'It
isn t worth while -- there's a fire here, Liddy.' She
suddenly exclaimed in an impulsive and excited whisper,
Have you heard anything strange said of Fanny?'
The words had no sooner escaped her than an expres+
sion of unutterable regret crossed her face, and she
burst into tears.
"No -- not a word !' said Liddy, looking at the
weeping woman with astonishment. 'What is it makes
you cry so, ma'am; has anything hurt you ? ' She came
to Bathsheba's side with a face full of sympathy.
" No, Liddy-i don't want you any more. I can
hardly say why I have taken to crying lately: I never
used to cry. Good-night.'
Liddy then left the parlour and closed the door.
<P 353>
Bathsheba was lonely and miserable now ; not lone+
lier actually than she had heen before her marriage;
but her loneliness then was to that of the present time
as the solitude of a mountain is to the solitude of a
cave. And within the last day or two had come these
disquieting thoughts about her husband's past. Her
wayward sentiment that evening concerning Fanny's
temporary resting-place had been the result of a strange
complication of impulses in Bathsheba's bosom. Per+
haps it would be more accurately described as a
determined rebellion against her prejudices, a revulsion
from a lower instinct of uncharitableness, which would
have withheld all sympathy from the dead woman, be+
cause in life she had preceded Bathsheba in the atten+
tions of a man whom Bathsheba had by no means
ceased from loving, though her love was sick to death
just now with the gravity of a further misgiving.
In five or ten minutes there was another tap at the
door. Liddy reappeared, and coming in a little way
stood hesitating, until at length she said, !Maryann has
just heard something very strange, but I know it isn't
true. And we shall be sure to know the rights of it in
a day or two.'
"What is it ?'
" Oh, nothing connected with you or us, ma'am. It
is about Fanny. That same thing you have heard.'
"I have heard nothing.'
"I mean that a wicked story is got to Weatherbury
within this last hour -- that --  -- ' Liddy came close to
her mistress and whispered the remainder of the sentence
slowly into her ear, inclining her head as she spoke in
the direction of the room where Fanny lay.
Bathsheba trembled from head to foot.
"I don't believe it ! ' she said, excitedly. 'And
there's only one name written on the coffin-cover.'
"Nor I, ma'am. And a good many others don't;
for we should surely have been told more about it if it
had been true -- don't you think so, ma'am ? '
"We might or we might not.'
Bathsheba turned and looked into the fire, that
Liddy might not see her
<P 354>
face. Finding that her mistress
was going to say no more, Liddy glided out, closed the
door softly, and went to bed.
Bathsheba's face, as she continued looking into the
fire that evening, might have excited solicitousness on
her account even among those who loved her least.
The sadness of Fanny Robin's fate did not make Bath+
sheba's glorious, although she was the Esther to this
poor Vashti, and their fates might be supposed to stand
in some respects as contrasts to each other. When
Liddy came into the room a second time the beautiful
eyes which met hers had worn a listless, weary look+
When she went out after telling the story they had ex+
pressed wretchedness in full activity. Her simple
country nature, fed on old-fashioned principles, was
troubled by that which would have troubled a woman
of the world very little, both Fanny and her child, if she
had one, being dead.
Bathsheba had grounds for conjecturing a connection
between her own history and the dimly suspected
tragedy of Fanny's end which Oak and Boldwood never
for a moment credited her with possessing. The
meeting with the lonely woman on the previous Saturday
night had been unwitnessed and unspoken of. Oak
may have had the best of intentions in withholding for
as many days as possible the details of what had
happened to Fanny ; but had he known that Bathsheba's
perceptions had already been exercised in the matter,
he would have done nothing to lengthen the minutes of
suspense she was now undergoing, when the certainty
which must terminate it would be the worst fact suspected
after all.
She suddenly felt a longing desire to speak to some
one stronger than herself, and so get strength to sustain
her surmised position with dignity and her carking
doubts with stoicism. Where could she find such a
friend? nowhere in the house. She was by far the
coolest of the women under her roof. Patience and
suspension of judgement for a few hours were what she
wanted to learn, and there was nobody to teach her.
Might she but go to Gabriel Oak ! -- but that could not
be. What a way Oak had, she thought, of enduring
things. Boldwood, who seemed so much deeper and
higher and stronger in
<P 355>
feeling than Gabriel, had not
yet learnt, any more than she herself, the simple
lesson which Oak showed a mastery of by every turn
and look he gave -- that among the multitude of interests
by which he was surrounded, those which affected his
personal welibeing were not the most absorbing and
important in his eyes. Oak meditatively looked upon
the horizon of circumstances without any special regard
to his own standpoint in the midst. That was how
she would wish to be. But then Oak was not racked
by incertitude upon the inmost matter of his bosom, as
she was at this moment. Oak knew all about Fanny
that he wished to know -- she felt convinced of that.
If she were to go to him now at once and say no more
than these few words, !What is the truth of the story?'
he would feel bound in honour to tell her. It would
be an inexpressible relief. No further speech would
need to be uttered. He knew her so well that no
eccentricity of behaviour in her would alarm him.
She flung a cloak roundher, went to the door and
opened it. Every blade, every twig was still. The air
was yet thick with moisture, though somewhat less dense
than during the afternoon, and a steady smack of drops
upon the fallen leaves under the boughs was almost
musical in its soothing regularity. lt seemed better to
be out of the house than within it, and Bathsheba closed
the door, and walked slowly down the lane till she came
opposite to Gabriel's cottage, where he now lived alone,
having left Coggan's house through being pinched for
room. There was a light in one window only', and that
was downstairs. The shutters were not closed, nor was
any blind or curtain drawn over the window, neither
robbery nor observation being a contingency which could
do much injury to the occupant of the domicile. Yes,
it was Gabriel himself who was sitting up : he was reading,
From her standing-place in the road she could see him
plainly, sitting quite still, his light curly head upon his
hand, and only occasionally looking up to snuff the
candle which stood beside him. At length he looked
at the clock, seemed surprised at the lateness of the
hour, closed his book, and arose. He was going to bed,
she knew, and if she tapped it must be done at once.
<P 356>
Alas for her resolve ! She felt she could not do it,
Not for worlds now could she give a hint about her
misery to him, much less ask him plainly for information
on the cause of Fanny's death. She must suspect, and
guess, and chafe, and bear it all alone.
Like a homeless wanderer she lingered by the bank,
as if lulled and fascinated by the atmosphere of content
which seemed to spread from that little dwelling, and
was so sadly lacking in her own. Gabriel appeared in
an upper room, placed his light in the window-bench,
and then -- knelt down to pray. The contrast of the
picture with her rebellious and agitated existence at this
same time was too much for her to bear to look upon
longer. It was not for her to make a truce with
trouble by any such means. She must tread her giddy
distracting measure to its last note, as she had begun it.
With a swollen heart she went again up the lane, and
entered her own door.
More fevered now by a reaction from the first feelings
which Oak's example had raised in her, she paused in
the hall, looking at the door of the room wherein Fanny
lay. She locked her fingers, threw back her head, and
strained her hot hands rigidly across her forehead, saying,
with a hysterical sob, 'Would to God you would speak
and tell me your secret, Fanny .! . , . O, I hope, hope
it is not true that there are two of you ! ... If I could
only look in upon you for one little minute, I should
know all !. '
A few moments passed, and she added, slowly, 'And
I will'
Bathsheba in after times could never gauge the mood
which carried her through the actions following this
murmured resolution on this memorable evening of her
life. She went to the lumber-closet for a screw-driver.
At the end of a short though undefined time she found
herself in the small room, quivering with emotion, a mist
before her eyes, and an excruciating pulsation in her
brain, standing beside the uncovered coffin of the girl
whose conjectured end had so entirely engrossed her, and
saying to herself in a husky voice as she gazed within --
'It was best to know the worst, and I know it now.!'
<P 357>
She was conscious of having brought about this
situation by a series of actions done as by one in an
extravagant dream ; of following that idea as to method,
which had burst upon her in the hall with glaring
obviousness, by gliding to the top of the stairs, assuring
herself by listening to the heavy breathing of her maids
that they were asleep, gliding down again, turning the
handle of the door within which the young girl lay, and
deliberately setting herself to do what, if she had antici+
pated any such undertaking at night and alone, would
have horrified her, but which, when done, was not so
dreadful as was the conclusive proof of her husband's
conduct which came with knowing beyond doubt the
last chapter of Fanny's story.
Bathsheba's head sank upon her bosom, and the
breath which had been bated in suspense, curiosity, and
interest, was exhaled now in the form of a whispered
wail: 'Oh-h-h!' she said, and the silent room added
length to her moan.
Her tears fell fast beside the unconscious pair in the
coffin: tears of a complicated origin, of a nature inde+
scribable, almost indefinable except as other than those
of simple sorrow. Assuredly their wonted fires must
have lived in Fanny's ashes when events were so shaped
as to chariot her hither in this natural, unobtrusive, yet
effectual manner. The one feat alone -- that of dying --
by which a mean condition couId be resolved into a
grand one, Fanny had achieved. And to that had
destiny subjoined this rencounter to-night, which had,
in Bathsheba's wild imagining, turned her companion's
failure to success, her humiliation to triumph, her luck
lessness to ascendency; et had thrown over herself a
garish light of mockery, and set upon all things about
her an ironical smile.
Fanny's face was framed in by that yeIIow hair of
hers; and there was no longer much room for doubt as
to the origin of the curl owned by Troy. In Bath+
sheba's heated fancy the innocent white countenance
expressed a dim triumphant consciousness of the pain
she was retaliating for her pain with all the merciless
rigour of the Mosaic law: 'Burning for burning; wound
for wound: strife for strife.
Bathsheba indulged in contempIations of escape from
her position by immediate death, which thought she,
<P 358>
though it was an inconvenient and awful way, had limits
to its inconvenience and awfulness that could not be
overpassed ; whilst the shames of life were measureless.
Yet even this scheme of extinction by death was out
FANNY'S REVENGE
tamely copying her rival's method without the reasons
which had glorified it in her rival's case. She glided
rapidly up and down the room, as was mostly her habit
hen excited, her hands hanging clasped in front of her,
as she thought and in part expressed in brocken words :
O, I hate her, yet I don't mean that I hate her, for
it is grievous and wicked; and yet I hate her a little !
yes, my flesh insists upon hating her, whether my spirit
is willing or no !.... If she had only lived, I could
ave been angry and cruel towards her with some justifi+
cation ; but to be vindictive towards a poor dead woman
recoils upon myself. O God, have mercy,! I am
miserable at all this !. '
Bathsheba became at this moment so terrified at her
own state of mind that she looked around for some sort
of refuge from herself. The vision of Oak kneeling
down that night recurred to her, and with the imitative
instinct which animates women she seized upon the idea,
resolved to kneel, and, if possible, pray. Gabriel had
prayed ; so would she.
She knelt beside the coffin, covered her face with her
hands, and for a time the room was silent as a tomb.
whether from a purely mechanical, or from any other
cause, when Bathsheba arose it was with a quieted spirit,
and a regret for the antagonistic instincts which had
seized upon her just before.
In her desire to make atonement she took flowers
from a vase by the window, and began laying them
around the dead girl's head. Bathsheba knew no other
way of showing kindness to persons departed than by
giving them flowers. She knew not how long she
remained engaged thus. She forgot time, life, where
she was, what she was doing. A slamming together of
the coach-house doors in the yard brought her to her+
self again. An instant after, the front door opened and
closed, steps crossed the hall, and her husband appeared
at the entrance to the room, looking in upon her.
He beheld it all by degrees, stared in stupefaction at
the scene, as if he thought it an illusion raised by some
fiendish
<P 359>
incantation. Bathsheba, pallid as a corpse on
end, gazed back at him in the same wild way.
So little are instinctive guesses the fruit of a legitimate
induction, that at this moment, as he stood with the
door in his hand, Troy never once thought of Fanny in
connection with what he saw. His first confused idea
was that somebody in the house had died.
'Weli-what ? ' said Troy, blankly.
'I must go ! I must go ! ' said Bathsheba, to herself
more than to him. She came with a dilated eye towards
the door, to push past him.
' What's the matter, in God's name ? who's dead ?'
said Troy.
'I cannot say; let me go out. I want air.! ' she
continued.
'But no; stay, I insist ! ' He seized her hand, and
then volition seemed to leave her, and she went off into
a state of passivity. He, still holding her, came up the
room, and thus, hand in hand, Troy and Bathsheba
approached the coffin's side.
The candle was standing on a bureau close by them,
and the light slanted down, distinctly enkindling the
cold features of both mother and babe. Troy looked
in, dropped his wife's hand, knowledge of it all came
over him in a lurid sheen, and he stood still.
So still he remained that he could be imagined to
have left in him no motive power whatever. The
clashes of feeling in all directions confounded one
another, produced a neutrality, and there was motion in
none.
'Do you know her?' said Bathsheba, in a small
enclosed echo, as from the interior of a cell.
'I do,' said Troy.
'Is it she?'
'It is.'
He had originally stood perfectly erect. And now,
in the welinigh congealed immobility of his frame
could be discerned an incipient movement, as in the
darkest night may be discerned light after a while.
He was gradually sinking forwards. The lines of his
features softened, and dismay modulated to illiimitable
sadness. Bathsheba was regarding him from the other
side, still with parted lips and distracted eyes.
<P 360>
Capacity
for intense feeling is proportionate to the general
intensity of the nature ,and perhaps in all Fanny's
sufferings, much greater relatively to her strength, there
never was a time she suffered in an absolute sense
what Bathsheba suffered now.
What Troy did was to sink upon  his knees with
an indefinable union of remorse and reverence upon
his face, and, bending over Fanny Robin, gently kissed
her, as one would kiss an infant asleep to avoid
awakening it.
At the sight and sound of that, to her, unendurable
act, Bathsheba sprang towards him. All the strong
feelings which had been scattered over her existence
since she knew what feeling was, seemed gathered
together into one pulsation now. The revulsion from
her indignant mood a little earlier, when she had
meditated upon compromised honour, forestalment,
eclipse in maternity by another, was violent and entire.
All that was forgotten in the simple and still strong
attachment of wife to husband. She had sighed for
her self-completeness then, and now she cried aloud
against the severance of the union she had deplored.
She flung her arms round Troy's neck, exclaiming wildly
from the deepest deep of her heart --
' Don't -- don't kiss them !. O, Frank, I can"t bear
it-i can't ! I love you better than she did: kiss me
too, Frank -- kiss me ! You will, Frank, kiss me too !'
There was something so abnormal and startling in
the childlike pain and simplicity of this appeal from a
woman of Bathsheba's calibre and independence, that
Troy, loosening her tightly clasped arms from his neck,
looked at her in bewilderment. It was such and unex+
pected revelation of all women being alike at heart, even
those so different in their accessories as Fanny and this
one beside him, that Troy could hardly seem to believe
her to be his proud wife Bathsheba. Fanny's own
spirit seemed to be animating her frame. But this was
the mood of a few instants only. When the momentary
'I will not kiss you!' he said pushing her away.
Had the wife now but gone no further. Yet,
perhaps. under the harrowing circumstances, to speak
out was the one wrong
<P 361>
act which can be better under+
stood, if not forgiven in her, than the right and politic
one, her rival being now but a corpse. All the feeling
she had been betrayed into showing she drew back to
herself again by a strenuous effort of self-command.
'What have you to say as your reason ?' she asked
her bitter voice being strangely low -- quite that of
another woman now.
'I have to say that I have been a bad, black-hearted
man,' he answered.
less than she.'
'Ah! don't taunt me, madam. This woman is more
to me, dead as she is, than ever you were, or are, or can
be.  If Satan had not tempted me with that face of
yours, and those cursed coquetries, I should have
He turned to Fanny then. 'But never mind, darling,'
wife.!'
At these words there arose from Bathsheba's lips a
long, low cry of measureless despair and indignation,
such a wail of anguish as had never before been heard
within those old-inhabited walls. It was the ??????????
of her union with Troy.
"If she's  --  that, -- what -- am I ? ' she added, as a
continuation of the same cry, and sobbing pitifully:
and the rarity with her of such abandonment only made
the condition more dire.
" You are nothing to me  --  nothing,' said Troy,
heartlessly. 'A ceremony before a priest doesn't make
a marriage. I am not morally yours.'
A vehement impulse to flee from him, to run from
this place, hide, and escape his words at any price, not
stopping short of death itself, mastered Bathsheba now.
She waited not an instant, but turned to the door and
ran out.
<C xliv>
<P 362>
UNDER A TREE -- REACTION
BATHSHEBA went along the dark road, neither know'
ing nor caring about the direction or issue of her flight.
The first time that she definitely noticed her position
was when she reached a gate leading into a thicket over+
hung by some large oak and beech trees. On looking
into the place, it occurred to her that she had seen it
by daylight on some previous occasion, and that what
appeared like an impassable thicket was in reality a
brake of fern now withering fast. She could think of
nothing better to do with her palpitating self than to go
in here and hide; and entering, she lighted on a spot
sheltered from the damp fog hy a reclining trunk, where
she sank down upon a tangled couch of fronds and
stems. She mechanically pulled some armfuls round
her to keep off the breezes, and closed her eyes.
Whether she slept or not that night Bathsheba was
not clearly aware. But it was with a freshened exist+
ence and a cooler brain that, a long time afterwards, she
became conscious of some interesting proceedings which
were going on in the trees above her head and around.
A coarse-throated chatter was the first sound.
It was a sparrow just waking.
Next : ' Chee-weeze-weeze-weeze .! ' from another
retreat.
It was a finch.
Third : ' Tink-tink-tink-tink-a-chink ! ' from the hedge,
It was a robin.
' Chuck-chuck-chuck !. ' overhead.
A squirrel.
Then, from the road, 'With my ra-ta-ta, and my
rum-tum-tum ! '
It was a ploughboy. Presently he came opposite,
and she believed from his voice that he was one of
the boys on her own farm. He was followed by a
shambling tramp of heavy feet, and
<P 363>
looking through
the ferns Bathsheba could just discern in the wan light
of daybreak a team of her own horses. They stopped
to drink at a pond on the other side of the way'. She
watched them flouncing into the pool, drinking, tossing
up their heads, drinking again, the water dribbling
from their lips in silver threads. There was another
flounce, and they came out of the pond, and turned
back again towards the farm.
She looked further around. Day was just dawning,
and beside its cool air and colours her heated actions
and resolves of the night stood out in lurid contrast.
She perceived that in her lap, and clinging to her
hair, were red and yellow leaves which had come
down from the tree and settled silently upon her
during her partial sleep. Bathsheba shook her dress to
get rid of them, when multitudes of the same family lying
round about her rose and fiuttered away in the breeze
thus created, 'like ghosts from an enchanter fleeing.'
There was an opening towards the east, and the
glow from the as yet unrisen sun attracted her eyes
thither. From her feet, and between the beautiful
yellowing ferns with their feathery arms, the ground
sloped downwards to a hollow, in which was a species
of swamp, dotted with fungi. A morning mist hung
over it now -- a fulsome yet magnificent silvery veil,
full of light from the sun, yet semi-opaque -- the hedge
behind it being in some measure hidden by its hazy
luminousness. Up the sides of this depression grew
sheaves of the common rush, and here and there a
peculiar species of flag, the blades of which glistened
in the enaerging sun, like scythes. But the general
aspect of the swamp was malignant. From its moist
and poisonous coat seemed to be exhaled the essences
of evil things in the earth, and in the waters under
the earth. The fungi grew in all manner of positions
from rotting leaves and tree stumps, some exhibiting
to her listless gaze their clammy tops, others their
oozing gills. Some were marked with great splotches,
red as arterial blood, others were saffron yellow, and
others tall and attenuated, with stems like macaroni.
Some were leathery and of richest browns. The
hollow seemed a nursery of pestilences small and
great, in the immediate neighbourhood of comfort
and health, and Bathsheba arose with a tremor at the
thought of having
<P 364>
passed the night on the brink of
so dismal a place.
'l'here were now other footsteps to be heard along
the road. Bathsheba's nerves were still unstrung :
she crouchcd down out of sight again, and the pedes+
trian came into view. He was a schoolboy, with a
bag slung over his shoulder containing his dinner,
and a hook in his hand. He paused by the gate,
and, without looking up, continued murmuring words
in tones quite loud enough to reach her ears.
'''O Lord, O Lord, O Lord, O Lord, O Lord'': --
that I know out o' book. ''Give us, give us, give us,
give us, give us '' : -- that I know. ''Grace that, grace that,
grace that, grace that '' : -- that I know.' Other words
followed to the same effect. The boy was of the
dunce class apparently; the book was a psalter, and
this was his way of learning the collect. In the worst
attacks of trouble there appears to be always a super+
ficial film of consciousness which is left disengaged
and open to the notice of trifles, and Bathsheba was
faintly amused at the boy's method, till he too passed on.
By this time stupor had given place to anxiety, and
anxiety began to make room for hunger and thirst.
A form now appeared upon the rise on the other side
of the swamp, half-hidden by the mist, and came
towards Bathsheba. The woman -- for it was a woman
 -- approached with her face askance, as if looking
earnestly on all sides of her. When she got a little
further round to the left, and drew nearer, Bathsheba
could see the newcomer's profile ngainst the sunny
sky', and knew the wavy sweep from forehead to chin,
with neither angle nor decisive line anywhere about
it, to be the familiar contour of Liddy Smallbury.
Bathsheba's heart bounded with gratitude in the
thought that she was not altogether deserted, and she
jumped up. ' O, Liddy .! ' she said, or attempted to say;
but the words had only been framed hy her lips; there
came no sound. She had lost her voice by exposure
to the clogged atmosphere all these hours of night.
'O, ma'am.! I am so glad I have found you,' said
the girl, as soon as she saw Bathsheba.
' You can't come across,' Bathsheba said in a whisper,
wihich she
<P 365>
vainly endeavoured to make loud enough to
reach Liddy's ears. Liddy, not knowing this, stepped
down upon the swamp, saying, as she did so, 'It will
bear me up, I think.'
Bathsheba never forgot that transient little picture
of Liddy crossing the swamp to her there in the
morning light. Iridescent bubbles of dank subter+
ranean breath rose from the sweating sod beside the
waiting maid's feet as she trod, hissing as they burst
and expanded away to join the vapoury firmament above.
Liddy did not sink, as Bathsheba had anticipated.
She landed safely on the other side, and looked up
at the beautiful though pale and weary face of her
young mistress.
'Poor thing ! ' said Liddy, with tears in her eyes,
Do hearten yourself up a little, ma'am. However
did --  -- '
'I can't speak above a whisper -- my voice is gone
for the present,' said Bathsheba, hurriedly. ' I suppose
the damp air from that hollow has taken it away
Liddy, don't question me, mind. Who sent you --
anybody ? '
' Nobody. I thought, when I found you were not
at home, that something cruel had happened. I fancy
I heard his voice late last night; and so, knowing
something was wrong --  -- '
'Is he at home?'
'No ; he left just before I came out.'
'Is Fanny taken away ? '
' Not yet. She will soon be -- at nine o'clock.'
'we won't go home at present, then. Suppose we
walk about in this wood ?'
Liddy, without exactly understanding everything, or
anything, in this episode, assented, and they walked
together further among the trees.
'But you had better come in, ma'am, and have
something to eat. You will die of a chill! '
'I shall not come indoors yet -- perhaps never.'
'Shall I get you something to eat, and something
else to put over your head besides that little shawl?'
'If you will, Liddy.'
Liddy vanished, and at the end of twenty minutes
returned with a cloak, hat, some slices of bread and
butter, a tea-cup, and some hot tea in a little china jug
<P 366>
"Is Fanny gone ? ' said Bathsheba.
' No,' said her companion, pouring out the tea.
Bathsheba wrapped herself up and ate and drank
sparingly. Her voice was then a little clearer, and
trifling colour returned to her face. 'Now we'll walk
about again,' she said.
They wandered about the wood for nearly two
REACTION
hours, Bathsheba replying in monosyllables to Liddy's
prattle, for her mind ran on one subject, and one only.
She interrupted with --
'l wonder if Fanny is gone by this time ? '
'I will go and see.'
She came back with the information that the
men were just taking away the corpse; that Bathsheba
had been inquired for; that she had replied to the
effect that her mistress was unwell and could not be
seen.
'Then they think I am in my bedroom ?'
' Yes.' Liddy then ventured to add: ' You said
when I first found you that you might never go home
again -- you didn't mean it, ma'am ? '
'No; I've altered my mind. It is only women with
no pride in them who run away from their husbands.
There is one position worse than that of being found
dead in your husband's house from his iliusage, and
that is, to be found alive through having gone away to
The house of somebody else. l've thought of it all this
morning, and I've chosen my course. A runaway wife
is an encumbrance to everybody, a burden to herself and
a byword -- all of which make up a heap of misery
greater than any that comes by staying at home --
though this may include the trifling items of insult,
beating, and starvation. Liddy, if ever you marry --
God forbid that you ever should ! -- you'll find yourself
in a fearful situation ; but mind this, don't you flinch.
Stand your ground, and be cut to pieces. That's
what I'm going to do.'
' O, mistress, don't talk so .! ' said Liddy,-taking her
hand; 'but I knew you had too much sense to bide
away. May I ask what dreadful thing it is that has
happened between you and him ?'
' You may ask; but I may not tell.'
In about ten minutes they returned to the house by
a cimuitous route, entering at the rear. Bathsheba
glided up the
<P 367>
back stairs to a disused attic, and her
companion followed.
'Liddy,' she said, with a lighter heart, for youth an
hope had begun to reassert themselves; ' you are to b
my confidante for the present -- somebody must be -- and
I choose you. Well, I shall take up my abode here fo
a while. Will you get a fire lighted, put down a piece
of carpet, and help me to make the place comfortable.
Afterwards, I want you and Maryann to bring up that
little stump bedstead in the small room, and the be
belonging to it, and a table, and some other things.
What shall I do to pass the heavy time away ?'
'Hemming handkerchiefs is a very good thing,' said
Liddy.
'O no, no .! I hate needlework-i always did.'
'knitting ? '
' And that, too.'
'You might finish your sampler. Only the carn
tions and peacocks want filling in; and then it could
be framed and glazed, and hung beside your aunt'
ma'am.'
' Samplers are out of date -- horribly countrified. No
Liddy, I'll read. Bring up some books -- not new ones.
I haven't heart to read anything new.'
'Some of your uncle's old ones, ma'am ? '
' Yes. Some of those we stowed away in boxes.' ,
faint gleam of humour passed over her face as she said:
'Bring Beaumont and Fletcher's Mai'd's Tragedy,- an
the Mourning Bride ,- and-iet me see -- Niht Thoghts,
and the Vanity of Human Wishes.'
'And that story of the black man, who murdered his
wife Desdemona? It is a nice dismal one that would
suit you excellent just now.'
' Now, Liddy, you've been looking into my book
without telling me; and I said you were not to ! How
do you know it would suit me? It wouldn't suit me a
all.'
'But if the others do --  -- '
' No, they don't ; and I won't read dismal books.
Why should I read dismal books, indeed ? Bring me
Love in a Village, and Maid of the Mill, and Doctor
Syntax, and some volumes of the Spectator.'
All that day Bathsheba and Liddy lived in the attic
in a state of
<P 368>
barricade ; a precaution which proved to be
needless as against Troy, for he did not appear in the
neighbourhood or trouble them at all. Bathsheba sat
at the window till sunset, sometimes attempting to read,
at other times watching every movement outside without
much purpose, and listening without much interest to
every sound.
The sun went down almost blood-red that night, and
a livid cloud received its rays in the east. Up against
this dark background the west front of the church
tower -- the only part of the edifice visible from the
farm-house windows -- rose distinct and lustrous, the
vane upon the summit bristling with rays. Hereabouts,
at six o'clock, the young men of the village gathered,
as was their custom, for a game of Prisoners' base. The
spot had been consecrated to this ancient diversion from
time immemorial, the old stocks conveniently forming
a base facing the boundary of the churchyard, in front
of which the ground was trodden hard and bare as a
pavement by the players. She could see the brown
and black heads of the young lads darting about right
and left, their white shirt-sleeves gleaming in the sun;
whilst occasionally a shout and a peal of hearty laughter
varied the stillness of the evening air. They continued
playing for a quarter of an hour or so, when the game
concluded abruptly, and the players leapt over the wall
and vanished round to the other side behind a yew-tree,
which was also half behind a beech, now spreading in
one mass of golden foliage, on which the branches
traced black lines.
'Why did the base-players finish their game so
suddenly?' Bathsheba inquired, the next time that
Liddy entered the room.
' I think 'twas because two men came just then from
Casterbridge and began putting up grand carved
tombstone,' said Liddy.  'The lads went to see whose
it was.'
' Do you know ? ' Bathsheba asked.
' I don't,' said Liddy.
<C xlv>
<P 369>
TROY'S ROMANTICISM
WHEN Troy's wife had left the house at the previous
midnight his first act was to cover the dead from sight.
This done he ascended the stairs, and throwing himself
down upon the bed dressed as he was, he waited miser+
ably for the morning.
Fate had dealt grimly with him through the last four+
and-twenty hours. His day had been spent in a way
which varied very materially from his intentions regard+
ing it. There is always an inertia to be overcome in
striking out a new line of conduct -- not more in our+
selves, it seems, than in circumscribing events, which
appear as if leagued together to allow no novelties in
the way of amelioration.
Twenty pounds having been secured from Bathsheba,
he had managed to add to the sum every farthing he
could muster on his own account, which had been seven
pounds ten. With this money, twenty-seven pounds ten
in all, he had hastily driven from the gate that morning
to keep his appointment with Fanny Robin.
On reaching Casterbridge he left the horse and trap
at an inn, and at five minutes before ten came back to
the bridge at the lower end of the town, and sat himself
upon the parapet. The clocks struck the hour, and no
Fanny appeared. In fact, at that moment she was being
robed in her grave-clothes by two attendants at the
Union poorhouse -- the first and last tiring-women the
gentle creature had ever been honoured with. The
quarter went, the half hour. A rush of recollection
came upon Troy as he waited: this was the second
time she had broken a serious engagement with him
In anger he vowed it should be the last, and at eleven
o'clock, when he had lingered and watched the stone
of the bridge till he knew every lichen upon their face
and heard the chink of the ripples underneath till they
oppressed him, he jumped from his seat, went to the inn
<P 370>
for his gig, and in a bitter mood of indifference con+
cerning the past, and recklessness about the future,
drove on to Budmouth races.
He reached the race-course at two o'clock, and re+
mained either there or in the town till nine, But
Fanny's image, as it had appeared to him in the sombre
shadows of that Saturday evening, returned to his mind,
backed up by Bathsheba's reproaches. He vowed he
would not bet, and he kept his vow, for on leaving the
town at nine o'clock in the evening he had diminish
his cash only to the extent of a few shillings.
He trotted slowly homeward, and it was now that
was struck for the first time with a thought that Fanny
had been really prevented by illness from keeping her
promise. 'This time she could have made no mistake
He regretted that he had not remained in Casterbridge
and made inquiries. Reaching home he quietly un+
harnessed the horse and came indoors, as we have seen,
to the fearful shock that awaited him.
As soon as it grew light enough to distinguish objects,
Troy arose from the coverlet of the bed, and in a mood
of absolute indifference to Bathsheba's whereabouts, a
almost oblivious of her existence, he stalked downstairs
and left the house by the back door. His walk was
towards the churchyard, entering which he searched
around till he found a newly dug unoccupied grave --
the grave dug the day before for Fanny. The position
of this having been marked, he hastened on to Caster+
bridge, only pausing
whereon he had last seen Fanny alive.
Reaching the town, Troy descended into a side
street and entered a pair of gates surmounted by a board
bearing the words, 'Lester, stone and marble mason.'
Within were lying about stones of all sizes and designs,
inscribed as being sacred to the memory of unnamed
persons who had not yet died.
Troy was so unlike himself now in look, word, and
deed, that the want of likeness was perceptible even to
his own consciousness. His method of engaging himself
in this business of purchasing a tomb was that of an
absolutely unpractised man. He could not bring him+
self to consider, calculate, or
<P 371>
economize. He waywardly
wished for something, and he set about obtaining it like
a child in a nursery. 'I want a good tomb,' he said to
the man who stood in a little office within the yard.
'I want as good a one as you can give me for twenty+
seven pounds,'
It was all the money he possessed.
'That sum to include everything?'
' Everything. Cutting the name, carriage to Weather+
bury, and erection. And I want it now at once .'
' We could not get anything special worked this
week.
'If you would like one of these in stock it could be
got ready immediately.'
'Very well,' said Troy, impatiently.  'Let's see what
you have.'
'The best I have in stock is this one, 'said the stone+
cutter, going into a shed. ' Here's a marble headstone
beautifully crocketed, with medallions beneath of typical
subjects ; here's the footstone after the same pattern,
and here's the coping to enclose the- grave. The
slabs are the best of their kind, and I can warrant them
'Well, I couId add the name, and put it up at
visitor who wore not a shred of mourning. Troy then
settled the account and went away. In the afternoon
almost done. He waited in the yard till the tomb was
way to Weatherbury, giving directions to the two men
the grave of the person named in the inscription.
bridge. He carried rather a heavy basket upon his
occasionally at bridges and
<P 372>
gates, whereon he deposited
returning in the darkness, the men and the waggon
the work was done, and, on being assured that it was,
Troy entered Weatherbury churchyard about ten
had marked the vacant grave early in the morning. It
extent from the view of passers along the road -- a spot
and bushes of alder, but now it was cleared and made
the ground elsewhere.
Here now stood the tomb as the men had stated, snow+
white and shapely in the gloom, consisting of head and
foot-stone, and enclosing border of marble-work uniting
them. In the midst was mould, suitable for plants.
Troy deposited his basket beside the tomb, and
vanished for a few minutes. When he returned he
carried a spade and a lantern, the light of which he
directed for a few moments upon the marble, whilst he
read the inscription. He hung his lantern on the lowest
bough of the yew-tree, and took from his basket flower+
roots of several varieties. There were bundles of snow+
drop, hyacinth and crocus bulbs, violets and double
daisies, which were to bloom in early spring, and of
carnations, pinks, picotees, lilies of the valley, forget-me+
not, summer's-farewell, meadow-saffron and others, for
the later seasons of the year.
Troy laid these out upon the grass, and with an im+
passive face set to work to plant them. The snowdrops
were arranged in a line on the outside of the coping,
the remainder within the enclosure of the grave. The
crocuses and hyacinths were to grow in rows; some of
the summer flowers he placed over her head and feet,
the lilies and forget-me-nots over her heart. The
remainder were dispersed in the spaces between these.
Troy, in his prostration at this time, had no percep+
tion that in the futility of these romantic doings, dictated
by a remorseful reaction from previous indifference, there
was any element
<P 373>
of absurdity. Deriving his idiosyn+
crasies from both sides of the Channel, he showed at
such junctures as the present the inelasticity of the
Englishman, together with that blindness to the line
where sentiment verges on mawkishness, characteristic
of the French.
lt was a cloudy, muggy, and very dark night, and
the rays from Troy's lantern spread into the two old
yews with a strange illuminating power, flickering, as it
seemed, up to the black ceiling of cloud above. He
felt a large drop of rain upon the back of his hand, and
presently one came and entered one of the holes of the
lantern, whereupon the candle sputtered and went out+
Troy was weary and it being now not far from midnight,
and the rain threatening to increase, he resolved to leave
the finishing touches of his labour until the day should
break. He groped along the wall and over the graves
in the dark till he found himself round at the north side.
Here he entered the porch, and, reclining upon the
bench within, fell asleep.
<C xlvi>
<P 374>
THE GURGOYLE : ITS DOINGS
THE tower of Weatherbury Church was a square
erection of fourteenth-century date, having two stone
gurgoyles on each of the four faces of its parapet. Of
these eight carved protuberances only two at this time
continued to serve the purpose of their erection -- that
of spouting the water from the lead roof within. One
mouth in each front had been closed hy bygone church+
wardens as superfluous, and two others were broken
away and choked -- a matter not of much consequence
to the welibeing of the tower, for the two mouths which
still remained open and active were gaping enough to do
all the work.
It has been sometimes argued that there is no truer
criterion of the vitality of any given art-period than the
power of the master-spirits of that time in grotesque ;
and certainly in the instance of Gothic art there is no
disputing the proposition. Weatherbury tower was a
somewhat early instance of the use of an ornamental
parapet in parish as distinct from cathedral churches,
and the gurgoyles, which are the necessary correlatives
of a parapet, were exccptionally prominent -- of the
boldest cut that the hand could shape, and of the most
original design that a human brain could conceive.
There was, so to speak, that symmetry in their distortion
which is less the characteristic of British than of
Continental grotesques of the period. All the eight
were different from each other. A beholder was con+
vinced that nothing on earth could be more hideous
than those he saw on the north side until he went
round to the south. Of the two on this latter face, only
that at the south-eastern corner concerns the story. It
was too human to be called like a dragon, too impish
to be like a man, too animal to be like a fiend, and not
enough like a bird to be called a griffin. This horrible
stone entity was fashioned as if covered with a
<P 375>
wrinkled
hide; it had short, erect ears, eyes starting from their
sockets, and its fingers and hands were seizing the
corners of its mouth, which they thus seemed to pull
open to give free passage to the water it vomited. The
lower row of teeth was quite washed away, though the
upper still remained. Here and thus, jutting a couple
of feet from the wall against which its feet rested as a
support, the creature had for four hundred years
laughed at the surrounding landscape, voicelessly in
dry weather, and in wet with a gurgling and snorting
sound.
Troy slept on in the porch, and the rain increased
outside. Presently the gurgoyle spat. In due time a
small stream began to trickle through the seventy feet
of aerial space between its mouth and the ground, which
the water-drops smote like duckshot in their accelerated
velocity. The stream thickened in substance, and in+
creased in power, gradually spouting further and yet
further from the side of the tower. When the rain fell
in a steady and ceaseless torrent the stream dashed
downward in volumes.
We follow its course to the ground at this point of
time. The end of the liquid parabola has come forward
from the wall, has advanced over the plinth mouldings,
over a heap of stones, over the marble border, into the
midst of Fanny Robin's grave.
The force of the stream had, until very lately, been
received upon some loose stones spread thereabout,
which had acted as a shield to the soil under the onset.
These during the summer had been cleared from the
ground, and there was now nothing to resist the down+
fall but the bare earth. For several years the stream
had not spouted so far from the tower as it was doing
on this night, and such a contingency had been over+
looked. Sometimes this obscure corner received no
inhabitant for the space of two or three years, and
then it was usually but a pauper, a poacher, or other
sinner of undignified sins.
The persistent torrent from the gurgoyle's jaws
directed all its vengeance into the grave. The rich
tawny mould was stirred into motion, and boiled like
chocolate. The water accumulated and washed deeper
down, and the roar of the pool thus formed spread into
the night as the head and chief among other noises of
<P 376>
the kind created by the deluging rain. The flowers so
carefully planted by Fanny's repentant lover began to
move and writhe in their bed. The winter-violets
turned slowly upside down, and became a mere mat of
mud. Soon the snowdrop and other bulbs danced in
the boiling mass like ingredients in a cauldron. Plants
of the tufted species were loosened, rose to the surface,
and floated of.
Troy did not awake from his comfortless sleep till it
was broad day. Not having been in bed for two nights
his shouldrrs felt stiff his feet tender, and his head
heavy. He remembered his position, arose, shivered,
took the spade, and again went out.
The rain had quite ceased, and the sun was shining
through the green, brown, and yellow leaves, now
sparkling and varnished by the raindrops to the bright+
ness of similar effects in the landscapes of Ruysdael and
Hobbema, and full of all those infinite beauties that
arise from the union of water and colour with high
lights. The air was rendered so transparent by the
heavy fall of rain that the autumn hues of the middle
distance were as rich as those near at hand, and the
remote fields intercepted by the angle of the tower ap+
peared in the same plane as the tower itself.
He entered the gravel path which would take him
behind the tower. The path, instead of being stony as
it had been the night before, was browned over with a
thin coating of mud. At one place in the path he saw
a tuft of stringy roots washed white and clean as a
bundle of tendons. He picked it up -- surely it could
not be one of the primroses he had planted? He saw
a bulb, another, and another as he advanced. Beyond
doubt they were the crocuses. With a face of perplexed
dismay Troy turned the corner and then beheld the
wreck the stream had made.
The pool upon the grave had soaked away into the
ground, and in its place was a hollow. The disturbed
earth was washed over the grass and pathway in the
guise of the brown mud he had already seen, and it
spotted the marble tombstone with the same stains.
Nearly all the flowers were washed clean out of the
ground, and they lay, roots upwards, on the spots whither
they had been splashed by the stream.
<P 377>
Troy's brow became heavily contracted. He set his
teeth closely, and his compressed lips moved as those of
one in great pain. This singular accident, by a strange
confluence of emotions in him, was felt as the sharpest
sting of all. Troy's face was very expressive, and any
observer who had seen him now would hardly have
believed him to be a man who had laughed, and sung,
and poured love-trifles into a woman's ear. To curse
his miserable lot was at first his impulse, but even that
lowest stage of rebellion needed an activity whose
absence was necessarily antecedent to the existence of the
morbid misery which wrung him. The sight, coming
as it did, superimposed upon the other dark scenery of
the previous days, formed a sort of climax to the whole
panorama, and it was more than he could endure.
Sanguine by nature, Troy had a power of eluding
grief by simply adjourning it. He could put off the
consideration of any particular spectre till the matter
had become old and softened by time. The planting
of flowers on Fanny's grave had been perhaps but a
species of elusion of the primary grief, and now it was
as if his intention had been known and circumvented.
Almost for the first time in his life, Troy, as he stood
by this dismantled grave, wished himself another man.
lt is seldom that a person with much animal spirit does
not feel that the fact of his life being his own is the one
qualification which singles it out as a more hopeful life
than that of others who may actually resemble him in
every particular. Troy had felt, in his transient way,
hundreds of times, that he could not envy other people
their condition, because the possession of that condition
would have necessitated a different personality, when he
desired no other than his own. He had not minded
the peculiarities of his birth, the vicissitudes of his life,
the meteoriike uncertainty of all that related to him,
because these appertained to the hero of his story,
without whom there would have been no story at all for
him; and it seemed to be only in the nature of things
that matters would right themselves at some proper date
and wind up well. This very morning the illusion
completed its disappearance, and, as it were, all of a
sudden, Troy hated himself. The suddenness was
probably more
<P 378>
apparent than real. A coral reef which
just comes short of the ocean surface is no more to the
horizon than if it had never been begun, and the mere
finishing stroke is what often appears to create an event
which has long been potentially an accomplished thing.
He stood and mediated -- a miserable man. Whither
should he go ? " He that is accursed, let him be accursed
still,' was the pitiless anathema written in this spoliated
effort of his new-born solicitousness. A man who has
spent his primal strength in journeying in one direction
has not much spirit left for reversing his course. Troy
had, since yesterday, faintly reversed his ; but the merest
opposition had disheartened him. To turn about would
have been hard enough under the greatest providential
encouragement; but to find that Providence, far from
helping him into a new course, or showing any wish
that he might adopt one, actuallyjeered his first trembling
and critical attempt in that kind, was more than nature
could bear.
He slowly withdrew from the grave. He did not
attempt to fill up the hole, replace the flowers, or do
anything at all. He simply threw up his cards and
forswore his game for that time and always. Going out
of the churchyard silently and unobserved -- none of the
villagers having yet risen -- he passed down some fields
at the back, and emerged just as secretly upon the high
road. Shortly afterwards he had gone from the village.
Meanwhile, Bathsheba remained a voluntary prisoner
in the attic. The door was kept locked, except during
the entries and exits of Liddy, for whom a bed had
been arranged in a small adjoining room. The light
of Troy's lantern in the churchyard was noticed about
ten o'clock by the maid-servant, who casually glanced
from the window in that direction whilst taking her
supper, and she called Bathsheba's attention to it.
They looked curiously at the phenomenon for a time,
until Liddy was sent to bed.
bathsheba did not sleep very heavily that night.
When her attendant was unconscious and softly breath+
ing in the next room, the mistress of the house was
still looking out of the window at the faint gleam
spreading from among the trees --
<P 379>
not in a steady shine,
but blinking like a revolving coastiight, though this
appearance failed to suggest to her that a person was
passing and repassing in front of it. Bathsheba sat
here till it began to rain, and the light vanished, when
she withdrew to lie restlessly in her bed and re-enact
in a worn mind the lurid scene of yesternight.
Almost before the first faint sign of dawn appeared
she arose again, and opened the window to obtain a full
breathing of the new morning air, the panes being now
wet with trembling tears left by the night rain, each
one rounded with a pale lustre caught from primrose+
hued slashes through a cloud low down in the awaken+
ing sky. From the trees came the sound of steady
dripping upon the drifted leaves under them, and from
the direction of the church she could hear another noise
 -- peculiar, and not intermittent like the rest, the purl
of water falling into a pool.
Liddy knocked at eight o'clock, and Bathsheba un+
locked the door.
" What a heavy rain we've had in the night, ma'am!.'
said Liddy, when her inquiries about breakfast had been
made.
" Yes ; very heavy.'
"Did you hear the strange noise from the church
yard?'
"I heard one strange noise. I've been thinking it
must have been the water from the tower spouts.'
"Well, that's what the shepherd was saying, ma'am.
He's now gone on to see.
"Oh!. Gabriel has been here this morning!.'
"Only just looked in in passing -- quite in his old way,
which I thought he had left off lately. But the tower
spouts used to spatter on the stones, and we are puzzled,
for this was like the boiling of a pot.'
Not being able to read, think, or work, Bathsheba asked
Liddy to stay and breakfast with her. The tongue of the
more childish womian still ran upon recent events. "Are
you going across to the church, ma'am?' she asked.
"Not that I know of,' said Bathsheba.
"I thought you might like to go and see where they
have put Fanny. The trees hide the place from your
window.'
<P 380>
Bathsheba had all sorts of dreads about meeting her
husband. "Has Mr. Troy been in to-night?' she said
" No, ma'am ; I think he's gone to Budmouth.
Budmouth! The sound of the word carried with
it a much diminished perspective of him and his deeds;
there were thirteen miles interval betwixt them now.
She hated questioning Liddy about her husband's
movements, and indeed had hitherto sedulously avoided
doing so; but now all the house knew that there had
been some dreadful disagreement between them, and
it was futile to attempt disguise. Bathsheba had
reached a stage at which people cease to have any
appreciative regard for public opinion.
"What makes you think he has gone there?' she said.
"Laban Tall saw him on the Budmouth road this
morning before breakfast.'
Bathsheba was momentarily relieved of that wayward
heaviness of the past twenty-four hours which had
quenched the vitality of youth in her without sub+
stituting the philosophy of maturer years, and the
resolved to go out and walk a little way. So when
breakfast was over, she put on her bonnet, and took
a direction towards the church. It was nine o'clock,
and the men having returned to work again from their
first meal, she was not likely to meet many of them in
the road. Knowing that Fanny had been laid in the
reprobates' quarter of the graveyard, called in the parish
'behind church,' which was invisible from the road, it
was impossible to resist the impulse to enter and look
upon a spot which, from nameless feelings, she at the
same time dreaded to see. She had been unable to
overcome an impression that some connection existed
between her rival and the light through the trees.
Bathsheba skirted the buttress, and beheld the hole
and the tomb, its delicately veined surface splashed and
stained just as Troy had seen it and left it two hours
earlier. On the other side of the scene stood Gabriel.
His eyes, too, were fixed on the tomb, and her arrival
having been noiseless, she had not as yet attracted his
attention. Bathsheba did not at once perceive that the
grand tomb and the disturbed grave were Fanny's, and
she looked on both sides and around for some humbler
mound,
<P 381>
earthed up and clodded in the usual way. Then
her eye followed Oak's, and she read the words with
which the inscription opened : --
"Erected by Francis Troy in Beloved Memory of
Fanny Robin.'
Oak saw her, and his first act was to gaze inquiringly
and learn how she received this knowledge of the
authorship of the work, which to himself had caused
considerable astonishment. But such discoveries did
not much affect her now. Emotional convulsions seemed
to have become the commonplaces of her history, and
she bade him good morning, and asked him to fill in
the hole with the spade which was standing by. Whilst
Oak was doing as she desired, Bathsheba collected the
flowers, and began planting them with that sympathetic
manipulation of roots and leaves which is so conspicuous
in a woman's gardening, and which flowers seem to
understand and thrive upon. She requested Oak to
get the churchwardens to turn the leadwork at the
mouth of the gurgoyle that hung gaping down upon
them, that by this means the stream might be directed
sideways, and a repetition of the accident prevented.
Finally, with the superfluous magnanimity of a woman
whose narrower instincts have brought down bitterness
upon her instead of love, she wiped the mud spots from
the tomb as if she rather liked its words than otherwise,
<C xlvii>
<P 382>
ADVENTURES BY THE SHORE
TROY wandered along towards the south. A composite
feeling, made up of disgust with the, to him, humdrum
tediousness of a farmer's life, gloomly images of her who
lay in the churchyard, remorse, and a general averseness
to his wife's society, impelled him to seek a home in any
place on earth save Weatherbury. The sad accessories
of Fanny's end confronted him as vivid pictures which
threatened to be indelible, and made life in Bathsheba's
house intolerable. At three in the afternoon he found
himself at the foot of a slope more than a mile in length,
which ran to the ridge of a range of hills lying parallel
with the shore, and forming a monotonous barrier between
the basin of cultivated country inland and the wilder
scenery of the coast. Up the hill stretched a road
nearly straight and perfectly white, the two sides
approaching each other in a gradual taper till they
met the sky at the top about two miles off. Through+
out the length of this narrow and irksome inclined plane
not a sign of life was visible on this garish afternoon
Troy toiled up the road with a languor and depression
greater than any he had experienced for many a day
and year before. The air was warm and muggy, and
the top seemed to recede as he approached.
At last he reached the summit, and a wide and
novel prospect burst upon him with an effect almost like
that of the Pacific upon Balboa's gaze. The broad
steely sea, marked only by faint lines, which had a
semblance of being etched thereon to a degree not deep
enough to disturb its general evenness, stretched the
whole width of his front and round to the right, where,
near the town and port of Budmouth, the sun bristled
down upon it, and banished all colour, to substitute in
its place a clear oily polish. Nothing moved in sky,
land, or sea, except a frill of milkwhite foam along the
nearer angles of the
<P 383>
shore, shreds of which licked the
contiguous stones like tongues.
He descended and came to a small basin of sea
enclosed by the cliffs. Troy's nature freshened within
him ; he thought he would rest and bathe here before
going farther. He undressed and plunged in. Inside
the cove the water was uninteresting to a swimmer,
being smooth as a pond, and to get a little of the ocean
swell, Troy presently swam between the two projecting
spurs of rock which formed the pillars of Hercules to
this miniature Mediterranean. Unfortunately for Troy
a current unknown to him existed outside, which, un+
important to craft of any burden, was awkward for a
swimmer who might be taken in it unawares. Troy
found himself carried to the left and then round in a
swoop out to sea.
He now recollected the place and its sinister
character. Many bathers had there prayed for a dry
death from time to time, and, like Gonzalo also, had
been unanswered ; and Troy began to deem it possible
that he might be added to their number. Not a boat
of any kind was at present within sight, but far in the
distance Budmouth lay upon the sea, as it were quietly
regarding his efforts, and beside the town the harbour
showed its position by a dim meshwork of ropes and
spars. After welinigh exhausting himself in attempts
to get back to the mouth of the cove, in his weakness
swimming several inches deeper than was his wont,
keeping up his breathing entirely by his nostrils, turning
upon his back a dozen times over, swimming <1en papillon>1
and so on, Troy resolved as a last resource to tread
water at a slight incline, and so endeavour to reach the
shore at any point, merely giving himself a gentle
impetus inwards whilst carried on in the general direc+
tion of the tide. This, necessarily a slow process, he
found to be not altogether so difficult, and though there
was no choice of a landing-place -- the objects on shore
passing by him in a sad and slow procession -- he per+
ceptibly approached the extremity of a spit of land yet
further to the right, now well defined against the sunny
portion of the horizon- While the swimmer s eye's were
fixed upon the spit as his only means of salvation on
this side of the
<P 384>
Unknown, a moving object broke the
outline of the extremity, and immediately a ship's boat
appeared manned with several sailor lads, her bows
towards the sea.
All Troy's vigour spasmodically revived to prolong
the struggle yet a little further. Swimming with his
right arm, he held up his left to hail them, splashing
upon the waves, and shouting with all his might. From
the position of the setting sun his white form was
distinctly visible upon the now deep-hued bosom of the
sea to the east of the boat, and the men saw him at
once. Backing their oars and putting the boat about,
they pulled towards him with a will, and in five or six
minutes from the time of his first halloo, two of the
sailors hauled him in over the stern.
They formed part of a brig's crew, and had come
ashore for sand. Lending him what little clothing they
could spare among them as a slight protection against
late they made again towards the roadstead where their
And now night drooped slowly upon the wide watery
levels in front; and at no great distance from them,
where the shoreiine curved round, and formed a long
riband of shade upon the horizon, a series of points of
yellow light began to start into existence, denoting the
spot to be the site of Budmouth, where the lamps were
being lighted along the parade. The cluck of their
oars was the only sound of any distinctness upon the
sea, and as they laboured amid the thickening shades
the lampiights grew larger, each appearing to send a
flaming sword deep down into the waves before it, until
there arose, among other dim shapes of the kind, the
form of the vessel for which they were bound.
<C xlviii>
<P 385>
DOUBTS ARISE -- DOUBTS LINGER
BATHSHEBA underwent the enlargement of her
Husband's absence from hours to days with a slight
feeling of suprise, and a slight feeling of relief; yet
neither sensation rose at any time far above the level
commonly designated as indifference. She belonged to
him : the certiinties of that position were so well defined,
and the reasonable probabilies of its issue so bounded
that she could not speculate on contingenciezs. Taking
no further interest in herself as a splendid woman, she
acquired the indifferent feelings of an outsider in contem+
plating her probable fate as a singular wretch ; for Bath+
sheba drew herself and her future in colours that no
reality could exceed for darkness. Her original vigorous
pride of youth had sickened, and with it had declined
all her anzieties about coming years, since anxiety
recognizes a better and a worse alternative, and Bath+
sheba had made up her mind that alternatives on any
noteworthy scale had ceased for her. Soon, or later --
and that not very late -- her husband would be home
again. And then the days of their tenancy of the
Upper Farm would be numbered. There had origin+
ally been shown by the agent to the estate some distrust
of Bathsheba's tenure as James Everdene's successor,
on the score of her sex, and her youth, and her beauty ;
but the peculiar nature of her uncle's will, his own
frequent testimony before his death to her cleverness
in such a pursuit, and her vigorous marshalling of the
numerous flocks and herds which came suddenly into
her hands before negotiations were concluded, had won
confidence in her powers, and no further objections had
been raised. She had latterly been in great doubt as
to what the legal effects of her marriage would be upon
her position; but no notice had been taken as yet of
her change of name, and only one point was clear -- that
in the event of her own or her husband's inability to
meet the agent at the
<P 386>
forthcoming January rent-day,
very little consideration would be shown, and, for that
matter, very little would be deserved. Once out of the
farm, the approach of poverty would be sure.
Hence Bathsheba lived in a perception that her
purposes were broken of. She was not a woman who
could hope on without good materials for the process,
differing thus from the less far-Sighted and energetic,
though more petted ones of the sex, with whom hope
goes on as a sort of clockwork which the merest food
and shelter are sufficient to wind up; and perceiving
clearly that her mistake had been a fatal one, she
accepted her position, and waited coldly for the end.
The first Saturday after Troy's departure she went
to Casterbridge alone, a journey she had not before
taken since her marriage. On this Saturday Bathsheba
was passing slowly on foot through the crowd of rural
business-men gathered as usual in front ot the market+
house, who were as usual gazed upon by the burghers
with feelings that those healthy lives were dearly paid
for by exclusion from possible aldermanship, when a
man, who had apparently been following her, said some
words to another on her left hand. Bathsheba's ears
were keen as those of any wild animal, and she dis+
tinctly heard what the speaker said, though her back
was towards him
"I am looking for Mrs. Troy. Is that she there?'
" Yes ; that's the young lady, I believe,' said the
the person addressed.
"I have some awkward news to break to her. Her
husband is drowned.'
As if endowed with the spirit of prophecy, Bathsheba
gasped out, "No, it is not true; it cannot be true!'
Then she said and heard no more. The ice of self+
command which had latterly gathered over her was
broken, and the currents burst forth again, and over
whelmed her. A darkness came into her eyes, and she
fell.
But not to the ground. A gloomy man, who had
been observing her from under the portico of the old
corn-exchange when she passed through the group
without, stepped quickly to her side at the moment of
her exclamation, and caught her in his arms as she sank
down.
<P 387>
"What is it?' said Boldwood, looking up at the
bringer of the big news, as he supported her.
"Her husband was drowned this week while bathing
in Lulwind Cove. A coastguardsman found his clothes,
and brought them into Budmouth yestersay.'
Thereupon a strange fire lighted up Boldwood's eye,
and his face flushed with the suppressed excitement of
an unutterable thought. Everybody's glance was now
centred upon him and the unconsious Bathsheba. He
lifted her bodily off the ground, and smoothed down
the folds of her dress as a child might have taken a
storm-beaten bird and arranged its ruffled plumes, and
bore her along the pavement to the King's Arms Inn.
Here he passed with her under the archway into a
private room; and by the time he had deposited -- so
lothly -- the precious burden upon a sofa, Bathsheba had
opened her eyes. Remembering all that had occurred,
she murmured, 'I want to go home .! '
Boldwood left the room. He stood for a moment in
the passage to recover his senses. The experience had
been too much for his consciousness to keep up with,
and now that he had grasped it it had gone again. For
those few heavenly, golden moments she had been in his
arms. What did it matter about her not knowing it? She
had been close to his breast ; he had been close to hers.
He started onward again, and sending a woman to
her, went out to ascertain all the facts of the case.
These appeared to be limited to what he had already
heard. He then ordered her horse to be put into the
gig, and when all was ready returned to inform her.
He found that, though still pale and unwell, she had in
the meantime sent for the Budmouth man who brought
the tidings, and learnt from him all there was to know.
Being hardly in a condition to drive home as she
had driven to town, Boldwood, with every delicacy of
manner and feeling, offered to get her a driver, or to
give her a seat in his phaeton, which was more com+
fortable than her own conveyance. These proposals
Bathsheba gently declined, and the farmer at once de+
parted.
About half-an-hour later she invigorated herself by
an effort, and took her seat and the reins as usuai-in
external
<P 388>
appearance much as if nothing had happened.
She went out of the town by a tortuous back street, and
drove slowly along, unconscious of the road and the
scene. The first shades of evening were showing them+
selves when Bathsheba reached home, where, silently
alighting and leaving the horse in the hands of the boy,
she proceeded at once upstairs. Liddy met her on the
landing. The news had preceded Bathsheba to Weather+
bury by half-an-hour, and Liddy looked inquiringly into
her mistress's face. Bathsheba had nothing to say.
She entered her bedroom and sat by the window, and
thought and thought till night enveloped her, and the
extreme lines only of her shape were visible. Somebody
came to the door, knocked, and opened it.
' Well, what is it, Liddy ? ' she said.
'I was thinking there must be something got for you
to wear,' said Liddy, with hesitation.
'What do you mean ?'
' Mourning.'
' No, no, no,' said Bathsheba, hurriedly.
'But I suppose there must be something done for
poor --  -- '
' Not at present, I think. It is not necessary.'
' Why not, ma'am ? '
' Because he's still alive.'
' How do you know that ? ' said Liddy, amazed.
' I don't know it. But wouldn't it have heen different,
or shouldn't I have heard more, or wouldn't they have
found him, Liddy ? -- or-i don't know how it is, but
death would have been different from how this is. I am
perfectly convinced that he is still alive .! '
Bathsheba remained firm in this opinion till Monday,
when two circumstances conjoined to shake it. The
first was a short paragraph in the local newspaper, which,
beyond making by a methodizing pen formidable pre+
sumptive evidence of Troy's death by drowning, con+
tained the important testimony of a young Mr. Barker,
M.D., of Budmouth, who spoke to being an eyewitness
of the accident, in a letter to the editor. In this he
stated that he was passing over the cliff on the remoter
side of the
<P 389>
cove just as the sun was setting. At that
time he saw a bather carried along in the current outside
the mouth of the cove, and guessed in an instant that
there was but a poor chance for him unless he should
be possessed of unusual muscular powers. He drifted
behind a projection of the coast, and Mr. Barker followed
along the shore in the same direction. But by the time
that he could reach an elevation sufficiently great to
command a view of the sea beyond, dusk had set in, and
nothing further was to be seen.
The other circumstance was the arrival of his clothes,
when it became necessary for her to examine and identify
them -- though this had virtually been done long before
by those who inspected the letters in his pockets. It
was so evident to her in the midst of her agitation that
Troy had undressed in the full conviction of dressing
again almost immediately, that the notion that anything
but death could have prevented him was a perverse one
to entertain.
Then Bathsheba said to herself that others were
assured in their opinion; strange that she should not
be. A stmnge reflection occured to her, causing her
face to flush. Suppose that Troy had followed Fanny
into another world. Had he done this intentionally, yet
contrived to make his death appear like an accident ?
Nevertheless, this thought of how the apparent might
differ from the reai-made vivid by her bygone jealousy
of Fanny, and the remorse he had shown that night
 -- did not blind her to the perception of a likelier
difference, less tragic, but to herself far more disastrous.
When alone late that evening beside a small fire, and
much calmed down, Bathsheba took Troy's watch into
her hand, which had been restored to her with the rest
of the articles belonging to him. She opened the case
as he had opened it before her a week ago. There was
the little coil of pale hair which had been as the fuze to
this great explosion.
'He was hers and she was his; they should be gone
together,' she said. 'I am nothing to either of them,
and why should I keep her hair?' She took it in her
hand, and held it over the fire. ' No-i'll not burn it
-i'll keep it in memory of her, poor thing !. ' she added,
snatching back her hand.
<C xlix>
<P 390>
OAK'S ADVANCEMENY -- A GREAT HOPE
THE later autumn and the winter drew on apace,
and the leaves lay thick upon the turf of the glades
and the mosses of the woods. Bathsheba, having
previously been living in a state of suspended feeling
which was not suspense, now lived in a mood of
quietude which was not precisely peacefulness. While
she had known him to be alive she could have thought
of his death with equanimity; but now that it might be
she had lost him, she regretted that he was not hers
still. She kept the farm going, raked in her profits
without caring keenly about them, and expended
money on ventures because she had done so in bygone
days, which, though not long gone by, seemed infinitely
removed from her present. She looked back upon that
past over a great gulf, as if she were now a dead person,
having the faculty of meditation still left in her, by
means of which, like the mouldering gentlefolk of the
poet's story, she could sit and ponder what a gift life
used to be.
However, one excellent result of her general apathy
was the long-delayed installation of Oak as bailiff; but
he having virtually exercised that function for a long
time already, the change, beyond the substantial in+
crease of wages it brought, was little more than a
nominal one addressed to the outside world.
Boldwood lived secluded and inactive. Much of
his wheat and all his barley of that season had been
spoilt by the rain. It sprouted, grew into intricate
mats, and was ultimately thrown to the pigs in armfuls.
The strange neglect which had produced this ruin
and waste became the subject of whispered talk among
all the people round; and it was elicited from one of
Boldwood's men that forgetfulness had nothing to do
with it, for he had been reminded of the danger to
his corn as many times and as persistently as inferiors
dared to do. The sight of the
<P 391>
pigs turning in disgust
from the rotten ears seemed to arouse Boldwood, and
he one evening sent for Oak. Whether it was sug+
gested by Bathsheba's recent act of promotion or not,
the farmer proposed at the interview that Gabriel
should undertake the superintendence of the Lower
Farm as well as of Bathsheba's, because of the necessity
Boldwood felt for such aid, and the impossibility of
discovering a more trustworthy man. Gabriel's malig+
nant star was assuredly setting fast.
Bathsheba, when she learnt of this proposai-for
Oak was obliged to consult her -- at first languidly
objected. She considered that the two farms together
were too extensive for the observation of one man.
Boldwood, who was apparently determined by personal
rather than commercial reasons, suggested that Oak
should be furnished with a horse for his sole use,
when the plan would present no difficulty, the two
farms lying side by side. Boldwood did not directly
communicate with her during these negotiations, only
speaking to Oak, who was the go-between throughout.
All was harmoniously arranged at last, and we now
see Oak mounted on a strong cob, and daily trotting
the length breadth of about two thousand acres
in a cheerful spirit of surveillance, as if the crops
belonged to him -- the actual mistress of the one-half
and the master of the other, sitting in their respective
homes in gloomy and sad seclusion.
Out of this there arose, during the spring succeeding,
a talk in the parish that Gabriel Oak was feathering his
nest fast.
' Whatever d'ye think,' said Susan Tall, ' Gable Oak
is coming it quite the dand. He now wears shining
boots with hardly a hob in 'em, two or three times
a-week, and a tall hat a-Sundays, and 'a hardly knows
the name of smockfrock. When I see people strut
enough to he cut up into bantam cocks, I stand
dormant with wonder, and says no more .! '
It was eventually known that Gabriel, though paid
a fixed wage by Bathslieba independent of the fluctua+
tions of agricultural profits, had made an engagement
with Boldwood by which Oak was to receive a share
of the receipts -- a small share certainly, yet it was
money of a higher quality than mere wages, and
capable of expansion in a way that wages were not.
<P 392>
Some were beginning to consider Oak a 'near' man,
for though his condition had thus far improved, he
lived in no better style than hefore, occupying the
same cottage, paring his own potatoes, mending his
stockings, and sometimes even making his bed with
his own hands. But as Oak was not only provokingly
indifferent to public opinion, but a man who clung
persistently to old habits and usages, simply because
they were old, there was room for doubt as to his
motives.
A great hope had latterly germinated in Boldwood,
whose unreasoning devotion to Bathsheba could only
be characterized as a fond madness which neither
time nor circumstance, evil nor good report, could
weaken or destroy. This fevered hope had grown up
again like a grain of mustard-seed during the quiet
which followed the hasty conjecture that Troy was
drowned. He nourished it fearfully, and almost
shunned the contemplation of it in earnest, lest facts
should reveal the wildness of the dream. Bathsheba
having at last been persuaded to wear mourning, her
appearance as she entered the church in that guise
was in itself a weekly addition to his faith that a
time was coming -- very far off perhaps, yet surely
nearing -- when his waiting on events should have
its reward. How long he might have to wait he had
not yet closely considered. what he would try to
recognize was that the severe schooling she had been
subjected to had made Bathsheba much more con+
siderate than she had formerly been of the feelings of
others, and he trusted that, should she be willing at
any time in the future to marry any man at all, that
man would be himself. There was a substratum of
good feeling in her: her self-reproach for the injury
she had thoughtlessly done him might be depended
upon now to a much greater extent than before her
infatuation and disappointment. It would be possible
to approach her by the channel of her good nature,
and to suggest a friendly businessiike compact between
them for fulfilment at some future day, keeping the
passionate side of his desire entirely out of her sight.
Such was Boldwood's hope.
To the eyes of the middle-aged, Bathsheba was
perhaps additionally charming just now. Her exuber+
ance cf spirit was pruned down ; the original phantom
of delight had shown
<P 393>
herself to be not too bright for
human nature's daily food, and she had been able to
enter this second poetical phase without losing much
of the first in the process.
Bathsheba's return from a two months' visit to her
old aunt at Norcombe afforded the impassioned and
yearning farmer a pretext for inquiring directly after
her -- now possibly in the ninth month of her
widowhood -- and endeavouring to get a notion of her
middle of the haymaking, and Boldwood contrived to
'I am glad to see you out of doors, Lydia,' he said
She simpered, and wondered in her heart why he
'I hope Mrs. Troy is quite well after her long
the coldest-hearted neighbour could scarcely say less
'She is quite well, sir.
'Yes, cheerful.
'Fearful, did you say?'
'O no. I merely said she was cheerful.'
'Tells you all her affairs?'
'No, sir.
'Some of them?'
'Yes, sir.
'Mrs Troy puts much confidence in you, Lydia;
and very wisely, perhaps.'
'She do, sir. I've been with her all through her
troubles, and was with her at the time of Mr.Troy's
going and all. And if she were to marry again I
expect I should bide with her.'
'She promises that you shali -- quite natural,' said
the strategic lover, throbbing throughout him at the
presumption which Liddy's words appeared to warrant
 -- that his darling had thought of re-marriage.
'No -- -she doesn't promise it exactly. I merely
judge on my own account.
'Yes       yes, I understand. When she alludes to the
possibility of marrying again, you conclude --  -- '
<P 394>
'She never do allude to it, sir,' said Liddy, thinking
how very stupid Mr. Boldwood was getting.
'Of course not,' he returned hastily, his hope falling
again. ' You needn't take quite such long reaches with
your rake, Lydia -- short and quick ones are best. Well,
perhaps, as she is absolute mistress again now, it is wise
of her to resolve never to give up her freedom.'
' My mistress did certainly once say, though not
seriously, that she supposed she might marry again at
the end of seven years from last year, if she cared to
risk Mr. Troy's coming back and claiming her.'
' Ah, six years from the present time. Said that she
might. She might marry at once in every reasonable
person's opinion, whatever the lawyers may say to the
contrary.'
'Have you been to ask them?' said Liddy, innocently.
' Not I,' said Boldwood, growing red. ' Liddy, you
needn't stay here a minute later than you wish, so Mr,
Oak says. I am now going on a little farther. Good'
afternoon.'
He went away vexed with himself, and ashamed of
having for this one time in his life done anything which
could be called underhand. Poor Boldwood had no
more skill in finesse than a battering-ram, and he was
uneasy with a sense of having made himself to appear
stupid and, what was worse, mean. But he had, after
all, lighted upon one fact by way of repayment. It was
a singularly fresh and fascinating fact, and though not
without its sadness it was pertinent and real. In little
more than six years from this time Bathsheba might
certainly marry him. There was something definite in
that hope, for admitting that there might have been no
deep thought in her words to Liddy about marriage,
they showed at least her creed on the matter.
This pleasant notion was now continually in his mind.
Six years were a long time, but how much shorter than
never, the idea he had for so long been obliged to
endure .! Jacob had served twice seven years for
Rachel: what were six for such a woman as this ? He
tried to like the notion of waiting for her better than
that of winning her at once. Boldwood felt his love
to be so deep and strong and eternal, that it was pos+
sible she
<P 395>
had never yet known its full volume, and this
patience in delay would afford him an opportunity of
giving sweet proof on the point. He would annihilate
the six years of his life as if they were minutes -- so little
did he value his time on earth beside her love. He
would let her see, all those six years of intangible ether+
eal courtship, how little care he had for anything but as
it bore upon the consummation.
Meanwhile the early and the late summer brought
round the week in which Greenhill Fair was held.
This fair was frequently attended by the folk of Weather+
bury.
<C l>
<P 396>
THE SHEEP FAIR -- TROY TOUCHES HIS WIFE'S HAND
GREENHILL was the Nijni Novgorod of South
Wessex; and the busiest, merriest, noisiest day of the
whole statute number was the day of the sheep fair.
This yearly gathering was upon the summit of a hill
which retained in good preservation the remains of an
ancient earthwork, consisting of a huge rampart and
entrenchnaent of an oval form encircling the top of
the hill, though somewhat broken down here and there.
To each of the two chief openings on opposite sides a
winding road ascended, and the level green space of
ten or fifteen acres enclosed by the bank was the
site of the fair. A few permanent erections dotted the
spot, but the majority of visitors patronized canvas alone
for resting and feeding under during the time of their
sojourn here.
Shepherds who attended with their flocks from long
distances started from home two or three days, or even
a week, before the fair, driving their charges a few miles
each day -- not more than ten or twelve -- and resting
them at night in hired fields by the wayside at pre+
viously chosen points, where they fed, having fasted since
morning. The shepherd of each flock marched behind,
a bundle containing his kit for the week strapped upon
his shoulders, and in his hand his crook, which he used
as the staff of his pilgrimage. Several of the sheep
would get worn and lame, and occasionally a lambing
occurred on the road. To meet these contingencies,
there was frequently provided, to accompany the flocks
from the remoter points, a pony and waggon into which
the weakly ones were taken for the remainder of the
journey.
The Weatherbury Farms, however, were no such
long distance from the hill, and those arrangements
were not necessary in their case. But the large united
flocks of Bathsheba and Farmer Boldwood formed a
valuable and imposing multitude which
<P 397>
demanded much
attention, and on this account Gabriel, in addition to
Boldwood's shepherd and Cain Ball, accompanied them
along the way, through the decayed old town of Kings'
bere, and upward to the plateau, -- old George the dog
of course behind them.
When the autumn sun slanted over Greenhill this
morning and lighted the dewy flat upon its crest, nebu+
lous clouds of dust were to be seen floating between
the pairs of hedges which streaked the wide prospect
around in all directions. These gradually converged
upon the base of the hill, and the flocks became
individually visible, climbing the serpentine ways which
led to the top. Thus, in a slow procession, they entered
the opening to which the roads tended, multitude after
multitude, horned and hornless -- blue flocks and red
flocks, buff flocks and brown flocks, even green and
salmon-tinted flocks, according to the fancy of the
colourist and custom of the farm. Men were shouting,
dogs were barking, with greatest animation, but the
thronging travellers in so long a journey had grown
nearly indifferent to such terrors, though they still
bleated piteously at the unwontedness of their experi+
ences, a tall shepherd rising here and there in the midst
of them, like a gigantic idol amid a crowd of prostrate
devotees.
The great mass of sheep in the fair consisted of
South Downs and the old Wessex horned breeds, to
the latter class Bathsheba's and Farmer Boldwood's
mainly belonged. These filed in about nine o'clock,
their vermiculated horns lopping gracefully on each side
of their cheeks in geometrically perfect spirals, a small
pink and white ear nestling under each horn. Before
and behind came other varieties, perfect leopards as to
the full rich substance of their coats, and only lacking the
spots. There were also a few of the Oxfordshire breeed,
whose wool was beginning to curl like a child's flaxen
hair, though surpassed in this respect by the effeminate
Leicesters, which were in turn less curly than the Cots+
wolds. But the most picturesque by far was a small
flock of Exmoors, which chanced to be there this year.
Their pied faces and legs, dark and heavy horns, tresses
of wool hanging round their swarthy
<P 398>
foreheads, quite
relieved the monotony of the flocks in that quarter.
All these bleating, panting, and weary thousands had
entered and were penned before the morning had far
advanced, the dog belonging to each flock being tied to
the corner of the pen containing it. Alleys for pedes+
trians intersected the pens, which soon became crowded
with buyers and sellers from far and near.
In another part of the hill an altogether different
scene began to force itself upon the eye towards mid+
day. A circular tent, of exceptional newness and size,
was in course of erection here. As the day drew on,
the flocks began to change hands, lightening the shep+
herd's responsibilities ; and they turned their attention
to this tent and inquired of a man at work there, whose
soul seemed concentrated on tying a bothering knot in
no time, what was going on.
' The Royal Hippodrome Performance of Turpin's
Ride to York and the Death of Black Bess,' replied the
man promptly, without turning his eyes or leaving off
tying.
As soon as the tent was completed the band struck
up highly stimulating harmonies, and the announce+
ment was publicly made, Black Bess standing in a con+
spicuous position on the outside, as a living proof, If
proof were wanted, of the truth of the oracular utterances
from the stage over which the people were to enter.
These were so convinced by such genuine appeals to
heart and understanding both that they soon began to
crowd in abundantly, among the foremost being visible
Jan Coggan and Joseph Poorgrass, who were holiday
keeping here to-day,
''That's the great ruffen pushing me .! ' screamed a
woman in front of Jan over her shoulder at him when
the rush was at its fiercest.
'How can I help pushing ye when the folk behind
push me ?' said Coggan, in a deprecating tone, turning
without turning his body, which was jammed as in a vice.
Tjere was a silence ; then the drums and trumpets
again sent forth their echoing notes. The crowd was
again ectasied,
<P 399>
and gave another lurch in which Coggan
and Poorgrass were again thrust by those behind upon
the women in front.
'O that helpless feymels should be at the mercy of
she swayed like a reed shaken by the wind.
Now,' said Coggan, appealing in an earnest voice
to the public at large as it stood clustered about his
shoulder-blades,'ded ye ever hear such onreasonable
woman as that ? Upon my carcase, neighbours, if I
could onlyu get out of this cheesewring, the damn women
might eat the show for me.! '
'Don't ye lose yer temper, Jan!' implored Joseph
Poorgrass, in a whisper. ' They might get their men to
murder us, for I think by the shine of their eyes that
they be a sinful form of womankind.'
Jan held his tongue, as if he had no objection to be
pacified to please a friend, and they gradually reached
the foot of the ladder, Poorgrass being flattened like a
jumping-jack, and the sixpence, for admission, which he
had got ready half-an-hour earlier, having become so
reeking hot in the tight squeeze of his excited hand that
the woman in spangles, brazen rings set with glass
diamonds, and with chalked face and shoulders, who
took the money of him, hastily dropped it again from
a fear that some trick had been played to burn her
fingers. So they all entered, and the cloth of the
tent, to the eyes of an observer on the outside, became
bulged into innumerable pimples such as we observe on
a sack of potatoes, caused by the various human heads,
backs, and elbows at high pressure within.
At the rear of the large tent there were two small
dressing-tents. One of these, alloted to the male per+
formers, was partitioned into halves by a cloth ; and in
one of the divisions there was sitting on the grass, puli
ing on a pair of jack-boots, a young man whom we
instantly recognise as Sergeant Troy.
Troy's appearance in this position may be briefly
accounted for. The brig aboard which he was taken in
Budmouth Roads was about to start on a voyage, though
somewhat short of hands. Troy read the articles and
joined, but before they sailed a boat was despatched
across the bay to Lulwind cove; as he
<P 400>
had half expected,
his clothes were gone. He ultimately worked his passage
to the United States, where he made a precarious living
in various towns as Professor of Gymnastics, Sword
Exercise, Fencing, and Pugilism. A few months were
sufficient to give him a distaste for this kind of life.
There was a certain animal form of refinement in his
nature; and however pleasant a strange condition might
be whilst privations were easily warded off, it was dis+
advantageously coarse when money was short. There
was ever present, too, the idea that he could claim a
home and its comforts did he but chose to return to
England and Weatherbury Farm. Whether Bathsheba
thought him dead was a frequent subject of curious
conjecture. To England he did return at last ; but the
but the fact of drawing nearer to Weatherbury abstracted its
fascinations, and his intention to enter his old groove at
the place became modified. It was with gloom he con+
sidered on landing at Liverpool that if he were to go home
his reception would be of a kind very unpleasant to con+
template ; for what Troy had in the way of emotion was
an occasional fitful sentiment which sometimes caused
him as much inconvenience as emotion of a strong and
healthy kind. Bathsheba was not a women to be made
a fool of, or a woman to suffer in silence; and how
could he endure existence with a spirited wife to whom
at first entering he would be beholden for food and
lodging ? Moreover, it was not at all unlikely that his
wife would fail at her farming, if she had not already
done so; and he would then become liable for her
maintenance : and what a life such a future of poverty
with her would be, the spectre of Fanny constantly be+
tween them, harrowing his temper and embittering her
words! Thus, for reasons touching on distaste, regret,
and shame commingled, he put off his return from day
to day, and would have decided to put it off altogether
if he could have found anywhere else the ready-made
establishment which existed for him there.
At this time -- the July preceding the September in
which we find at Greenhill Fair -- he fell in with a
travelling circus which was performing in the outskirts of
a northern town. Troy introduced himself to the
manager by taming a restive horse of the troupe, hitting
a suspended apple with pistol-+
<P 401>
bullet fired from the
animal's back when in full gallop, and other feats. For
his merits in these -- all more or less based upon his ex+
periences as a dragoon-guardsman -- Troy was taken into
the company, and the play of Turpin was prepared with
a view to his personation of the chief character. Troy
was not greatly elated by the appreciative spirit in which
he was undoubtedly treated, but he thought the engage+
ment might afford him a few weeks for consideration.
It was thus carelessly, and without having formed any
definite plan for the future, that Troy found himself
at Greenhill Fair with the rest of the company on this
day.
And now the mild autumn sun got lower, and in
front of the pavilion the following incident had taken
place. Bathsheba -- who was driven to the fair that day
by her odd man Poorgrass -- had, like every one else,
read or heard the announcement that Mr. Francis, the
Great Cosmopolitan Equestrian and Roughrider, would
enact the part of Turpin, and she was not yet too old
and careworn to be without a little curiosity to see him.
This particular show was by far the largest and grandest
in the fair, a horde of little shows grouping themselves
under its shade like chickens around a hen. The crowd
had passed in, and Boldwood, who had been watching
all the day for an opportunity of speaking to her, seeing
her comparatively isolated, came up to her side.
"I hope the sheep have done well to-day, Mrs. Troy?'
he said, nervously.
"O yes, thank you,' said Bathsheba, colour springing
up in the centre of her cheeks. "I was fortunate
enough to sell them all just as we got upon the hill, so
we hadn't to pen at all.'
"And now you are entirely at leisure ?'
"Yes, except that I have to see one more dealer in
two hours' time : otherwise I should be going home.
was looking at this large tent and the announcement.
Have you ever seen the play of "Turpin's Ride to
York?" Turpin was a real man, was he not ?'
"O yes, perfectly true -- all of it. Indeed, I think
I've heard Jan Coggan say that a relation of his knew
Tom King, Turpin's friend, quite well.'
<P 402>
"Coggan is rather given to strange stories connected
with his relations, we must remember. I hope they
can all be believed.'
"Yes, yes; we know Coggan. But Turpin is true
enough. You have never seen it played, I suppose?'
"Never. I was not allowed to go into these places
when I was young. Hark.! What's that prancing?
How they shout!'
"Black Bess just started off, I suppose. Am I right
in supposing you would like to see the performance,
Mrs. Troy ? Please excuse my mistake, if it is one;
but if you would like to, I'll get a seat for you with
pleasure.' Perceiving that she hesitated, he added, 'I
myself shall not stay to see it: I've seen it before.'
Now Bathsheba did care a little to see the show, and
had only withheld her feet from the ladder because she
feared to go in alone. She had been hoping that Oak
might appear, whose assistance in such cases was always
accepted as an inalienable right, but Oak was nowhere
to be seen; and hence it was that she said, "Then if
you will just look in first, to see if there's room, I think
I will go in for a minute or two.'
And so a short time after this Bathsheba appeared
in the tent with Boldwood at her elbow, who, taking
her to a " reserved ' seat, again withdrew.
This feature consisted of one raised bench in very
conspicuous part of the circle, covered with red cloth,
and floored with a piece of carpet, and Bathsheba
immediately found, to her confusion, that she was the
single reserved individual in the tent, the rest of the
crowded spectators, one and all, standing on their legs
on the borders of the arena, where they got twice as
good a view of the performance for half the money.
Hence as many eyes were turned upon her, enthroned
alone in this place of honour, against a scarlet back+
ground, as upon the ponies and clown who were
engaged in preliminary exploits in the centre, Turpin
not having yet appeared. Once there, Bathsheba was
forced to make the best of it and remain: she sat
down, spreading her skirts with some dignity over the
unoccupied space on each side of her, and giving a
new and feminine aspect to the pavilion. In a few
minutes she noticed the fat red nape of Coggan's neck
among those standing just
<P 403>
below her, and Joseph Poor+
grass's saintly profile a little further on.
The interior was shadowy with a peculiar shade.
The strange luminous semi-opacities of fine autumn
afternoons and eves intensified into Rembrandt effects
the few yellow sunbeams which came through holes
and divisions in the canvas, and spirted like jets of
gold-dust across the dusky blue atmosphere of haze
pervading the tent, until they alighted on inner surfaces
of cloth opposite, and shone like little lamps suspended
there.
Troy, on peeping from his dressing-tent through a
slit for a reconnoitre before entering, saw his unconscious
wife on high before him as described, sitting as queen
of the tournament. He started back in utter confusion,
for although his disguise efectually concealed his person+
ality, he instantly felt that she would be sure to recognize
his voice. He had several times during the day thought
of the possibility of some Weatherbury person or other
appearing and recognizing him; but he had taken the
risk carelessly. If they see me, let them, he had said.
But here was Bathsheba in her own person; and the
reality of the scene was so much intenser than any of
his prefigurings that he felt he had not half enough
considered the point.
She looked so charming and fair that his cool mood
about Weatherbury people was changed. He had not
expected her to exercise this power over him in the
twinkling of an eye. Should he go on, and care nothing ?
He could not bring himself to do that. Beyond a politic
wish to remain unknown, there suddenly arose in him
now a sense of shame at the possibility that his
attractive young wife, who already despised him, should
despise him more by discovering him in so mean a
condition after so long a time. He actually blushed
at the thought, and was vexed beyond measure that
his sentiments of dislike towards Weatherbury should
have led him to dally about the country in this way.
But Troy was never more clever than when absolutely
at his wit's end. He hastily thrust aside the curtain
dividing his own little dressing space from that of the
manager and proprietor, who now appeared as the
individual called Tom King as far
<P 404>
down as his waist, and
as the aforesaid respectable manager thence to his toes.
"Here's the devil to pay!' said Troy.
"How's that ?'
"Why, there's a blackguard creditor in the tent I don't
want to see, who'll discover me and nab me as sure as
Satan if I open my mouth. What's to be done?'
You must appear now, I think.'
"I can't.'
But the play must proceed.'
"Do you give out that Turpin has got a bad cold,
and can't speak his part, but that he'll perform it just
the same without speaking.'
The proprietor shook his head.
"Anyhow, play or no play, I won't open my mouth,
said Troy, firmly.
"Very well, then let me see. I tell you how we'll
manage,' said the other, who perhaps felt it would be
extremely awkward to offend his leading man just at
this time. "I won't tell 'em anything about your
keeping silence; go on with the piece and say nothing,
doing what you can by a judicious wink now and then,
and a few indomitable nods in the heroic places, you
know. They'll never find out that the speeches are
omitted.'
This seemed feasible enough, for Turpin's speeches
were not many or long, the fascination of the piece
lying entirely in the action ; and accordingly the play
began, and at the appointed time Black Bess leapt
into the grassy circle amid the plaudits of the spectators.
At the turnpike scene, where Bess and Turpin are hotly
pursued at midnight by the officers, and half-awake
gatekeeper in his tasselled nightcap denies that any
horseman has passed, Coggan uttered a broad-chested
"Well done!' which could be heard all over the fair
above the bleating, and Poorgrass smiled delightedly
with a nice sense of dramatic contrast between our
hero, who coolly leaps the gate, and halting justice in
the form of his enemies, who must needs pull up
cumbersomely and wait to be let through. At the
death of Tom King, he could not refrain from seizing
Coggan by the hand, and whispering, with tears in his
eyes, "Of
<P 405>
course he's not really shot, Jan  --  only
seemingly!' And when the last sad scene came on,
and the body of the gallant and faithful Bess had to
be carried out on a shutter by twelve volunteers from
among the spectators, nothing could restrain Poorgrass
from lending a hand, exclaiming, as he asked Jan to
join him, "Twill be something to tell of at Warren's in
future years, Jan, and hand down to our children.' For
many a year in Weatherbury, Joseph told, with the air
of a man who had had experiences in his time, that he
touched with his own hand the hoof of Bess as she lay
upon the board upon his shoulder. If, as some thinkers
hold, immortality consists in being enshrined in others'
memories, then did Black Bess become immortal that
day if she never had done so before.
Meanwhile Troy had added a few touches to his
ordinary make-up for the character, the more effectually
to disguise himself, and though he had felt faint qualms
on first entering, the metamorphosis effected by judici+
ously "lining' his face with a wire rendered him safe from
the eyes of Bathsheba and her men. Nevertheless, he
was relieved when it was got through.
There a second performance in the evening, and
the tent was lighted up. Troy had taken his part very
quietly this time, venturing to indroduce a few speeches
on occasion ; and was just concluding it when, whilst
standing at the edge of the circle contiguous to the first
row of spectators, he observed within a yard of him the
eye of a man darted keenly into his side features. Troy
hastily shifted his position, after having recognized in
sworn enemy, who still hung about the outskirts of
At first Troy resolved to take no notice and abide
by circumstances. That he had been recongnized by
this man was highly probable; yet there was room for
a doubt. Then the great objection he had felt to
allowing news of his proximity to precede him to
Weatherbury in the event of his return, based on a
feeling that knowledge of his present occupation would
discredit him still further in his wife's eyes, returned
in full force. Moreover, should he resolve not to
return at all, a tale of his being alive and being in
the neighbourhood would be
<P 406>
awkward ; and he was
anxious to acquire a knowledge of his wife's temporal
affairs before deciding which to do.
In this dilemma Troy at once went out to recon+
noitre. It occurred to him that to find Pennyways, and
make a friend of him if possible, would be a very wise
act. He had put on a thick beard borrowed from the
establishment, and this he wandered about the fair+
field. It was now almost dark, and respectable people
were getting their carts and gigs ready to go home
The largest refreshment booth in the fair was provided
by an innkeeper from a neighbouring town. This was
considered an unexceptionable place for obtaining the
necessary food and rest: Host Trencher (as he was
jauntily called by the local newspaper) being a sub+
stantial man of high repute for catering through all the
county round. The tent was divided into first and
second-class compartments, and at the end of the first+
class division was a yet further enclosure for the most
exclusive, fenced of from the body of the tent by a
luncheon-bar, behind which the host himself stood
bustling about in white apron and shirt-sleeves, and look+
ing as if he had never lived anywhere but under canvas
all his life. In these penetralia were chairs and a table,
which, on candles being lighted, made quite a cozy and
luxurious show, with an urn, plated tea and coffee pots,
china teacups, and plum cakes.
Troy stood at the entrance to the booth, where a
gipsy-woman was frying pancakes over a little fire of
sticks and selling them at a penny a-piece, and looked
over the heads of the people within. He could see
nothing of Pennyways, but he soon discerned Bathsheba
through an opening into the reserved space at the
further end. Troy thereupon retreated, went round the
tent into the darkness, and listened. He could hear
Bathsheba's voice immediately inside the canvas ; she
was conversing with a man. A warmth overspread his
face: surely she was not so unprincipled as to flirt in
a fair! He wondered if, then, she reckoned upon his
death as an absolute certainty. To get at the root of
the matter, Troy took a penknife from his pocket and
softly made two little cuts crosswise in the cloth, which,
by folding back the corners left a hole the size of a
<P 407>
wafer. Close to this he placed his face, withdrawing
it again in a movement of surprise; for his eye had
been within twelve inches of the top of Bathsheba's
head. lt was too near to be convenient. He made
another hole a little to one side and lower down, in a
shaded place beside her chair, from which it was easy
and safe to survey her by looking horizontally'.
Troy took in the scene completely now. She was
leaning back, sipping a cup of tea that she held in her
hand, and the owner of the male voice was Boldwood,
who had apparently just brought the cup to her,
Bathsheba, being in a negligent mood, leant so idly
against the canvas that it was pressed to the shape of
her shoulder, and she was, in fact, as good as in 'rioy's
arms; and he was obliged to keep his breast carefully
backward that she might not feel its warmth through the
cloth as he gazed in.
Troy found unexpected chords of feeling to be stirred
again within him as they had been stirred earlier in the
day. She was handsome as ever, and she was his. It
was some minutes before he could counteract his sudden
wish to go in, and claim her. Then he thought how
the proud girl who had always looked down upon him
even whilst it was to love him, would hate him on dis+
covering him to be a strolling player. Were he to make
himself known, that chapter of his life must at all risks
be kept for ever from her and from the Weatherbury
people, or his name would be a byword throughout the
parish. He would be nicknamed 'Turpin' as long as
he lived. Assuredly before he could claim her these few
past months of his existence must be entirely blotted out.
"Shall I get you another cup before you start,
ma'am?' said Farmer Boldwood.
I thank you," said Bathsheba. " But I must be going
at once. It was great neglect in that man to keep me
waiting here till so late. I should have gone two hours
ago, if it had not been for him. I had no idea of
coming in here; but there's nothing so refreshing as a
cup of tea, though I should never have got one if you
hadn't helped me.'
Troy scrutinized her cheek as lit by the candles,
and watched each varying shade thereon, and the
white shell-like sinuosities
<P 408>
of her little ear. She took
out her purse and was insisting to Boldwood on paying
for her tea for herself, when at this moment Pennyways
entered the tent. Troy trembled : here was his scheme
for respectability endangered at once. He was about
to leave his hole of espial, attempt to follow Pennyways,
and find out if the ex-bailiff had recognized him, when
he was arrested by the conversation, and found he was
too late.
"Excuse me, ma'am,' said Pennyways ; "I've some
private information for your ear alone.'
"I cannot hear it now,' she said, coldly. That
Bathsheba could not endure this man was evident; in
fact, he was continually coming to her with some tale
or other, by which he might creep into favour at the
expense of persons maligned.
"I'll write it down,' said Pennyways, confidently. He
stooped over the table, pulled a leaf from a warped
pocket-book, and wrote upon the paper, in a round
hand --
" <1Your husband is here. I've seen him. Who's the fool
now?'
This he folded small, and handed towards her.
Bathsheba would not read it ; she would not even put
out her hand to take it. Pennyways, then, with a laugh
of derision, tossed it into her lap, and, turning away,
left her.
From the words and action of Pennyways, Troy,
though he had not been able to see what the ex-bailiff
wrote, had not a moment's doubt that the note referred
to him. Nothing that he could think of could be done
to check the exposure. " Curse my luck.!' he whispered,
and added imprecations which rustled in the gloom like
a pestilent wind. Meanwhile Boldwood said, taking up
the note from her lap --
"Don't you wish to read it, Mrs. Troy? If not,
I'll destroy it."
" Oh, well,' said Bathsheba, carelessly, "perhaps it is
unjust not to read it; but I can guess what it is about.
He wants me to recommend him, or it is to tell me of
some little scandal or another connected with my work+
people. He's always doing that.'
Bathsheba held the note in her right hand. Bold+
wood handed towards her a plate of cut bread-and+
butter; when, in order to take a slice, she put the note
into her left hand, where she was still holding the purse,
and then allowed her hand to drop
<P 409>
beside her close to
the canvas. The moment had come for saving his game,
and Troy impulsively felt that he would play the card,
For yet another time he looked at the fair hand, and
saw the pink finger-tips, and the blue veins of the
wrrist, encircled by a bracelet of coral chippings which
she wore: how familiar it all was to him.! Then, with
the lightning action in which he was such an adept, he
noiselessly slipped his hand under the bottom of the
tent-cloth, which was far from being pinned tightly down,
lifted it a little way, keeping his eye to the hole,
snatched the note from her fingers, dropped the canvas,
and ran away in the gloom towards the bank and ditch,
smiling at the scream of astonishment which burst from
her. Troy then slid down on the outside of the rampart,
hastened round in the bottom of the entrenchment to
a distance of a hundred yards, ascended again, and
crossed boldly in a slow walk towards the front entrance
of the tent. His object was now to get to Pennyways,
and prevent a repetition of the announcement until
such time as he should choose.
Troy reached the tent door, and standing among the
groups there gathered, looked anxiously for Pennyways,
evidently not wishing to make himself prominent by
inquiring for him. One or two men were speaking of
a daring attempt that had just been made to rob a
young lady by lifting the canvas of the tent beside her.
It was supposed that the rogue had imagined a slip of
paper which she held in her hand to he a bank note,
for he had seized it, and made off with it, leaving her
purse behind. His chagrin and disappointment at dis+
covering its worthlessness would be a good joke, it was
said. However, the occurrence seemed to have become
known to few, for it had not interrupted a fiddler, who
had lately begun playing by the door of the tent, nor
the four bowed old men with grim countenances and
walking-sticks in hand, who were dancing "Major
Malley's Reel' to the tune. Behind these stood
Pennyways. Troy glided up to him, beckoned, and
whispered a few words ; and with a mutual glance of
concurrence the two men went into the night together.
<C li>
<P 410>
BATHSHEBA TALKS WITH HER OUTRIDER
THE arrangement for getting back again to Weather+
bury had been that Oak should take the place of Poor+
grass in Bathsheba's conveyance and drive her home,
it being discovered late in the afternoon that Joseph
was suffering from his old complaint, a multiplying eye,
and was, therefore, hardly trustworthy as coachman and
protector to a woman. But Oak had found himself so
occupied, and was full of so many cares relative to
those portions of Boldwood's flocks that were not
disposed of, that Bathsheba, without telling Oak or
anybody, resolved to drive home herself, as she had
many times done from Casterbridge Market, and trust
to her good angel for performing the journey un+
molested. But having fallen in with Farmer Boldwood
accidentally (on her part at least) at the refreshment+
tent, she found it impossible to refuse his offer to ride
on horseback beside her as escort. It had grown
twilight before she was aware, but Boldwood assured
her that there was no cause for uneasiness, as the
moon would be up in half-an-hour.
Immediately after the incident in the tent, she had
risen to go -- now absolutely alarmed and really grateful
for her old lover's protection -- though regretting Gabriel's
absence, whose company she would have much preferred,
as being more proper as well as more pleasant, since he
was her own managing-man and servant. This, how+
ever, could not be helped; she would not, on any
consideration, treat Boldwood harshly, having once
already iliused him, and the moon having risen, and
the gig being ready, she drove across the hilitop in
the wending way's which led downwards -- to oblivious
obscurity, as it seemed, for the moon and the hill it
flooded with light were in appearance on a level, the
rest of the world lying as a vast shady concave between
them. Boldwood mounted his horse, and
<P 411>
followed in
close attendance behind. Thus they descended into
the lowlands, and the sounds of those left on the
hill came like voices from the sky, and the lights were
as those of a camp in heaven. They soon passed the
merry stragglers in the immediate vicinity of the hill,
traversed Kingsbere, and got upon the high road.
The keen instincts of Bathsheba had perceived that
the farmer's staunch devotion to herself was still un+
diminished, and she sympathized deeply. The sight
had quite depressed her this evening; had reminded
her of her folly; she wished anew, as she had wished
many months ago, for some means of making repara+
tion for her fault. Hence her pity for the man who
so persistently loved on to his own injury and per+
manent gloom had betrayed Bathsheba into an injudi+
cious considerateness of manner, which appeared
almost like tenderness, and gave new vigour to the
exquisite dream of a Jacob's seven years service in
poor Boldwood's mind.
He soon found an excuse for advancing from his
position in the rear, and rode close by her side. They
had gone two or three miles in the moonlight, speaking
desultorily across the wheel of her gig concerning the
fair, farming, Oak's usefulness to them both, and other
indifferent subjects, when Boldwood said suddenly
and simply --
"Mrs. Troy, you will marry again some day?'
This point-blank query unmistakably confused her,
it was not till a minute or more had elapsed that
she said, "I have not seriously thought of any such
subject.'
"I quite understand that. Yet your late husband
has been dead nearly one year, and -- '
" You forget that his death was never absolutely
proved, and may not have taken place; so that I may
not be really a widow,' she said, catching at the straw of
escape that the fact afforded
"Not absolutely proved, perhaps, but it was proved
circumstantially. A man saw him drowning, too. No
reasonable person has any doubt of his death; nor
have you, ma'am, I should imagine.
"O yes I have, or I should have acted differently,'
she said, gently. "From the first, I have had a strange
uaccountable
<P 412>
feeling that he could not have perished,
but I have been able to explain that in several ways
since. Even were I half persuaded that I shall see
him no more, I am far from thinking of marriage with
another. I should be very contemptible to indulge in
such a thought.'
They were silent now awhile, and having struck into
an unfrequented track across a common, the creaks of
Boldwood's saddle and gig springs were all the
sounds to be heard. Boldwood ended the pause.
"Do you remember when I carried you fainting in
my arms into the King's Arms, in Casterbridge? Every
dog has his day: that was mine.'
"I know-i know it all,' she said, hurriedly.
"I, for one, shall never cease regretting that events
so fell out as to deny you to me.'
"I, too, am very sorry,' she said, and then checked
herself. "I mean, you know, I am sorry you thought
i -- '
"I have always this dreary pleasure in thinking over
those past times with you -- that I was something to
you before <1he>1 was anything, and that you belonged
<1almost>1 to me. But, of course, that's nothing. You
never liked me.'
" I did ; and respected you, too.'
"Do you now?'
"Yes.'
"Which?'
"How do you mean which?'
"Do you like me, or do you respect me?'
"I don't know -- at least, I cannot tell you. It is
difficult for a woman to define her feelings in language
which is chiefly made by men to express theirs. My
treatment of you was thoughtless, inexcusable, wicked.!
I shall eternally regret it. If there had been anything
I could have done to make amends I would most
gladly have done it -- there was nothing on earth I so
longed to do as to repair the error. But that was not
possible.'
"Don't blame yourself -- you were not so far in the
wrong as you suppose. Bathsheba, suppose you had
real complete proof
<P 413>
that you are what, in fact, you are
 -- a widow -- would you repair the old wrong to me by
marrying me?'
"I cannot say. I shouldn't yet, at any rate.'
"But you might at some future time of your life?'
"O yes, I might at some time.'
"Well, then, do you know that without further proof
of any kind you may marry again in about six years
from the present -- subject to nobody's objection or
blame?'
"O yes,' she said, quickly. " I know all that. But
don't talk of it -- seven or six years -- where may we all
be by that time?'
"They will soon glide by, and it will seem an
astonishingly short time to look back upon when they
are past -- much less than to look forward to now.'
"Yes, yes; I have found that in my own experience.'
" Now listen once more,' Boldwood pleaded. "If I
wait that time, will you marry me? You own that you
owe me amends-iet that be your way of making them.'
"But, Mr. Boldwood -- six years -- '
"Do you want to be the wife of any other man?'
"No indeed! I mean, that I don't like to talk
about this matter now. Perhaps it is not proper, and
I ought not to allow it. Let us drop it. My husband
may be living, as I said.'
"Of course, I'll drop the subject if you wish. But
propriety has nothing to do with reasons. I am a
middle-aged man, willing to protect you for the
remainder of our lives. On your side, at least, there
is no passion or blamable haste -- on mine, perhaps,
there is. But I can't help seeing that if you choose
from a feeling of pity, and, as you say, a wish to make
amends, to make a bargain with me for a far-ahead
time -- an agreement which will set all things right
and make me happy, late though it may be -- there is
no fault to be found with you as a woman. Had'nt
I the first place beside you? Haven't you been
almost mine once already? Surely you can say to
me as much as this, you will have me back again
should circumstances permit ? Now, pray speak ! O
Bathsheba, promise -- it is only a little promise -- that
if you marry again, you will marry me.!'
His tone was so excited that she almost feared him
at this
<P 414>
moment, even whilst she sympathized. It was
a simple physical fear -- the weak of the strong; there
no emotional aversion or inner repugnance. She
said, with some distress in her voice, for she remembered
vividly his outburst on the Yalbury Road, and shrank
from a repetition of his anger: --
"I will never marry another man whilst you wish me
to be your wife, whatever comes -- but to say more -- you
have taken me so by surprise -- -'
"But let it stand in these simple words -- that in six
years' time you will be my wife ? Unexpected accidents
we'll not mention, because those, of course, must be
given way to. Now, this time I know you will keep
your word.'
"That's why I hesitate to give it.'
"But do give it ! Remember the past, and be kind.'
She breathed; and then said mournfully : "O what
shall I do ? I don't love you, and I much fear that I
never shall love you as much as a woman ought to love
a husband. If you, sir, know that, and I can yet give
you happiness by a mere promise to marry at the end of
six years, if my husband should not come back, it is a
great honour to me. And if you value such an act of
friendship from a woman who doesn't esteem her+
self as she did, and has little love left, why it
wili -- '
"Promise!.'
" -- Consider, if I cannot promise soon.'
"But soon is perhaps never?'
"O no, it is not.! I mean soon. Christmas, we'll
say.'
"Christmas.!' He said nothing further till he
added : "Well, I'll say no more to you about it till that
time.'
Bathsheba was in a very peculiar state of mind,
which showed how entirely the soul is the slave of the
body, the ethereal spirit dependent for its quality upon
the tangible flesh and blood. It is hardly too much to
say that she felt coerced by a force stronger than her
own will, not only into the act of promising upon this
singularly remote and vague matter, but into the emo+
tion of fancying that she ought to promise. When the
weeks intervening between the night of this conversa+
<P 415>
tion and Christmas day began perceptibly to diminish,
her anxiety and perplexity increased.
One day she was led by an accident into an oddly
confidential dialogue with Gabriel about her difficulty
It afforded her a little relief -- of a dull and cheerless
kind. They were auditing accounts, and something
occurred in the course of their labours which led Oak
to say, speaking of Boldwood, " He'll never forget you,
ma'am, never.'
Then out came her trouble before she was aware ;
and she told him how she had again got into the toils;
what Boldwood had asked her, and how he was ex+
pecting her assent. "The most mournful reason of all
for my agreeing to it,' she said sadly, 'and the true
reason why I think to do so for good or for evil, is this
 -- it is a thing I have not breathed to a living soul as
yet-i believe that if I don't give my word, he'll go out
of his mind.'
"Really, do ye?' said Gabriel, gravely.
'I believe this,' she continued, with reckless frank+
ness; "and Heaven knows I say it in a spirit the very
reverse of vain, for I am grieved and troubled to my
soul about it-i believe I hold that man's future in my
hand. His career depends entirely upon my treatment
of him. O Gabriel, I tremble at my responsibility, for
it is terrible.!'
"Well, I think this much, ma'am, as I told you years
ago,' said Oak, 'that his life is a total blank whenever
he isn't hoping for 'ee; but I can't suppose-i hope
that nothing so dreadful hangs on to it as you fancy.
His natural manner has always been dark and strange,
you know. But since the case is so sad and oddiike,
why don't ye give the conditional promise? I think I
would.'
"But is it right? Some rash acts of my past life
have taught me that a watched woman must have very
much circumspection to retain only a very little credit,
and I do want and long to be discreet in this! And
six years -- why we may all be in our graves by that
BATHSHEBA TALKS WITH OAK
time, even if Mr. Troy does not come back again, which
he may not impossibly do.! Such thoughts give a sort
of absurdity to the scheme. Now, isn't it preposterous,
<P 416>
Gabriel? However he came to dream of it, I cannot think.
But is it wrong? You know -- you are older than I.'
"Eight years older, ma'am.'
"Yes, eight years -- and is it wrong?'
"Perhaps it would be an uncommon agreement for a
man and woman to make : I don't see anything really
wrong about it,' said Oak, slowly. "In fact the very
thing that makes it doubtful if you ought to marry en
under any condition, that is, your not caring about him
 -- for I may suppose --  -- '
"Yes, you may suppose that love is wanting,' she
said shortly. "Love is an utterly bygone, sorry, worn+
out, miserable thing with me -- for him or any one else.'
"Well, your want of love seems to me the one thing
that takes away harm from such an agreement with him.
If wild heat had to do wi' it, making ye long to over+
come the awkwardness about your husband's vanishing,
it mid be wrong ; but a cold-hearted agreement to oblige
a man seems different, somehow. The real sin, ma'am
in my mind, lies in thinking of ever wedding wi' a man
you don't love honest and true.'
"That I'm willing to pay the penalty of,' said Bath+
sheba, firmly. " You know, Gabriel, this is what I can+
not get off my conscience -- that I once seriously injured
him in sheer idleness. If I had never played a trick
upon him, he would never have wanted to marry me.
O if I could only pay some heavy damages in money
to him for the harm I did, and so get the sin off my
soul that way!... Well, there's the debt, which can
only be discharged in one way, and I believe I am
bound to do it if it honestly lies in my power, without
any consideration of my own future at all. When a
rake gambles away his expectations, the fact that it is
an inconvenient debt doesn't make him the less liable.
I've been a rake, and the single point I ask you is, con+
sidering that my own scruples, and the fact that in the
eye of the law my husband is only missing, will keep
any man from marrying me until seven years have
passed -- am I free to entertain such an idea, even
though 'tis a sort of penance -- for it will be that? I
hate the act of marriage under such circumstances, and
the class of women I should seem to belong to by doing
it!'
<P 417>
"It seems to me that all depends upon whe'r you
think, as everybody else do, that your husband is
dead.'
"I shall get to, I suppose, because I cannot help
feeling what would have brought him back long before
this time if he had lived.'
"Well, then, in religious sense you will be as free
to <1think>1 o' marrying again as any real widow of one
year's standing. But why don't ye ask Mr. Thirdly's
advice on how to treat Mr. Boldwood?'
"No. When I want a broad-minded opinion for
general enlightenment, distinct from special advice, I
never go to a man who deals in the subject pro+
fessionally. So I like the parson's opinion on law, the
lawyer's on doctoring, the doctor's on business, and my
business-man's -- that is, yours -- on morals.'
'And on love --  -- '
"My own.'
"I'm afraid there's a hitch in that argument,' said
Oak, with a grave smile.
She did not reply at once, and then saying, 'Good
evening Mr. Oak,' went away.
She had spoken frankly, and neither asked nor ex+
pected any reply from Gabriel more satisfactory than
that she had obtained. Yet in the centremost parts of
her complicated heart there existed at this minute a
little pang of disappointment, for a reason she would
not allow herself to recognize. Oak had not once
wished her free that he might marry her himself -- had
not once said, "I could wait for you as well as he.'
That was the insect sting. Not that she would have
listened to any such hypothesis. O no -- for wasn't
she saying all the time that such thoughts of the future
were improper, and wasn't Gabriel far too poor a man
to speak sentiment to her? Yet he might have just
hinted about that old love of his, and asked, in a playful
off-hand way, if he might speak of it. It would have
seemed pretty and sweet, if no more; and then she
would have shown how kind and inoffensive a woman's
"No' can sometimes be. But to give such cool advice
 -- the very advice she had asked for -- it ruffled our
heroine all the afternoon.
<C lii>
<P 418>
CONVERGING COURSES
        I
CHRISTMAS-EVE came, and a party that Boldwood
was to give in the evening was the great subject of talk
in Weatherbury. It was not that the rarity of Christmas
parties in the parish made this one a wonder, but that
Boldwood should be the giver. The announcement
had had an abnormal and incongruous sound, as if one
should hear of croquet-playing in a cathedral aisle, or
that some much-respected judge was going upon the
stage. That the party was intended to be a truly jovial
one there was no room for doubt. A large bough of
mistletoe had been brought from the woods that day, and
suspended in the hall of the bachelor's home. Holly
and ivy had followed in armfuls. From six that morning
till past noon the huge wood fire in the kitchen roared
and sparkled at its highest, the kettle, the saucepan, and
the threeiegged pot appearing in the midst of the flames
like Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego ; moreover,
roasting and basting operations were continually
carried on in front of the genial blaze.
As it grew later the fire was made up in the large
long hall into which the staircase descended, and all
encumbrances were cleared out for dancing. The log
which was to form the back-brand of the evening fire
was the uncleft trunk of a tree, so unwieldy that it could
be neither brought nor rolled to its place ; and accord+
ingly two men were to be observed dragging and heaving
it in by chains and levers as the hour of assembly drew
near.
In spite of all this, the spirit of revelry was wanting
In the atmosphere of the house. Such a thing had
never been attempted before by its owner, and it was
now done as by a wrench. Intended gaieties would
insist upon appearing like solemn grandeurs, the organ+
ization of the whole effort was
<P 419>
carried out coldly,by
hirelings, and a shadow seemed to move about the
rooms, saying that the proceedings were unnatural to
the place and the lone man who lived therein, and hence
not good.
Bathsheba was at this time in her room, dressing for
the event. She had called for candles, and Liddy
entered and placed one on each side of her mistress's
glass.
"Don't go away, Liddy,' said Bathsheba, almost
timidly.' I am foolishly agitated-i cannot tell why.
I wish I had not been obliged to go to this dance; but
there's no escaping now. I have not spoken to Mr.
Boldwood since the autumn, when I promised to see
him at Christmas on business, but I had no idea there
was to be anything of this kind.'
"But I would go now,' said Liddy, who was going
with her; for Boldwood had been indiscriminate in his
invitations.
"Yes, I shall make my appearance, of course,' said
Bathsheba. ' But I am <1the cause>1 of the party, and that
upsets me! -- Don't tell, Liddy.'
"O no, ma'am, You the cause of it, ma'am ?'
"Yes. I am the reason of the party-i. If it had
not been for me, there would never have been one. I
can't explain any more -- there's no more to be explained.
I wish I had never seen Weatherbury.'
"That's wicked of you -- to wish to be worse off than
you are.'
"No, Liddy. I have never been free from trouble
since I have lived here, and this party is likely to bring
me more. Now, fetch my black silk dress, and see how
it sits upon me.'
"But you will leave off that, surely, ma'am? You
have been a widowiady fourteen months, and ought to
brighten up a little on such a night as this.'
"Is it necessary? No; I will appear as usual, for if
I were to wear any light dress people would say things
about me, and I should seem to he rejoicing when I am
solemn all the time. The party doesn't suit me a bit;
but never mind, stay and help to finish me off.'
                     III
<P 420>
Boldwood was dressing also at this hour. A tailor
from Casterbridge was with him, assisting him in the
operation of trying on a new coat that had just beem
brought home.
Never had Boldwood been so fastidious, unreasonable
about the fit, and generally difficult to please. The
tailor walked round and round him, tugged at the waist,
pulled the sleeve, pressed out the collar, and for the
first time in his experience Boldwood was not bored+
Times had been when the farmer had exclaimed against
all such niceties as childish, but now no philosophic or
hasty rebuke whatever was provoked by this man for
attaching as much importance to a crease in the coat
as to an earthquake in South America. Boldwood at
last expressed himself nearly satisfied, and paid the bill,
the tailor passing out of the door just as Oak came in
to report progress for the day.
"Oh, Oak,' said Boldwood. "I shall of course see
you here to-night. Make yourself merry. I am deter+
mined that neither expense nor trouble shall be spared.'
"I'll try to be here, sir, though perhaps it may not
be very early,' said Gabriel, quietly. "I am glad indeed
to see such a change in 'ee from what it used to be.'
" Yes-i must own it-i am bright to-night : cheerful
and more than cheerfui-so much so that I am almost
sad again with the sense that all of it is passing away.
And sometimes, when I am excessively hopeful and
blithe, a trouble is looming in the distance : so that I
often get to look upon gloom in me with content, and
to fear a happy mood. Still this may be absurd-i feel
that it is absurd. Perhaps my day is dawning at last.'
"I hope it 'ill be a long and a fair one.'
"Thank you -- thank you. Yet perhaps my cheerfui
mess rests on a slender hope. And yet I trust my hope.
It is faith, not hope. I think this time I reckon with
my host. -- Oak, my hands are a little shaky, or some+
thing; I can't tie this neckerchief properly. Perhaps
you will tie it for me. The fact is, I have not been well
lately, you know.'
"I am sorry to hear that, sir.'
<P 421>
"Oh, it's nothing. I want it done as well as you can,
please. Is there any late knot in fashion, Oak?'
"I don't know, sir,' said Oak. His tone had sunk to
sadness.
Boldwood approached Gabriel, and as Oak tied the
neckerchief the farmer went on feverishly --
"Does a woman keep her promise, Gabriel?'
"If it is not inconvenient to her she may.'
" -- Or rather an implied promise.'
"I won't answer for her implying,' said Oak, with
faint bitterness. "That's a word as full o' holes as a
sieve with them.'
"Oak, don't talk like that. You have got quite
cynical lately -- how is it? We seem to have shifted our
positions: I have become the young and hopeful man,
and you the old and unbelieving one. However, does
a woman keep a promise, not to marry, but to enter on
an engagement to marry at some time? Now you
know women better than i-tell me.'
"I am afeard you honour my understanding too much.
However, she may keep such a promise, if it is made
with an honest meaning to repair a wrong.'
"It has not gone far yet, but I think it will soon --
yes, I know it will,' he said, in an impulsive whisper.
"I have pressed her upon the subject, and she inclines
to be kind to me, and to think of me as a husband at
a long future time, and that's enough for me. How
can I expect more? She has a notion that a woman
should not marry within seven years of her husband's
disappearance -- that her own self shouldn't, I mean --
because his body was not found. It may be merely
this legal reason which influences her, or it may be a
religious one, but she is reluctant to talk on the point+
Yet she has promised -- implied -- that she will ratify an
engagement to-night.'
"Seven years,' murmured Oak.
"No, no -- it's no such thing!' he said, with im+
patience. Five years, nine months, and a few days.
Fifteen months nearly have passed since he vanished,
and is there anything so wonderful in an engagement of
little more than five years?'
"It seems long in a forward view. Don't build too
much upon such promises, sir. Remember, you have
once be'n deceived. Her meaning may be good; but
there -- she's young yet.'
<P 422>
"Deceived? Never! ' said Boldwood, vehemently.
"She never promised me at that first time, and hence
she did not break her promise! If she promises me,
she'll marry me, Bathsheba is a woman to her word.'
                     IV
Troy was sitting in a corner of The White Hart
tavern at Casterbridge, smoking and drinking a steaming
mixture from a glass. A knock was given at the door,
and Pennyways entered.
"Well, have you seen him?' Troy inquired, pointing
to a chair.
"Boldwood?'
"No -- Lawyer Long.'
"He wadn' at home. I went there first, too.'
"That's a nuisance.'
"'Tis rather, I suppose.'
"Yet I don't see that, because a man appears to be
drowned and was not, he should be liable for anything.
I shan't ask any lawyer -- not I.'
"But that's not it, exactly. If a man changes his
name and so forth, and takes steps to deceive the world
and his own wife, he's a cheat, and that in the eye of
the law is ayless a rogue, and that is ayless a lammocken
vagabond; and that's a punishable situation.'
"Ha-ha! Well done, Pennyways.' Troy had laughed,
but it was with some anxiety that he said, "Now, what
I want to know is this, do you think there's really
anything going on between her and Boldwood? Upon
my soul, I should never have believed it! How she.
must detest me! Have you found out whether she
has encouraged him?'
"I haen't been able to learn. There's a deal of
feeling on his side seemingly, but I don't answer for
her. I didn't know a word about any such thing till
yesterday, and all I heard then was that she was gwine
to the party at his house to-night. This is the first
time she has ever gone there, they say. And they say
that she've not so much as spoke to him since they were
at Greenhill Fair: but what can folk believe o't ? How+
ever, she's not fond of him -- quite offish and quite care
less, I know.'
<P 423>
"I'm not so sure of that.... She's a handsome
woman, Pennyways, is she not? Own that you never
saw a finer or more splendid creature in your life.
Upon my honour, when I set eyes upon her that day
I wondered what I could have been made of to be able
to leave her by herself so long. And then I was
hampered with that bothering show, which I'm free of
at last, thank the stars.' He smoked on awhile, and
then added, "How did she look when you passed by
yesterday?'
"Oh, she took no great heed of me, ye may well
fancy; but she looked well enough, far's I know. Just
flashed her haughty eyes upon my poor scram body, and
then let them go past me to what was yond, much as if
I'd been no more than a leafless tree. She had just got
off her mare to look at the last wring-down of cider for
the year; she had been riding, and so her colours were
up and her breath rather quick, so that her bosom
plimmed and feli-plimmed and feli-every time plain
to my eye. Ay, and there were the fellers round her
wringing down the cheese and bustling about and
saying, Ware o' the pommy, ma'am : 'twill spoil yer
gown. "Never mind me," says she. Then Gabe
brought her some of the new cider, and she must
needs go drinking it through a strawmote, and not in
a nateral way at all. "Liddy," says she, "bring indoors
a few gallons, and I'll make some cider-wine." Sergeant,
I was no more to her than a morsel of scroffin the fuei
house!'
"I must go and find her out at once -- O yes, I see
that-i must go. Oak is head man still, isn't he?'
"Yes, 'a b'lieve. And at Little Weatherbury Farm
too. He manages everything.'
"Twill puzzle him to manage her, or any other man
of his compass!'
"I don't know about that. She can't do without
him, and knowing it well he's pretty independent.
And she've a few soft corners to her mind, though
I've never been able to get into one, the devil's in't!'
"Ah baily she's a notch above you, and you must
own it: a higher class of animai-a finer tissue. How+
ever, stick to me, and neither this haughty goddess,
dashing piece of womanhood, Juno-wife of mine (Juno
was a goddess, you know), nor
<P 424>
anybody else shall hurt
you. But all this wants looking into, I perceive.
What with one thing and another, I see that my work
is well cut out for me.'
                    v
"How do I look to-night, Liddy?' said Bathsheba,
giving a final adjustment to her dress before leaving the
glass.
"I never saw you look so well before. Yes-i'll tell
you when you looked like it -- that night, a year and a
half ago, when you came in so wildiike, and scolded us
for making remarks about you and Mr. Troy.'
"Everybody will think that I am setting myself to
captivate Mr. Boldwood, I suppose,' she murmured.
"At least they'll say so. Can't my hair be brushed
down a little flatter? I dread going -- yet I dread the
risk of wounding him by staying away.'
"Anyhow, ma'am, you can't well be dressed plainer
than you are, unless you go in sackcloth at once. 'Tis
your excitement is what makes you look so noticeable
to-night.'
"I don't know what's the matter, I feel wretched at
one time, and buoyant at another. I wish I could have
continued quite alone as I have been for the last year
or so, with no hopes and no fears, and no pleasure and
no grief.
"Now just suppose Mr. Boldwood should ask you
 -- only just suppose it -- to run away with him, what
would you do, ma'am?'
"Liddy -- none of that,' said Bathsheba, gravely.
"Mind, I won't hear joking on any such matter. Do
you hear?'
"I beg pardon, ma'am. But knowing what rum
things we women be, I just said -- however, I won't
speak of it again.'
"No marrying for me yet for many a year; if ever,
'twill be for reasons very, very different from those you
think, or others will believe! Now get my cloak, for it
is time to go.'
                        VI
"Oak, said Boldwood, "before you go I want to
mention what has been passing in my mind lately --
that little arrangement we made about your share in the
farm I mean. That share is small, too small, consider+
ing how little I attend to business now, and how much
time and thought you give to it. Well,
<P 425>
since the world
is brightening for me, I want to show my sense of it
by increasing yopur proportion in the partnership. I'll
make a memorandum of the arrangement which struck
me as likely to be convenient, for I haven't time to talk
about it now; and then we'll discuss it at our leisure.
My intention is ultimately to retire from the manage+
ment altogether, and until you can take all the expendi+
ture upon your shoulders, I'll be a sleeping partner in
the stock. Then, if I marry her -- and I hope-i feel I
shall, why --  -- '
"Pray don't speak of it, sir,' said Oak, hastily. "We
don't know what may happen. So many upsets may
befall 'ee. There's many a slip, as they say -- and I
would advise you-i know you'll pardon me this once --
not to be <1too sure>1.'
"I know, I know. But the feeling I have about in+
creasing your share is on account of what I know of you
Oak, I have learnt a little about your secret: your
interest in her is more than that of bailiff for an em+
ployer. But you have behaved like a man, and I, as a
sort of successful rivai-successful partly through your
goodness of heart -- should like definitely to show my
sense of your friendship under what must have been a
great pain to you.'
"O that's not necessary, thank 'ee,' said Oak,
hurriedly. "I must get used to such as that; other
men have, and so shall I.'
Oak then left him. He was uneasy on Boldwood's
account, for he saw anew that this constant passion
of the farmer made him not the man he once had
been.
As Boldwood continued awhile in his room alone --
ready and dressed to receive his company -- the mood of
anxiety about his appearance seemed to pass away, and
to be succeeded by a deep solemnity. He looked out
of the window, and regarded the dim outline of the trees
upon the sky, and the twilight deepening to darkness.
Then he went to a locked closet, and took from
a locked drawer therein a small circular case the size of
a pilibox, and was about to put it into his pocket. But
he lingered to open the cover and take a momentary
glance inside. It contained a woman's finger-ring, set
all the way round with small
<P 426>
diamonds, and from its
appearance had evidently been recently purchased.
Boldwood's eyes dwelt upon its many sparkles a long
time, though that its material aspect concerned him
little was plain from his manner and mien, which were
those of a mind following out the presumed thread of
that jewel's future history.
The noise of wheels at the front of the house became
audible. Boldwood closed the box, stowed it away
carefully in his pocket, and went out upon the landing.
The old man who was his indoor factotum came at the
same moment to the foot of the stairs.
"They be coming, sir-iots of 'em -- a-foot and a+
driving!'
"I was coming down this moment. Those wheels I
heard -- is it Mrs. Troy?'
"No, sir -- 'tis not she yet.'
A reserved and sombre expression had returned to
Boldwood's face again, but it poorly cloaked his feei
ings when he pronounced Bathsheba's name; and his
feverish anxiety continued to show its existence by a
galloping motion of his fingers upon the side of his thigh
as he went down the stairs.
                   VII
"How does this cover me?' said Troy to Pennyways,
"Nobody would recognize me now, I'm sure.'
He was buttoning on a heavy grey overcoat of
Noachian cut, with cape and high collar, the latter being
erect and rigid, like a girdling wall, and nearly reaching
to the verge of travelling cap which was pulled down
over his ears.
Pennyways snuffed the candle, and then looked up
and deliberately inspected Troy
"You've made up your mind to go then?' he
said.
"Made up my mind? Yes; of course I have.'
"Why not write to her? 'Tis a very queer corner
that you have got into, sergeant. You see all these things
will come to light if you go back, and they won't sound
well at all. Faith, if I was you I'd even bide as you be
 -- a single man of the name of Francis. A good wife is
good, but the best wife is not so good
<P 427>
as no wife at all.
Now that's my outspoke mind, and I've been called a
long-headed feller here and there.'
"All nonsense!' said Troy, angrily. "There she is
with plenty of money, and a house and farm, and
horses, and comfort, and here am I living from hand to
mouth -- a needy adventurer. Besides, it is no use
talking now; it is too late, and I am glad of it ; I've been
seen and recognized here this very afternoon. I should
have gone back to her the day after the fair, if it hadn't
been for you talking about the law, and rubbish about
getting a separation; and I don't put it off any longer.
What the deuce put it into my head to run away at all,
I can't think! Humbugging sentiment -- that's what it
was. But what man on earth was to know that his wife
would be in such a hurry to get rid of his name!'
"I should have known it. She's bad enough for
anything.'
"Pennyways, mind who you are talking to.'
"Well, sergeant, all I say is this, that if I were you I'd
go abroad again where I came from -- 'tisn't too late to do
it now. I wouldn't stir up the business and get a bad
name for the sake of living with her -- for all that about
your play-acting is sure to come out, you know, although
you think otherwise. My eyes and limbs, there'll be a
racket if you go back just now -- in the middle of Bold+
wood's Christmasing!'
"H'm, yes. I expect I shall not be a very welcome
guest if he has her there,' said the sergeant, with a slight
laugh. "A sort of Alonzo the Brave; and when I go in
the guests will sit in silence and fear, and all laughter
and pleasure will be hushed, and the lights in the
chamber burn blue, and the worms -- Ugh, horrible! --
Ring for some more brandy, Pennyways, I felt an
awful shudder just then! Well, what is there besides?
A stick-i must have a walking-stick.'
Pennyways now felt himself to be in something of a
difficulty, for should Bathsheba and Troy become recon+
ciled it would be necessary to regain her good opinion
if he would secure the patronage of her husband. I
sometimes think she likes you yet, and is a good woman
at bottom,' he said, as a saving sentence. "But there's
no telling to a certainty from a body's outside. Well,
<P 428>
you'll do as you like about going, of course, sergeant,
and as for me, I'll do as you tell me.'
"Now, let me see what the time is,' said Troy, after
emptying his glass in one draught as he stood. 'Half+
past six o'clock. I shall not hurry along the road, and
shall be there then before nine.'
CONCURRITUR
<C liii>
<P 429>
CONCURRITUR -- HORAE MOMENTO
OUTSIDE the front of Boldwood's house a group of
men stood in the dark, with their faces towards the door,
which occasionally opened and closed for the passage of
some guest or servant, when a golden rod of light would
stripe the ground for the moment and vanish again,
leaving nothing outside but the glowworm shine of the
pale lamp amid the evergreens over the door.
"He was seen in Casterbridge this afternoon -- so the
boy said,' one of them remarked in a whisper. "And l
for one believe it. His body was never found, you know.'
"'Tis a strange story,' said the next. "You may
depend upon't that she knows nothing about it.'
"Not a word.'
"Perhaps he don't mean that she shall,' said another
man.
"If he's alive and here in the neighbourhood, he
means mischief,' said the first. "Poor young thing:
I do pity her, if 'tis true. He'll drag her to the dogs.'
"O no; he'll settle down quiet enough,' said one
disposed to take a more hopeful view of the case.
"What a fool she must have been ever to have had
anything to do with the man! She is so self-willed and
independent too, that one is more minded to say it
serves her right than pity her.'
"No, no. I don't hold with 'ee there. She was no
otherwise than a girl mind, and how couid she tell what
the man was made of? If 'tis really true, 'tis too hard
a punishment, and more than she ought to hae. -- Hullo,
who's that?' This was to some footsteps that were
heard approaching.
"William Smallbury,' said a dim figure in the shades,
coming up and joining them. 'Dark as a hedge, to+
night, isn't it? I all but missed the plank over the river
ath'art there in the bottom --
<P 430>
never did such a thing
before in my life. Be ye any of Boldwood's workfolk?'
He peered into their faces.
"Yes -- all o' us. We met here a few minutes ago.'
"Oh, I hear now -- that's Sam Samway : thought I
knowed the voice, too. Going in?'
"Presently. But I say, William,' Samway whispered,
"have ye heard this strange tale?'
"What -- that about Sergeant Troy being seen, d'ye
mean, souls?' said Smallbury, also lowering his voice.
"Ay: in Casterbridge.'
"Yes, I have. Laban Tall named a hint of it to me
but now -- but I don't think it. Hark, here Laban
comes himself, 'a b'lieve.' A footstep drew near.
"Laban?'
"Yes, 'tis I,' said Tall.
"Have ye heard any more about that?'
"No,' said Tall, joining the group. "And I'm in+
clined to think we'd better keep quiet. If so be 'tis not
true, 'twill flurry her, and do her much harm to repeat
it; and if so be 'tis true, 'twill do no good to forestall
her time o' trouble. God send that it mid be a lie, for
though Henery Fray and some of 'em do speak against
her, she's never been anything but fair to me. She's
hot and hasty, but she's a brave girl who'll never tell a
lie however much the truth may harm her, and I've no
cause to wish her evil.'
"She never do tell women's little lies, that's true ; and
'tis a thing that can be said of very few. Ay, all the
harm she thinks she says to yer face: there's nothing
underhand wi' her.'
They stood silent then, every man busied with his
own thoughts, during which interval sounds of merri+
ment could be heard within. Then the front door again
opened, the rays streamed out, the weliknown form of
Boldwood was seen in the rectangular area of light, the
door closed, and Boldwood walked slowly down the path.
"'Tis master,' one of the men whispered, as he neared
them. "We'd better stand quiet -- he'll go in again
directly. He would think it unseemly o' us to be
loitering here.
Boldwood came on, and passed by the men without
<P 431>
seeing them, they being under the bushes on the grass.
He paused, leant over the gate, and breathed a long
breath. They heard low words come from him.
"I hope to God she'll come, or this night will be
nothing but misery to me! O my darling, my darling,
why do you keep me in suspense like this?'
He said this to himself, and they all distinctly heard
it. Boldwood remained silent after that, and the noise
from indoors was again just audible, until, a few minutes
later, light wheels could be distinguished coming down
the hill. They drew nearer, and ceased at the gate.
Boldwood hastened back to the door, and opened it;
and the light shone upon Bathsheba coming up the
path.
Boldwood compressed his emotion to mere welcome:
the men marked her light laugh and apology as she met
him: he took her into the house; and the door closed
again.
"Gracious heaven, I didn't know it was like that with
him!' said one of the men. "I thought that fancy of
his was over long ago.
"You don't know much of master, if you thought
that,' said Samway.
"I wouldn't he should know we heard what 'a said
for the world,' remarked a third.
"I wish we had told of the report at once,' the first
uneasily continued. "More harm may come of this than
we know of. Poor Mr. Boldwood, it will, be hard upon
en. I wish Troy was in  --  --  Well, God forgive me
for such a wish! A scoundrel to play a poor wife such
tricks. Nothing has prospered in Weatherbury since he
came here. And now I've no heart to go in. Let's
look into Warren's for a few minutes first, shall us,
neighbours?'
Samway, Tall, and Smallbury agreed to go to Warren's,
and went out at the gate, the remaining ones entering
the house. The three soon drew near the malt-house,
approaching it from the adjoining orchard, and not by
way of the street. The pane of glass was illuminated
as usual. Smallbury was a little in advance of the rest
when, pausing, he turned suddenly to his companions
and said, "Hist! See there.'
<P 432>
The light from the pane was now perceived to be
shining not upon the ivied wall as usual, but upon some
object close to the glass. It was a human face.
"Let's come closer,' whispered Samway; and they
approached on tiptoe. There was no disbelieving the
report any longer. Troy's face was almost close to the
pane, and he was looking in. Not only was he looking in,
but he appeared to have been arrested by a conversation
which was in progress in the malt-house, the voices of
the interlocutors being those of Oak and the maltster.
"The spree is all in her honour, isn't it -- hey?' said
the old man. "Although he made believe 'tis only
keeping up o' Christmas?'
"I cannot say,' replied Oak.
"O 'tis true enough, faith. I cannot understand
Farmer Boldwood being such a fool at his time of life
as to ho and hanker after thik woman in the way 'a do,
and she not care a bit about en.'
The men, after recognizing Troy's features, withdrew
across the orchard as quietly as they had come. The
air was big with Bathsheba's fortunes to-night : every
word everywhere concerned her. When they were quite
out of earshot all by one instinct paused.
"It gave me quite a turn -- his face,' said Tall,
breathing.
"And so it did me,' said Samway. "What's to be
done?'
"I don't see that 'tis any busincss of ours,' Smallbury
murmured dubiously.
"But it is! 'Tis a thing which is everybody's business,
said Samway. "We know very well that master's on a
wrong tack, and that she's quite in the dark, and we
should let 'em know at once. Laban, you know her
best -- you'd better go and ask to speak to her.'
"I bain't fit for any such thing,' said Laban, nervously.
"I should think William ought to do it if anybody. He's
oldest.'
"I shall have nothing to do with it,' said Smallbury.
"'Tis a ticklish business altogether. Why, he'll go on
to her himself in a few minutes, ye'll see.'
"We don't know that he will. Come, Laban.'
<P 433>
"Very well, if I must I must, I suppose,' Tall reluct+
antly answered. "What must I say?'
"Just ask to see master.'
"O no; I shan't speak to Mr. Boldwood. If I tell
anybody, 'twill be mistress.'
"Very well,' said Samway.
Laban then went to the door. When he opened it
the hum of bustle rolled out as a wave upon a still
strand -- the assemblage being immediately inside the
hali-and was deadened to a murmur as he closed it
again. Each man waited intently, and looked around at
the dark tree tops gently rocking against the sky and
occasionally shivering in a slight wind, as if he took
interest in the scene, which neither did. One of them
began walking up and down, and then came to where
he started from and stopped again, with a sense that
walking was thing not worth doing now.
"I should think Laban must have seen mistress by
this time,' said Smallbury, breaking the silence. "Per+
haps she won't come and speak to him.'
The door opened. Tall appeared, and joined them
"Well?' said both.
"I didn't like to ask for her after all,' Laban faltered
out. "They were all in such a stir, trying to put a little
spirit into the party. Somehow the fun seems to hang
fire, though everything's there that a heart can desire,
and I couldn't for my soul interfere and throw damp
upon it -- if 'twas to save my life, I couldn't!'
"I suppose we had better all go in together,' said
Samway, gloomily. "Perhaps I may have a chance of
saying a word to master.'
So the men entered the hall, which was the room
sellected and arranged for the gathering because of its
size. The younger men and maids were at last just
beginning to dance. Bathshesba had been perplexed
how to act, for she was not much more than a slim
young maid herself, and the weight of stateliness sat
heavy upon her. Sometimes she thought she ought
not to have come under any circumstances; then she
considered what cold unkindness that would have been,
and finally resolved
<P 434>
upon the middle course of staying
for about an hour only, and gliding off unobserved,
having from the first made up her mind that she could
on no account dance, sing, or take any active part in
the proceedings.
Her allotted hour having been passed in chatting
and looking on, Bathsheba told Liddy not to hurry her+
self, and went to the small parlour to prepare for
departure, which, like the hall, was decorated with holly
and ivy, and well lighted up.
Nobody was in the room, but she had hardly
HORAE MOMENTO
been there a moment when the master of the house
entered.
"Mrs. Troy -- you are not going?' he said. "We've
hardly begun!'
"If you'll excuse me, I should like to go now.' Her
manner was restive, for she remembered her promise,
and imagined what he was about to say. "But as it is
not late,' she added, "I can walk home, and leave my
man and Liddy to come when they choose.'
"I've been trying to get an opportunity of speaking
to you,' said Boldwood. "You know perhaps what I
long to say?'
Bathsheba silently looked on the floor.
"You do give it?' he said, eagerly.
"What?' she whispered.
"Now, that's evasion! Why, the promise. I don't
want to intrude upon you at all, or to let it become
known to anybody. But do give your word! A
mere business compact, you know, between two people
who are beyond the influence of passicn.' Boldwood
knew how false this picture was as regarded himself;
but he had proved that it was the only tone in which
she would allow him to approach her. "A promise to
marry me at the end of five years and three-quarters.
You owe it to me!'
"I feel that I do,' said Bathsheba ; "that is, if you
demand it. But I am a changed woman -- an unhappy
woman -- and not -- not --  -- "
" You are still a very beautiful woman, said Boldwood.
Honesty and pure conviction suggested the remark,
unaccompanied by any perception that it might have
been adopted by blunt flattery to soothe and win her.
However, it had not much effect now, for for she said,
in a
<P 435>
passionless murmur which was in itself a proof of
her words: "I have no feeling in the matter at all.
And I don't at all know what is right to do in my
diddicult Position, and I have nobody to advise me. But
I give my promise, if I must. I give it as the rendering of
a debt, conditionally, of course, on my being a widow.'
"You'll marry me between five and six years hence ? '
"Don't press me too hard. I'll marry nobody
else.'
" But surely you will name the time, or there's nothing
in the promise at all?'
"O, I don't know, pray let me go!' she said, her
bosom beginning to rise. "I am afraid what to do.!
want to be just to you, and to be that seems to be wrong+
ing myself, and perhaps it is breaking the commandments.
There is considerable doubt of his death, and then it
is dreadful; let me ask a solicitor, Mr. Boldwood, if I
ought or no!'
"Say the words, dear one, and the subject shall be
dismissed ; a blissrul loving intimacy of six years, and
then marriage -- O Bathsheba, say them!' he begged in
a husky voice, unable to sustain the forms of mere
friendship any longer. "Promise yourself to me; I
deserve it, indeed I do, for I have loved you more than
anybody in the world! And if I said hasty words and
showed uncalled-for heat of manner towards you, believe
me, dear, I did not mean to distress you ; I was in
agony, Bathsheba, and I did not know what I said.
You wouldn't let a dog suffer what I have suffered,
could you but know it! Sometimes I shrink from your
knowing what I have felt for you, and sometimes I am
distressed that all of it you never will know. Be
gracious, and give up a little to me, when I would give
up mylife for you!'
The trimmings of her dress, as they quivered against
the light, showed how agitated she was, and at last she
burst out crying. 'And you'll not -- press me -- about
anything more -- if I say in five or six years?' she
sobbed, when she had power to frame the words.
"Yes, then I'll leave it to time.'
"Very well. If he does not return, I'll marry you
in six years from this day, if we both live,' she said
solemnly.
<P 436>
"And you'll take this as a token from me.'
Boldwood had come close to her side, and now he
clasped one of her hands in both his own, and lifted it
to his breast.
"What is it? Oh I cannot wear a ring!' she ex+
claimed, on seeing what he held; "besides, I wouldn't
have a soul know that it's an engagement! Perhaps it
is improper? Besides, we are not engaged in the usual
sense, are we ? Don't insist, Mr. Boldwood -- don't!'
In her trouble at not being able to get her hand away
from him at once, she stamped passionately on the floor
with one foot, and tears crowded to her eyes again.
"It means simply a pledge -- no sentiment -- the seal
of a practical compact,' he said more quictly, but still
retaining her hand in his firm grasp. "Come, now!'
And Boldwood slipped the ring on her finger.
"I cannot wear it,' she said, weeping as if her heart
would break. " You frighten me, almost. So wild a
scheme! Please let me go home!'
" Only to-night : wear it just to-night, to please me!.'
Bathsheba sat down in a chair, and buried her face
in her handkerchief, though Boldwood kept her hand
yet. At length she said, in a sort of hopeless whisper --
"Very well, then, I will to-night, if you wish it so
earnestly. Now loosen my hand; I will, indeed I will
wear it to-night.'
"And it shall be the beginning of a pleasant secret
courtship of six years, with a wedding at the end?'
"It must be, I suppose, since you will have it so!'
she said, fairly beaten into non-resistance.
Boldwood pressed her hand, and allowed it to drop
in her lap. "I am happy now,' he said. "God bless
you!'
He left the room, and when he thought she might
be sufficiently composed sent one of the maids to her
Bathsheba cloaked the effects of the late scene as she
best could, followed the girl, and in a few moments
came downstairs with her hat and cloak on, ready to go.
To get to the door it was necessary to pass through the
hall, and before doing so she paused on the bottom of
the staircase which descended into one corner, to take
a last look at the gathering.
There was no music or dancing in progress just now.
At the
<P 437>
lower end, which had been arranged for the work+
folk specially, a group conversed in whispers, and with
clouded looks. Boldwood was standing by the fireplace,
and he, too, though so absorbed in visions arising from
her promise that he scarcely saw anything, seemed at
that moment to have observed their peculiar manner,
and their looks askance.
"What is it you are in doubt about, men?' he said.
One of them turned and replied uneasily: 'It was
something Laban heard of, that's all, sir.'
"News? Anybody married or engaged, born or
dead?' inquired the farmer, gaily. "Tell it to us, Tall.
One would think from your looks and mysterious ways
that it was something very dreadful indeed.'
"O no, sir, nobody is dead,' said Tall.
"I wish somebody was,' said Samway, in a whisper.
"What do you say, Samway?' asked Boldwood, some+
what sharply. "If you have anything to say, speak out;
if not, get up another dance.'
"Mrs. Troy has come downstairs,' said Samway to
Tall. "If you want to tell her, you had better do it now.'
"Do you know what they mean?' the farmer asked
Bathsheba, across the room.
"I don't in the least," said Bathsheba.
There was a smart rapping at the door. One of
the men opened it instantly, and went outside.
"Mrs. Troy is wanted,' he said, on returning.
"Quite ready,' said Bathsheba. "Though I didn't
tell them to send.'
"It is a stranger, ma'am,' said the man by the door.
"A stranger?' she said.
"Ask him to come in,' said Boldwood.
The message was given, and Troy, wrapped up to
his eyes as we have seen him, stood in the doorway.
There was an unearthly silence, all looking towards
the newcomer. Those who had just learnt that he
was in the neighbourhood recognized him instantly;
those who did not were perplexed. Nobody noted
Bathsheba. She was leaning on the stairs. Her brow
had heavily contracted; her whole face was
<P 438>
pallid, her
lips apart, her eyes rigidly staring at their visitor.
Boldwood was among those who did not notice that
he was Troy. "Come in, come in!' he repeated,
cheerfully, "and drain a Christmas beaker with us,
stranger!'
Troy next advanced into the middle of the room,
took off his cap, turned down his coat-collar, and looked
Boldwood in the face. Even then Boldwood did not
recognize that the impersonator of Heaven's persistent
irony towards him, who had once before broken in
upon his bliss, scourged him, and snatched his delight
away, had come to do these things a second time.
Troy began to laugh a mechanical laugh: Boldwood
recognized him now.
Troy turned to Bathsheba. The poor girl's wretched+
ness at this time was beyond all fancy or narration.
She had sunk down on the lowest stair; and there
she sat, her mouth blue and dry, and her dark eyes
fixed vacantly upon him, as if she wondered whether it
were not all a terrible illusion.
Then Troy spoke. "Bathsheba, I come here for
you!'
She made no reply.
" Come home with me: come!
Bathsheba moved her feet a little, but did not rise.
Troy went across to her.
"come, madam, do you hear what I say?' he said,
peremptorily.
A strange voice came from the fireplace -- a voice
sounding far off and confined, as if from a dungeon.
Hardly a soul in the assembly recognized the thin tones
to be those of Boldwood. Sudden dispaire had trans+
formed him.
"Bathsheba, go with your husband!'
Nevertheless, she did not move. The truth was
that Bathsheba was beyond the pale of activity -- and
yet not in a swoon. She was in a state of mental <1gutta>1
<1serena>1; her mind was for the minute totally deprived of
light at the same time no obscuration was apparent
from without.
Troy stretched out his hand to pull her her towards him,
when she quickly shrank back. This visible dread of
him seemed to irritate Troy, and he seized her arm and
pulled it sharply.
<P 439>
Whether his grasp pinched her, or
whether his mere touch was the ccause, was never known,
but at the moment of his seizure she writhed, and gave
a quick, low scream.
The scream had been heard but a few seconds When
it was followed by sudden deafening report that
echoed through the room and stupefied them all. The
oak partition shook with the concussion, and the place
was filled with grey smoke.
In bewilderment they turned their eyes to Boldwood.
at his back, as stood before the fireplace, was a gun+
rack, as is usual in farmhouses, constructed to hold two
guns. When Bathsheba had cried out in her husband's
grasp, Boldwood's face of gnashing despair had changed.
The veins had swollen, and a frenzied look had gleamed
in his eye. He had turned quickly, taken one of the
guns, cocked it, and at once discharged it at Troy.
Troy fell. The distance apart of the two men was
so small that the charge of shot did not spread in the
least, but passed like a bullet into his body. He uttered
a long guttural sigh -- there was a contraction -- an exten+
sion -- then his muscles relaxed, and he lay still.
Boldwood was seen through the smoke to be now
again engaged with the gun. It was double-barrelled,
and he had, meanwhile, in some way fastened his hand+
kerchief to the trigger, and with his foot on the other
end was in the act of turning the second barrel upon
himself. Samway his man was the first to see this, and
in the midst of the general horror darted up to him.
Boldwood had already twitched the handkerchief, and
the gun exploded a second time, sending its contents,
by a timely blow from Samway, into the beam which
crossed the ceiling.
"Well, it makes no difference!' Boldwood gasped.
"There is another way for me to die.'
Then he broke from Samway, crossed the room to
Bathsheba, and kissed her hand. He put on his hat,
opened the door, and went into the darkness, nobody
thinking of preventing him.
<C liv>
<P 440>
AFTER THE SHOCK
BOLDWOOD passed into the high road and turned
in the direction of Casterbridge. Here he walked at
an even, steady pace over Yalbury Hill, along the dead
level beyond, mounted Mellstock Hill, and between
eleven and twelve o'clock crossed the Moor into the town.
The streets were nearly deserted now, and the waving
lamp-flames only lighted up rows of grey shop-shutters,
and strips of white paving upon which his step echoed
as his passed along. He turned to the right, and halted
before an archway of heavy stonework, which was closed
by an iron studded pair of doors. This was the entrance
to the gaol, and over it a lamp was fixed, the light en+
abling the wretched traveller to find a belipull.
The small wicket at last opened, and a porter
appeared. Boldwood stepped forward, and said some+
thing in a low tone, when, after a delay, another man
came. Boldwood entered, and the door was closed
behind him, and he walked the world no more.
Long before this time Weatherbury had been
thoroughly aroused, and the wild deed which had ter+
minated Boldwood's merrymaking became known to
all. Of those out of the house Oak was one of the
first to hear of the catastophe, and when he entered
the room, which was about five minutes after Boldwood's
exit, the scene was terrible. All the female guests were
huddled aghast against the walls like sheep in a storm,
and the men were bewildered as to what to do. As for
Bathsheba, she had changed. She was sitting on the
floor beside the body of Troy, his head pillowed in her
lap, where she had herself lifted it. With one hand she
held her handkerchief to his breast and covered the
wound, though scarcely a single drop of blood had
flowed, and with the other she tightly clasped one of
his. The household convulsion had made her herself
again. The
<P 441>
temporary coma had ceased, and activity
had come with the necessity for it. Deeds of endur+
ance, which seem ordinary in philosophy, are rare in
conduct, and Bathsheba was astonishing all around her
now, for her philosophy was her conduct, and she
seldom thought practicable what she did not practise.
She was of the stuff of which great men's mothers
are made. She was indispensable to high generation,
hated at tea parties, feared in shops, and loved at crises.
Troy recumbent in his wife's lap formed now the sole
spectacle in the middle of the spacious room.
"Gabriel,' she said, automatically, when he entered,
turning up a face of which only the weliknown lines
remained to tell him it was hers, all else in the picture
having faded quite. "Ride to Casterbridge instantly
for a surgeon. It is, I believe, useless, but go. Mr.
Boldwood has shot my husband.'
Her statement of the fact in such quiet and simple
words came with more force than a tragic declamation,
and had somewhat the effect of setting the distorted
images in each mind present into proper focus. Oak,
almost before he had comprehended anything beyond
the briefest abstract of the event, hurried out of the
room, saddled a horse and rode away. Not till he had
ridden more than a mile did it occur to him that he
would have done better by sending some other man
on this errand, remaining himself in the house. What
had become of Boldwood? He should have been
looked after. Was he mad -- had there been a quarrel?
Then how had Troy got there? Where had he come
from? How did this remarkable reappearance effect
itself when he was supposed by many to be at the
bottom of the sea? Oak had in some slight measure
been prepared for the presence of Troy by hearing a
rumour of his return just before entering Boldwood's
house ; but before he had weighed that information, this
fatal event had been superimposed. However, it was too
late now to think of sending another messenger, and
he rode on, in the excitement of these self-inquiries
not discerning, when about three miles from Caster+
bridge, a square-figured pedestrian passing along
under the dark hedge in the same direction as his
own.
The miles necessary to be traversed, and other
hindrances
<P 442>
incidental to the lateness of the hour and
the darkness of the night, delayed the arrival of Mr,
Aldritch, the surgeon ; and more than three hours
passed between the time at which the shot was fired
and that of his entering the house. Oak was addition+
ally detained in Casterbridge through having to give
notice to the authorities of what had happened; and
he then found that Boldwood had also entered the
town, and delivercd himself up.
In the meantime the surgeon, having hastened into
the hall at Boldwood's, found it in darkness and quite
deserted. He went on to the back of the house,
where he discovered in the kitchen an old man, of
whom he made inquiries.
"She's had him took away to her own house, sir,'
said his informant.
"Who has?' said the doctor.
"Mrs. Troy. 'A was quite dead, sir.'
This was astonishing information. "She had no
right to do that,' said the doctor. "There will have
to be an inquest, and she should have waited to know
what to do.'
"Yes, sir; it was hinted to her that she had better
wait till the law was known. But she said law was
nothing to her, and she wouldn't let her dear husband's
corpse bide neglected for folks to stare at for all the
crowners in England.'
Mr. Aldritch drove at once back again up the
hill to Bathsheba's. The first person he met was
poor Liddy, who seemed literally to have dwindled
smaller in these few latter hours. "What has been
done?' he said.
"I don't know, sir,' said Liddy, with suspended
breath. "My mistress has done it all.'
"Where is she?'
" Upstairs with him, sir. When he was brought
home and taken upstairs, she said she wanted no
further help from the men. And then she called me,
and made me fill the bath, and after that told me I
had better go and lie down because I looked so ill.
Then she locked herself into the room alone with him,
and would not let a nurse come in, or anybody at all.
But I thought l'd wait in the next room in case she
should want me. I heard her moving about inside
for more than an
<P 443>
hour, but she only came out once,
and that was for more candles, because hers had burnt
down into the socket. She said we were to let her
know when you or Mr. Thirdly came, sir.'
Oak entered with the parson at this moment, and
they all went upstairs together, preceded by Liddy
Smallbury. Everything was silent as the grave when
they paused on the landing. Liddy knocked, and
Bathsheba's dress was heard rustling across the room:
the key turned in the lock, and she opened the door.
Her looks were calm and nearly rigid, like a slightly
animated bust of Melpomene.
"Oh, Mr. Aldritch, you have come at last,' she
murmured from her lips merely, and threw back the
door. "Ah, and Mr. Thirdly. Well, all is done, and
anybody in the world may see him now.' She then
passed by him, crossed the landing, and entered
another room.
Looking into the chamber of death she had vacated
they saw by the light of the candles which were on the
drawers a tall straight shape lying at the further end
of the bedroom, wrapped in white. Everything around
was quite orderly. The doctor went in, and after a
few minutes returned to the landing again, where
Oak and the parson still waited.
"It is all done, indeed, as she says,' remarked Mr.
Aldritch, in a subdued voice. "The body has been
undressed and properly laid out in grave clothes.
Gracious Heaven -- this mere girl! She must have the
nerve of a stoic!'
"The heart of a wife merely,' floated in a whisper
about the ears of the three, and turning they saw
Bathsheba in the midst of them. Then, as if at that
instant to prove that her fortitude had been more of
will than of spontaneity, she silently sank down between
them and was a shapeless heap of drapery on the floor.
The simple consciousness that superhuman strain was
no longer required had at once put a period to her
power to continue it.
They took her away into a further room, and the
medical attendance which had been useless in Troy's
case was invaluable in Bathsheba's, who fell into a
series of fainting-fits that had a serious aspect for a
time. The sufferer was got to bed,
<P 444>
and Oak, finding
from the bulletins that nothing really dreadful was to
be apprehended on her score, left the house. Liddy
kept watch in Bathsheba's chamber, where she heard
her mistress, moaning in whispers through the dull
slow hours of that wretched night: "O it is my fault
 -- how can I live! O Heaven, how can I live!'
<C lv>
<P 445>
THE MARCH FOLLOWING -- "BATHSHEBA BOLDWOOD'
WE pass rapidly on into the month of March, to a
breezy day without sunshine, frost, or dew. On Yai
bury Hill, about midway between Weatherbury and
Casterbridge, where the turnpike road passes over
the crest, a numerous concourse of people had
gathered, the eyes of the greater number being fre+
quently stretched afar in a northerly direction. The
groups consisted of a throng of idlers, a party of
javelin-men, and two trumpeters, and in the midst
were carriages, one of which contained the high
sheriff. With the idlers, many of whom had mounted
to the top of a cutting formed for the road, were several
Weatherbury men and boys -- among others Poorgrass,
Coggan, and Cain Ball.
At the end of half-an-hour a faint dust was seen in
the expected quarter, and shortly after a travelling+
carriage, bringing one of the two judges on the Western
Circuit, came up the hill and halted on the top. The
judge changed carriages whilst a flourish was blown
by the big-cheeked trumpeters, and a procession being
formed of the vehicles and javelin-men, they all pro+
ceeded towards the town, excepting the Weatherbury
men, who as soon as they had seen the judge move
off returned home again to their work.
" Joseph, I zeed you squeezing close to the carriage,"
said Coggan, as they walked. "Did ye notice my lord
judge's face ?'
"I did,' said Poorgrass. "I looked hard at en, as
if I would read his very soul; and there was mercy
in his eyes -- or to speak with the exact truth required
of us at this solemn time, in the eye that was towards
me.'
"Well, I hope for the best,' said Coggan, though
bad that must be. However, I shan't go to the trial,
and I'd advise the rest of ye that bain't wanted to bide
away. 'Twill disturb his
<P 446>
mind more than anything to
see us there staring at him as if he were a show.'
" The very thing I said this morning,' observed Joseph,
"Justice is come to weigh him in the balances," I said
in my reflectious way, "and if he's found wanting, so
be it unto him," and a bystander said "Hear, hear,
A man who can talk like that ought to be heard.'
But I don't like dwelling upon it, for my few words
are my few words, and not much; though the speech
of some men is rumoured abroad as though by nature
formed for such.'
"So 'tis, Joseph. And now, neighbours, as I said,
every man bide at home.'
The resolution was adhered to ; and all waited
anxiously for the news next day. Their suspense
was diverted, however, by a discovery which was made
in the afternoon, throwing more light on Boldwood's
conduct and condition than any details which had
preceded it.
That he had been from the time of Greenhill Fair
until the fatal Christmas Eve in excited and unusual
moods was known to those who had been intimate
with him; but nobody imagined that there had shown
in him unequivocal symptoms of the mental derange+
ment which Bathsheha and Oak, alone of all others
and at different times, had momentarily suspected.
In a locked closet was now discovered an extraordinary
collection of articles. There were several sets of ladies'
dresses in the piece, of sundry expensive materials;
silks and satins, poplins and velvets, all of colours
which from Bathsheba's style of dress might have been
judged to be her favourites. There were two muffs,
sable and ermine. Above all there was a case of
jewellery, containing four heavy gold bracelets and
several lockets and rings, all of fine quality and manu+
facture. These things had been bought in Bath and
other towns from time to time, and brought home by
stealth. They were all carefully packed in paper, and
each package was labelled " Bathsheba Boldwood,' a
date being subjoined six years in advance in every
instance.
These somewhat pathetic evidences of a mind crazed
with care and love were the subject of discourse in
<P 447>
Warren's malt-house when Oak entered from Caster+
bridge with tidings of the kiln glow shone upon
it, told the tale sufficiently well. Boldwood, as every
one supposed he would do, had pleaded guilty, and
had been sentenced to death.
The conviction that Boldwood had not been morally
responsible for his later acts now becam general. Facts
elicited previous to the trial had pointed strongly in the
same direction, but they had not been of sufficient weight
to lead to an order for an examination into the state
of Boldwood's mind. It was astonishing, now that a
presumption of insanity was raised, how many collateral
circumstances were remembered to which a condition
of mental disease seemed to afford the only explanation
 -- among others, the unprecedented neglect of his corn
stacks in the previous summer.
A petition was addressed to the Home Secretary,
advancing the circumstances which appeared to justify
a request for a reconsideration of the sentence. It was
not "numerously signed ' by the inhabitants of Caster+
bridge, as is usual in such cases, for Boldwood had
never made many friends over the counter. The shops
thought it very natural that a man who, by importing
direct from the producer, had daringly set aside the
first great principle of provincial existence, namely
that God made country villages to supply customers
to county towns, should have confused ideas about
the Decalogue. The prompters were a few merciful
men who had perhaps too feelingly considered the
facts latterly unearthed, and the result was that evidence
was taken which it was hoped might remove the crime
in a moral point of view, out of the category of wilful
murder, and lead it to be regarded as a sheer outcome
of madness.
The upshot of the petition was waited for in Weather+
bury with solicitous interest. The execution had been
fixed for eight o'clock on a Saturday morning about a
fortnight after the sentence was passed, and up to
Friday afternoon no answer had been recieved. At
that time Gabriel came from Casterbridge Gaol, whither
he had been to wish Boldwood good-bye, and turned
down a by-street to avoid the town. When past the last
<P 448>
house he heard a hammering, and lifting his bowed
head he looked back for a moment. Over the chimneys
he could see the upper part of the gaol entrance, rich
and glowing in the afternoon sun, and some moving
figures were there. They were carpenters lifting a post
into a vertical position within the parapet. He with+
drew his eyes quickly, and hastened on.
It was dark when he reached home, and half the
village was out to meet him.
"No tidings,' Gabriel said, wearily. "And I'm afraid
there's no hope. I've been with him more than two
hours.'
"Do ye think he <1really>1 was out of his mind when he
did it?' said Smallbury.
" I can't honestly say that I do,' Oak replied. " How+
ever, that we can talk of another time. Has there been
any change in mistress this afternoon?'
"None at all.'
"Is she downstairs?'
"No. And getting on so nicely as she was too.
She's but very little better now again than she was at
Christmas. She keeps on asking if you be come, and
if there's news, till one's wearied out wi' answering her.
Shall I go and say you've come?'
"No,' said Oak. "There's a chance yet; but I
couldn't stay in town any longer -- after seeing him too,
So Laban -- Laban is here, isn't he ? '
" Yes,' said Tall.
"What I've arranged is, that you shall ride to town
the last thing to-night ; leave here about nine, and wait
a while there, getting home about twelve. If nothing
has been received by eleven to-night, they say there's
no chance at all.'
"I do so hope his life will be spared,' said Liddy.
"If it is not, she'll go out of her mind too. Poor thing;
her sufferings have been dreadful; she deserves any+
body's pity.'
"Is she altered much ? ' said Coggan.
"If you haven't seen poor mistress since Christmas,
you wouldn't know her,' said Liddy. " Her eyes are so
miserable that she's not the same woman. Only two
years ago she was a romping girl, and now she's this!'
Laban departed as directed, and at eleven o'clock
that night
<P 449>
several of the villagers strolled along the
road to Casterbridge and awaited his arrivai-among
them Oak, and nearly all the rest of Bathsheba's men.
Gabriel's anxiety was great that Boldwood might be
saved, even though in his conscience he felt that he
ought to die; for there had been qualities in the farmer
which Oak loved. At last, when they all were weary
the tramp of a horse was heard in the distance --
First dead, as if on turf it trode,
Then, clattering  on the village road
In other pace than forth he yode.
'We shall soon know now, one way or other,' said
Coggan, and they all stepped down from the bank on
which they had been standing into the road, and the
rider pranced into the midst of them.
"Is that you, Laban ? ' said Gabriel.
"Yes -- 'tis come. He's not to die. 'Tis confine+
ment during her Majesty's pleasure.'
"Hurrah!' said Coggan, with a swelling heart. "God's
above the devil yet!'
<C lvi>
<P 450>
BEAUTY IN LONELINESS -- AFTER ALL
BATHSHEBA revived with the spring. The utter
prostration that had followed the low fever from which
she had sufered diminished perceptibly when all un+
certainty upon every subject had come to an end.
But she remained alone now for the greater part of
her time, and stayed in the house, or at furthest went
into the garden. She shunned every one, even Liddy,
and could be brought to make no confidences, and to
ask for no sympathy.
As the summer drew on she passed more of her time
in the open air, and began to examine into farming
matters from sheer necessity, though she never rode
out or personally superintended as at former times.
One Friday evening in August she walked a little way
along the road and entered the village for the first time
since the sombre event of the preceding Christmas.
None of the old colour had as yet come to her cheek,
and its absolute paleness was heightened by the jet black
of her gown, till it appeared preternatural. When she
reached a little shop at the other end of the place,
which stood nearly opposite to the churchyard, Bath+
sheba heard singing inside the church, and she knew
that the singers were practising. She crossed the road,
opened the gate, and entered the graveyard, the high
sills of the church windows effectually screening her
from the eyes of those gathered within. Her stealthy
walk was to the nook wherein Troy had worked at
planting flowers upon Fanny Robin's grave, and she
came to the marble tombstone.
A motion of satisfaction enlivened her face as she
read the complete inscription. First came the words of
Troy himself: --
<P 451>
ERECTED BY FRANCIS TROY
IN BELOVEO MEMORY OF
FANNY ROBIN,
WHO DIED OCTOBER 9, 18 -- ,
AGED 20 YEARS.
Unerneath this was now inscribed in new letters: --
IN THE SAME GRAVE LIE
THE REMAINS OF THE AFORESAID
FRANCIS TROY,
WHO DIED DECEMBER 24TH, 18 -- ,
Whilst she stood and read and meditated the tones of
the organ began again in the church, and she went
with the same light step round to the porch and listened.
The door was closed, and the coir was learning a new
hymn. Bathsheba was stirred by emotions which
latterly she had assumed to be altogether dead within
her. The little attenuated voices of the children
brought to her ear in destinct utterance the words they
sang without thought or comprehension --
Lead, kindly Light, amid the encircling gloom,
Lead Thou me on.
Bathsheba's feeling was always to some extent de+
pendent upon her whim, as is the case with many other
women. Something big came into her throat and an
uprising to her eyes -- and she thought that she would
allow the imminent tears to flow if they wished. They
did flow and plenteously, and one fell upon the stone
bench beside her. Once that she had begun to cry for
she hardly knew what, she could not leave off for crowd+
ing thoughts she knew too well. She would have given
anything in the world to be, as those children were, un+
concerned at the meaning of their words, because too
innocent to feel the necessity for any such expression.
All the impassioned scenes of her brief expenence
seemed to revive with added emotion at that moment,
and those scenes which had been without emotion
<P 452>
during enactment had emotion then. Yet grief came
to her rather as a luxury than as the scourge of former
times.
Owing to Bathsheba's face being buried in her hands
she did not notice a form which came quietly into the
porch, and on seeing her, first moved as if to retreat,
then paused and regarded her. Bathsheba did not raise
her head for some time, and when she looked round
her face was wet, and her eyes drowned and dim. "Mr.
Oak,' exclaimed she, disconcerted, " how long have you
been here ?'
"A few minutes, ma'am,' said Oak, respectfully.
"Are you going in?' said Bathsheba; and there came
from within the church as from a prompter --
l loved the garish day, and, spite of fears,
pride ruled my will: remember not past years.
"I was,' said Gabriel. " I am one of the bass singers,
you know. I have sung bass for several months.
"Indeed: I wasn't aware of that. I'll leave you, then.'
Which I have loved long since, and lost awhile,
sang the children.
"Don't let me drive you away, mistress. I think I
won't go in to-night.'
"O no -- you don't drive me away.
Then they stood in a state of some embarrassment
Bathsheba trying to wipe her dreadfully drenched and
inflamed face without his noticing her. At length Oak
said, I've not seen you-i mean spoken to you -- since
ever so long, have I?' But he feared to bring distress+
ing memories back, and interrupted himself with: "Were
you going into church ?'
"No,' she said. I came to see the tombstone
privately -- to see if they had cut the inscription as I
wished Mr. Oak, you needn't mind speaking to me, if
you wish to, on the matter which is in both our minds
at this moment.'
"And have they done it as you wished ?' said Oak.
"Yes. Come and see it, if you have not already.'
So together they went and read the tomb. "Eight
months
<P 453>
ago!' Gabriel murmured when he saw the date.
'It seems like yesterday to me.'
And to me as if it were years ago-iong years, and
I had been dead between. And now I am going home,
Mr. Oak.'
Oak walked after her. 'I wanted to name a small
matter to you as soon as I could,' he said, with hesitation.
"Merrly about business, and I think I may just mention it
now, if you'll allow me.'
" O yes, certainly.'
It is that I may soon have to give up the manage+
ment of your farm, Mrs. Troy. The fact is, I am think+
ing of leaving England -- not yet, you know -- next
spring. '
"Leaving England!' she said, in surprise and
genuine disappointment.' Why, Gabriel, what are you
going to do that for?'
"Well, I've thought it best,' Oak stammered out.
"California is the spot I've had in my mind to try.'
"But it is understood everywhere that you are going
to take poor Mr. Boldwood's farm on your own account.'
"I've had the refusal o' it 'tis true; but nothing is
settled yet, and I have reasons for gieing up. I shall
finish out my year there as manager for the trustees,
but no more.'
"And what shall I do without you? Oh, Gabriel, I
don't think you ought to go away. You've been with
me so long -- through bright times and dark times -- such
old friends that as we are -- that it seems unkind almost. I
had fancied that if you leased the other farm as master,
you might still give a helping look across at mine. And
now going away!'
"I would have willingly.'
" Yet now that I am more helpless than ever you go
away!'
"Yes, that's the ill fortune o' it,' said Gabriel, in a
distressed tone. "And it is because of that very help+
lessness that I feel bound to go. Good afternoon,
ma'am ' he concluded, in evident anxiety to get
away, and at once went out of the churchyard by a
path she could follow on no pretence whatever.
Bathsheba went home, her mind occupied with a
new trouble, which being rather harassing than deadly
was calculated to do good by diverting her from the
chronic gloom of
<P 454>
her life. She was set thinking a great
deal about Oak and of his wich to shun her; and there
occurred to Bathsheba several incidents of latter in+
tercourse with him, which, trivial when singly viewed
amounted together to a perceptible disinclination for
her society. It broke upon her at length as a great
pain that her last old disciple was about to forsake her
and flee. He who had believed in her and argued on
her side when all the rest of the world was against her,
had at last like the others become weary and neglectful
of the old cause, and was leaving her to fight her battles
alone.
Three weeks went on, and more evidence of his
want of interest in her was forthcoming. She noticed
that instead of entering the small parlour or office
where the farm accounts were kept, and waiting, or
leaving a memorandum as he had hitherto done during
her seclusion, Oak never came at all when she was likely
to be there, only entering at unseasonable hours when
her presence in that part of the house was least to be
expected. Whenever he wanted directions he sent a
message, or note with neither heading nor signature, to
which she was obliged to reply in the same off-hand
style. Poor Bathsheba began to suffer now from the
most torturing sting of ali-a sensation that she was
despised.
The autumn wore away gloomily enough amid these
melancholy conjectures, and Christmas-day came, com+
pleting a year of her legal widowhood, and two years
and a quarter of her life alone. On examining her
heart it appeared beyond measure strange that the sub+
ject of which the season might have been supposed
suggestive -- the event in the hall at Boldwood's -- was
not agitating her at all; but instead, an agonizing con+
viction that everybody abjured her -- for what she could
not teli-and that Oak was the ringleader of the
recusants. Coming out of church that day she looked
round in hope that Oak, whose bass voice she had
heard rolling out from the gallery overhead in a most
unconcerned manner, might chance to linger in her path
in the old way. There he was, as usual, coming down
the path behind her. But on seeing Bathsheba turn, he
looked aside, and as soon as he got beyond the gate,
<P 455>
and there was the barest excuse for a divergence, he
made one, and vanished.
The next morning brought the culminating stroke;
she had been expecting it long. It was a formal notice
by letter from him that he should not renew his engage+
ment with her for the following Lady-day.
Bathsheba actually sat and cried over this letter most
bitterly. She was aggrieved and wounded that the
possession of hopeless love from Gabriel, which she had
AFTER ALL
grown to regard as her inalienable right for life, should
have been withdrawn just at his own pleasure in this
way. She was bewildered too by the prospect of having
to rely on her own resources again: it seemed to herself
that she never could again acquire energy sufficient to
go to market, barter, and sell. Since Troy's death Oak
had attended all sales and fairs for her, transacting her
business at the same time with his own. What should
she do now? Her life was becoming a desolation.
So desolate was Bathsheba this evening, that in an
absolute hunger for pity and sympathy, and miserable in
that she appeared to have outlived the only true friend+
ship she had ever owned, she put on her bonnet and
cloak and went down to Oak's house just after sunset,
guided on her way by the pale primrose rays of a
crescent moon a few days old.
A lively firelight shone from the window, but nobody
was visible in the room. She tapped nervously, and
then thought it doubtful if it were right for a single
woman to call upon a bachelor who lived alone, although
he was her manager, and she might be supposed to call
on business without any real impropriety. Gabriel
opened the door, and the moon shone upon his fore+
haad.
"Mr. Oak,' said Bathsheba, faintly.
"Yes; I am Mr. Oak,' said Gabriel. "Who have I
the honour -- O how stupid of me, not to know you,
mistress!'
"I shall not be your mistress much longer, shall I
Gabriel?' she said, in pathetic tones.
"Well, no. I suppose -- But come in, ma'am. Oh --
and I'll get a light,' Oak replied, with some awkwardness.
<P 456>
"No; not on my account.'
"It is so seldom that I get a lady visitor that I'm
afraid I haven't proper accommodation. Will you sit
down, please ? Here's a chair, and there's one, too.
I am sorry that my chairs all have wood scats, and are
rather hard, but i-was thinging of getting some new
ones.' Oak placed two or three for her.
"They are quite easy enough for me.'
So down she sat, and down sat he, the fire dancing
in their faces, and upon the old furniture
all a-sheenen
Wi' long years o' handlen,
that formed Oak's array of household possessions, which
sent back a dancing reflection in reply. It was very
odd to these two persons, who knew each other passing
well, that the mere circumstance of their meeting in a
new place and in a new way should make them so
awkward and constrained. In the fields, or at her house,
there had never been any embarrassment; but now that
Oak had become the entertainer their lives seemed to be
moved back again to the days when they were strangers.
"You'll think it strange that I have come, but -- -'
"O no; not at all.'
"But I thought -- Gabriel, I have been uneasy in the
belief that I have offended you, and that you are going
away on that account. It grieved me very much and
I couldn't help coming.'
"Offended me! As if you could do that, Bathsheba!'
"Haven't I?' she asked, gladly. " But, what are you
going away for else?'
"I am not going to emigrate, you know; I wasn't
aware that you would wish me not to when I told 'ee or I
shouldn't ha' thought of doing it,' he said, simply. "I
have arranged for Little Weatherbury Farm and shall
have it in my own hands at Lady-day. You know I've
had a share in it for some time. Still, that wouldn't
prevent my attending to your business as before, hadn't
it been that things have been said about us.'
<P 457>
"What?' said Bathsheba, in surprise. "Things said
about you and me! What are they?'
"I cannot tell you.'
"It would be wiser if you were to, I think. You have
played the part of mentor to me many times, and I don't
see why you should fear to do it now.'
"It is nothing that you have done, this time. The
top and tail o't is this -- that I am sniffing about here,
and waiting for poor Boldwood's farm, with a thought
of getting you some day.'
"Getting me! What does that mean?'
"Marrying o' 'ee, in plain British. You asked me to
tell, so you mustn't blame me.'
Bathsheba did not look quite so alarmed as if a
cannon had been discharged by her ear, which was what
Oak had expected. "Marrying me! I didn't know it
was that you meant,' she said, quietly. "Such a thing
as that is too absurd -- too soon -- to think of, by far!'
"Yes; of course, it is too absurd. I don't desire any
such thing; I should think that was plain enough by
this time. Surely, surely you be the last person in the
world I think of marrying. It is too absurd, as you say
""Too -- s-s-soon" were the words I used.'
"I must beg your pardon for correcting you, but you
said, ""too absurd,"' and so do I.'
"I beg your pardon too! she returned, with tears
in her eyes. """Too soon"' was what I said. But it
doesn't matter a bit -- not at ali-but I only meant,
""too soon"' Indeed, I didn't, Mr. Oak, and you must
believe me!'
Gabriel looked her long in the face, but the firelight
being faint there was not much to be seen. " Bathsheba,'
he said, tenderly and in surprise, and coming closer:
"if I only knew one thing -- whether you would allow me
to love you and win you, and marry you after ali-if I
only knew that!'
"But you never will know,' she murmured.
"Why?'
"Because you never ask.
"Oh -- Oh!' said Gabriel, with a low laugh of joyous+
ness. "My own dear -- -'
<P 458>
"You ought not to have sent me that harsh letter
this morning,' she interrupted. "It shows you didn't
care a bit about me, and were ready to desert me like
all the rest of them! It was very cruel of you, consider+
ing I was the first sweetheart that you ever had, and
you were the first I ever had; and I shall not forget it!'
"Now, Bathsheba, was ever anybody so provoking
he said, laughing. " You know it was purely that I, as
an unmarried man, carrying on a business for you as a
very taking young woman, had a proper hard part to
play -- more particular that people knew I had a sort
of feeling for'ee; and I fancied, from the way we were
mentioned together, that it might injure your good name.
Nobody knows the heat and fret I have been caused
by it.'
"And was that all?'
"All.'
"Oh, how glad I am I came!' she exclaimed, thank+
fully, as she rose from her seat. "I have thought so
much more of you since I fancied you did not want
even to see me again. But I must be going now, or I
shall be missed. Why Gabriel,' she said, with a slight
laugh, as they went to the door, "it seems exactly as if
I had come courting you -- how dreadful!'
"And quite right too,' said Oak. "I've danced at
your skittish heels, my beautiful Bathsheba, for many a
long mile, and many a long day; and it is hard to be+
grudge me this one visit.'
He accompanied her up the hill, explaining to her
the details of his forthcoming tenure of the other farm.
They spoke very little of their mutual  feeling; pretty
phrases and warm expressions being probably un+
necessary between such tried friends. Theirs was that
substantial affection which arises (if any arises at all)
when the two who are thrown together begin first by
knowing the rougher sides of each other's character,
and not the best till further on, the romance growing
up in the interstices of a mass of hard prosaic reality.
This good-fellowship -- <1camaraderie>1 --  usually occurring
through similarity of pursuits, is unfortunately seldom
superadded to love between the sexes, because men and
women associate, not in their lahours, but in their
pleasures merely. Where, however, happy circumstance
<P 459>
permits its development, the compounded feeling proves
itself to be the only love which is strong as death -- that
love which many waters cannot quench, nor the floods
drown, beside which the passion usually called by the
name is evanescent as steam.
<C lvii>
<P 460>
A FOGGY NIGHT AND MORNING -- CONCLUSION
"THE most private, secret, plaines wedding that it is
possible to have.'
Those had been Bathsheba's words to Oak one
evening, some time after the event of the preceding
chapter, and he meditated a full hour by the clock upon
how to carry out her wishes to the letter.
"A licence -- O yes, it must be a licence,' he said
to himself at last. "Very well, then; first, a license.'
On a dark night, a few days later, Oak came with
mysterious steps from the surrogate's door, in Caster+
bridge. On the way home he heard a heavy tread in
front of him, and, overtaking the man, found him to be
Coggan. They walked together into the village until
they came to a little lane behind the church, leading
down to the cottage of Laban Tall, who had lately been
installed as clerk of the parish, and was yet in mortal
terror at church on Sundays when he heard his lone
voice among certain hard words of the Psalms, whither
no man ventured to follow him.
"Well, good-night, Coggan,' said Oak, "I'm going
down this way.'
"Oh!' said Coggan, surprised; "what's going on to+
night then, make so bold Mr. Oak?'
It seemed rather ungenerous not to tell Coggan,
under the circumstances, for Coggan had been true as
steel all through the time of Gabriel's unhappiness about
Bathsheba, and Gabriel said, " You can keep a secret,
Coggan?'
"You've proved me, and you know.'
"Yes, I have, and I do know. Well, then, mistress
and I mean to get married to-morrow morning.'
"Heaven's high tower! And yet I've thought of
such a thing
<P 461>
from time to time; true, I have. But
keeping it so close! Well, there, 'tis no consarn of
amine, and I wish 'ee joy o' her.'
"Thank you, Coggan. But I assure 'ee that this
great hush is not what I wished for at all, or what
either of us would have wished if it hadn't been for
certain things that would make a gay wedding seem
hardly the thing. Bathsheba has a great wish that all
the parish shall not be in church, looking at her -- she's
shyiike and nervous about it, in fact -- so I be doing
this to humour her.'
"Ay, I see: quite right, too, I suppose I must say.
And you be now going down to the clerk.'
"Yes; you may as well come with me.'
"I am afeard your labour in keeping it close will be
throwed away,' said Coggan, as they walked along.
"Labe Tall's old woman will horn it all over parish in
half-an-hour. '
"So she will, upon my life; I never thought of
that,' said Oak, pausing. "Yet I must tell him to+
night, I suppose, for he's working so far off, and leaves
early.'
"I'll tell 'ee how we could tackle her,' said Coggan.
"I'll knock and ask to speak to Laban outside the door,
you standing in the background. Then he'll come out,
and you can tell yer tale. She'll never guess what I
want en for; and I'll make up a few words about the
farm-work, as a blind.'
This scheme was considered feasible; and Coggan
advanced boldly, and rapped at Mrs. Tall's door. Mrs.
Tall herself opened it.
"I wanted to have a word with Laban.'
"He's not at home, and won't be this side of eleven
o'clock. He've been forced to go over to Yalbury since
shutting out work. I shall do quite as well.'
"I hardly think you will. Stop a moment;' and
Coggan stepped round the corner of the porch to consult
Oak.
"Who's t'other man, then?' said Mrs. Tall.
"Only a friend,' said Coggan.
"Say he's wanted to meet mistress near church-hatch
to-morrow morning at ten,' said Oak, in a whisper.
"That he must come without fail, and wear his best
clothes.'
<P 462>
"The clothes will floor us as safe as houses!' said
Coggan.
"It can't be helped said Oak. "Tell her.'
So Coggan delivered the message. "Mind, het or
wet, blow or snow, he must come, added Jan. "'Tis
very particular, indeed. The fact is, 'tis to witness her
sign some law-work about taking shares wi' another
farmer for a long span o' years. There, that's what 'tis,
and now I've told 'ee, Mother Tall, in a way I shouldn't
ha' done if I hadn't loved 'ee so hopeless well.'
Coggan retired before she could ask any further;
and next they called at the vicar's in a manner which
excited no curiosity at all. Then Gabriel went home,
and prepared for the morrow.
"Liddy,' said Bathsheba, on going to bed that night,
"I want you to call me at seven o'clock to-morrow, In
case I shouldn't wake.'
"But you always do wake afore then, ma'am.'
"Yes, but I have something important to do, which
I'll tell you of when the time comes, and it's best to
make sure.'
CONCLUSION
Bathsheba, however, awoke voluntarily at four, nor
could she by any contrivance get to sleep again. About
six, being quite positive that her watch had stopped
during the night, she could wait no longer. She went
and tapped at Liddy's door, and after some labour awoke
her.
"But I thought it was I who had to call you?' said
the bewildered Liddy. "And it isn't six yet.'
"Indeed it is; how can you tell such a story, Liddy?
I know it must be ever so much past seven. Come to
my room as soon as you can; I want you to give my
hair a good brushing.'
When Liddy came to Bathsheba's room her mistress
was already waiting. Liddy could not understand
this extraordinary promptness. " Whatever <1is>1 going on,
ma'am?' she said.
"Well, I'll tell you,' said Bathsheba, with a mischiev+
ous smile in her bright eyes. "Farmer Oak is coming
here to dine with me to-day!'
"Farmer Oak -- and nobody else ? -- you two alone?'
"Yes.'
<P 463>
"But is it safe, ma'am, after what's been said?' asked
her companion, dubiously. "A woman's good name is
such a perishable article that --  -- '
Bathsheba laughed with a flushed cheek, and
whispered in Liddy's ear, although there was nobody
present. Then Liddy stared and exclaimcd, " Souls
alive, what news! It makes my heart go quite
bumpity-bump"
"It makes mine rather furious, too,' said Bathsheba.
"However, there's no getting out of it now!'
It was a damp disagreeable morning. Nevertheless,
at twenty minutes to ten o'clock, Oak came out of his
house, and
Went up the hill side
With that sort of stride
A man puts out when walking in search of a bride,
and knocked Bathsheba's door. Ten minutes later
a large and a smaller umbrella might have been seen
moving from the same door, and through the mist along
the road to the church. The distance was not more
than a quarter of a mile, and these two sensible persons
deemed it unnecessary to drive. An observer must have
been very close indeed to discover that the forms under
the umbrellas were those of Oak and Bathsheba, arm-in+
arm for the first time in their lives, Oak in a greatcoat
extending to his knees, and Bathsheba in a cloak that
reached her clogs. Yet, though so plainly dressed
there was a certain rejuvenated appearance about her : --
  As though a rose should shut and be a bud again.
Repose had again incarnadined her cheeks; and having,
at Gabriel's request, arranged her hair this morning as
she had worn it years ago on Norcombe Hill, she seemed
in his eyes remarkably like a girl of that fascinating
dream, which, considering that she was now only three
or four-and-twenty, was perhaps not very wonderful. In
the church were Tall, Liddy, and the parson, and in a
remarkably short space of time the deed was done.
The two sat down very quietly to tea in Bathsheba's
parlour in the evening of the same day, for it had been
arranged that
<P 464>
Farmer Oak should go there to live, since
he had as yet neither money, house, nor furniture worthy
of the name, though he was on a sure way towards them,
whilst Bathsheba was, comparatively, in a plethora of all
three.
Just as Bathsheba was pouring out a cup of tea,
their ears were greeted by the firing of a cannon,
followed by what seemed like a tremendous blowing of
trumpets, in the front of the house.
"There!' said Oak, laughing, "I knew those fellows
were up to something, by the look on their face; '
Oak took up the light and went into the porch,
followed by Bathsheba with a shawl over her head. The
rays fell upon a group of male figures gathered upon the
gravel in front, who, when they saw the newly-married
couple in the porch, set up a loud "Hurrah!' and at
the same moment bang again went the cannon in the
background, followed by a hideous clang of music from
a drum, tambourine, clarionet, serpent, hautboy, tenor+
viol, and double-bass -- the only remaining relics of the
true and original Weatherbury band -- venerable worm+
eaten instruments, which had celebrated in their own
persons the victories of Marlhorough, under the fingers
of the forefathers of those who played them now. The
performers came forward, and marched up to the
front.
"Those bright boys, Mark Clark and Jan, are at the
bottom of all this,' said Oak. " Come in, souls, and
have something to eat and drink wi' me and my wife.'
"Not to-night,' said Mr. Clark, with evident self+
denial. "Thank ye all the same; but we'll call at a
more seemly time. However, we couldn't think of
letting the day pass without a note of admiration of
some sort. If ye could send a drop of som'at down to
Warren's, why so it is. Here's long life and happiness
to neighbour Oak and his comely bride!'
"Thank ye; thank ye all,' said Gabriel. "A bit and
a drop shall be sent to Warren's for ye at once. I had
a thought that we might very likely get a salute of some
sort from our old friends, and I was saying so to my
wife but now.'
"Faith,' said Coggan, in a critical tone, turning to his
companions, "the man hev learnt to say ""my wife"'
in a wonderful
<P 465>
naterel way, considering how very youth+
ful he is in wedlock as yet -- hey, neighbours all?'
"I never heerd a skilful old married feller of twenty
years' standing pipe ""my wife"' in a more used note
than 'a did,' said Jacob Smallbury. "It might have been
a little more true to nater if't had been spoke a little
chillier, but that wasn't to be expected just now.
"That improvement will come wi' time,' said Jan,
twirling his eye.
Then Oak laughed, and Bathsheba smiled (for she
never laughed readily now), and their friends turned to
go.
"Yes; I suppose that's the size o't,' said Joseph
Poorgrass with a cheerful sigh as they moved away;
"and I wish him joy o' her; though I were once or
twice upon saying to-day with holy Hosea, in my
scripture manner, which is my second nature. ""Ephraim
is joined to idols: let him alone."' But since 'tis as 'tis
why, it might have been worse, and I feel my thanks
accordingly.'
THE END
